586642
Freightliner_Group
Freightliner Group Limited is a rail freight and logistics company, founded in 1995 and now operating in the Kingdom, Poland, and Australia. It is the second largest rail freight operator in the UK, after Schenker Rail (UK).  History File:47376 at Toddington.JPG|thumb|right|Class 47 no. 47376 in original Freightliner livery. This locomotive was used to launch the company in 1995, being named Freightliner 1995. It is now preserved on the Warwickshire Railway and is seen at Toddington station on 25 September 2005.The origins of the Freightliner concept go back to the mid-1960s with Rail under Beeching. As part of its modernisation and rationalisation programme, British Rail began moving freight using containers on flat wagons between a series of dedicated inland terminals, using gantry cranes for transshipment between road and rail.Although initially intended for domestic freight, this was soon overtaken by freight between deep-sea ports, such as Southampton Maritime and inland distribution terminals associated with centres of manufacturing or population, such as Birmingham Lawley Street. There was also a terminal which opened at Dudley,  from Birmingham, on the site of the old railway station in 1967. This proved to be one of the most profitable such terminals in the country, while the Birmingham terminal was ultimately one of the least financially viable. Yet by 1981, Freightliner UK was planning to close the Dudley terminal and transfer its staff to the Birmingham terminal in order to boost the latters fortunes. However, the Dudley terminal was reprieved in 1983, only for closure plans to re-emerge in 1986. It finally closed in 1989 and the remaining staff were transferred to Birmingham.(http://www.railaroundbirmingham.co.uk/Stations/dudley.php)In 1995, Freightliner was privatised as a stand-alone company, being bought out by its own management.In 1999, it set up its Heavy Haul business alongside its traditional Intermodal container operation. Heavy Haul initially operated railway infrastructure trains moving ballast, rails etc. and later moving into other bulk loads including cement, coal, aggregates and scrap metal.In 2004, it launched Logico, providing short-term or one-off spaces on intermodal trains.Freightliner Group Ltd was acquired by Arcapita from its previous owners 3i, Private Equity on 13 June 2008.() Management and staff also hold shares in the company. Freight operations  United Kingdom Previously part of Rail, Freightliner was privatised in 1996. The company initially only provided Intermodal services but now have four subsidiary companies, all operating under Freightliner Group Limited. Freightliner provides trunk rail services between key ports and inland rail freight interchanges within the UK, supplemented with local road services. In 1999 the company entered the bulk freight market by forming Freightliner Heavy Haul, which became a company in 2001.  Freightliner Heavy Haul operates nationwide in the coal, aggregates, cement, specialist minerals, waste and petroleum sectors. Since then, Freightliner Group has established two new subsidiaries, Freightliner Maintenance Limited, a separate entity dedicated to the repair and maintenance of traction and rolling stock, and their European subsidiary, Freightliner PL Sp. z o.o., which began operations in 2007. Poland File:Class66004 4-train.jpg|thumb|right|Freightliner PL EMD JT42CWRM #66004 awaits its next duty at the train station in Zotw, Poland on 30 September 2008.In 2006, Freightliner UK expanded its operations into Poland. A subsidiary company, Freightliner PL Sp. z o.o., was established to exploit high volumes of coal traffic and the liberalization of the Polish railway system from the government.The first train hauled coal from Bogdanka mine to Power Station on September 1, 2007. Freightliner PL operates seven exclusively-ordered EMD JT42CWRMs & 432 Greenbrier coal hopper wagons to transport the coal in Poland. FPLs locomotives and coal wagons have the ability to be interchanged to Germany. The JT42CWRMs are suitable for slow-speed-starts on long coal trains and can haul other commodities as the Polish Government has granted Freightliner PL to provide passenger and freight services besides coal. Four JT42CWR-T1 locomotives: 66586, 66582, 66583, 66584, & 66625(numbered 66008, 66009, 66010, 66011,& 66601 respectively) were sent from the Freightliner UK fleet to Poland. These units underwent various modifications to meet the requirements of Poland. FPL have also has 3 extra JT42CWRs (former Railways) on hire from HSBC Leasing.Most of Freightliner PLs services are located in the Gdansk - Warszawa corridor and southern Poland.Freightliner PL and Freightliner UK operate as separate entities, but FPL is retained as a subsidiary to Freightliner UK. Australia In 2008 the new owners of Freightliner announced that they were interested in expanding internationally, particularly in Australia.( ) Freightliner Australia Pty Ltd has since been accredited as a rail operator in the state of South Wales,() starting operations in Australia in July 2009 hauling bulk cotton.()In September 2009 mining firm Xstrata Coal signed a deal with Freightliner Australia to haul export coal in the Hunter Valley of New South Wales, commencing in late 2010 and allowing Xstrata to avoid the current incumbent rail operators.() The 10 C44aci heavy haul locomotives and rollingstock will be purchased outright by Xstrata from manufacturer Rail.( ) Fleet history In its early days, the company struggled with an aging fleet of Class 47 locomotives, supplemented by Class 86 and newer Class 90 locomotives. In order to increase reliability, in 19971998, six Class 47 locomotives were rebuilt by Traction, Loughborough with General Motors engines and reconditioned alternators, emerging as Class 57 locomotives. A further six locomotives were rebuilt in 19992000.A large fleet of Class 66 has subsequently been acquired from Diesel.In November 2007 Freightliner Group announced an order for 30 Transportation Systems JS37ACi locos under a project called Project Genesis.() The planned locomotives were given the new project name PowerHaul in 2008 and have been designed with new technology engines and control systems to minimise the levels of emissions produced.  These locomotives will receive the TOPS classification Class 70. Several have already been delivered and are already in service as of May 2010.File:57012 Freightliner Envoy at Ipswich.JPG|Class 57 no. 57012 Freightliner Envoy at Ipswich on 31 January 2004. This class was rebuilt from redundant Class 47 locomotives by Traction.File:Class 66 railway locomotive - Freightliner livery - Virginia Water station - England - 280404.jpg|The new order - Class 66 no. 66534 OOCL Express in the new Freightliner livery, at Virginia Water station, April 2004File:Dundee Railway Station 01.JPG|Class 66 no. 66605, with Freightliner 40 - 1965-2005 logo, at Dundee on 6 June 2007File:86613_and_86610_at_Ipswich.JPG|Class 86 nos. 86613 and 86610 in the new Freightliner livery at Ipswich on 14 February 2004.File:Freightliner class 70 number 70001 leaves Claycross Tunnel.jpg|Rail Class 70 (PowerHaul) 70001 leaves Cross Tunnel working 0Z70 Lawley Street - Leeds Midland RoadFile:Banbury_Frieghtliner_2001..png|A Freightliner loco in Banbury station during 2001. It is in its old Rail livery.  Locomotives UK operationsPolish operations() References  External links * Freightliner* Freightliner PL (in Polish)* Logico* Mike Smith, Air Braked Container Services, Goods and Not So Goods website, 2003(Bahngesellschaft)(Royaume-Uni)(UK)
588998
Smolyan_Province
Smolyan Province ( - Oblast Smolyan, former name Smolyan okrug) is a province in Southern-central Bulgaria, located in the Mountains, neighbouring Greece to the south. It is named after its administrative and industrial centre - the city of Smolyan. The province embraces a territory of 3,192.8 km( Bulgarian Provinces area and population 1999  National Center for Regional Development  page 90-91) that is divided into 10 municipalities with a total population of 124,795 inhabitants, as of December 2009.( Bulgarian National Statistical Institute - Bulgarian provinces and municipalities in 2009)( WorldCityPopulation)(pop-stat.mashke.org) Municipalitiesthumb|260px|Municipalities of Smolyan provinceThe Smolyan province (, oblast) contains 10 municipalities(Oblast Haskovo, official website) (singular: o, obshtina - plural: , obshtini). The following table shows the names of each municipality in English and Cyrillic, the main town or village (towns are shown in bold), and the population of each as of December 2009.Demography260px|thumb|right|The Miraculous bridgesThe Smolyan province had a population of 140,066(( according to the 2001 census, of which  were male and  were female.( Population to 01.03.2001 by Area and Sex from Bulgarian National Statistical Institute: Census 2001)As of the end of 2009, the population of the province, announced by the Bulgarian National Statistical Institute, numbered 124,795( of which  are inhabitants aged over 60 years.( Bulgarian National Statistical Institute - Population by age in 2009)The following table represents the change of the population in the province after War II:ReligionThe Smolyan province along with the Province is a province where the predominant religion is not Orthodox Christianity but Islam. However, unlike Kardzhali where the majority of the population is Turkish, the Muslim population of the Smolyan province is made up almost entirely of Bulgarians.Religious adherence in the province according to 2001 census:( Religious adherence in Bulgaria - census 2001)LanguageIn the 2001 census, 135,761 people from the Smolyan province identified one of the following as their tongue (with percentage of total population): 129,181 Bulgarian (), 5,782 Turkish (), 532 Roma (Gypsy) () and 266 other ().( Population to 01.03.2001 by District and Mother Tongue from Bulgarian National Statistical Institute: Census 2001)Ethnic groupsIn the 2001 census, 132,654 people from the Smolyan province identified themselves as belonging to one of the following ethnic groups (with percentage of total population):( Population to 01.03.2001 by District and Ethnic Group from Bulgarian National Statistical Institute: Census 2001) Economy The economy of the province is based on tourism, mining, timber and machine industries and livestock raising. The main crops of the region are potatoes (about 30% of the national production), rye and barley; but sheep, pigs and cattle are of greater importance for the agriculture. In the eastern parts of the province are located more than 20 lead and zinc mines, which form one of the most extensive ore deposits in the Balkans. The dense coniferous forests are prerequisite for well developed timber industry in Dospat, Smolyan, Devin. In Smolyan there are big plants producing machine tools and other machinery, while textile industry is mainly developed to the east in Nedelino, Zlatograd, Madan and Rudozem. There is also a synthetic rubber plant in Madan.Nowadays, tourism is the backbone of the economy, especially in winter due to the excellent ski resorts of Pamporovo and Chepelare; having been completely renovated and modernized. The only factory for skiing equipment is located in Chepelare and employs 400 people. The mineral springs in Devin and Beden are very popular among tourists. The beautiful, unspoilt nature and the spectacular gorges, rock bridges and caves attract many people from around the country as well as foreign tourists, while the numerous dams are popular with campers and fishermen.See also*of Bulgaria*of villages in Smolyan ProvinceReferences( External links * Pictures from Smolyan ProvinceNorthwest  Provincede Smolianoblast(provins)Smoljanpiirkondde SmolyanSmoljan(oblast)SmoljanSmolyandi Smoljan(provincia)sritis(oblast)ja:Smolan(provncia)Smolian(rajon)(oblas)ili(tnh)(lalawigan)zh:
590687
Cobblestone
Image:Acorn Street Beacon Hill Boston Massachusetts.JPG|thumb|right|Built in the late 1820s, Acorn Street of Hill, Boston is paved with cobblestones.Cobblestones are stones that were frequently used in the pavement of early streets. Cobblestone is derived from the very old English word cob, which had a wide range of meanings, one of which was rounded lump with overtones of large size. Cobble, which appeared in the 15th century, simply added the diminutive suffix le to cob, and meant a small stone rounded by the flow of water; essentially, a large pebble. It was these smooth cobbles, gathered from stream beds, that paved the first cobblestone streets.Note that cobble is a generic geological term for any stone having dimensions between 2.510 inches. A cobbled area is known as a causey, cassay or cassie in Scots (probably from causeway).(Scottish National Dictionary Association (1999) Concise Scots Dictionary . Edinburgh, Polygon. ISBN 1-902930-01-0)Use in roadingthumb|right|Italian cobblestone-covered street in Isola Bella. Cobblestones such as these are designed for horses to get a good grip.Cobblestones are typically either set in sand or similar material, or are bound together with mortar. Paving with cobblestones allows a road to be heavily used all year long. It prevents the build-up of ruts often found in roads. It has the additional advantage of not getting muddy in wet weather or dusty in dry weather. The fact that carriage wheels, horse hooves and even modern automobiles make a lot of noise when rolling over cobblestone paving might be thought a disadvantage, but it has the advantage of warning pedestrians of their approach. In England, the custom was to strew the cobbles outside the house of a sick or dying person with straw to dampen the sound.Cobblestones set in sand have the environmental advantage of being paving, and of flexing rather than cracking with movements in the ground.Use todayCobblestones were largely replaced by quarried granite setts in the nineteenth century.  Cobblestone is often wrongly used to describe such treatment. Setts were relatively even and roughly rectangular stones that were laid in regular patterns.  They gave a smoother ride for carts than cobbles, although in heavily used sections, such as in yards and the like, the usual practice was to replace the setts by parallel granite slabs set apart by the standard axle length of the time.Cobblestoned and setted streets gradually gave way to macadam roads, and later to tarmac, and finally to asphalt at the beginning of the 20th century. However, cobble&shy;stones are often retained in historic areas, even for streets with modern vehicular traffic. Many older villages and cities in Europe are still paved with cobblestones. In recent decades, cobblestones have become a popular material for paving newly pedestrianised streets in Europe. In this case, the noisy nature of the surface is an advantage as pedestrians can hear approaching vehicles. The visual cues of the cobblestones also clarify that the area is more than just a normal street.() The use of cobblestones/setts is also considered to be a more upmarket roadway solution, having been described as unique and artistic compared to the normal asphalt road environment.()In older U.S. cities such as Boston, Pittsburgh, York City, Chicago, Francisco, Portland, Baltimore, and Philadelphia, many of the older streets are paved in cobblestones and setts (mostly setts); however, many such streets have been paved over with asphalt, which can crack and erode away due to heavy traffic, thus revealing the original stone pavement.thumb|right|Setts visible beneath cracked asphalt in New Bedford, MA.In some places such as Saskatchewan, Canada, as late as the 1990s some busy intersections still showed cobblestones through worn down sections of pavement. Many cities in Latin America, such as Aires, Argentina; Zacatecas and Guanajuato, in Mexico; San Juan, Rico and Montevideo, Uruguay, richly influenced by many European architectural features, are well known for their many cobblestone streets, which are still operational and in good condition. They are still maintained and repaired the old fashion way, by placing and arranging granite stones by hand.Cobblestone roads are a decisive element in some of the biggest professional cycling races. The of Flanders and ParisRoubaix are especially well known for their many long cobblestone sections.In the Republic, there are old cobblestone paths with colored marbles and limestones. The design with three colors (red/limestone, black/limestone, white/marble) has a long tradition in Bohemia. The cubes of the old ways are handmade.Use in architectureIn the Lakes Region of New York State, the retreat of the glaciers during the last ice age left numerous small, rounded cobblestones available for building.  Pre-Civil War architecture in the region made heavy use of cobblestones for walls.  Today, the fewer than 600 remaining cobblestone buildings are prized as historic locations, most of them private homes. They are clustered south of Lake Ontario, between Buffalo and Syracuse. There is also a cluster of cobblestone buildings in the Town of Paris, Ontario. In addition to homes, cobblestones were used to build barns, stagecoach taverns, smokehouses, stores, churches, schools, factories, and cemetery markers. The history of building with cobblestones and 17 driving tours to see the remaining structures are found in Cobblestone Quest - Road Tours of New Yorks Historic Buildings.The only public cobblestone building is the Classical School, located in NY.thumb|right|The Alexander Classical School three-story cobblestone building in Alexander, NY.Cultural ReferencesCobblestone is referenced in the chorus of the song Cold as Cobblestone by Tundra Archive.In Simpsons, cobblestone is comedically referred to on multiple occasions by Moe as an ingredient in the drinks he serves.Cobblestone has the item code 4 in the video game Minecraft, and can be obtained by mining stone.See also*Pavement*Calsada*Empedrado (used in Aires, Argentina)Referencesbg:lt:Gargdasru:sr:sv:Kullersten
593873
Byron_Bay,_New_South_Wales
 location2 Brisbanethumb|right|160px|Tallow Beach looking south from the lighthousethumb|right|160px|Overlooking Wategos with Julian Rocks in the backgroundthumb|right|160px|Byron Bay with sugar cane burning in the distanceByron Bay is a beachside town located in the far-northeastern corner of the state of South Wales, Australia. It is located  north of Sydney and  south of Brisbane. Byron, a headland adjacent to the town, is the easternmost point of mainland Australia. At the 2006 Census, the town had a permanent population of 4,981.( The town is in turn the nucleus of Shire, which has in excess of 28,000 residents.() Captain Cook named Cape Byron after circumnavigator of the world Byron, grandfather of the poet, Byron.() History For thousands of years Aboriginal people came to the Bay to swap stories, find marriage partners, and trade goods. They called it Cavvanbah.The history of Europeans in Byron Bay began in 1770, when Captain Cook found a safe anchorage and named Byron after Byron, who had circumnavigated the world and who was later the grandfather of English poet Lord Byron. In the 1880s, when Europeans settled more permanently, streets were named for other English writers and philosophers.()The first industry in Byron was cedar-getting, the Red Centre from the Australian red cedar, australis. The timber industry is the origin of the word shoot in many local names  Possum Shoot, Coopers Shoot and Skinners Shoot  where the timber-cutters would shoot the logs down the hills to be dragged to waiting ships.Byron Bay has a history of primary industrial production (dairy factory,(Creamery Tramway at Byron Bay Longworth, Jim Australian Railway Historical Society Bulletin, October, 1996 pp295-298) abattoirs, whaling until 1963, fishing) and was a significant, but hazardous, sea port. The first jetty was built in 1886, and the railway was connected in 1894, and Cavvanbah became Byron Bay in 1894.( Dairy farmers cleared more land and settled the area. In 1895, the Norco Co-operative was formed to provide cold storage and manage the dairy industry.((http://www.norco.com.au/publish/history/index.php) The introduction of paspalum improved production, and Byron Bay exported butter to the world.  The Norco factory was the biggest in the southern hemisphere, expanding from dairy to bacon and other processed meat.The lighthouse was built in 1901 at the most easterly point on the Australian mainland.( In 1930, the first meatworks opened.()Despite this success, Byron Bay struggled to become a viable community, and was always a poor working town.  The smell from the meat and dairy works was, by all accounts, appalling, and the annual slaughter of whales in the 1950s and 1960s made matters worse.  Sand mining between the World Wars damaged the environment further, and one by one, all these industries declined. After all the factories and industries closed, surfers discovered the wonderful natural breaks at The Pass, Wategos, and Cosy Corner. The longboarders arrived in the 1960s.  This was the beginning of Byron Bay as a tourist destination, and by 1973, when the Festival was held in Nimbin, its reputation as a hippy, happy, alternative town was established. Geography Byron Bay is part of the erosion caldera of an ancient volcano, the Volcano, which erupted 23 million years ago. The volcano formed as a result of the Plate moving over the Australia hotspot. Education Byron Bay is home to several schools and educational institutions. Schools include Bay Public School, Bay High School, St Finbarrs Primary School, Byron Bay Community School, and Byron Rudolf Steiner School. Among these are a number of early childhood facilities including Byron Bay Preschool and Periwinkle Preschool. In the fields of adult education there are Lexis English Centres (previously Global Village English Centres) and Byron Bay English Language School (both organisations providing English language tuition to international students), the Byron Region Community College, which is a registered training organisation and the SAE Institute Byron Bay which is a government-accredited, degree granting institution in the fields of audio engineering, digital film making, multimedia and animation. Tourism thumb|The main beach in 2006File:Byron Bay Lighthouse.JPG|thumb|Bay LighthouseThe town has several beaches which are popular for surfing. It is a resort popular with both domestic and international tourists, including backpackers, who travel along the Australian coast, and the scenery attracts sky divers. The area is also noted for its wildlife, with the watching industry a significant contributor to the local economy.An oceanway runs from the centre of town to the Cape Byron lighthouse. Visitors are encouraged to use sustainable options for moving around town like walking and cycling.Temperate and tropical waters merge at Byron Bay, making it a popular area for diving and snorkelling. Most diving is done at Rocks which is part of the recently established Byron Marine Park and only a few minutes boat ride from Main Beach.Byron Bay also lies close to subtropical rainforests, and areas such as the National Park with the Falls are all within easy reach of the town.Byron Bay is now also a popular destination for week during late November and early December.()HeritageThe following places are listed on the of the National Estate:(The Heritage of Australia, Macmillan Company, 1981, p.2/214)* Cape Byron Lighthouse, built in 1901* Broken Head Nature Reserve (south of Byron Bay)* Brunswick Heads Nature Reserve (north of Byron Bay)* Julian Rocks Nature Reserve* Two Sisters Rocks, located on Broken HeadEventsEvents held at Byron Bay include yoga retreats, pagan gatherings,  music festivals such as the Coast Blues & Roots Music Festival at Easter and in the Grass (which has since moved to Queensland), the Bay Writers Festival,(Byron Bay Writers Festival) the Bay Film Festival and the Byron Underwater Festival.(Byron Underwater Festival) The vibrant musical community has produced internationally renowned bands such as King Brown, Drive and Lions.Byron Bay also has a number of regular markets including a weekly market(Byron Bay Farmers Market) at the Butler Street Reserve every Thursday with over 70 local farmers selling fresh produce. There is also a craft market held on the same site on the first Sunday of each month and an artisan market(Byron Artisan Market) held on Saturday evenings at Railway Park.The Byron Bay Triathlon is held on the second Saturday in May every year.1300 competitors from many different countries enter this Olympic Distance event. Media The Byron Bay area has a number of newspapers:*The Shire Echo (Independent weekly A3)*The Byron Shire News (APN weekly A3)*The Northern Star (APN daily)*The Saturday Star (Independent A5 monthly)*The Bagg (Independent weekly A3 gig guide)Radio stations in Byron area:*2LM 900 AM (commercial)*Triple Z FM 100.9 (commercial)*J 96.1 FM*Radio National 96.9 FM*Classic FM 95.3 FM*Northern Rivers 94.5 FM*Bay FM 99.9 FM (community)All major television channels are available in Byron Bay and the wider Northern Rivers region. The networks and the channels they broadcast are listed as follows:*Television, 7Two on PRIME, (Network affiliated channels).*Television, (Australian TV channel) channel, (Network Australia).*Cross Ten and HD, (Ten Australia).*(ABC Television) including ABC1, ABC2 and ABC3, part of the Broadcasting Corporation.*Broadcasting Service, ONE and Two.Filming locationof Everything is an ABC television drama series filmed in Byron Bay and released on 30 March 2008. The program is broadcast from Melbourne and Sydney.Notable residents*Bargh, TV presenter.* Space Cowboy is a record-breaking sword swallower and street performer who hails from Byron Bay.* Drive, a Metalcore band formed in 2002 that have toured around the world several times.* Allen, musician.* Darville, actor.ReferencesExternal links*Byron Bay Visitor Centre - Byron Bay Accommodation & Tours*Byron Shire News*BayBayBayBayBayBayru:-uk:-zh:
595192
Warrandyte,_Victoria
Warrandyte SouthWarrandyte is a suburb in Melbourne, Victoria, Australia, 24 km north-east from Melbournes central business district. Its Local Government Area is the of Manningham. At the 2006 Census, Warrandyte had a population of 7393. Warrandyte is bounded in the west by Mullum Creek and Target Road, in the north by the River, in the east by Jumping Creek and Anzac Road, and in the south by an irregular line from Reynolds Road north of Donvale, Park Orchards and Warrandyte South.Warrandyte was founded as a Victorian town located in the once gold-rich rolling hills east of Victoria, and is now on the north-eastern boundary of suburban Melbourne. Gold was first discovered in the town in 1851 and together with towns like Victoria and Victoria, led the way in gold discoveries during the gold rush. Today Warrandyte retains much of its past in its surviving buildings of the Colonial period and remains a twin community with North Warrandyte which borders the River to its north. Today the town and suburb is well known for its residents positive attitude towards the environment. Conservation programs run regularly and areas of land small and large have been set aside for conservation or ecological restoration purposes. The Warrandyte Festival is held every year in mid March, a parade, live music, food and shopping stalls and kids activities are some of the things that can be seen at the festival, which is one of the last remaining volunteer-run festivals in Victoria.EtymologyIn Aboriginal mythology (see dreamtime), a Wurundjeri dreamtime story tells of a great eagle; the all powerful, ever watchful creator of the world named Bunjil, who once gazed down upon his people from the star Altair and saw their wrong doing. Awaiting their return, with a mighty crash of thunder, he hurled down a star to destroy them. Where the star struck created a gorge in which much of the town today is located. Bunjils people remembered the spot, and referred to it as Warrandyte speculated to mean that which is thrown.(Warrandyte Diary, Number 389, August 2006.)HistoryPre-European settlementThe area was originally occupied by one or more clans of the Wurundjeri, Australians of the Kulin nation, who spoke variations of the Woiwurrung language group. Warrandyte was an important place to them as the geology formed a natural gorge which inspired many of the Wurundjeri dreamtime stories, such as those associated with Bunjil. They managed the land sustainably for tens of thousands of years. One example of this can be found in the tradition whereby neighbouring clans agreed to cease fishing in the River once fish populations became low; this gave the fish the opportunity to repopulate the area and prevented the human-induced extinction of any species. This principle was also applied to hunting and gathering on land and the use of trees.Gold discovery and miningIn 1851, gold was first discovered in Victoria in Warrandyte at Andersons Creek by Louis Michel, the approximate location of the site is marked by a cairn on Fourth Hill in the State Park.(Melway Edition 33 2006 (Pages 22,23,24,34,35 & 36)) This marked the start of the gold rush, however more substantial discoveries in the Ballarat and Bendigo region initially drew prospectors away from Warrandyte. While some mining did occur in the area throughout the peak of the gold rush, it wasnt until the late 19th century, after gold discoveries reduced in the more popular regions, that the area around Warrandyte was intensively mined, particularly around Fourth Hill and Whipstick Gully. Some areas continued to be mined up until the 1960s. Warrandyte Post Office opened on 1 August 1857.()Throughout Warrandyte the river shows signs of being exploited during this time, a classic example being the tunnel at Bend. The river was partially dammed at Pound Bend near Normans Reserve at its eastern entrance and near Bobs wetlands at its western exit. Miners then blasted a 300m long tunnel through solid rock. The river was then fully dammed at the entrance and exit to the tunnel and water was diverted through 300m and out the other side leaving 3.85 km of riverbed around Pound Bend exposed, ready to be mined.Artists colonyImage:Clara Southern - The Road to Warrandyte, 1905-1910.jpg|thumb|Southern, The Road to Warrandyte, ca. 19051910In the early 20th century, Warrandyte became a popular destination for artists of the School who sought subject matter further into the bush. This led to the development of an artists camp and small colony. Though not as substantial as the older colonies at Heidelberg and Box Hill, several artists, such as Southern and Withers, who were associated with the Heidelberg School, took up residence in Warrandyte.(Hammond, Victoria; Peers, Juliet. Completing the Picture: Women Artists and the Heidelberg Era. Artmoves, 1992. ISBN 0646074938, p. 26) Others followed, including Boyd, Harold Herbert and Jo Sweatman.Potters CottageIn 1958, a group of potters  looking for a way of exhibiting and selling their wares, opened the Potters Cottage in a small miners hut near the Warrandyte bridge.  The founding members were Artur Halpern, Preston, Phyl Dunn, McLaren and Charles Wilton.  Sylvia Halpern, Kate Janeeba and Elsa Ardern, joined the group in 1961 after the cottage had moved to a farmhouse at the corner of Jumping Creek and Ringwood-Warrandyte roads. The only non potter member being John Hipwell an architect. The last member of the group was Peter Laycock, who joined in 1969.  The cottage continued to operate until 2005.The bridgeImage:Penleigh Boyd - Bridge and Wattle at Warrandyte, 1914.jpg|thumb|Boyd, Bridge and Wattle at Warrandyte, 1914Warrandyte has always had some form of river crossing at the site of its current bridge. Before the time of bridges, punts were used to cross the River into Warrandyte. Prior to the construction of the Upper Yarra Dam, heavy downpours led to flood waters that washed away Warrandytes punt downstream into Templestowe, whose residents then decided to use it to cross the Yarra at the present day site of the Swingbridge near Oddesey House. The first bridge was built in Warrandyte in 1861 after much lobbying by  residents. The majority of funding came from the government, with the difference made up by residents of Warrandye and North Warrandyte. Built entirely out of local timber, the bridge was located 5 mi east of the current bridge and stood for 90 years until the mid 1950s saw the current bridge constructed from new materials in Australia at the time: concrete and iron.BushfiresMajor bushfires have swept through Warrandyte throughout history, and the town was at the centre of the Friday bushfires in 1939, in which 71 people lost their lives. Many examples of colonial architecture have been destroyed by bushfires, however, there are still a few original buildings that survive to this day. Recent attempts by the Warrandyte CFA at backburning sections of bushland to minimise fuel for fires during the bushfire season have contributed to the town being well prepared if a major fire does take hold in the area. Warrandyte residents are constantly aware of the risk bushfires pose to the area and most are well prepared with evacuation plans and bushfire preparations.Also the Black Sataurday fires in Kinglake were 15 minutes away from North Warrandyte. Major bushfires to have swept through Warrandyte include:*1851 - February 6 Black Thursday*1939 - January 13 Black Friday*1962 - January 1416GeographyImage:Pound Bend tunnel.JPG|thumb|Pound bend tunnel was created by gold miners during the gold rush to divert the River.Warrandyte is situated on the southern banks of the River. The river and hills surrounding the town were once rich in gold, and the ruins of mineshafts and tunnels can be found throughout the State Park amongst other locations. While the central town itself is nestled into a gorge on the river, the suburb covers a reasonably large area of land and can be divided up into the following sections:Central Warrandyte and the YarraCentral Warrandyte comprises the main street of Ringwood-Warrandyte Road and Heidelberg-Warrandyte Road (Yarra Street), Pound bend and the southern banks of the Yarra River. This is sometimes referred to as central Warrandyte or the town, in contrast to the suburbs extending to the south and west.Around Andersons CreekAndersons Creek flows from neighbouring South Warrandyte and Warranwood into the Yarra just before the beginning of Pound Bend. This area is where several gullies converge and create a geographical hole with Fourth Hill to the east and the hills on the eastern banks of the Mullum Mullum Creek to the west. This becomes evident when driving through Warrandyte on Heidelberg-Warrandyte Road, as the hills guide the road down towards Andersons Creek.The Eastern banks of the Mullum Mullum CreekThe Eastern banks of the Mullum Creek were home to vast orchards overflowing from neighbouring East Doncaster and as a result, much of the vegetation has been cleared. Today the area is covered in large residential properties due to local council regulations allowing land to be subdivided into larger sites. Further south from here, Aumanns Orchard can be found, one of the last surviving operational orchards in the area.Vast areas of land around Warrandyte are governed by Parks Victoria or are privately owned such as Longridge Farm. These areas contain dense populations of many different varieties of Eucalyptus Trees.Warrandyte is home to or borders the following rivers and creeks:(* The River* Jumping Creek* Parson Gully* Mullum Creek* Andersons CreekSome geographical features that can be found in Warrandyte include:(* Harris Gully* Beauty Gully* Fourth Hill* Pound Bend* Pound Bend Tunnel* The Island* Black Flat* Whipstick Gully* Specimen GullyEcologyThe vegetation in the area was almost entirely cleared during the late 19th century, mostly for agriculture, housing and for mining purposes. The threat of bushfires, several of which destroyed parts of or the entire town, the distance from Melbourne and later, the establishment of the green wedge, halted any large scale development throughout the 20th century. This enabled the native vegetation to regenerate and much of what is seen today was grown back since the late 19th and early 20th centuries.TransportationWarrandyte is serviced primarily by the private car, however a bus service is run by the Ventura (formerly the National) bus company along the main roads of Ringwood-Warrandyte Road (route number:  & ) and Heidelberg-Warrandyte Road (Yarra Street) (route numbers: Occ, Occ, Occ, 155-6 , 906, 364  , ). The service interchanges at the bridge (route numbers: 155-6, 159, 201Occ, 304, 305Occ & 308Occ). These two roads service the suburb by car as well as bus. Traffic flowing through Warrandyte usually contains residents traveling from or to East Doncaster, Wonga Park, North Warrandyte and Park Orchards, however, due to Warrandytes geographical position, it can at times be used to travel to and from suburbs further away.Peak hour traffic always flows to and from west and south of Warrandyte along its main roads, this traffic is either trying to get out of surrounding suburbs or to the Eastern Freeway.Major local roads in Warrandyte include:(* Reynolds Road* Tindals Road* Beauty Gully Road* Harris Gully Road* Gold Memorial Road* Pound Road* Webb Street* Jumping Creek Road* Yarra StreetCommunityImage:Sulphur-crested Cockatoos in Warrandyte.jpg|thumb|Cockatoos at the Stonehouse Cafe in Warrandyte.thumb|19th century Victorian house, converted into a shop, on Yarra Street, Warrandyte.Warrandyte is well known for its residents positive attitude towards the environment. Conservation programs run regularly and areas of land small and large have been set aside for conservation or environmental restoration purposes. In homage to this community spirit, the Warrandyte Festival, one of the last remaining volunteer-run festivals in Victoria, is held every year in mid March. Typically, the festival features a variety of attractions. Many stalls sell local produce or crafts, and there are numerous historical exhibits, as well as safety demonstrations by the CFA. A variety of live music stages are set up, with stages specifically catering for youth bands from the community. The festival parade is a feature of the festival, with bands, community orientated groups and schools all partaking in a morning march through the town.Warrandyte contains a general post office, tennis courts, a community centre, an RSL, several and Breakfasts, restaurants, a police station, a CFA Fire Station, two kindergartens, two recreational ovals (AFL Football and Cricket), Warrandyte Community Church, Uniting and Anglican places of worship, Andersons Creek Cemetery and a Scout hall, canoe launching ramps, a skatepark, nurseries and tearooms and the Crystal Brook Holiday Centre.(Melways Street Directory, 33rd Edition 2006.)Educational Facilities in Warrandyte:(* High School* Andersons Creek Primary School* Warrandyte Primary SchoolShopping Strips & Centres in Warrandyte:* Goldfields Plaza* Street Shops either side of the Main Roads around the BridgeParklands and recreationMany people who live outside of Warrandyte travel to the suburb to partake in different recreational activities, as well as its residents. These include walking, bike riding, mountain biking, tennis, basketball, football (AFL), cricket, swimming in the River, canoeing, kayaking, skateboarding and bushwalking among many others.Parks, Gardens and Reserves in Warrandyte:(* State Park (including Pound Bend, Fourth Hill, Black Flat, Mount Lofty and other areas)* Pound Bend Reserve* Stiggants Reserve* Warrandyte Reserve/Taroona Reserve (Home to the Warrandyte Cricket Club, which is the 4th oldest in Victoria formed in 1855), Warrandyte The Bloods Football Club competing in the Eastern Football League () and Junior Football Clubs and Warrandyte Netball Club)* Longridge Farm* Alexander Reserve* Bush Park (Environment Centre and Wildlife Enclosure)* Wildflower Reserve* Andersons Creek Streamside ReserveSee also* of Doncaster and Templestowe - the former local government area of which Warrandyte was a part*district of Warrandyte* of Melbourne suburbs* gold rush* Manningham Municipal Council Offices. See - of ManninghamReferencesde:Warrandyte()
597785
Adverse_possession
Adverse possession is a process by which premises can change ownership. It is a law concept concerning the title to property (land and the fixed structures built upon it). By adverse possession, title to anothers real property can be acquired without compensation, by holding the property in a manner that conflicts with the true owners rights for a specified period.  For example, squatters rights are a specific form of adverse possession.The circumstances in which adverse possession arises determine the type of title acquired by the disseisor (the one who obtains the title from the original owner), which may be simple title, rights, or another interest in real property. Adverse possessions origins are based both in statutory actions and in common law precepts, so the details concerning adverse possession actions vary by jurisdiction. The required period of uninterrupted possession is governed by the of limitations. Other elements of adverse possession are judicial constructs. History At common law, where entitlement to possession of land was in dispute (originally only in what were known as real actions), the person claiming a right to possession was not allowed to allege that the land had come into his possession in the past (in older terminology that he had been put into seisin) at a time before the reign of Henry I.(See Bevils Case 10 Co. Rep.) The law recognized a cut off date going back into the past, before which date the law would not be interested. There was no requirement for a defendant to show any form of adverse possession.As time went on, the date was moved by statute -- first to the reign of Henry II(By the Statute of Merton,  20 H. 3), and then to the reign of I.(Statute of Westminster I, 3 Edw 1 c. 29 listed in the chronological table of statutes as the Limitation of Prescription Act 1275. The situation was more complicated, the reign of Richard I applying only to Writs of Right.) No further changes were made of this kind.By the reign of VIII the fact that there had been no changes to the cutoff date had become very inconvenient. A new approach was taken whereby the person claiming possession had to show possession of the land for a continuous period, a certain number of years (60, 50 or 30 depending on the kind of claim made) before the date of the claim.(32 H. 8 c.2 (Limitation of Prescription 1540)) Later statutes have shortened the limitation period in most common law jurisdictions. Purpose and moral basis Adverse possession exists to cure potential or actual defects in real estate titles by putting a statute of limitations on possible litigation over ownership and possession.Because of the doctrine of adverse possession, a landowner can be secure in title to his land.  Otherwise, long-lost heirs of any former owner, possessor or lien holder of centuries past could come forward with a legal claim on the property. The doctrine of adverse possession prevents this.This means the law may be used to reward a person who possesses the land of another for a requisite period of time. Failure of a landowner to exercise and defend his property rights for a certain period may result in the permanent loss of the landowners interest in the property.Requirements for adverse possessionThe adverse party is called the disseisor, meaning one who dispossesses the true owner of the property. The disseisor must openly occupy the property exclusively, keeping out others, and use it as if it were his own. Some jurisdictions permit accidental adverse possession as might occur with a surveying error. Generally, the openly hostile possession must be continual (although not necessarily continuous or constant) without challenge or permission from the lawful owner, for a fixed statutory period to acquire title. Where the property is of a type ordinarily occupied only during certain times (such as a summer cottage), the disseisor may need to have only exclusive, open, and hostile possession during those successive useful periods, making the same use of the property as an owner would for the required number of years.Basic requirements for adverse possessionAdverse possession requires at a minimum five basic conditions being met to perfect the title of the disseisor. These are:*Actual possession of the property  The disseisor must physically use the land as a property owner would, in accordance with the type of property, location, and uses. Merely walking or hunting on land does not establish actual possession. In Cone v. West Virginia Pulp & Paper, the States Court of Appeals for the Fourth Circuit held that Cone failed to establish actual possession by occasionally visiting the land and hunting on it, because his actions did not change the land from a wild and natural state. The actions of the disseisor must change the state of the land, as by clearing, mowing, planting, harvesting fruit of the land, logging or cutting timber, mining, fencing, pulling tree stumps, running livestock and constructing buildings or other improvements.*Open and notorious use of the property  The disseisors use of the property is so visible and apparent that it gives notice to the legal owner that someone may assert claim. It must be of such character that would give notice to a reasonable person. If legal owner has knowledge, this element is met; it can be also met by fencing, opening or closing gates or an entry to the property, posted signs, crops, buildings, or animals that a diligent owner could be expected to know about.*Exclusive use of the property  The disseisor holds the land to the exclusion of the true owner. If, for example, the disseisor builds a barn on the owners property, and the owner then uses the barn, the disseisor cannot claim exclusive use. (Note: There may be more than one adverse possessor, taking as tenants in common, so long as the other elements are met.)*Hostile or adverse use of the property  The disseisor entered or used the land without permission. Renters, hunters or others who enter the land with permission are not hostile. The disseisors motivations may be viewed by the court in several ways: Objective viewused without true owners permission and inconsistent with true owners rights. Bad faith or intentional trespass viewused with the adverse possessors subjective intent and state of mind (mistaken possession in some jurisdictions does not constitute hostility). Good faith viewa few courts have required that the party mistakenly believed that it is his land. All views require that the disseisor openly claim the land against all possible claims.*Continuous use of the property  The disseisor must, for statute of limitations purposes, hold that property continuously for the entire limitations period, and use it as a true owner would for that time. This element focuses on adverse possessors time on the land, not how long true owner has been dispossessed of it.  Occasional activity on the land with long gaps in activity fail the test of continuous possession.  Courts have ruled that merely cutting timber at intervals, when not accompanied by other actions that demonstrate actual and continuous possession, fails to demonstrate continuous possession.  If the true owner ejects the disseisor from the land, verbally or through legal action, and after some time the disseisor returns and dispossesses him again, then the statute of limitation starts over from the time of the disseisors return.  He cannot count the time between his ejection by the true property owner and the date on which he returned.Specific requirements for adverse possessionA court may require some combination of the following as elements of the basic requirements for adverse possession listed above.  Which of these applies varies by jurisdiction and may be a result of interpreting common law or of statute.*Claim of title or claim of right. The Court of the United States has ruled that the mere intent to take the land as ones own constitutes claim of right.  Other cases have determined that a claim of right exists if the person believes he has rightful claim to the property, even if that belief is mistaken. A negative example would be a timber thief who sneaks onto a property, cuts timber not visible from the road, and hauls the logs away at night. His actions, though they demonstrate actual possession, also demonstrate knowledge of guilt, as opposed to claim of right.*Good faith (in a minority of states) or bad faith (sometimes called the Maine Rule although it is now abolished in Maine)*Improvement, cultivation, or enclosure (California Code of Civil Procedure Section 323, 325)*Payment of property taxes.  This may be required by statute, such as in California (California Code of Civil Procedure Section 325), or just a contributing element to a courts determination of possession.  Both payment by the disseisor and by the true owner are relevant.*A legal document that appears (incorrectly) to give the disseisor title.  (California Code of Civil Procedure Section 323)*Dispossession not under force of arms. Dispossession by armed invasion does not establish a claim of adverse possession against the true owner. Effect of adverse possession A disseisor will be committing a civil trespass on the property he has taken and the owner of the property could cause him to be evicted by an action in trespass (ejectment) or by bringing an action for possession. All common law jurisdictions require that an ejectment action be brought within a specified time, after which the true owner is assumed to have acquiesced. The effect of a failure by the true landowner to evict the adverse possessor depends on the jurisdiction, but will eventually result in title by adverse possession.In some jurisdictions (such as and Wales), the title of the landowner will be automatically extinguished once the relevant limitation period has passed. This process now applies only to unregistered land.In other jurisdictions, the disseisor acquires merely an equitable title; the landowner is considered to be a trustee of the property for the disseisor.Adverse possession extends only to the property actually possessed. If the original owner had a title to a greater area (or volume) of property, the disseisor does not obtain all of it. The exception to this is when the disseisor enters the land under a of title to an entire parcel, his continuous and actual possession of a small part of that parcel will perfect his title to the entire parcel defined in his color of title.  Thus a disseisor need not build a dwelling on, or farm on, every portion of a large tract in order to prove possession, as long as his title does correctly describe the entire parcel.In some jurisdictions, a person who has successfully obtained title to property by adverse possession may (optionally) bring an action in court to title of record in his name on some or all of the former owners property.  Such action will make it simpler to convey the interest to others in a definitive manner, and also serves as notice that there is a new owner of record, which may be a prerequisite to benefits such as equity loans or judicial standing as an abutter.  Even if such action is not taken, the title is legally considered to belong to the new titleholder, with most of the benefits and duties, including paying taxes to avoid losing title to the tax collector.  The effects of having a stranger to the title paying taxes on property may vary from one jurisdiction to another. (Many jurisdictions have accepted tax payment for the same parcel from two different parties without raising an objection or notifying either party that the other had also paid.)Adverse possession does not typically work against property owned by the public.The process of adverse possession would require a thorough analysis if private property is taken by domain, after which control is given to a private corporation (such as a railroad), and then abandoned.Where land is registered under a title registration system or similar, special rules apply. It may be that the land cannot be affected by adverse possession (as was the case in and Wales from 1875 to 1926), or that special rules apply.Adverse possession may also apply to territorial rights.  In the United States, Georgia lost an island in the Savannah River to South Carolina, when South Carolina used fill from dredging to attach the island to its own shore.  Since Georgia knew of this yet did nothing about it, the Supreme Court (which has jurisdiction in such matters) granted this land to South Carolina, although the of Beaufort (1787) explicitly specified that the rivers islands belonged to Georgia.(??Georgia v. South Carolina, 497 U.S. 376 (1990)??) England and Wales In England and Wales, adverse possession has been governed by the Act 1980, the Registration Act 1925 and the Registration Act 2002. Different rules are in place for the limitation periods of adverse possession in unregistered land(Sections 15 and 17 Limitation Act 1980) and registered land.(Section 75 Land Registration Act 1925 or Schedule 6 Land Registration Act 2002, depending on when the limitation period is completed)For unregistered land, the Limitation Act of 1980 states that a squatter must remain in adverse possession for 12 years,(Section 15(1) Limitation Act 1980) at which point the paper owners title to the land is extinguished.For registered land, adverse possession claims completed before 13 October 2003 (the date the 2002 Act came into force)(Section 1 The Land Registration Act 2002 (Transitional Provisions) (No 2) Order 2003)) are governed by section 75(1) and 75(2) of the Land Registration Act of 1925. The limitation period remains the same (12 years) but instead of the original owners title to the land being extinguished, the original owner holds the land on trust for the adverse possessor.(Section 75(1) Land Registration Act 1925) The adverse possessor can then apply to be the new registered proprietor of the land.(Section 75(2) Land Registration Act 1925)The position of a registered landowner was significantly improved by the Land Registration Act of 2002. Where land is registered, the adverse possessor may apply to be registered as owner after 10 years(Schedule 6 Paragraph 1 Land Registration Act 2002) of adverse possession and the Land Registry must give notice to the true owner of this application.(Schedule 6 Paragraph 2 Land Registration Act 2002) This gives the landowner a statutory period of time business days to object to the adverse possession, and if they do so the application fails. Otherwise, the squatter becomes the registered properietor according to the land registry. If the true owner is unable to evict the squatter in the two years following the first application, the squatter can apply again after this period and be successful despite the opposition of the owner. The process effectively prevents the removal of a landowners right to property without his knowledge, while ensuring squatters have a fair way exercising their rights.Where a tenant adversely possesses land, there is a presumption that he is doing so in a way that will benefit his landlord at the end of his term. If the land does not belong to his landlord, the land will become part of both the tenancy and the reversion. If the land does belong to his landlord, it would seem that it will be gained by the tenant but only for the period of his term.(Smirk v Lyndale Developments Ltd 1974 3 WLR 91)Squatters rightsMost cases of adverse possession deal with boundary line disputes between two parties who hold clear title to their property.  The term squatters rights has no actual legal meaning, but is generally used to refer to a specific form of adverse possession where the disseisor holds no title to any properties adjoining the property under dispute.  In most jurisdictions of the United States, few squatters can meet the legal requirements for adverse possession.  If the squatter abandons the property for a period, or if the rightful owner effectively removes the squatters access even temporarily during the statutory period, or gives his permission, the clock usually stops. For example, if the required period in a given jurisdiction is twenty years and the squatter is removed after only 15 years, the squatter loses the benefit of that 15-year possession (i.e., the clock is reset at zero). If that squatter later retakes possession of the property, that squatter must, to acquire title, remain on the property for a full 20 years after the date on which the squatter retook possession. In this example, the squatter would have held the property for a total of 35 years (the original 15 years plus the later 20 years) to acquire title.Depending on the jurisdiction, one squatter may or may not pass along continuous possession to another squatter, known as tacking, until the adverse possession period is complete. Tacking is valid only if the conveyance of the property from one adverse possesser to another is founded upon a written document (usually an erroneous deed), indicating color of title. This concept is known as privity, a requirement for tacking under some statutes. If tacking requires privity in the jurisdiction, a squatter claiming adverse possession without a foundation on a written document (claim of right) may not tack previous periods of adverse possession onto his own for purposes of running out the statutory period.(Dukeminier et al. Property (6th Ed). 140.) A lawful owner may also restart the clock at zero by giving temporary permission for the occupation of the property, thus defeating the necessary continuous and hostile element. Evidence that a squatter paid rent to the owner would defeat adverse possession for that period.Comparison to homesteadingAdverse possession is in some ways similar to homesteading.  Like the disseisor, the homesteader may gain title to property by using the land and fulfilling certain other conditions. In homesteading, however, the possession of the property is not hostile; the land is either considered to have no legal owner or is owned by the government. The government allows the homesteader to use the land with the expectation that the homesteader who fulfills the requirements necessary for the homestead will gain title to the property.The principles of homesteading and squatters rights embody the most basic concept of property and ownership, which can be summarized by the adage possession is nine-tenths of the law, meaning the person who uses the property effectively owns it. Likewise, the adage, use it or lose it, applies. The principles of homesteading and squatters rights predate formal property laws; to a large degree, modern property law formalizes and expands these simple ideas.The principle of homesteading is that if no one is using or possessing property, the first person to claim it and use it consistently over a specified period owns the property.  Squatters rights embodies the idea that if one property owner neglects property and fails to use it, and a second person starts to tend and use the property, then after a certain period the first persons claim to the property is lost and ownership transfers to the second person, who is actually using the property.The legal principle of homesteading, then, is a formalization of the principle in the same way that the right of adverse possession is a formalization of the pre-existing principle of squatters rights.The essential ideas behind the principles of homesteading and squatters rights hold generally for any type of item or property of which ownership can be asserted by simple use or possession.  In modern law, homesteading and the right of adverse possession refer exclusively to property.  In the realm of property, the same impulse is summarized by the adage finders/keepers and is formalized by laws and conventions concerning property.CopyrightsSome legal scholars have proposed to extend the concept of adverse possession to property law, in particular to reconcile intellectual property and law(Constance E. Bagley and Gavin Clarkson, Adverse Possession for Intellectual Property: Adapting an Ancient Concept to Resolve Conflicts between Antitrust and Intellectual Property Laws in the Information Age Harvard Journal of Law & Technology 16:2 (Spring 2003) full text) or to unify copyright law and property law.(Michael James Arrett, Adverse Possession of Copyright: A Proposal to Complete Copyrights Unification with Property Law, Journal of Corporation Law 31:1 (October 2005) abstract; full text (pay))Adverse possession of easementsAdverse possession grants only those rights in the disseized property that are taken by the disseisor. For example, a disseisor might choose to take an easement rather than the entire title to the property. In this manner, it is possible to disseize an easement, under the legal doctrine of prescription. This must also be done openly but need not be exclusive. Prescription is governed by different statutory and common law time limits to adverse possession. It is common practice in cities such as New York, where builders often leave sidewalk space or plazas in front of their buildings to meet zoning requirements, to close public areas they own periodically to prevent the creation of a permanent easement that would cloud their exclusive rights.If a property owner interferes with an easement upon his property in a manner that satisfies the requirements for adverse prescription (e.g. locking the gates to a commonly used area, and nobody does anything about it), he will successfully extinguish the easement.  This is another reason to quiet title after a successful adverse possession or adverse prescription: it clarifies the record of who should take action to preserve the adverse title or easement while evidence is still fresh.For example, given a deeded easement to use someone elses driveway to reach a garage, if a fence or permanently locked gate prevents the use, nothing is done to remove and circumvent the obstacle, and the statutory period expires, then the easement ceases to have any legal force, although the deed held by the fee-simple owner stated that the owners interest was subject to the easement.Strictly speaking, prescription works in a different way to adverse possession. Adverse possession is concerned with the extinction of the title of the original owner by a rule of limitation of actions. Prescription, on the other hand, is concerned with acquiring a right that did not previously exist.Non-common law jurisdictionsSome non-common law jurisdictions have laws similar to adverse possession. For example, Louisiana has a legal doctrine called acquisitive prescription, which is derived from law.In law, usucapio laws allowed someone who was in possession of a good without title to become the lawful proprietor if the original owner didnt show up after some time (one or two years), unless the good was obtained illegally (by theft or force). Stemming from Roman law, adverse possession is recognized for instance in Romanian property law which establishes two time periods for the acquisition of property: 30 years and 1020 years depending on the bona fidae of the possessor and the location of the parties involved.See also*of real estate topics*Homelessness*Easement for related adverse rights** of way in England and Wales*Escheat*Squatting*Usucaption*Usufruct*law*rights*Lien*sovereignty*Act of 1841*statute 2477*Deed*(property) References de:Ersitzungko:ro:Uzucapiunepossessionth:zh-yue:zh:
599955
Gerry_Brownlee
Gerard Anthony Gerry Brownlee (born 1956) is a New Zealand politician. He served from 17 November 2003 to 27 November 2006 as deputy-leader of the National Party  during that period the second-largest party in the New Zealand Parliament, and thus forming the core of the Opposition. In November 2008 he became a senior front-bench Minister in Keys coalition cabinet.Personal biographyBorn in Christchurch, Brownlee has lived there ever since. After leaving high school, he worked in his familys timber business, and received training in carpentry. Later he qualified as a teacher. He then taught woodwork and crafts at high-school level at Ellesmere College, and later at St Bedes College (which he himself had attended as a pupil). At St Bedes he taught woodwork and graphics.Member of ParliamentIn the 1993 elections, Brownlee stood as the National Party candidate in the Sydenham electorate, where he campaigned  unsuccessfully  against Anderton of the newly-formed Alliance. In the 1996 elections he contested the nearby seat of Ilam, and won by a comfortable margin. He has remained the MP for Ilam since that point, although his majority declined until making a strong recovery in the 2005 election.Junior Parliamentary WhipIn Parliament, Brownlee has served as the National Partys Junior Whip and as its spokesperson on superannuation, energy, transport, local government, and the ACC. Alleged assault Brownlee received criticism during the 1999 election campaign when during a private closed meeting he ejected an elderly protester from a platform containing several National Party candidates. The ejection took place with what many, including watching media-representatives, considered excessive force. The protester brought charges against Brownlee, seeking damages of $60,000. After a brief trial the Court ordered Brownlee to pay the protester $8,500 in damages.()In OppositionIn 2003, Goff and Scoop columnist Paulo Politico considered Brownlee a potential challenger to the party leadership of English (20012003), as he had run for the deputy leadership position against English in early 2001.()() Eventually, on 28 October 2003, however, English gave way to Brash, a former governor of the Reserve Bank. Brownlee then featured high on the list of potential deputy-leaders, but he declined to pursue the position, and on 28 October 2003 Nick Smith became Brashs deputy.Shortly after his selection, however, Smith opted to take two weeks of stress-leave, saying that the protracted leadership disputes had exhausted him. When Smith returned to Parliament, Brownlee challenged him for the deputy-leadership. Informed of the challenge, Smith resigned, and on 17 November 2003 Brownlee won the caucus vote unopposed. (For an alternative version of events, see Nick Smith.) Initially, Smith alleged that while he was on stress-leave; a campaign to oust me was conducted in the media while I was under the leaders instructions to make no comment.() Audrey Young wrote in the New Zealand Herald that Brownlee and McCully were rumoured to have been behind the campaign to oust Smith as deputy leader.() After becoming a deputy leader, Brownlee continued his confrontational and colourful style of political debate. Following the controversy surrounding Brashs speech of 27 January 2004, Brownlee became the National Partys spokesman for Maori Affairs in place of Te Heuheu, who resigned from the position after refusing to endorse party-leader Brashs comments. Brownlees approach to this portfolio involved criticising the governments policies regarding perceived special treatment for Mori, an issue at the core of Nationals 2005 election manifesto.After the resignation of former National Party Leader of the Opposition Brash (27 November 2006), internal party discussion apparently ensued over the post of deputy parliamentary party leader. English, Power and Collins all appeared to aspire to the position.( )On 26 November 2006 Brownlee announced that he would step aside as Deputy Leader. A special National Party caucus meeting confirmed the proposed new hierarchy the following day. On 1 December 2006 Key confirmed Brownlee as the third-ranked National Party MP with responsibility for Energy, SOEs, and State Services; the Shadow Leader of the House, and the chair the National Partys Strategy Committee.Return to officeOn 19 November 2008, Sir Satyanand, General of New Zealand, swore Brownlee in the Ministerial portfolios of Economic Development, Energy and Resources, and also as Associate Minister for the Rugby World Cup. Brownlee also became the Leader of the House, making him responsible for the schedule of Government business, allocating time for non-governmental and opposition business to be presented to the house and announcing the Business Statement for the Parliamentary sitting dates to the house and its members.In August 2009, Brownlee was criticised by and Bird Spokesperson Hackwell for playing down government considerations to possibly mine Conservation estate land. Mr Hackwell was reported as stating that If the Governments to go down this line they could be buying a fight with the people of the Coromandel, with the people of New Zealand generally, who have put these areas aside and want them protected for their conservation values.() There were signs within the New Zealand mining industry that the move would be welcomed if the considerations were carried out.() In early December 2009, a leaked document showed that there were considerations to remove part of the conservation status of Aspiring National Park for mining purposes.() The result of the controversy was that the government decided not to explore considerations amongst significant debate on the issue in the House, in submissions to the Select Committees and within the National Partys own parliamentary caucus.() On the withdrawal Brownlee stated I suspect few New Zealanders knew the country had such considerable mineral potential before we undertook this process, and I get a sense that New Zealanders are now much more aware of that potential. He went on that it might contribute to economic growth and further stated that New Zealanders have given the minerals sector a clear mandate to go and explore that land, and where appropriate, within the constraints of the resource consent process, utilise its mineral resources for everyones benefit. An additional announcement from Conservation Minister Wilkinson pronounced that future National Park land would receive protections, stating that, This is an added layer of protection for New Zealands most highly valued conservation land...()After the Canterbury Earthquake of 4 September 2010, Brownlee, due to his position as his Partys only Electorate MP in Christchurch, was appointed Earthquake Recovery Minister on 7 September 2010. On 14 September 2010, Brownlee introduced the Canterbury Earthquake Response and Recovery Bill into the house with leave to pass the legislation in one sitting. This Bill was passed by the time the House adjourned at 10.02 pm.()ReferencesExternal links*Profile at National party*|-|-|-|-Brownlee
602199
Dardani
:This article is about the ancient peoples. For the Trojan allies, see Dardanoi.Dardania (; ) was the region of the Dardani (;(, ,  Dardanioi, Georg Autenrieth, A Homeric Dictionary, at Perseus) (Latin Dictionary)).Located at the Thraco-Illyrian contact zone, their identification as either an Illyrian or Thracian tribe is uncertain.(Wilkes, J. J. The Illyrians, 1992, ISBN 0631198075, page 85, Whether the Dardanians were an Illyrian or a Thracian people has been much debated and one view suggests that the area was originally populated with Thracians who where then exposed to direct contact with illyrians over a long period...)(The central Balkan tribes in pre-Roman times: Triballi, Autariatae, Dardanians, Scordisci and Moesians, Amsterdam 1978, by Fanula Papazoglu, ISBN 9025607934, page 131, ...the Dardanians ... living in the frontiers of the Illyrian and the Thracian worlds retained their individuality and, alone among the peoples of that region succeeded in maintaining themselves as an ethnic unity even when they were militarily and politically subjected by the Roman arms ... and when at the end of the ancient world, the Balkans were involved in far-reaching ethnic perturbations, the Dardanians, of all the Central Balkan tribes, played the greatest part in the genesis of the new peoples who took the place of the old) Their territory itself was not considered part of Illyria(The central Balkan tribes in pre-Roman times: Triballi, Autariatae...Fanula Papazoglu, 1978, page 217) by Strabo. The term used for their territory was (),(The central Balkan tribes in pre-Roman times: Triballi, Autariatae... Fanula Papazoglu, 1978, page 523) while for other tribes had more unspecified terms, such as () for the Autariatae. Other than that, little to no data(The central Balkan tribes in pre-Roman times: Triballi, Autariatae... Fanula Papazoglu, 1978, page 187, We have very little information about the territory of the Dardanians before its inclusion in the Roman state,...) exists on the territory of the Dardanii prior to Roman conquest, especially on its southern extent.The region was inhabited by Illyrians, Celts(The central Balkan tribes in pre-Roman times: Triballi, Autariatae, Dardanians, Scordisci and Moesians by Fanula Papazoglu, ISBN 9025607934, page 265)(Pannonia and Upper Moesia: a history of the middle Danube provinces of the Roman EmpireThe Provinces of the Roman Empire Tome 4, ISBN-0710077149, 9780710077141, 1974, page 9) and Thracians.((Wilkes, J. J. The Illyrians, 1992, ISBN 0631198075, page 85, Whether the Dardanians were an Illyrian or a Thracian people has been much debated and one view suggests that the area was originally populated with Thracians who where then exposed to direct contact with illyrians over a long period...) After Roman conquest of Illyria at BC, Romans colonized and founded several cities in the region.(Hauptstdte in Sdosteuropa: Geschichte, Funktion, nationale Symbolkraft by Harald Heppner, page 134)Name and mythic originsBeginning with Georg von Hahn in 1854, 19th century linguistics concluded that Dardanoi and Dardania may be related to a proto-Albanian word meaning pear tree (dardha in modern Albanian the definite form, dardh indefinite form). Opinions differ whether the ultimate etymon of this word in Proto-Indo-European was *ghord-, or *dheregh-.(Elsie, Robert (1998): Dendronymica Albanica: A survey of Albanian tree and shrub names. Zeitschrift fr Balkanologie 34: 163-200 online paper)Graves connected Greek  burned up (from the verb  dardapto ...to wear, to slay, to burn up).(The Greek Myths by Robert Graves, ISBN 0140171991)In mythology, Dardanus (), one of the sons of Illyrius (the others being Enchelus, Autarieus, Maedus, Taulas, and Perrhaebus) was the eponymous ancestor of the Dardanoi ().(Appian, The Foreign Wars, III, 1.2)Some Roman ethnographers proposed a connection between Dardani of the Balkans and the Dardans of Troy,  having a group of Dardan colonists   settle in the Balkans and subsequently degenerate into a state of barbarism,(The Illyrians by J. J. Wilkes, 1992, ISBN 0631198075, page 220, Leaving aside Strabos comment on the dirty habits of the Dardanians, there is little on which to judge the general health of the Illyrian population.) but the Romans(Greeks and Barbarians (Edinburgh Readings on the Ancient World) by T. Harrison, 2001, ISBN 0415939593, page 140) considered them to be Greeks as a whole, which contradicts modern scholarship.HistoryThe Dardanians are first mentioned in 4th century BC. when their king Bardyllis succeeded into bringing various tribes in a single organization. Under his leadership Dardanians defeated several times Macedonians and Molossians. At this time they were strong enough to rule Macedonia through a puppet king in 392-391 BC and their continuous invasions forced a later Macedonian king to pay them a tribute in 372 BC In 385-384 we see them in alliance with Dionyssius defeating Molossians in a battle killing up to 15,000 Molossian soldiers and ruling their territory for a short period. They returned raiding the Molossians in 360. In 359 BC Dardanians under Bardyllis won a decisive battle against a Macedonian king III by killing the Macedonian king himself and 4,000 of his soldiers, and occupied the cities of upper Macedonia.(The Cambridge ancient history: The fourth century B.C. Volume 6 of The Cambridge ancient history, Iorwerth Eiddon Stephen Edwards, ISBN 0521850738, 9780521850735, Authors: D. M. Lewis, John Boardman, Editors: D. M. Lewis, John Boardman, Edition 2, Publisher: Cambridge University Press, 1994 ISBN 0521233488, 9780521233484, pp. 428-429 http://books.google.com/books?idvx251bK988gC&lpgPA429&dqbardylis&as_brr3&pgPA428#vonepage&qbardylis&ffalse)(The Macedonian Empire: The Era of Warfare Under Philip II and Alexander the Great, 359-323 B.C. Author: James R. Ashley, Publisher: McFarland, 2004, ISBN	0786419180, 9780786419180, pages 111-112 http://books.google.com/books?idnTmXOFX-wioC&lpgPA114&dqbardylis&as_brr3&pgPA112#vonepage&qbardylis&ffalse)Following the disastrous defeat of Macedonians by Dardanians, when king Philip took control of the Macedonian throne in 358, he reaffirmed the treaty with Dardanians marrying the Illyrian princess Audata, probably the daughter or the niece of Bardyllis.(The time of this marriage is somewhat disputed while some historians maintain that the marriage happened after the defeat of Bardyllis  Women and monarchy in Macedonia Oklahoma Series in Classical Culture, Author: Elizabeth Donnelly Carney, University of Oklahoma Press, 2000, ISBN 0806132124,9780806132129 http://books.google.com/books?idZbI2hZBy_EkC&lpgPA274&dqbardylis&lr&as_brr3&pgPA58#vonepage&qbardylis&ffalse) This gave Philip valuable time to gather its forces and to defeat Dardanians still under Bardyllis in the decisive Valley battle by killing about 7,000 of them eliminating the Dardanian menace for some time.(The Macedonian Empire: The Era of Warfare Under Philip II and Alexander the Great, 359-323 B.C., Author: James R. Ashley, Publisher: McFarland, 2004, ISBN 0786419180, 9780786419180,  pages 111-112 http://books.google.com/books?idnTmXOFX-wioC&lpgPA114&dqbardylis&as_brr3&pgPA112#vonepage&qbardylis&ffalse)(The Genius of Alexander the Great, Author: N. G. L. Hammond, Publisher: UNC Press, 1998, ISBN 0807847445, 9780807847442, page 11 http://books.google.com/books?idcyzFEG-JjLcC&lpgPA11&dqdardanians&lr&as_brr3&pgPA11#vonepage&qdardanians&ffalse)In BC under the lead of Cleitus the son of Bardyllis, Dardanians in alliance with other Illyrian tribes, of the Taulanti under Glaukias and Autariate, attacked Macedonia which was this time under Alexander the Great. The Dardanians managed to capture some cities but were eventually defeated later by Alexanders forces (The Macedonian Empire: The Era of Warfare Under Philip II and Alexander the Great, 359-323 B.C. Author	James R. Ashley, Publisher: McFarland, 2004, ISBN 0786419180, 9780786419180, page 117 http://books.google.com/books?idnTmXOFX-wioC&lpgPA114&dqbardylis&as_brr3&pgPA171#vsnippet&qcleitus&ffalse)(The Cambridge ancient history: The fourth century B.C. Volume 6 of The Cambridge ancient history, Iorwerth Eiddon Stephen Edwards, ISBN 0521850738, 9780521850735, Authors: D. M. Lewis, John Boardman, Editors: D. M. Lewis, John Boardman, Edition 2, Publisher: Cambridge University Press, 1994, ISBN 0521233488, 9780521233484, pp. 428-429 http://books.google.com/books?idvx251bK988gC&lpgPA429&dqbardylis&as_brr3&pgPA796#vonepage&qcleitus&ffalse)In winter 280-279 BC when Celts invaded Macedonia, the Dardanian king offered to help Macedonians with 20,000 soldiers, but they were refused by Macedonian king Keraunos, eventually contributing to his defeat and consequent death.(A history of Macedonia Volume 5 of Hellenistic culture and society, Robert Malcolm Errington, University of California Press, 1990 ISBN 0520063198, 9780520063198, page 160 http://books.google.com/books?idPYgkqP_s1PQC&lpgPA30&dqbardylis&lr&as_brr3&pgPA159#vsnippet&qcelts&ffalse)(The Illyrians By John Wilkes)(A History of Macedonia: 336-167 B.C Volume 3 of A History of Macedonia, Authors: N. G. L. Hammond, F. W. Walbank, Publisher: Oxford University Press, 1988ISBN 0198148151, 9780198148159, page 253 http://books.google.com/books?idqpb3JdwuDQIC&lpgPA248&dqgauls%20dardanians&as_brr3&pgPA253#vonepage&qgauls%20dardanians&ffalse) Unlike Macedonia, Dardanians suffered little under the Celtic invasion and Dardanian forces attacked them while they were returning north.Dardanians were a constant threat to the Macedonian kingdom. In 230 under Longarus(A History of Macedonia: 336-167 B.C  By Nicholas Geoffrey Lemprire Hammond, Frank William Walbank page 338) they captured Bylazora from Paionians (A history of Macedonia Volume 5 of Hellenistic culture and society, Author: Robert Malcolm Errington, University of California Press, 1990 ISBN 0520063198, 9780520063198 page 185 http://books.google.com/books?idPYgkqP_s1PQC&lpgPA30&dqbardylis&lr&as_brr3&pgPA185#vsnippet&qdardanians&ffalse) and in 229 they attacked again Macedonia defeating in an important battle Macedonian forces under Demetrius II.(A history of Macedonia Volume 5 of Hellenistic culture and society, Robert Malcolm Errington, University of California Press, 1990, ISBN 0520063198, 9780520063198 http://books.google.com/books?idPYgkqP_s1PQC&lpgPA30&dqbardylis&lr&as_brr3&pgPA174#vonepage&qDardanians&ffalse) In this period their influence on the region grow and some other Illyrian tribes defected Teuta joining Dardanians under Longarus, forcing Teuta to call off her expedition forces in Epirus.(A History of Macedonia: 336-167 B.C By Nicholas Geoffrey Lemprire Hammond, Frank William Walbank, page 335 http://books.google.com/books?idqpb3JdwuDQIC&lpgPA248&dqgauls%20dardanians&as_brr3&pgPA335#vsnippet&qdardanians&ffalse) When Philip V rose to the Macedonian throne skirmishing with Dardanians began in 220-219 BC and he managed to capture Bylazora from them in 217 BC. Skirmishes continued in 211 and in 209 when a force of Dardanians under Aeropus, probably a pretender to the Macedonian throne, captured Lychnidus and looted Macedonia taking 20.000 prisoners and retreating before Philips forces could reach them.(A History of Macedonia: 336-167 B.C  By Nicholas Geoffrey Lemprire Hammond, Frank William Walbank, page 404 http://books.google.com/books?idqpb3JdwuDQIC&lpgPA248&dqgauls%20dardanians&as_brr3&pgPA404#vsnippet&qdardanians&ffalse) In 201 of Dardania along with Pleuratus the Illyrian and Amynander king of Athamania, cooperated with Roman consul Sulpicius in his expedition against Philip V.(A History of Macedonia: 336-167 B.C  By Nicholas Geoffrey Lemprire Hammond, Frank William Walbank, page 420 http://books.google.com/books?idqpb3JdwuDQIC&lpgPA248&dqgauls%20dardanians&as_brr3&pgPA420#vsnippet&qdardanians&ffalse) Being always under the menace of Dardanian attacks on Macedonia, around 183 BC Philip V made an alliance with Bastarnae and invited them to settle in Polog, the region of Dardania closest to Macedonia.(A History of Macedonia: 336-167 B.C By Nicholas Geoffrey Lemprire Hammond, Frank William Walbank p.470) A joint campaign of Bastarnae and Macedonians against Dardanians was organized but Philip V died and of Macedon withdrew its forces from the campaign. Bastarnae crossed the Danube in huge numbers and although they didnt met the Macedonians, they continued the campaign. Some 30,000 Bastarnae under the command of Clondicus, seems to have defeated the Dardanians(A History of Macedonia: 336-167 B.C By Nicholas Geoffrey Lemprire Hammond, Frank William Walbank p.491) but eventually they returned home and the plan of Philip V failed. In 177 BC, Dardanians sent an report to Roman Senate, accusing Perseus of Macedon for being again in alliance with Bastarnae against Dardanians, but the Roman investigating commission failed to find support for such accusations.(A history of Macedonia By Robert Malcolm Errington p. 212)In BC, they invaded the Roman province of Macedonia together with the Scordisci and the  Maedi.(Wilkes, J. J. The Illyrians, 1992, ISBN 0631198075, page 140, ... Autariatae at the expense of the Triballi until, as Strabo remarks, they in their turn were overcome by the Celtic Scordisci in the early third century Sc. ...)Polybius(Polybius, Histories,25.6) writes of an event in which the Dardani ask for Roman aid against their enemies.: When the Rhodian envoys arrived in Rome the Senate, after listening to their address, deferred its answer. Meanwhile the Dardanian envoys came with reports as to the number of the Bastarnae, the size of their men, and their courage in the field.They gave information also of the treacherous practices of Perseus and the Gauls, and said that they were more afraid of him than of the Bastarnae, and therefore begged the help of the Romans. The report of the Dardani being supported by that of the Thessalian envoys who arrived at that time, and who also begged for help, the Senators determined to send some commissioners to see with their own eyes the truth of these reports; and they accordingly at once appointed and despatched Postumius, accompanied by some young men.According to Strabo, they were divided into  two sub-groups, the Galabri and the Thunaki.(Strabo: Books 17, 1517 in English translation, ed. H. L. Jones (1924), at LacusCurtius)It seems quite probable that the Dardani actually lost independence in 28 BC thus, the nal occupation of Dardania by Rome has been connected with the beginnings of Augustus rule in  6 AD, when they were finally conquered by Rome. Dardania was conquered by Scribonius Curio and the Latin language was soon adopted as the main language of the tribe as many other conquered and Romanized.(http://www.balkaninstitut.com/pdf/izdanja/B_XXXVII_2007.pdf) At first, Dardania was not a separate Roman province, but became a region in the province of Superior in 87.(The Illyrians by J. J. Wilkes, 1992, ISBN 0631198075, page 210, Here the old name of Dardania appears as a new province formed out of Moesia, along with Moesia Prima, Dacia (not Trajans old province but a...))(The Illyrians by J. J. Wilkes, 1992, ISBN 0631198075, page 210, Though its line is far from certain there seems little doubt that most of the Dardanians were excluded from Illyricum and were to become a part of the province of Moesia...) Emperor Diocletian later (284) made Dardania into a separate (The Illyrians by J. J. Wilkes, 1992, ISBN 0631198075, page 210, Here the old name of Dardania appears as a new province formed out of Moesia, along with Moesia Prima, Dacia (not Trajans old province but a...)) province with its capital at Naissus (Ni). During the Byzantine administration (in the 6th century), there was a Byzantine province of Dardania that included cities of Ulpiana, Scupi, Stobi, Prima, and others.As with the rest of the Illyrians, today almost nothing survives except for names.(Wilkes (1992): Though almost nothing of it survives, except for names, the Illyrian language has figured prominently (p. 67)) The Illyrians in the antiquity were subject to varying degrees of Celticization,(A dictionary of the Roman Empire Oxford paperback reference, ISBN 0195102339, 1995, page 202, ...contact with the peoples of the Illyrian kingdom and at the Celticized tribes of the Delmatae)(Pannonia and Upper Moesia. A History of the Middle Danube Provinces of the Roman Empire. A Mocsy, S Frere) Hellenization,(Stanley M. Burstein, Walter Donlan, Jennifer Tolbert Roberts, and Sarah B. Pomeroy. A Brief History of Ancient Greece: Politics, Society, and Culture. Oxford University Press, p. 255.) Romanization(Epirus Vetus: The Archaeology of a Late Antique Province (Duckworth Archaeology) by William Bowden, 2003, page 211: ... in the ninth century. Wilkes suggested that they represented a `Romanized population of Illyrian origin driven out by Slav settlements further north, ...)(The Oxford Dictionary of Byzantium (3-Volume Set) by Alexander P. Kazhdan, 1991, page 248, ...were well fortified. In the 6th and 7th C. the romanized Thraco-Illyrian population was forced to settle in the mountains; they reappear ...) and later Slavicisation.Rulers and nobles* Bardyllis(Harding, Philip. From the End of the Peloponnesian War to the Battle of Ipsus, 1985, p. 93, ISBN 0521299497. Grabos became the most powerful Illyrian king after the death of Bardylis in 358.) of the Dardani from BC -BC:* Audata probably daughter of Bardyllis and wife of Philip II married to him after the battle of 358.(Whos who in the age of Alexander the Great: prosopography of Alexanders empire, Author: Waldemar Heckel, Publisher: Wiley-Blackwell, 2006 ISBN 1405112107, 9781405112109, page 64 http://books.google.com/books?idJJ4K1wFZkrsC&lpgPA86&dqCleitus%20bardylis&as_brr3&pgPA64#vsnippet&qAudata&ffalse):* the Illyrian son of Bardyllis, 4th century BC(Wilkes 1995, page 120)::* II probably Cleitus son, 4th century BC(Whos who in the age of Alexander the Great: prosopography of Alexanders empire. Author: Waldemar Heckel, Publisher: Wiley-Blackwell, 2006, ISBN 1405112107, 9781405112109, page 86 http://books.google.com/books?idJJ4K1wFZkrsC&lpgPA86&dqCleitus%20bardylis&as_brr3&pgPA86#vonepage&qCleitus%20bardylis&ffalse):::* Bircenna granddaughter of Cleitus(A History of Macedonia: 336-167 B.C By Nicholas Geoffrey Lemprire Hammond, Frank William Walbank page 47) and daughter of Bardyllis II.(Whos who in the age of Alexander the Great: prosopography of Alexanders empire, Author: Waldemar Heckel, Publisher: Wiley-Blackwell, 2006, ISBN 1405112107, 9781405112109, page 86 http://books.google.com/books?idJJ4K1wFZkrsC&lpgPA86&dqCleitus%20bardylis&as_brr3&pgPA86#vonepage&qCleitus%20bardylis&ffalse) She was a wife of of Epirus.* Longarus(The Illyrians by J. J. Wilkes, 1992, ISBN 0631198075, p. 86, ... including the names of Dardanian rulers, Longarus, Bato, Monunius and Etuta, and those on later epitaphs, Epicadus, Scerviaedus, Tuta, Times and Cinna. Other Dardanian names are linked with...) of the Dardani father of Bato* of Dardania(The Illyrians by J. J. Wilkes, 1992, ISBN 0631198075, p. 85, The recorded names of Dardanian leader during the Macedonian and the Roman wars, Longarus, Bato...) of the Dardani son of LongarusDardanian KingdomThe domain of the Dardanian kings was made up of many(The central Balkan tribes in pre-Roman times: Triballi, Autariatae ...  by Fanula Papazoglu, 1978, ISBN-9025607934, page 445, The assumption that the Dardanian kingdom was composed of a considerable number of tribes and tribal groups, finds confirmation in Strabos statement about) tribes. The first and most prominent king of the Dardani was Bardyllis( who ruled from BC to BC. He was perhaps succeeded by Grabos (BC - BC)(Harding, p. 93. Grabos became the most powerful Illyrian king after the death of Bardylis in 358.)(The Greek world, 479-323 BC by Simon Hornblower, 2002, ISBN-0415163269, page 272) that may have been(The Illyrians by J. J. Wilkes, 1992, ISBN 0631198075, p. 121, The Illyrians of Grabus are unlikely to have been the subjects of Bardyllis defeated only two years earlier though some have suggested Grabus was his son and successor.) Bardylliss son. Little is known about II(The Journal of Hellenic Studies by Society for the Promotion of Hellenic Studies (London, England), 1973, p. 79. Cleitus was evidently the son of Bardylis II the grandson of the very old Bardylis who had fallen in battle against Phillip II in 385 BC.) (4th century BC)  Bardylliss son. the Illyrian( (4th century BC) was his son. Tribal chiefs Longarus and his son of Dardania took part in the wars( against Romans and Macedonians. The Dardanians, in all their history, always(The central Balkan tribes in pre-Roman times: Triballi, Autariatae, Dardanians, Scordisci and Moesians by Fanula Papazoglu, ISBN 9025607934, page 216) had separate domains from the rest of the Illyrians.Roman DardaniaDuring the administrative reforms of Diocletian (244 - 311) and Constantine I (272  337), the of Moesia was created, encompassing most of the central Balkans and the Greek peninsula. After a few years, however, the diocese was split in two, forming the of Macedonia and the of Dacia, encompassing the provinces of Mediterranea,  Inferior, Dardania, Praevalitana and Ripensis.Since 238, Moesia was constantly invaded or raided by the Carpi, and the Goths, who had already invaded Moesia in 250. Hard pressed by the Huns, the Goths again crossed the Danube during the reign of Valens (376) and with his permission settled in Moesia.Late Roman(Starinar,Books 45-46,by Srpsko arheoloko drutvo,Arheoloki institut (Belgrade, Serbia), page 33) Dardania did not include the eastern part of the Dardania of Aurelian.Byzantine DardaniaThe area remained part of the empire until the late early 7th century when the Slavic migration destroyed Byzantine authority in most of the Balkan peninsula. Since then Dardania ceased to exist as separate administrative entity.CitiesDardanias largest towns by the time it was part of the Roman province of Superior were Ulpiana, Therranda, Vicianum, Skopi,(The Illyrians by J. J. Wilkes, 1992, ISBN 0631198075, page 49, ...historic Lychnitis around Ohrid and in Dardania around Skopje in the upper Vardar basin. Among the many tumuli surviving in Pelagonia only Visoi has so far been...) Vindenis, and Velanis. By this time Naissus(Naissos) (a previously Celtic settlement) was the provinces most important city.The Romans had organized a mining town Dardanicum(The Illyrians by J. J. Wilkes, 1992, ISBN 0631198075, page 258, In the south the new city named municipium Dardanicum, was another mining town connected with the local workings (Metalla Dardanica).) (in modern Socanica near the Ibar valley) was connected with the workings (metalla Dardanica(). Dacians(Ethnic continuity in the Carpatho-Danubian area by Elemr Illys, 1988, ISBN 0880331461, page 223) lived in Dardania in their city Quemedava.LanguageAn extenstive study over onomastics has been undertaken by Katii which puts the Dardani language area in the Central Illyrian area (Central Illyrian consisting of  most of ex-Yugoslavia, north of southern Montenegro to the west of Morava, excepting ancient Liburnia in the North-West, but perhaps extending into Pannonia in the north).(Katii, Radoslav (1964b) Die neuesten Forschungen ber die einhemiche Sprachschist in den Illyrischen Provinzen in Benac (1964a) 9-58 Katii, Radoslav (1965b) Zur frage der keltischen und panonischen Namengebieten im rmischen Dalmatien ANUBiH 3 GCBI 1, 53-76)(Katii, Radoslav. Ancient languages of the Balkans. The Hague - Paris (1976))Greek and Roman Historiography   The tribe was for some reason seen as extremely barbaric by Greeks and Romans(An English translation of Claudius Aelianus Varia historia)(The central Balkan tribes in pre-Roman times: Triballi, Autariatae... by Fanula Papazoglu, 1978, page 517, There must have been some reason why it was said of the Dardanians, and not of any other people, that they only bathed three times in their lives,...). Aelianus & other writers wrote that they bathed only three(Dictionary of Classical Antiquities (1898) ...whence it is said of the Dardanians, an Illyrian people, that they bathe only thrice in their livesat birth, marriage, and after death.) times in their lives. At birth, when they were wed and after they died. Strabo refers to them as wild(History of ancient geography) and dwelling in dirty caves under dung-hills(Strabo,7.5, The Dardanians are so utterly wild that they dig caves beneath their dung-hills and live there, but still they care for music, always making use of musical instruments, both flutes and stringed instruments). This however may have had to do not with cleanliness, as bathing had to do with monetary(The central Balkan tribes in pre-Roman times: Triballi, Autariatae... by Fanula Papazoglu, 1978, page 517, ...like the Dardanians, which was applied not to dirty folk, as might be expected, but to the miserly (  )! For the Greeks, obviously, to bathe or not was only a question of expense and financial means.) status from the viewpoint of the Greeks. At the same time, Strabo writes that they had some interest in music as they owned and used flutes and corded instruments.( See also*religion*Balkans*Illyria*of Illyrian tribes*WarsReferencesOther sources*Andrs Mcsy, Sheppard Frere, Pannonia and Upper Moesia: A History of the Middle Danube Provinces of the Roman Empire, Routledge (1974), ISBN 0710077149.External links*Illyria and Illyriansbs:Dardancibg:ca:Drdans(Volk)es:Dardanioshr:Dardanciid:Dardaniit:Dardanihe:jv:Dardanialt:Dardanaipl:Dardanowieru:sq:Dardantsl:Dardancisr:sh:Dardancifi:Dardanitsv:Dardaner
603595
Max_the_Mighty
Max the Mighty is a childrens novel by Philbrick. Published in 1998, it is the sequel to the Mighty.PlotIn the sequel to the Mighty, Kane helps Rachel Sandesa, nicknamed Worm because of her love of reading, run from her overly religious and abusive stepfather. Nicknamed The Undertaker, he drives in a hearse and wears all dark black clothing. The Undertaker accuses Max of kidnapping Worm, so Max and Worm run away with Dippy Hippie on his bus, the Prairie Schooner. Along the way, they meet two con-men, Frank and Joanie, who read about Max and Worm and a money reward for finding them. Frank then turns them in, and Max and Worm have to leave the Prairie Schooner. To take them the rest of the way they go on a Train with Hobo Joe and arrive in Chivalry, Montana. They go into a mining tunnel and Max discovers that Worms birth father has already died in a mining accident. The Undertaker arrives there with the police and Max and Worm run away in the tunnels. They meet Dip, and Maxs grandfather, Grim. The police catch them, and then Worm runs back into the tunnel. She thinks about committing suicide to be with her father, but Max talks her out of it. The book ends with Worm and her mother coming to live with Max and his grandparents.
605577
Mbuti_people
Mbuti or Bambuti are one of several indigenous pygmy groups in the Congo region of Africa. Their languages belong to the Central Sudanic (subgroup of the Nilo-Saharan phylum) and also to languages.OverviewThe Bambuti are pygmy hunter-gatherers, and are one of the oldest indigenous people of the Congo region of Africa. The Bambuti are composed of bands which are relatively small in size, ranging from 15 to 60 people. The Bambuti population totals about 30,000 to 40,000 people. There are four distinct cultures within the Bambuti. These are the Ef, who speak the language of a neighboring Sudanic people, Lese; the Sua  Kango  Mbuti, who speak a dialect (or perhaps two) of the language of a neighboring Bantu people, Bila; and Asua, the only Mbuti people with their own language, which is closely related to that of the neighboring Sudanic Mangbetu. The term BaMbuti (Mbuti) is therefore confusing, as it has been used to refer to all the pygmy peoples in the Ituri region in general, as well as to a single subgroup in the center of the Ituri forest.Around 2500 BCE, the Egyptians made reference to a people of the trees that could have been the Mbuti. Environment File:Rgion Ituri Rpublique dmocratique du Congo.png|right|thumb|Map of Rainforest within the DRC.The forest of Ituri is a tropical rainforest. In this area, there is a high amount of rainfall annually, ranging from 50 to 70 inches (127 cm to 178 cm). The rainforest is 70,000 square kilometers. The season is relatively short, ranging from one to two months in duration. The forest is a moist, humid region strewn with rivers and lakes. Several ecological problems exist which affect the Bambuti. Disease is prevalent in the forests and can spread quickly, killing not only humans, but plants, and animals, the major source of food, as well. One disease, carried by flies, is sleeping sickness, which limits the use of large mammals. Too much rainfall, as well as droughts, can greatly diminish the food supply. Settlement architecture and organization The Bambuti live in villages that are categorized as bands. Each hut houses a family unit. At the start of the season, they leave the village to enter the forest and set up a series of camps. This way the Bambuti are able to utilize more land area for maximum foraging. These villages are solitary and separated from other groups of people. Their houses are small, circular, and very temporary. House construction begins with the tracing of the outline of the house into the ground. The walls of the structures are strong sticks that are placed in the ground, and at the top of the sticks, a vine is tied around them to keep them together. Large leaves are used in the construction of the hut roofs. Food and resources The Bambuti are primarily hunter-gatherers. Their animal foodstuffs include crabs, shellfish, ants, larvae, snails, pigs, antelopes, monkeys, fishes, and honey. The vegetable component of their diet includes wild yams, berries, fruits, roots, leaves, and nuts. While hunting, the Bambuti have been known to specifically target the forest hog. The meat obtained from the giant forest hog (as is the  meat from rats) is often considered kweri, a bad animal which may cause illness to those who eat it, but is often valuable as a trade good between the Bambuti and agriculturalist Bantu groups. There is some lore that is thought to have identified giant forest hogs as kweri due to their nocturnal habits and penchant for disruption of the few agricultural advances the Bambuti have made. This lore can be tied to mythology, where the giant forest hog is thought to be a physical manifestation of Negoogunogumbar. Further, there are unconfirmed reports of giant forest hogs eating Bambuti infants from their cribs in the night. Other food sources yielded by the forest are non-kweri animals for meat consumption, root plants, palm trees, and bananas; and in some seasons, wild honey. Yams, legumes, beans, peanuts, hibiscus, amaranth, and gourds are consumed. The Bambuti use large nets, traps, and bows and arrows to hunt game. Women and children sometimes assist in the hunt by driving the prey into the nets. Both sexes gather and forage. Each band has its own hunting ground, although boundaries are hard to maintain. Trade The Bantu villagers produce many items that the hunter gatherers trade some of their products for. They often obtain iron goods, pots, wooden goods, and basketry, in exchange for meat, animal hides, and other forest goods. Bushmeat is a particularly frequently traded item. They will also trade to obtain agricultural products from the villagers through barter. Labor Hunting is usually done in groups, with men, women, and children all aiding in the process. Women and children are not involved if the hunting involves the use of a bow and arrow, but if nets are used, it is common for everyone to participate. In some instances women may hunt using a net more often than men. The women and the children herd the animals to the net, while the men guard the net. Everyone engages in foraging, and women and men both take care of the children. Women are in charge of cooking, cleaning and repairing the hut, and obtaining water. The kin-based units work together to provide food and care for the young. It is easier for men to lift the women up into the trees for honey. Kinship and descent system The Bambuti tend to follow a patrilineal descent system, and their residences after marriage are patrilocal. However, the system is rather loose. The only type of group seen amongst the Bambuti is the nuclear family. Kinship also provides allies for each group of people. Marriage customs Sister exchange is the common form of marriage. Based on reciprocal exchange, men from other bands exchange sisters or other females to whom they have ties. In Bambuti society, wealth is not customary. There is no formal marriage ceremony: a couple are considered officially married when the groom presents his brides parents with an antelope he alone has hunted and killed. Polygamy does occur, but at different rates depending on the group, and it is not very common. Political structure Bambuti societies have no ruling group or lineage, no overlying political organization, and little social structure. The Bambuti are an egalitarian society in which the band is the highest form of social organization. Leadership may be displayed for example on hunting treks. Men and women basically have equal power. Issues are discussed and decisions are made by consensus at fire camps; men and women engage in the conversations equivalently.  If there is a disagreement, misdemeanor, or offense, then the offender may be banished, beaten or scorned. Religion :See mythology.Everything in the Bambuti life is centered on the forest. They consider the forest to be their great protector and provider and believe that it is a sacred place. They sometimes call the forest mother or father. An important ritual that impacts the Bambutis life is referred to as molimo. After events such as death of an important person in the tribe, molimo is noisily celebrated to wake the forest, in the belief that if bad things are happening to its children, it must be asleep. As for many Bambuti rituals, the time it takes to complete a molimo is not rigidly set; instead, it is determined by the mood of the group. Food is collected from each hut to feed the molimo, and in the evening the ritual is accompanied by the men dancing and singing around the fire. Women and children must remain in their huts with the doors closed. These practices were studied thoroughly by British anthropologist Turnbull, known primarily for his work with the tribe.Molimo is also the name of a trumpet the men play during the ritual. Traditionally, it was made of wood or sometimes bamboo, but Turnbull also reported the use of metal drainpipes. The sound produced by a molimo is considered more important than the material it is made out of. When not in use, the trumpet is stored in the trees of the forest. During a celebration, the trumpet is retrieved by the youth of the village and carried back to the fire. Major challenges today The way of life of the Bambuti is threatened for various reasons. Their territory in the DRC has no legal protections, and the boundaries that each band claims are not formally established. Bambuti are no longer allowed to hunt large game. Due to deforestation, mining, and modern influences from plantations, agriculturalists, and efforts to conserve the forests, their food supply is threatened. There is also much civil unrest in the country.In 2003, Sinafasi Makelo, a representative of Mbuti Pygmies, told the Forum on Indigenous Issues that during the Congo Civil War, his people were hunted down and eaten as though they were game animals. Both sides of the war regarded them as subhuman and some say their flesh can confer magical powers. Makelo asked the Security Council to recognize cannibalism as a against humanity and an act of genocide.(DR Congo pygmies exterminated)(DR Congo Pygmies appeal to UN) See also *Pygmy*Twa (Batwa) peoples*Anarcho-primitivism Notes 1   2  3  4  5  6  7  8  9  10   11  12  13  14  15  16  17  18  19  20  21  22  23  24  25  26  27  28  29  References External links * Todd Pitman, Mbuti Net Hunters of the Ituri Forest, story with photos and link to Audio Slideshow. The Associated Press, 2010.*The Mbuti of Zaire, uconn.edu*African Pygmies Hunter-Gatherers of Central Africa, with photos and soundscapes* Stephanie McCrummen, Lured Toward Modern Life, Pygmy Families Left in Limbo, Washington Post, 12 November 2006*Erasing the Board Report of the international research mission into crimes under international law committed against the Bambuti Pygmies in the eastern Democratic Republic of Congo; Minority Rights Group International, July 2004*http://foragers.wikidot.com/mbuti More information about the Mbuti on a site that is devoted to the scientific study of the diversity of forager societies without recreating a myth.*http://turnbullandthembuti.pbwiki.com/ a critique of Colin Turnbulls The Forest Peoplees:Mbutinl:Mbutija:pl:Mbutisv:Mbuti
607836
Oldest_town_in_Britain
The Oldest town in Britain is a title claimed by a number of settlements in Britain.ThatchamThatcham in Berkshire is often claimed as the oldest town in Britain, since its occupation can be traced back to a mesolithic hunting camp, which was discovered there beside a rebound period lake, and there is evidence of human occupation within and around Thatcham covering the past 13,000 years or more.There is strong evidence to support the case that people settled in Thatcham in the Mesolithic Age (10,000BC - 4,000BC). Arguably it is the Bronze (2,500BC - 750BC) and Iron (750BC - 43AD) Ages which make Thatcham more notable than any other, and indeed makes Thatcham a nationally important place. Thatcham has strong evidence that it was settled by the Romans, then Saxons, and was mentioned in the Book.  Subsequently it received medieval charters.Thatcham has a place in the 1990 World Records as being the strongest claimant to the longest continually inhabited town in the UK.AbingdonAbingdon in the English county of Oxfordshire (historically Berkshire) also claims to be the oldest town in Britain in continuous settlement, with people having lived there for at least 6,000 years. In 1991 evidence of a late-Iron Age enclosure of 33 hectares known as an oppidum was discovered underneath the town centre. Unlike other major earthworks discovered from this period, it continued to be used as a town throughout the Roman occupation of Britain and subsequently became the Saxon settlement of Sevekesham or Seovechesham at a time when most other Roman cities were being abandoned.()()()In 2010 the issue of whether Thatcham or Abingdon was the longest inhabited town was disputed after the popular TV program QI claimed on its websites Fact Of The Day that it was Abingdon.ColchesterColchester claims to be Britains oldest recorded town.()() Its claim is based on a reference by the Elder, the Roman writer, in his Natural History (Historia Naturalis) in AD 77. He described Anglesey as about 200 miles from Camulodunum, a town in Britain, where Camulodunum was the Roman name for Colchester.  It is claimed that this is the first known reference to any named settlement in Britain.However, Camulodunum clearly existed for a substantial period before AD 77. From around AD 10, Cunobelinus (the Cymbeline of Shakespeares play), ruled much of south-east Britain from Camulodunon (the fortress of the war god, Camulos) until his death in AD 40.  Following the invasion by Claudius in AD 43, Camulodunum became the first garrison and capital of the new Roman province of Britannia.  In AD 50, Britains first city, Colonia Claudia Victricensis, was founded there, but the city was razed and its citizens massacred in Boudicas rebellion in AD 60. The Roman provincial capital subsequently moved to Londinium (London) where it remained until the end of Roman colonization and influence.IpswichIpswich, the county town of the English county of Suffolk, also claims it is Englands oldest continuously settled town, with a history of continued occupation since the Anglo Saxons.()()MarazionMarazion in Cornwall is one of the towns claiming to be Britains oldest town. Evidence of tin mining begins to appear in Brittany, Devon and Cornwall, and in the Iberian Peninsula around 2000 BC, and all are possible candidates for the Cassiterides (Tin Islands), believed to be situated somewhere near the west coasts of Europe. Remains of an ancient bronze furnace, discovered near the town, indicates that tin smelting was practised here at an early period. Marazion was recorded in the Book of 1088 and is the oldest chartered town in Britain, having been granted this status by King Henry III in 1257.ReferencesExternal links* Guide to Colchester - Britains Oldest Recorded Town
609449
Warburton,_Victoria
East Warburtonthumb|right|200px|Map of Victoria showing the location of WarburtonWarburton is a town in Victoria, Australia, 72 km east from Melbournes central business district. Its Local Government Area is the of Yarra Ranges. At the 2006 Census, Warburton had a population of 2288.The name Warburton has been shared between two townships over the years. The mining town of Yankee Jims Creek was located on the gold-bearing slopes of Mount Little Joe, and was renamed Warburton after the mining warden of the district, Charles Warburton Carr. Gold depletion caused a declining population in the 1880s, so the town was renamed Old Warburton and the town of Upper Warburton on the banks on the Yarra River was renamed Warburton.The Post Office opened around 1884 though two earlier offices named Warburton were renamed as Launching Place and Hoddles Creek.()Warburton area is a tourist destination, with picturesque mountain views of the surrounding hills. The Yarra river meanders through the township and is lined with walking tracks and beautiful picnic spots. The township is 20 minutes drive from Donna Buang, which is snow covered in the winter. Restaurants and cafs, river walks, snow-play, and wineries make up the local attractions.Warburton was connected to Lilydale by a Railways branch line which closed in 1965.(Australian Railway Historical Society Bulletin, March, 1966 pp49-54)  The railway path is now used for the to Warburton Rail Trail, a trail  used by pedestrians, cyclists, and horse-riders.()  East of Warburton is a large water catchment area called Upper Yarra Dam designed to supply Melbourne with the required amount of water sourced from the Thomson catchment area.Together with its neighbouring township Millgrove, Warburton has an Rules football team (Warburton Millgrove) competing in the Valley Mountain District Football League.( )Golfers play at the course of the Warburton Golf Club on Dammans Road.() Notable people * Thompson (19232008), politician* Johanson (1956-), aviator* James Webb (1967-), artistSee alsoWarburton railway stationReferencesExternal links*Warburton Chamber of Commerce, Tourist Info and Community Groups websitethumb|left|500px|The Brisbane Bridge over the Yarra River, Warburton(Victoria)(Victoria)
611308
Ibrahim_of_Johor
Sultan Ibrahim Iskandar Al-Masyhur ibni Abu Bakar or Sultan Ibrahim II, GCMG, GBE, (17 September 1873&ndash;8 May 1959) was the 22nd Sultan of Johor, in Malaysia. He was known as one of the richest men in the world during his reign.An Anglophile, Sultan Ibrahim continued the policy of friendly relations with the crown of the Kingdom, often manipulating his friendship with the reigning kings of Britain to thwart the expansionist ambitions of the British Office.He became highly unpopular later due to him being known as an Anglophile and opposed to Malayan independence. This led him to spend most of his time away from his state, travelling to Europe, particularly Britain.Early lifeWan Ibrahim was born September 17, 1873 in Istana Bidadari, Singapore, and received his education at a boarding school in England during his formative years. He was appointed a Lieutenant of the Johor Military Forces during his teenage years and was formally installed as the first Tunku Mahkota of Johor on 23 May 1891(Basri, Johor, 1855-1917: Pentadbiran dan Perkembangannya, pg 64) and was brought to Europe by his father where he was being introduced to the European royal families.(Nadarajah, Johore and the Origins of British Control, 1895-1914, pg 48) During his term as the Tunku Mahkota, Tunku Ibrahim occasionally acted as the states regent and was delegated a few state duties whenever the Sultan was travelling overseas.( In his free time, Tunku Ibrahim spent most of his time in hunting and horseracing.(Tate, The Making of Modern South-East Asia, pg 144)Tunku Ibrahim acted as one of the three signatories when Sultan Abu Bakar promogulated the Johor state constitution in April 1895.(Kings of old feared and revered, 1 March 2009, Straits Times) The following month, Tunku Ibrahim accompanied Abu Bakar to London, who had the intent of seeking further negotiations with the Colonial Office on state affairs. Abu Bakar was by then a very sick man when he reached England, and Tunku Ibrahim spent much of his time by his fathers bedside before Abu Bakar died the following month.(Noor, The Other Malaysia: Writings on Malaysias Subaltern History, pg 51)Sultan of JohorEarly years (1895-1914)Tunku Ibrahim was proclaimed as the Sultan of Johor on the day of Abu Bakars burial on 7 September 1895, while his one-year old son, Tunku Ismail was proclaimed as his heir-apparent.(Puthucheary, The Politics of Administration: The Malaysian Experience, pg 29) A formal coronation ceremony took place on 2 November 1895.(Anon, European Settlements in the Far East, pg 265) He took over the state government the following year, and one of his first reports was the financial difficulties which the state was facing.(Gullick, Rulers and Residents: Influence and Power in the Malay States, 1870-1920, pg 131) Many of his employees complained of delays in receiving their salaries; which was often paid in installments. Sultan Ibrahim then took charge of closely supervising the state treasury, and personally witnessed the payment of the states employees during payment day.(Winstedt, A History of Johore (13651941), pg 141) In the same year, he also took on the task of appointing the committee members of the Johor Gambier and Pepper Society (also known as Kongkek in Malay).(Trocki, Prince of Pirates: The Temenggongs and the Development of Johor and Singapore, 1784-1885, pg 179) Sultan Ibrahim was inexperienced in public administration skills and heavily relied on his private secretary, Abdul Rahman bin Andak on advice and assistance in running the affairs of the state.(Winstedt, A History of Johore (13651941), pg 142) The Resident General of the Malay States, Swettenham proposed to Sultan Ibrahim in November 1899 for the construction of a railway line into Johor, in conjunction with his plan for the North-South Main Trunk Railway line in the Peninsula. Sultan Ibrahim welcomed Swettenham of the plan but was weary of political British influence in Johor and insisted on financing the construction of the railway linehimself. Swettenham was comfortable with Sultan Ibrahims prospect of financing the railway line using the states revenues, and submitted his proposals to the Colonial Office in England. The proposals drew skepticism from the Secretary of State for the Colonies, Chamberlain, who was aware of Johors financial difficulties and withheld decision. Sultan Ibrahim then sent his Abdul Rahman the following May to London to negotiate with the Colonial Office,(Nadarajah, Johore and the Origins of British Control, 1895-1914, pg 68-9) and in April 1901, Sultan Ibrahim made a year-long trip to London to seek private English financers to fund the construction of the railway line and negotiated with the Colonial Office for a railway loan.(Nadarajah, Johore and the Origins of British Control, 1895-1914, pg 57) The Sultan did, however, manage to obtain a loan for the construction of the railway and the Johor Railway Convention was signed in July 1904 by his adviser, Abdul Rahman, that gave provisions for an extension of the Malayan railway line to be extended into Johor.( Sultan Ibrahim returned to Johor the following year, and expanded the states military forces. He instituted the Johor Volunteer Forces (JVF), which consisted of young Malay boys and served as the states reservist soldiers.( In 1906, he granted land concessions to English capitalists and financiers for development purposes. This drew the concern of the Straits Governor, Sir John Anderson, who was not very favourable with Sultan Ibrahims intents to detach Johors economic dependence from Singapore. He successfully pressured Sultan Ibrahim to dispense with the services of Abdul Rahman( as well as ceding the administrative powers of the railway line to the colonial government the following year after reports of the states troubled finances were revealed.(Nadarajah, Johore and the Origins of British Control, 1895-1914, pg 192)Sultan Ibrahim was also facing political challenges from the British colonial government, who were ostensibly unhappy his negligence in his state affairs and were seeking to extend greater political influence into the state. The Colonial Secretary of the Straits Settlements, Victor Bruce, Lord Elgin had met Sultan Ibrahim in 1906 and advised him to administer the state in favour of British interests and to cut down on his overseas travels to Europe.(Nadarajah, Johore and the Origins of British Control, 1895-1914, pg 128) Sultan Ibrahim was adamant to Elgins advice and was indignant to accept British advice, and was later warned by Lord Elgin two years later on the British possibility to enact constitutional changes in the state administration.(Nadarajah, Johore and the Origins of British Control, 1895-1914, pg 139) In 1910, Sultan Ibrahim accepted a British adviser for Johor after immense pressure from the colonial government. The British were extremely unhappy with the condition of Johors finances, which was depleted as a result of Sultan Ibrahims extensive overseas travels. The British-Resident of Sembilan, Douglas Graham Campbell was appointed the first adviser of Johor.(Nadarajah, Johore and the Origins of British Control, 1895-1914, pg 51)Relations between Sultan Ibrahim and Campbell were excellent within Campbells first year as an adviser, and Sultan Ibrahim gave him support to improve the state administrative system.(Nadarajah, Johore and the Origins of British Control, 1895-1914, pg 150) However, a tenacious relationship was develop as Campbell proposed numerous administrative reforms which were disproved by the Sultan. A political scandal erupted in 1912 after Campbell publicly revealed malpractices of the Bahru Prison. Campbell was particularly unhappy with the way the prisoners were incarcated and lobbied to the British authorities to take charge of the administrative affairs of the prison, and ignited protest from the Sultan.(Nadarajah, Johore and the Origins of British Control, 1895-1914, pg 167) Grievances between the Sultans administration and the colonial government over the administrative control of the state railway remain unabated during this period, and the Menteri Besar of Johor, Dato Abdullah bin Jaafar was delegated to handle these matters.(Nadarajah, Johore and the Origins of British Control, 1895-1914, pg 165) Shortly after his fallout with Campbell, Sultan Ibrahim implemented a state executive council (Malay: Masyurat Kerja) to oversee the administration of state agricultural and mining activities.(Straits Settlements. Statistical Office, Malayan Information Agency, Malayan Year Book, 1935, pg 25) The Sultan distanced himself from the Campbell and the states legal adviser, Whitley and took administrative matters into his own hands. This incited worry and unhappiness in Campbell and Whitley, and they submitted a memorandum to the Governor of the Straits Settlements, Sir Arthur Henderson Young to appeal for greater British administrative control over the state. Young gave provisions to Campbell with the power similar to a British Resident-General from other states, but kept the title of General Adviser to show protocol deference to the Sultan.(Nadarajah, Johore and the Origins of British Control, 1895-1914, pg 178) Sultan Ibrahim was unhappy with the new proposals as the British adviser would have more direct control over the state affairs, but Young assured the Sultan that the he will be available for consultation in the event whereby  opinion differences may arise between Campbell and Sultan Ibrahim. A treaty was signed on 12 May 1914, which formalised the powers of the states General Adviser.(Nadarajah, Johore and the Origins of British Control, 1895-1914, pg 179)World War I and Interwar years (1914-1941)The state economy experienced a budget surplus as a result of an  increase in rubber prices for the rest of the 1910s. Campbell served as its states General Adviser until his death in June 1918, and between June 1918 until December 1920, five General Advisers were appointed in succession, each of whom only took office for a few months. As the colonial government lacked a decisiveness in the state administration, Sultan Ibrahim attempted to extend his influence in the state administration. Hayes Marriot was appointed as the states new General Adviser in December 1920 and reorganised the state administration.(Winstedt, A History of Johore (13651941), pg 149) Sultan Ibrahim took on the role of a ceremonial monarch from the 1920s onwards, and his duties were largely limited to gracing various opening ceremonies around the state. He occasionally expressed his views on the state administration and economic developments whenever he had grievances, which the British colonial government often took into account as a result of his political influence in the state.(Winstedt, A History of Johore (13651941), pg 180) He began to take time off to travel abroad  from 1928, after he began to suffer from chronic gout and myocardial degeneration.(Winstedt, A History of Johore (13651941), pg 175-6) London was one destination which he often visited, and frequented the Colonial Office whenever he had grievances with the state administration.(Winstedt, A History of Johore (13651941), pg 178) As a result of his frequent complaints of maladministration of state affairs by the local British government, Sultan Ibrahims relations with each General Adviser became strained. Sir Clementi, who served as the Governor of the Straits Settlements as well as the High Commissioner of the Malay States from 1930 to 1934, remarked in December 1932 that Sultan Ibrahim was too independent in state affairs and proposed to the Sultan that he should approach Clementi in future under the capacity of the High Commissioner instead of the Straits Governor. Clementis proposals apparently angered the Sultan, who boycotted the Durbar in February 1934.(Sultan Ibrahim was a close friend of Frank Buck and often assisted Buck in his animal collecting endeavors.Malay nationalism took root in Johor during the 1920s as a Malay aristocrat, Jaafar, whom the Sultan had treated him as an adopted son, became a journalist and wrote articles on the welfare of the Malays. Some of Onns articles were critical of Sultan Ibrahims policies, which led to a strained personal relations with the Sultan. In particular, Sultan Ibrahim expelled Onn from Johor after he published an article in the Sunday Mirror, a Singapore-based English tabloid and criticised the Sultans poor treatment of the Johor Military Forces personnel and the welfare of the Asli. Onn became very popular after he continued to cover issues on Malay grievances, and Sultan Ibrahim invited Onn to return to Johor in 1936.(Aristocrat who spoke his mind, 18 June 2007, Star (Malaysia)) Sultan Ibrahim became an active patron of the states forestry department around 1930, and encouraged the state forestry department to designate some of the remaining virgin forests in the state as reserves, as Johor witnessed a reduction in timber supplies due to extensive logging in the past. Nature reserves covered about 15 per cent of the states land area by 1934, mainly in the northern regions of the state.(Wells, Nature and Nation: Forests and Development in Peninsular Malaysia, pg 142-3) Sultan Ibrahims relations with Clementis successor, Sir Thomas did not fare well as Thomas attempted to form a centralised Union by bringing Johore and other Malay States under the direct charge of the Straits Governor.(Newbury, Patrons, Clients, and Empire: Chieftaincy and Over-rule in Asia, Africa, and the Pacific, pg 167) As the Second World War broke out in 1939, Thomas introduced the Pan-Malayan war tax scheme to fund for Britains war efforts. Sultan Ibrahims rejected proposals, and made a 250,000 cash gift to VI of the United Kingdom on his 44th birthday in 1939 during his trip to Europe in 1939.(Stockwell, British policy and Malay Politics during the Malayan Union Experiment, 1945-1948, pg 1) From 1934 to 1940 the Sultans name was associated with that of the cabaret dancer Cecilia Hill,() who was buried in 1940 at Kent.()Japanese Occupation (1941-1945)Sultan Ibrahim became a personal friend of Tokugawa Yoshichika during the 1920s. Tokugawa was a scion of the clan, and his ancestors were military leaders (Shogun in Japanese) which ruled Japan from the 16th to the 19th centuries. When the Japanese invaded Malaya, Tokugawa accompanied General Yamashita Tomoyukis troops and was warmly received by Sultan Ibrahim when they reached Johor Bahru at the end of January 1942. Yamashita and his officers then stationed themselves at the Sultans residence, Bukit Serene and the state secretariat building, Ibrahim Building to plan for the invasion of Singapore.(Lee, Singapore: The Unexpected Nation, pg 37)The Japanese established a military government in February, shortly after they settled down in Malaya. Tokugawa was appointed as its political adviser at the recommendation of Sultan Ibrahim. Relations between the military government and the monarchy were initially coordial throughout the Japanese occupation years, and Tokugawa briefly envisioned a plan for a united Malay Sultanate over the Peninsula (including Pattani) with Sultan Ibrahim as its figurehead. However, as the Japanese began to experience economic difficulties and military defeats in the War from 1943 onwards, these plans were dropped and the military government channelled its efforts towards state agriculture. The Japanese continued the British policy of appointing a state adviser in Johor, and Sultan Ibrahim spent most of his time in his leisure activities.(Bayly, Harper, Forgotten Armies: The Fall of British Asia, 1941-1945, pg 220-1)Sultan Ibrahim, on his part, became resentful of the Japanese military government during the later part of the occupation years. The Japanese gave orders to the Malay Sultans to contribute an  annual stipend of $10,000 to support the Japanese war efforts, and public speeches which the rulers made were drafted by the prpoaganda department.(Cheah, Red Star Over Malaya: Resistance and Social Conflict during and after the Japanese occupation of Malaya, 1941-1946, pg 267-8) In particular, Sultan Ibrahim was once publicly rebuked for leaning on his walking stick before Japanese officers and humiliating him in the process.(Bayly, Harper, Forgotten Armies: The Fall of British Asia, 1941-1945, pg 221) Shortly before the Japanese surrendered in 1945, Sultan Ibrahim was expelled from his residence at Istana Bukit Serene and was forced to reside at Pasir Pelangi, the crown princes palace.(Bayly, Harper, Forgotten wars: Freedom and Revolution in Southeast Asia, pg 132)Malay nationalism (1946-1948)The Military Administration set to task of reviving pre-war plans for centralised control over the Malay states within days after British Allied forces landed in Singapore on 5 September 1945. A former Malayan Civil Service legal officer, H.C. Willan, was ordered to interview the Malay rulers and Willan approached Sultan Ibrahim on 8 September. Sultan Ibrahim was living at Istana Pasir Pelangi with his Romanian wife, and reportedly warmed up to Willan when he first saw him.(Stockwell, Malaya: The Malayan Union Experiment, pg 132) During the interview with Willan, Sultan Ibrahim spoke bitterly of his experiences during the Japanese occupation years, and offered to serve under the British Military Administration. The Sultan asked Willans permission to fly the Jack on his car to attend the surrender ceremony on 12 September, and the British military government granted his requests.(Stockwell, Malaya: The Malayan Union Experiment, pg 140)Willan made further interviews with other Malay rulers over the next few days, and made assessments of the political situation in each state. His studies were forwarded to the military administration, and Sir MacMichael, the former high commissioner of Palestine was empowered to sign official treaties with the Malay rulers over the Union proposal scheme. MacMichael made several visits to the Malay rulers, beginning with Sultan Ibrahim in October 1945. The Sultan quickly consented to MacMichaels proposal scheme, which was motivated by his strong desire to visit England at the end of the year. MacMichael paid further visits to other Malay rulers over the proposal, and sought their consent over the proposal scheme. Many Malay rulers expressed strong reluctance in signing the treaties with MacMichael, partly because they feared losing their royal status and the prospect of their states falling into Thai political influence.(Bayly, Harper, Forgotten wars: Freedom and Revolution in Southeast Asia, pg 133-4)The treaties provided that Kingdom had full administrative powers over the Malay states except in areas pertaining to Islamic customs. The Malays strongly protested against the treaties, as the treaties had the effect of circumscribing the spiritual and moral authority of the Malay rulers, which the Malays held high esteem over it. Communal tensions between the Malays and Chinese were high, and the prospect of granting citizenship to non-Malays was deemed unacceptable to the Malays.( In particular, politicians in Johor were extremely unhappy with the willingness of Sultan Ibrahim to sign the treaties with MacMichael, and voiced out that the Sultan Ibrahim had violated the terms in the Johor state constitution which explicitly forbade any foreign powers to assume legitimate control over the state. In early February 1946, seven political dissidents led by Awang bin Hassan organised a rally to protest against the Sultans decision for signing the treaties, and Jaafar, who was then serving as a district officer in Pahat, was invited to attend the rally.(Bayly, Harper, Forgotten wars: Freedom and Revolution in Southeast Asia, pg 211) The rally was held on 1 February 1946 at the Abu Bakar State Mosque, and protesters shouted nationalistic slogans and called for the dethronement of Sultan Ibrahim. Malay nationalistic slogans were raised during the rally, many of whom were directed against the Sultan himself, whom they accused him for committing treason against the Malay race by signing the treaties. News of the rally reached the Sultan Ibrahim on 22 February, who was then residing at House in London. Sultan Ibrahim approached the colonial office and expressed his withdrawal of support for the proposal scheme, but this did not appease the political dissidents and Onn continued to organise more rallies in the other Malay states to muster further support for his calls against the Malayan Union, and formed Malays National Organisation (UMNO) in May.(Bayly, Harper, Forgotten wars: Freedom and Revolution in Southeast Asia, pg 211-2)Sultan Ibrahim returned to Johor in early September 1947 and attended UMNOs second general meeting at Besar, which was led by its youth chief, Onn. Although many Johor politicians still held a critical opinion of Sultan Ibrahim over the treaties with MacMichael, the UMNO delegates gave him a rousing welcome when he arrived at the palace.(Stockwell, British policy and Malay politics during the Malayan Union Experiment, 1945-1948, pg 99) Critical opinions against the Sultan waned after the of Malaya was established the following January, which restored the rulers powers. Shortly before Sultan Ibrahim left for England in May, he personally donated a lump of $5,000 to UMNO, hoping to improve relations with UMNO leaders and Onn himself, who was appointed the Menteri Besar of Johor in 1946.(Bayly, Harper, Forgotten wars: Freedom and Revolution in Southeast Asia, pg 361)Pre-independence Malaya (1948-1957)The establishment of the Federation did not go down well with the Chinese, whereby favourable conditions for obtaining citizenship for the Chinese and other non-Malays were withdrawn. The Chinese Association (MCA) was formed in 1949 under the leadership of a Chinese businessman, Cheng Lock who frequently raised grievances over the citizenship terms that were set when the Federation was established.(Bayly, Harper, Forgotten wars: Freedom and Revolution in Southeast Asia, pg 502-3) As a result, communal tensions between the Malays and Chinese surfaced, and Onn kept his distance from Tan. Tan encountered initial difficulties with meeting the Sultan, who was not accustomed to working with Chinese businessmen. Sultan Ibrahim also became increasingly disappointed in Onns work commitment, whom he saw as neglecting state affairs as a result of his commitments towards UMNO. In early 1950, Sultan Ibrahim approached Onn, who was asked to choose between committing his efforts for UMNO and the state. Onn chose to the latter, and resigned as the Menteri Besar of Johor in May.(Ong, One Mans Will: A Portrait of Dato Sir Onn bin Jaafar, pg 184)Sultan Ibrahim became increasingly uncomfortable with the idea of Johor as a state within the Federation of Malaya, particularly when the prospect of an independent Federation free from British interference became increasingly clearer under Abdul Rahmans leadership. In a letter which he wrote to Straits Times in 1953, Straits Settlement Forever, Sultan Ibrahim expressed a sceptical opinion of Johors future as part of an independent Malaya, and voiced support for the continuation of British Adviser system in Johor.(of Malaya, Journal of Malaysian and Comparative Law (Jernal Undang-undang), Vol. 14, pg 142) At his diamond jubilee celebrations in September 1955, Sultan Ibrahim publicly called for Johors secession from the Federation.(Sopiee, From Malayan Union to Singapore Separation: Political Unification in the Malaysia region, 1945-65, pg 77) Sultan Ibrahims calls for secession inspired the formation of Persatuan Kebangsaan Melayu Johor (PKMJ) the following month, a secessionist movement led by Ungku Abdullah bin Omar, a relative of Sultan Ibrahim who was serving as one of Johors state executive councillor. The Sultan voiced public support for PKMJ during a public gathering in mid-December 1955, and PKMJ courted considerable support from the grassroots within the first half of 1956.(Sopiee, From Malayan Union to Singapore Separation: Political Unification in the Malaysia region, 1945-65, pg 78)The Alliance party reacted strongly to the events which motivated the formation of the PKMJ, and called for the Alliance-dominated Johor state executive council to vet all future state-policy speeches that will be made by the Sultan or members of the royal family.( In particular, the Alliance reacted with great hostility to the existence of the PKMJ, and actively attempted to suppress and discredit the party. PKMJ rapidly lost most of its members to UMNO, and by mid-1957 Ungku Abdullah only had ten members left within the party. Meanwhile, at the of Rulers in March 1957, Tunku Abdul Rahman expressed his desire to elect Sultan Ibrahim as the first di-Pertuan Agong of Malaysia, but Sultan Ibrahim declined on grounds of his old age and desire to lead his final years in retirement.(Tate, The Making of Modern South-East Asia, pg 145) Four months later in July 1957, Ungku Abdullah made one last call to urge Sultan Ibrahim not to sign the Malayan Federal Constitution. The Sultan, who was now residing in London, replied to Ungku Abdullah that he had empowered the Tunku Mahkota, Tunku Ismail (later Sultan Ismail) to decide on the matter. Ungku Abdullah then called upon Tunku Ismail not to sign the constitution, but his calls were ignored and Tunku Ismail proceeded to sign the constitution at the rulers meeting. Following the ordeal, Ungku Abdullah formally disbanded the party a few days before Malayas Independence day.( WealthDuring his reign, the Sultan was known as one of the richest men in the world. He also had a reputation as a wild international playboy. His exploits ranged from changing the colour of his racing horse to present it as an unknown  with better odds of course  to less savoury behaviour in the red-light area of Vienna. To be fair, he spread his wealth around, giving a magnificent pair of tigers to Zoo on the one hand and, on the other, sending a huge cash present to King George V on his Jubilee.The Sultan was an Anglophile and spent much of his life away from Johor, preferring the more liberal delights of Europe. He sent his sons, by his Malay wives, to be educated in Britain.The Sultan was reported to have given Helen Ibrahim a spectacular jewel collection, reputedly giving her an emerald on her birthday and a diamond on their wedding anniversary, even after the divorce. It is little wonder that her jewellery collection was held to be the finest in the world.DeathSultan Ibrahim spent the last two years of his life at his apartment at Grosvenor House in London. He spent most of his time watching television and visiting theatres and enjoyed the company of his sixth wife, Marcella Mendl and their beloved daughter, Tunku Meriam.(Shrubs in the Fairway, Magazine, 18 May 1959) The Sultan died on 8 May 1959 at his apartment, with his wife reportedly at his bedside during his last hours.(The Sultana of Johore&ndash;The Story Behind the Stamp, Gibbons Stamp Monthly, September 2007) Tunku Ismail was appointed as the Sultan of Johor in place of his father, and many Malay and British leaders who have worked with him publicly expressed their condolences to the late Sultan within the first two weeks of his death.(Royal Asiatic Society of Great Britain and Ireland. Malaysian Branch, Journal of the Malaysian Branch of the Royal Asiatic Society, pg 41) The Sultans body was shipped back to Johor Bahru and arrived the following month, whereby he was given a state funeral and his body lay in state between 46 June at Besar.(Istana Besar, birthplace of Umno, Fauziah Ismail, 22 March 2009, Straits Times)(The Sultan of Johores Funeral, The Janvinsion Gallery, retrieved 14 June 2009)At the time of his death, Sultan Ibrahim was probably the longest reigning Malay sultan in Malayan history after having ruled for 64 years.FamilySultan Ibrahim was the only son of Che Wan Abu Bakar, Temenggung of Johor by Che Puan Besar Zubaidah (ne Cecilia Catharina Lange, 18481939). Zubaidah was the daughter of Johansen Lange; a Balinese-based Danish businessman(Braginsky, Murtagh, Harrison, pg 137) and his Chinese wife, Nonna Sang Nio(Andresen, pp 7, 42, 48, 184; Schefold, Vermeulen, pp 118) (born Ong Sang Nio). Nonna, who was born in Southern China, lived in East Java for a time prior to her marriage to Lange.(Mabbett, In Praise of Kuta: From Slave Port to Fishing Village to the Most Popular Resort in Bali, pp 140) He had one sister, Meriam (born 1871).MarriageSultan Ibrahim married at least four official wives who became sultanahs of Johor. They were: * Ungku Maimunah binti Ungku Abdul Majid (d 1909); married 1892, they had one son, Sultan Ismail (18941981)* Che Ruqaiya (d 1926); married in 1920, they had one son, Tunku Abu Bakar (18981956)* Helen Bartholomew Wilson (18891977), former wife of William Brockie Wilson; married 15 October 1930, divorced 30 March 1938* Marcella Mendl (19151982), daughter of Edgar Mendl and cousin of British diplomat Sir Charles Mendl.http://205.188.238.109/time/magazine/article/0,9171,777520,00.html. Upon converting to Islam, she took the name Fawzia binti Abdullah and was known as Lady Marcella Ibrahim (19401955) and Her Highness Sultana Fawzia binti Abdullah (19551982). Married in 1940, they had one daughter, Tunku Miriam binti al-Marhum Sultan Sir Ibrahim (born 18 September 1950)http://aolsvc.timeforkids.kol.aol.com/time/magazine/article/0,9171,817864-1,00.html (married 1978-1980, Barry Sapherson, aka Barry Ryan)http://www.royalark.net/Malaysia/johor14.htmHe also had a son by Hasnah bte Jaffar: Tunku Ahmad, 1898-1983.LegacyIn recent years, efforts have been made by the sultans heirs to rehabilitate his image and paint him as a benevolent ruler.  However, Sultan Ibrahim is largely remembered as an anti-independence figure, a wastrel and a close (almost deferential) ally of the British.  The posthumous title of the Great (in Malay, mil Masyhur) conferred on him by his grandson Sultan Iskandar, never caught on.Honours* Grand Commander of the Family Order of Johor (DK) - 1891* Knight Grand Commander of the of the Crown of Johor (SPMJ)-1891* Queen Victoria Diamond Jubilee Medal - 1897* Imperial Order of the Osmans (Nishan-i-Osmanieh), 1st Class - 1898* Edward VII Coronation Medal - 1902* George V Coronation Medal - 1911* Grand Cross of the Order of St Michael and St George (GCMG) - 1916  (KCMG - 1897)* Grand Cross of the of the Crown of Romania - 1920* Grand Cordon of the of the White Elephant - 1924* Grand Cross of the Order of Cambodia-1933* Grand Cross of the of the Dragon of Annam-1933* Grand Cordon of the of the Rising Sun-1934* Grand Cross of the Order of the British Empire (GBE)-1935  (KBE-1918)* George V Silver Jubilee Medal-1935*George VI Coronation Medal-1937* Grand Cross of the of the Crown of Italy-1938* Grand Cordon of the of the Brilliant Star of Zanzibar* Elizabeth II Coronation Medal-1953* Order of the Crown of State of Malaysia (DMN - 1958Footnotes(NotesReferences* Andresen, Paul, Mads Lange fra Bali: Og Hans Efterslaegt Sultanerne af Johor, Universitetsforlag, 1992, ISBN 8774928511* Anon, European Settlements in the Far East, published by READ BOOKS, 2008, ISBN 1443722928* Basri, M. A. Fawzi Mohd., Johor, 1855-1917: Pentadbiran dan Perkembangannya, published by Fajar Bakti, 1988, ISBN 9679337170* Braginsky, Vladimir, Murtagh, Ben, Harrison, Rachel (FRW, The Portrayal of Foreigners in Indonesian and Malay Literatures: Essays on the Ethnic other, Edwin Mellen Press, 2007, ISBN 0773453652* Bayly, Christopher Alan; Harper, Timothy Norman, Forgotten armies: the fall of British Asia, 1941-1945, University Press, 2005, ISBN 067401748X* Bayly, Christopher Alan; Harper, Timothy Norman, Forgotten wars: freedom and revolution in Southeast Asia, Harvard University Press, 2007, ISBN 0674021533* Cheah, Boon Keng, Red Star Over Malaya: Resistance and Social Conflict during and after the Japanese occupation of Malaya, 1941-1946, NUS Press, 2003, ISBN 9971692740* Gullick, J.M., Rulers and Residents: Influence and Power in the Malay States, 1870-1920, University Press, 1992, ISBN 0195885678* Lee, Edwin Siew Cheng, Singapore: The Unexpected Nation,  Institute of Southeast Asian Studies, 2008, ISBN 9812307966* Lim, Patricia Pui Huen; Wong, Diana, War and Memory in Malaysia and Singapore, Institute of Southeast Asian Studies, 2000, ISBN 9812300376* Mabbett, Hugh, In Praise of Kuta: From Slave Port to Fishing Village to the Most Popular Resort in Bali, January Books, 1987, ISBN 0959780602* Nadarajah, Nesalamar, Johore and the Origins of British Control, 1895-1914, Arenabuku, 2000, ISBN 9679703185* Newbury, Colin Walter, Patrons, Clients, and Empire: Chieftaincy and Over-rule in Asia, Africa, and the Pacific, University Press, 2003, ISBN 0199257817* Noor, Farish A.,The Other Malaysia: Writings on Malaysias Subaltern History, Silverfishbooks, 2002, ISBN 9834081634* Ong, Pamela Siew Im, One Mans Will: A Portrait of Dato Sir Onn bin Jaafar, 1998, ISBN 9838080535* Puthucheary, Marvis, The Politics of Administration: The Malaysian Experience, University Press, 1978, ISBN 0195803876* Royal Asiatic Society of Great Britain and Ireland. Malaysian Branch, Journal of the Malaysian Branch of the Royal Asiatic Society, 1966* Schefold, Reimar, Vermeulen, Han F., Treasure Hunting?: Collectors and Collections of Indonesian Artefacts, Published by CNWS, 2002, ISBN 905789078X* Sopiee, Mohammed Nordin, From Malayan Union to Singapore Separation: Political Unification in the Malaysia region, 1945-65, University Malaya Press, 2005, ISBN 983100194X* Stockwell, A.J., British policy and Malay Politics during the Malayan Union Experiment, 1945-1948, Council of the MBRAS by Art Printing Works, 1979* Stockwell, A.J., Malaya: The Malayan Union Experiment, 1942-1948, Council of the MBRAS by Art Printing Works, 1995, ISBN 0112905404* Straits Settlements. Statistical Office, Malayan Information Agency, Malayan Year Book, 1935, Government Printing Office, 1939* Tate, D.J.M, The Making of Modern South-East Asia, University Press, 1971* Trocki, Carl A., Prince of Pirates: The Temenggongs and the Development of Johor and Singapore, 1784-1885, Singapore University Press, 1979* Winstedt R.O., A History of Johore (13651941), (M.B.R.A.S. Reprints, 6.) Kuala Lumpur: Malaysian Branch of the Royal Asiatic Society, 1992, ISBN 9839961462* of Malaya, Journal of Malaysian and Comparative Law (Jernal Undang-undang), Vol. 14, 1984, Lumpur, Universiti Malaya, Fakulti Undang-undang* Wells, J. Kathirithamby, Nature and Nation: Forests and Development in Peninsular Malaysia, of Hawaii Press, 2005, ISBN 0824828631 External links * Glasgow girl and the Sultan of Johore* Royalty* video: Sultan Ibrahim assists Frank Buck in capturing a man eating tigeraf JohorIbrahim dari JohorIbrahim ibni Sultan Abu Bakar
613782
Silver_City_Highway
Image:Calder silvercity.jpg|thumb|left|The Silver City Highway, near New South Wales.The Silver City Highway is a highway in the state of South Wales, Australia. It runs from south to north close to the western border of South Wales with Australia.  It links the towns of Wentworth,  located at the confluence of the River and the River,  to the mining city of Broken Hill,  and the village of Tibooburra in the remotest, north west corner of South Wales.North of Broken Hill the highway has a partially unsealed (gravel) surface, although one section is currently being sealed.Much of the Highway from Wentworth northwards has a speed limit posted at 110 km/h. The 265 km from Wentworth to Broken Hill has just one roadhouse, Coombah, which sells basic foodstuffs and fuel. Between Hill and Tibooburra the main stop for fuel and supplies is at Packsaddle.  The highway crosses the River into Victoria at the hamlet of Yelta via the Bridge. It continues south through Victoria as the Highway, and is given the shield A79.See also*in Australia*of highways in New South WalesReferences
614371
Pietro_Belluschi
awards             Gold MedalMedal of ArtsPietro Belluschi (August 18, 1899  February 14, 1994) was an American architect, a leader of the Modern Movement in architecture, and was responsible for the design of over one thousand buildings.(Belluschi, Pietro. (2007). In Encyclopdia Britannica. Retrieved September 22, 2007, from: Encyclopdia Britannica Online) Born in Italy, Belluschis architectural career began as a draftsman in a Oregon firm.  He achieved a national reputation within about twenty years, largely for his 1947 aluminum-clad Equitable Building.  In 1951 he was named the dean of the School of Architecture and Planning, where he served until 1965, also working as collaborator and design consultant for many high-profile commissions, most famously the 1963 Pan Am Building.  He won the 1972 Gold Medal.Early lifePietro Belluschi was born in Italy in 1899.(Gragg, Randy. Belluschi revered as creative, spiritual architect. Oregonian, February 15, 1994.) He grew up in Italy and served in the Italian armed forces during War I when Italy was allied with Britain, France, and later the United States.( Serving in the army he fought against the Austrians at the battles of Caporetto and Vittorio Veneto.( After the war, Belluschi studied at the University of Rome, earning a degree in engineering in 1922.( He moved to the United States in 1923, despite speaking no English, and finished his educationas an exchange student on a scholarshipat University with a second degree in civil engineering.((() Instead of returning to Italy, he worked briefly as a mining engineer in Idaho earning $5 per day, but he then joined the architectural office of E. Doyle in Portland.( He remained in the U.S., as friends in Italy had cautioned him to not return home because of the rise to power of Mussolini and the Fascist government.(CareerImage:St Marys Cathedral - San Francisco.jpg|thumb|of Saint Mary of the Assumption in San FranciscoAt Doyles office, Belluschi rose rapidly, soon becoming chief designer. After Doyle died in 1928, the firm took him into partnership in 1933. By 1943, Belluschi had assumed control of the firm by buying out all the other partners and was practicing under his own name. In 1951, Belluschi became Dean of the architecture and planning school at the Institute of Technology, a position he held until 1965.( When he accepted the position of dean and moved to Massachusetts, he transferred his office in Portland to the architecture firm Owings and Merrill. The move reduced his annual income from $150,000 to a salary of $15,000, but was prompted by health concerns attributable to the long hours of managing his office while still designing buildings.(Belluschi emerged as a leader in the development of American architecture, with the design of several buildings reflecting the influence of the International Style and his awareness of the technological opportunities of new materials. Most important was the Equitable Building (194447) in Portland, Oregon: a concrete frame office block clad in aluminum, and considered the first office building with a completely sealed air-conditioned environment.  Belluschis churches and residences differed from his commercial works. Although of Modern design, they fit within the development of the Northwest regional Modern idiom as they frequently used regional materials (particularly wood) and were often integrated with their suburban or rural sites.Awards and honorsBelluschi was elected a Fellow of the Academy of Arts and Sciences in 1952.()  He was a Fellow in the Institute of Architects (AIA), and was awarded the Gold Medal, the highest award given by the institute, in 1972.( He was awarded the Medal of Arts by the National Endowment for the Arts in 1991 for his lifetime achievements.(National Medal of Arts: Medalists. National Endowment for the Arts, accessed September 22, 2007.) Belluschi was on the jury that selected the winning design for the Veterans Memorial in D.C.(Clausen, Meredith L., Pietro Belluschi: Modern American Architect, Press, Cambridge, Massachusetts and London 1994, ISBN 0262032201)Later lifethumb|The Portland Art Museum.After leaving MIT in 1965, he continued to work. Belluschi would design and consult on both buildings and issues surrounding planning.( Pietro married Marjorie, and they had two sons: Peter and Anthony.( Pietro Belluschi died in Portland on February 14, 1994.(Worksthumb|Commonwealth Building in Portland.Image:Rohm and Haas.jpg|thumb|and HaasBelluschis designs include:* Pacific Telephone and Telegraph Company Building, southern addition, Portland,( 1926* Building, Portland, 1926* Public Service Building, Portland, Oregon, 1927* Belluschi Building, Art Museum (NRHP), 1932* Library Building (now Smullin Hall) at University, Oregon,(Gregg, Robert D. 1970. Chronicles of Willamette, volume II: Those eventful years of the President Smith era. Salem, Or: Willamette University.) 1938* Thomas More Catholic Church, Portland, 1940* Peter Kerr House, Oregon,(http://www.greatbuildings.com/buildings/Peter_Kerr_House.html) 1941* Chapel, River View Cemetery, Portland, 1942* Sweeney, Straub and Dimm Printing Plant, Portland (NRHP), 1946* Emmanuel Lutheran Church, Washington, 1946* Burkes House, Portland, 1947* Oregonian Building, Portland,(() 1947* Baxter Hall and Collins Hall, University, Oregon,( 1947* Psychology Building, College, Portland, 19471948* Equitable Building, Portland (NRHP), 1948* First Presbyterian Church, Grove, Oregon (NRHP), 1948* Sacred Heart Church, Oswego, Oregon, 1949* Zion Lutheran Church, Portland (NRHP) (Image), 1950* Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco, Portland Branch,( 1950* Central Lutheran Church, Portland,(Central Lutheran Church: Building History) 1951* Philip Neri Catholic Church, Portland, 1952* YWCA building, Salem,(Salem Online History, The YWCA: Celebrating 90 Years in Salem) 1954* Marion County Courthouse, Salem, Oregon,(Marion County Circuit Court:The Marion County Courthouse: A Historical Perspective) 1954* First Lutheran Church, Boston, 19541957* Temple Adath Israel, with Charles Frederick Wise, Pennsylvania, 19561957* College Library, Vermont, 19571958* Central Lutheran Church, Oregon,(University of Oregon News release: UO Gallery Shows Drawings by Pietro Belluschi) 1959* Temple Brith Kodesh, Rochester, New York, 19591963* First Methodist Church, Minnesota, 19621969* The Tully Hall at the School within the Center, York City, 19631969* Pan Am Building, Belluschi and Gropius as design consultants to Emery Roth & Sons, New York City, 1963* and Haas Corporate Headquarters, with George M. Ewing Co., Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, 1964* Church of the Christian Union, Rockford, Illinois, 1964-1965(The Unitarian Universalist Church)* Hoffman Columbia Plaza, now Unitus Plaza, Portland, Oregon, 1966* Immanuel Lutheran Church, Oregon, 1966* California Street, as consultant to Wurster, Benardi and Emmons and Owings and Merrill, Francisco, California, 1969* Boston Place, with Emery Roth & Sons, Massachusetts, 1970* of Virginia School of Architecture, 1970* of Saint Mary of the Assumption, San Francisco (collaborating with Luigi Nervi and others), 1971* Art Institute, with Architects Collaborative, Massachusetts, 1973* Meyerhoff Symphony Hall, Maryland, 19781982* M. Davies Symphony Hall, with Owings and Merrill, San Francisco, 1980* Financial Center, Boston, 1983* Bancorp Tower, as consultant to Owings and Merrill, Portland, 1983* United Hebrew Congregation, Chesterfield, Missouri, 19861989* Hills Christian Church, Beaverton, Oregon (198789) (Clausen, Meredith L.  Spiritual Space: The Religious Architecture of Pietro Belluschi, University of Washington Press; First Edition, August 1992.)* Centennial Tower and Wheeler Sports Center, Fox University ( George Fox University: Centennial Clock Tower,)(George Fox University Athletic Facilities, Newberg, Ore.) 1991* Breitenbush Hall, State Hospital, Salem (NRHP)(Architects Associated with Oregon State Hospital)* Abbey School campus, Rhode Island* Uncle Tobys Story House, Blue Wing Lodge, Guardians Lodge, Kiwanis Lodge, Namanu, Oregon* Lacamas Summer Home, Camas, Washington* Chapel of Christ the Teacher, of Portland(University of Portland: Campus Ministry: Prayer Schedule)References External links * Oregon Blue Book biography* 1983 interview from the Smithsonians Archives of American ArtBelluschiBelluschiBelluschiBelluschiBelluschi
617345
City_of_Heroes
requirementsWindows 2000/XP,Intel Pentium III 800 MHz or AMD Athlon 800MHz,512 MB RAM,2 GB Available HD Space,Nvidia 2 series or ATI Radeon 8500 Video Card,16X CD-ROM Drive,16-bit Sound Card,56K Modem connection,Keyboard and mouse.Mac OS X 10.5.5 Leopard or higher,Intel Core Duo Processor,1024 MB RAM,2.9 GB Available HD Space,ATI X1600, NVidia 7300 GT, or X3100 Intel integrated graphics chip (Intel GMA950 not supported)City of Heroes (CoH) is a multiplayer online role-playing game based on the superhero book genre, developed by Studios and published by NCsoft. The game was launched in America on April 27, 2004 and in Europe (by NCsoft Europe) on February 4, 2005 with English, German and language servers. Twenty-one free major updates for City of Heroes have been released since its launch. The newest update, Convergence, was released on September 13, 2011.In the game, players create super-powered characters that can team up with others to complete missions and fight criminals belonging to various gangs and organizations in the fictional Paragon City.On October 31, 2005, the games first sequel, of Villains (CoV), was launched, allowing players to play as supervillains. Initially dubbed as an Expanshalone by the developers (a portmanteau of an pack and stand-alone), the game did not require CoH to run, but if the user had both games, content was added to the CoH side of game play. On July 16, 2008, NCsoft merged the two games content together, thus a player who only owned City of Heroes could now play City of Villains, and vice versa. Prior to this, a purchase was required to access either games content, but they were linked by one account and subscription fee.(date2008-07-16)On November 6, 2007, NCsoft announced their purchase of the CoH/CoV property and transitioned the staff from Cryptic Studios to a new location in Mountain View, CA to continue development of the game.( ) The new studio on April 14, 2009, became Studios, which shares credit with Cryptic Studios for the development work. This then led to City of Heroes becoming available for download on Steam, along with other NCsoft titles, on April 22, 2009.()On October 30, 2008, NCsoft announced a partnership with Technologies in order to bring both City of Heroes and City of Villains and all 13 expansions to OS X.( )The expansion City of Heroes: Going Rogues future release was announced on May 11, 2009. The game centers on the alternate reality of Praetoria and features a new alignment system allowing players characters to shift allegiances between Heroes and Villains, giving characters access to both the Paragon City of CoH and the Rogue Isles of CoV. Paragon Studios describes this as exploring the shades of gray that lay between Heroes and Villains.()() Going Rogue was released on August 17, 2010, with pre-purchasers able to play on August 16.()On June 20, 2011, Paragon Studios announced that they were going to switch to a hybrid subscription model called City of Heroes: Freedom, adding in a free gameplay model, as well as special models for former subscribers termed Premium Players, and current subscribers become VIP players, who will gain access to all of the content in the various upcoming game updates.(accessdate2011-06-21)()GameplayImage:coh-screenshot.jpg|thumb|240px|left|A tanker (foreground) confronts one of the games arch villains, the scientist Dr. Vahzilok, in City of Heroes.Players begin by using the games extensive character creation system to first select an archetype, then primary and secondary power sets, then design a unique costume. In the final character creation screen, players can optionally write a backstory or description and battle cry for their hero, as well as choose a name. The name may be changed at a later time for a one-time charge, and the description and battle cry may be changed at any time. There is an automatic check to make sure the name is exclusive on that server.Characters may begin in an isolated tutorial zone, or skip the tutorial and begin in an open low level zone. A characters level increases by earning experience points from defeating foes, completing missions, and exploring zones, then returning to a trainer. Benefits for rising in level include more health, more powers, more slots to allocate enhancements to powers, and larger inventories.The primary setting of the game, Paragon City, is divided into different zones by giant energy war walls. Especially dangerous zones called hazard or trial zones, which teem with large groups of enemies, are marked in red on the in-game map and are much more dangerous than normal zones. The villains setting, the Rogue Isles, consists of islands connected by a network of ferries. A few zones are accessible to both heroes and villains; some are cooperative zones, while others are player versus player (PvP) zones.Players initially move around the zones by slowly jogging or using a minor speed-increasing power such as Sprint. As heroes grow in level and accumulate more powers, they may choose among four higher speed traveling powers: Teleportation, Super Speed, Super Jumping, and Flight.As characters level-up, players may choose new powers from the characters primary and secondary power sets, as set during creation, or from shared power pools. The power pools contain the four travel powers and other generic, usually utilitarian, powers that fall under categories such as: Fitness, Concealment, and Leadership. In addition, as characters level up, they gain access to new costume features, including the ability to change between up to five costumes and unlockable costume parts such as capes and auras.Missions are obtained through various channels. Missions are typically staged on private instances accessible only to the mission holders team by entering a door in a zone, and may require defeating a boss, escorting NPCs, or finding a particular clue or item. The level of enemies, and number of enemies per spawn, are set according to the team size, level of the mission holder, and difficulty setting of the mission holder. Some story arcs will emerge during the missions, with mission sequences forming a larger story. Once outside of a mission, a player reappears at a door or location in a zone which is accessible to any player on the server.For committed players, there are other types of activities are availabletask forces for heroes, strike forces for villains, and trials. These activities forbid adding new members to the team once started, and so consist of a series of linked missions that must be run till completion by the same team. Certain trials reward players with an opportunity to respecify their characters by choosing a different complement of superpowers within their selected power sets, and reallocating enhancement slots. Two types of Raids are available to Heroes and Villains: Rikti Mothership (in a shared zone for both Hero and Villain participants), and Hamidon (separate Hero and Villain locations), which encourage teamwork across multiple teams of players.Team play is a large part of City of Heroes. Players can form supergroups reminiscent of classic book groups such as the X-Men or League of America. Also, a system called Sidekicking/Lackeying or Exemplaring/Malefactoring makes all players on the team either 1 level lower than the team leader or mission holder (if they are a lower level) or the same level (if they are a higher level). Exemplared/Malefactored characters still earn experience and have access to all powers up to 5 levels above their temporarily lower level. Characters may also make leveling pacts under which the characters receive experience points equally whether online or offline, maintaining the characters at the same level.Other game features include auction houses and crafting inventions to make characters more powerful. The Architect release gives players the ability to construct custom mission arcs, with customized villains and layouts that can then be played by all other players.  Going Rogue (an optional expansion pack) allows players to switch which side their character fights on using Tip Missions collected from defeated villains.Character creationIn character creation, the player first selects a characters origin and archetype, then primary and secondary power sets. Next, the actual avatar with its costume is created. Then the player has a choice of customizing the color and hues of his/her powers. Lastly, the player chooses a name and can optionally write a background story to add some flavor to the character as well as creating an individual battle cry.There are five origins a player can choose for his/her character that dictate what type of enhancements the character may use, affect which single short-ranged power they begin with (in addition to powers obtained from their primary and secondary power sets), and can influence the various villain groups that the character goes up against; these origins are Natural, Magic, Science, Mutation, and Technology.There are five basic hero archetypes, which affect a characters power choices and team role throughout the game. Blasters are versatile damage dealers, capable of fighting at short or long range against one or many opponents. Controllers are adept at preventing enemies from moving or acting. Defenders turn the tide of battle with weakening attacks (debuffs) and ally strengthening powers (buffs). Scrappers are melee fighters with a greater chance of critical hits against tough opponents such as bosses. Tankers possess great defenses and the ability to take hits for the team.There are also five basic villain archetypes. Brutes deal increasing damage as they attack or are themselves attacked. Corruptors can cause damage at range, with high chance for critical hits against wounded targets. Dominators assail enemies with status effects and direct damage. Masterminds summon, upgrade, and control combat pets. Stalkers are stealthy fighters, dealing critical hits when hidden or when accompanied by a team.There are also two shapeshifting hero archetypes which are unlocked after attaining level 20 (level 50 prior to Issue 17) with a hero. Peacebringers are peaceful symbiotic aliens that have light based powers. Warshades are warlike symbiotes that are normally enemies to the Peacebringers but have reformed their evil ways. Both archetypes are capable of shapeshifting into a more offensive or more defensive form. The villain side mirrors this, with two branching villain archetypes which are unlocked after attaining level 20 (also level 50 prior to Issue 17) with a villain. Arachnos Soldiers can branch into either a Bane Spider or Crab Spider. Arachnos Widows can branch into either a Night Widow or Fortunata.Virtual rewardsSimilarly to other MMORPGs, City of Heroes/Villains has various items that are rewarded within the game. However, many of these items are described as intangible or other-worldly; such as inspirations (temporary powerups) or influence (used instead of money), which are abstract ideas in the real world. Enhancementsslottable attribute boostsalso cover a range of ideas and items from magic enchantments to technological gadgets to training techniques. With the release of Issue 6, while in supergroup mode, a setting that can be toggled on and off, players accumulate prestige points which are used to improve the supergroup base.Issue 9 brought the Invention system to the game, which allows characters to combine salvage and recipes to create various goods. Invented enhancements can provide better bonuses than normal enhancements, including set bonuses for slotting invented enhancements from the same set into the same power. Costume pieces and limited-use temporary powers can also be invented.In addition to these, there are also collectible badges for players to obtain. Gained for performing various actions in game, such as: moving over specific places in each zone, defeating certain numbers of enemies, healing allies, and taking damage, most serve no functional purpose for players, except to provide characters with tag lines under their character names. However, some few, called Accolades give players access to temporary powers and permanent bonuses to health and endurance (the games equivalent to mana or magic points) and are gained by collecting other badges.Players also have the option of purchasing (outside of the game) additional items known as Booster Packs, which currently include a permanent Wedding-themed expansion for costumes and emotes (actions), a 30 day Jet Pack temporary power, valkyrie themed costume items, and regular Booster Pack releases based on Player Origins available in-game (See Updates and history below).EnemiesIn City of Heroes there are multiple NPC groups that players fight as part of random encounters. Many enemies are found on the streets of Paragon City, whereas others are found in specific instances or areas. There are also Giant Monsters and similar events that take place in parts of the city that are even rarer, such as Lusca the Giant Octopus in the waters of the Independence Port zone or the Ghost Ship that spawns ghostly enemies in the Talos Island and Independence Port zones.SettingParagon City is a fictitious city located in Island in the States.() The city itself is divided into several smaller neighborhoods that have varying villains and progressively higher levels of villains within them. The arbitrary divisions between zones are explained by the presence of War Walls, powerful forcefields derived from alien technology which are used to defend various areas of the city. Heroes set out by dealing with low-powered street gangs in the initial zones, working their way up to fighting increasingly dangerous threatssuch as organised crime, corrupt corporations, hostile aliens and supernatural terrorseven eventually entering other dimensions to fight supremely powerful villains.Updates and historyThe Development Team continually expands City of Heroes with free downloadable patches/updates as well as free game expansions dubbed Issues. All Issues were made available to both City of Heroes and (as of Issue 6) City of Villains titles throughout the lifespan of the game, improving features in both games with each release.Issues (free updates)Expansions (Paid updates)*City of Villains: CoV was released in 2005 as an Expanshalone release, or an expansion that did not require the original City of Heroes purchase to work (i.e. stand-alone). It offered 5 new character archetypes that were, at the time, exclusive to Villain characters, new maps, and began the first PvP Zones (versus the Arena, which were instanced maps made for PvP fighting) of the game. City of Villains also was playable with the same subscription fee that paid for City of Heroes access after buying City of Villains.  The retail box included 4 CD-ROMs for installation current to Issue 6, one of four limited edition HeroClix figures of the games villains, a poster of a map of the Rogue Isles, and a serial code that gave access to the game and one month of game play. Also included was a code for a 30-day trial for CoH, as both games were currently separate.  Since 2008 after the NCSoft acquisition of the intellectual properties, owning either City of Heroes or City of Villains unlocks both titles at no additional cost.*Going Rogue: City of Heroes: Going Rogue was released in 2010. Unlike CoV, Going Rogue is an expansion rather than an Expanshalone and requires the original game(s) to play. Going Rogue adds an Alignment system, which allows players to switch from Hero to Villain and adds two intermediate Alignments: Vigilante as a player progresses from Hero to Villain and Rogue as a player progresses from Villain to Hero. Players with Vigilante or Rogue characters have access to both City of Heroess Paragon City and City of Villainss Rogue Isles until they change to Hero or Villain. The expansion also adds the Praetorian Earth dimension where players can start out as neutrally aligned Praetorians (choosing any of the 10 basic Archetypes available to Heroes or Villains), either deciding to side with Emperor Coles ruling faction and become a Loyalist or side with the Resistance; the allegiance can change as the player choses and completes missions. Praetorian players can also attack new Neutral mobs and will eventually be able to play a mission that will allow them to choose to be a Hero or Villain and complete gameplay in the original games. Going Rogue also grants access to four new power sets, new costume sets and auras, and introduces missions that start after defeating mobs that affect the players Alignment.Retail releases & special editions*City of Heroes: Collectors Edition: Sold through stores in 2005, this included an installation DVD-ROM that had game content up to Issue 4, a poster of a map of Paragon City, a CoH/PvP comic book, a Statesman HeroClix figure, and a serial code that adds access to a special movement power, badge, and cape, in addition to access to the game and one month of game play. A special Hero Kit was later sold that allowed people to get all of the physical and digital content included in the Collectors Edition aside from the game installation disc.*City of Villains: Collectors Edition: Sold in stores alongside the standard game edition, this pack included an installation DVD-ROM current through issue 6, seven exclusive HeroClix figures of characters from both games, a book featuring art for both games, a promotional card for the of Heroes Collectible Card Game, one of five preview decks for the CCG, a two-sided poster of the game map from the standard edition and a Heroes vs. Villains fight scene, a CoH trial serial code, and a serial code that allowed access to a special costume icon and cape, in addition to access to CoV and one month of game play.*City of Heroes: Bootleg Edition: A trial copy of City of Heroes released free of charge as a promotional copy during City of Villains. Bootleg Edition came with no special features, a 10-day demo key, and required a player to purchase a digital key for the City of Heroes or City of Villains game in order to play after the demo. Released during Issue 6, the disc allowed players to try either Heroes or Villains.*City of Heroes & City of Villains: Good Versus Evil Edition: This retail box included an installation DVD-ROM current to Issue 7, a two-sided map of Paragon City and the Rogue Isles, digital copies of issues 1 through 6 Cows CoH comic book, and a Pocket D VIP Pass that had the serial code for access to both games, a month of free game play, special costume pieces for both Heroes and Villains, a special badge, and two special powers. This serial code was later made available digitally.*City of Heroes: Architect Edition: This edition of the game included an installation DVD-ROM current to Issue 14 for both PC and Mac, a quick-start guide, the map from the Good Versus Evil Edition, and an activation code for the unified games, one month of free game play, and access to one of the first two Super Booster packs. A digital-only purchase later was made available for the same content.*City of Heroes Going Rogue: Complete Collection: Released in 2010 alongside the standard version of the game, this edition includes City of Heroes, City of Villains, and adds access to unique in-game costume pieces, auras, emotes, and a unique invisibility power in addition to access to all of the content available with the standard Going Rogue game. Ordering this from GameStop included exclusive power enhancements.()Booster packsStarting in 2008, Booster Packs were also released sporadically around Issue updates. Booster Packs do not function like expansions (adding content to the game), but rather add optional sets to the games character creator and user interface, and are available on the NCsoft Store for a one-time fee. Although each of these packs are themed after their similarly named character option in the game (so far character origins and powersets), their features can be applied to any or all the characters in your account regardless of their actual origin, archetype or powers. As of August 30th, 2011 Booster Packs are no longer available for sale on the NCSoft website. The individual costume pieces and powers will be sold separately in the in-game store when City of Heroes: Freedom is released.()  Booster Packs that were available are:*Super Booster I: Cyborg  Adds new cyborg costume sets, character emotes that fit the cyborg theme, and a Self-Destruct prestige power which kills your player to deal large amounts of damage.*Super Booster II: Magic  Adds new magic themed costume sets, special character costume change emotes, and a Fortune Teller prestige power which can boost (or occasionally curse) your team mates with a random temporary ability.*Super Booster III: Superscience() - Adds more costume change emotes and an enhanced tailor that allows character modifications including height, dimensions, and gender as well as costumes per each costume slot on your character.*Super Booster IV: Martial Arts  Adds a new martial arts themed costume set, character emotes that fit the martial arts theme, special costume change emotes, and a Ninja Run power.*Super Booster V: Mutant  Adds Bioluminescent and Organic Armor costume pieces, two character emotes and three costume change emotes, all fitting a mutation theme. It also added a Secondary Mutation power, which bestows a random temporary buff upon the user.()In addition to the above, there is also a Mini-Booster pack for the purchase of an in-game jetpack for 30 days of real time.Virtual item packsA small number of In-Game Item packs were released to allow players to gain in-game items from select box releases of the game at a lower cost than repurchasing the title at retail price.  Item packs only contain the items in a Edition release, and do not come with free playtime or (in the case of expansions) the added game content that require an expansion purchase in order to use.*Good versus Evil Edition Item Pack which included a Jump Jet Travel Power, Pocket D Teleport power and special Hero/Villain themed costume sets.*Mac Special Edition Item Pack, which included all of the costume pieces from the Valkyrie set and the Mission Transporter power.*Going Rogue Item Pack, which included the Alpha and Omega costume sets and the Shadowy Presence power.*Wedding Pack: A serial code first sold on Day 2008 added special wedding-themed costume pieces and emotes to the game.*Party Pack: Released in late September 2010, which includes party themed character emotes.Holiday eventsThe City of Heroes Development Team also initiates events based on American and European holidays and observances, starting with Halloween in 2004, followed by a Winter Event (eventually becoming a primarily Christmas-themed event),() and the newest holiday observance, a Day event. Recent changes to holiday events include the addition of a Zombie Apocalypse world event during Halloween, and a Ski Slope inside of Pocket D during the Holidays. Holiday events grant commemorative badges upon signing in during the event, and have earnable themed badges by participating in the in-game events.AnniversaryCity of Heroes grants a commemorative badge during its anniversary month of May and has often scheduled special events and surprises during May. On the games fifth anniversary on April 28, 2009, and on the same day during the sixth anniversary for 2010, an outbreak of Giant Monsters of every type was released throughout the game in all zones for players to defeat within a 24 hour span.()City of HeroA Korean open beta of City of Heroes, entitled City of Hero (, Siti Obeu Hieoro), was launched on January 18, 2006. However, the games official release was cancelled. The Korean CoH team directed its players to a coupon for an account on the US servers as compensation.()ServersCity of Heroes and City of Villains employ several servers. The servers are divided between the North American and European markets, with separate European servers with language localization for German and French speakers. The North American servers based in Dallas, Texas,(PlayNC FAQ Entry: Where are the servers located?) while the European servers were moved from Germany to a new site in the US in November 2010.(City of Heroes EU News Feed: Extended European Server Downtime)ReceptionAn uncommon MMOGaming World hailed the game saying City of Heroes blows a super powered gust of fresh air into an increasingly stale sword-and-sorcery MMO world in August 2004. Gamer, Informer, GameSpy and several other industry magazines critically acclaimed City of Heroes for its foray into the superhero genre and gave the game top or near top scores across the board.GameSpy went on to say that City of Heroes has the most flexible character creator to date of any MMORPG (in particular the costume design system allows for a huge variety of sizes, colors, clothing types and other bells and whistles) and has consistently given the update issues high marks. The launch of City of Heroes was widely reported as one of the most successful MMOG launches in the history of the industry.Recently, praise was given from IGN,() The Escapist,() and Allakhazam() for the release of Issue 14: Architect, which added Mission Creation capabilities. Paragon Studios produced City of Heroes: Architect Edition, and re-released the game to Retail Stores in April 2009 containing the PC and Macintosh Versions and a free choice between either Super Booster I: Cyborg or Super Booster II: Magic.Accessible development communityCity of Heroes offers a development team that actively communicates with its player base through in-game events (who will individually take on various in-game personas when interacting with the players), online forums, and in game interviews through media outlets. The development team will request feedback, admit mistakes and also implement player suggestions to the game. The communication level between players and developers is such that players are encouraged to send private messages about their concerns to the developers, and usually the player can expect to receive feedback as a private reply, or as a part of a news item or forum post if the concern affects a larger part of the community.Since Issue 9, City of Heroes allows players to participate in Open Beta testing of the upcoming Issue Releases on their own Training Room Server. There is also a Closed Beta test before that which allows players who are invited specifically by the Developer Team to try out the new issues features under a Non-Disclosure Agreement.The City of Heroes Development and Moderation Team organizes regular appearances at popular conventions to meet players face-to-face, as well as organizing Meet & Greet events of their own. They held their first annual convention, HeroCon, in Santa Clara, CA from October 17-19th, 2008. The second annual event was held from October 23 to October 25, 2009, and attendees were given a sneak preview of the Going Rogue expansion.Casual-playThe game has received additional praise because the characters of inactive players are not deleted, even if the subscription has been canceled or inactive for an extended period of time (ex. 4 years). Some MMORPGs delete a character after a period of inactivity. In anticipation of the release of of Villains, Cryptic announced on October 10, 2005 that effective October 24, 2005, accounts which had been unpaid and inactive for 90 days would have the names of any characters on the account under level 35 flagged as unreserved, allowing new players to use that name.() The character itself was left untouched, and a player who lost his characters name was given the option to choose a new one. This policy was suspended on May 4, 2006, because Cryptics data-mining had shown that very few names were being taken in this fashion anymore; Cryptic said 30 days notice would be given prior to future changes to the name policy.() On July 31, 2007, Cryptic announced that the name policy would go back into effect as of August 29, 2007, but this time, it would apply only to characters under level 6, instead of the previous 35.( )Enhancement DiversityA significant gameplay change called Enhancement Diversification, or ED, was implemented in Issue 6. ED received strong negative feedback from the player community. The response thread to ED on the official City of Heroes message forum exceeded 3,500 replies in the first 36 hours, and soon after grew so large that a second thread was required due to forum software limits.()ED imposed a point of sharply diminished returns on how far each individual aspect of each power could be improved. Prior to ED, a player could focus all enhancements on only one of a powers aspects and receive fully cumulative benefits. Cryptics stated reason behind ED was to promote the use of more different types of Enhancements in powers.() Critics derided ED for its universal reduction of the maximum possible effectiveness of all characters, making it a global nerf;( that many defensive powers had now been significantly weakened for two Issues in a row,( frustrating especially those who specialize in such powers and invalidated many of their existing tactics; that some powers cannot legally or usefully accept more than one type of Enhancement and thus cannot be diversified;( that it was deceitful to enact such a severe change less than a month after officially announcing weve finished making large changes to the power sets;()() and that ED was too fundamental a change to implement so long after the original launch. Some, but not all, of the negative effects of Enhancement Diversification were negated with the release of the Invention system in Issue 9, allowing players to create one enhancement that affects multiple statistics at once with bonuses for a full set that would affect global (across all powers) statistics thus allowing powers to increase a given statistic beyond the point of diminishing returns, while still honoring the limits created with ED during Issue 6.Awards* Beckett Massive Online Gamer: Best Sci-Fi/Superhero Game of 2009* Massively.com: Most Improved Game of 2008* Gaming World: MMORPG Game of the Year 2004* Spike TV 2004 Video Game Awards: MMORPG Game of the Year* GameSpy: Game of the Month  May 2004, Editors Choice  May 2004*Billboard 2004 Digital Entertainment Conference & Awards: PC or Console Game of the Year, Multiplayer Game of the Year* Wargamer: Award for Excellence* Magazine: Game of the Year 2004* Games Magazine: Editors Choice  August 2004 Issue* Gaming World: Editors Choice  August 2004* Informer: PC Game of the Month  July 2004 Issue* Loadedinc, Hot Property Award* Actiontrip: Editors Choice* Warcry: Best Expansion  City of Villains  E3 2004* IGN; Editors Choice* GameSpot: Game of the Month  May 2004* GameSpy: Game of the Month  May 2004* GameSpy: Editors Choice*E3 2003 Critics Awards: Best Online Multiplayer* Game Revolution Best of E3 2003: Best Online GameSubscriptionAs in a few other MMORPGs, players must subscribe to City of Heroes by paying the publisher (NCsoft) a monthly fee to continue playing City of Heroes. Portions of the subscription costs go to supporting a full-time live team, which develops additional content for the game; other portions support the significant server maintenance and bandwidth costs.() The subscription fee after Issue 6 covered play in either of the games in the City of franchise or both of them at once for the same cost, however, since merging the titles in 2008 this became a moot point as any player of one of the games could access the opposite game without purchasing it.Continuing active subscriptions are also entitled to Veteran Rewards. The system rewards players with costume pieces, extra powers, supergroup base items, respec opportunities, and other minor in-game perks to all characters (both hero and villain characters) on any server tied to the active subscription. Inactive accounts do not accrue time for Veteran Rewards.()Since 2009, players considering City of Heroes can sign up for a 14-day trial key without subscribing to the game, without receiving an in-game referral or using a credit card. Certain features, such as chat, trade, membership in groups, and leveling up are restricted to prevent exploitative players/groups from using trial accounts to further Money Trade activities that NCSoft prohibits in-game. After 14 days expire, a trial player would need to buy the game and subscribe for further months to continue their play.As of September 2008, City of Heroes had around 124,939 subscribers in the US & Europe, according to financial reports released by NCsoft in November 2008.()On June 20, 2011, City of Heroes announced the City of Heroes: Freedom subscription model, which will be implemented at some point in 2011. The servers will be free-to-play, with limitations on what Free players can access. Players who have had subscriptions lapse will become Premium players, and will have access to everything they used to have, but will be limited to what they will access in the games future updates unless they sign up for a VIP subscription. The VIP subscription adds free access to the Going Rogue game content, and a monthly VIP Rewards system (as opposed to the quarterly releases of the Veteran Rewards). There will also be an in-game shop where all players can purchase points to purchase expansions to the game; VIP subscribers will be given a monthly stipend of these points at no extra charge.((Other mediaNovelsThe first City of Heroes novel, The Web of Arachnos, by Weinberg, was published by CDS Books (an imprint of the Perseus Publishing Group) in October 2005. The novel chronicles the back stories of the Statesman and Recluse, the central iconic characters in the City of Heroes and City of Villains franchises. A second novel, The Freedom Phalanx, written by Laws, was released in May 2006 and detailed the reformation of the hero team the Phalanx in the 1980s. The story centers on the fledgling heroes Positron and Synapse, but also includes Manticore, Sister Psyche, and Statesman. The books villains include Lord Recluse, Doctor Null, Shadow Queen, and Revenant. Artist Prez provides the covers for the first two novels, as well as lending his name to one of the early areas of the game itself, Prez Park. A third novel, The Rikti War, was announced by CDS at the time the first novel was published, with an August 2006 scheduled release date. Authors Paul S. Kemp and Shane Hensley have been attached to the project at various times. The book was reportedly going to cover the epic transdimensional war between Earth and the Rikti home world, however a post on the official message boards containing a message supposedly from Kemp states that the novel is not to be and he must leave it at that. Developer Sean Michael Fish (Manticore) has recently stated that CDS will no longer be publishing books for CoH, and The Rikti War may or may not be published.Comic booksTo tie in with the game, NCsoft released original comic book series that featured various characters from within the games themselves. The original series by publisher Blue King featured the heroes/roommates Apex and War Witch with their neighbor Horus. The more recent series from publisher Top Cow features signature heroes and villains from both City of Heroes and City of Villains such as The Statesman, Positron, Recluse, and Widow, along with scripts by well-known comic book creators Mark Waid, Troy Hickman, and Dan Jurgens. However, the Top Cow series ended with Issue 20 (July 2007), with no current plans for another new series. The official website allowed people to download the comics in PDF format roughly a month after their release in comic book stores.Collectible card gameEntertainment Group also worked with CoH to create a card game featuring characters from the game, as well as several original characters. The games website also allows players to create a game-compliant card for their own online character. This card game is now discontinued.Role-playing gameThe CoH team has also worked with Studios, Inc. to create an RPG based on the MMORPG. While a free preview version of the game was released, the game has been indefinitely delayed due to the cancellation license with Fox on their Buffy the Vampire Slayer and Angel roleplaying-games.() Pages on the game have since been removed from the main Eden Studios site and its discussion forums.Movie and televisionIn June 2007, it was announced that the producer for the Transformers film, DeSanto, had acquired the option to make movies and television shows based on the City of Heroes franchise.(accessdate2007-06-08 ) In February 2008, it was announced that DeSanto has indeed begun preparations for the film. A plot summary has been released detailing that the movie itself takes place during the first Rikti War.()Suit by MarvelIn November 2004, Comics filed a lawsuit against City of Heroes developer Cryptic Studios, publisher NCsoft, and game administrator NC Interactive (NCI), alleging that the game not only allowed, but actively promoted, the creation of characters who infringe copyrights and trademarks owned by Marvel. The suit sought unspecified damages and an injunction halting further sales and shutting down the game.()The game includes in its User agreement strong language against such activity, however. It forbids the creation of potentially infringing characters, and NCI has been known to delete or rename such characters. The User Agreement additionally holds players accountable to indemnify (reimburse) NCI and its affiliates against third-party infringement claims, and demands either a granting of sole ownership in player created content, including characters, to NCI, or a warranty that a third party owner of the rights in player created content has made such a grant.() It is unclear whether this grant is an exclusive assignment or a non-exclusive license, however.The defendants replied that the lawsuit was frivolous, and while many property analysts agreed, others noted that trademark law is structured such that, if Marvel believes their marks are being infringed upon, they have little choice but to file a lawsuit, regardless of its outcome, to preserve the strength of the marks. At least one noted similarities to Fonovisa, Inc. v. Cherry Auction, Inc., a case in which a company that ran a market was successfully sued over property infringement because a vendor had been selling bootlegged records at that flea market. Although Cherry Auction had not been directly selling the infringing items, the court found that it was vicariously or contributorally liable for the infringement.Marvel subsequently admitted() that some of the allegedly infringing characters cited in the complaint had been created by Marvels own investigators. In March 2005, the court struck those exhibits from the complaint.() The court also dismissed with prejudice() some of Marvels claims. The dismissed claims included all indirect infringement counts, because Marvel had not pled commercial use of Marvels marks by the games players. Commercial use is a required element of infringement under American trademark statutes.On December 12, 2005, all remaining claims were settled under undisclosed terms. The games operators asserted that the settlement did not require changes to the character creation engine.()Despite the recent litigation, in October 2006 Comics selected Cryptic Studios to develop its own superhero MMORPG for Vista and Live, titled Universe Online. The news of the alliance led to a surprised reaction from players, but developer Matt Positron Miller assured fans on Cryptics official website that development and maintenance would continue separately on both games (), proved later by the complete split between City of Heroes and Cryptic Studios. Marvel Universe Online was eventually cancelled by Microsoft.Acquisition and new studioOn November 6, 2007, NCsoft announced that it would assume ownership of both City of Heroes and City of Villains. As part of a push to further develop City of Heroes, the company also announced the formation of a new development studio dedicated to new titles as well as their interest in distributing and administering their future works once launched. This new team is centered on key members of the Cryptic and NCsoft City of Heroes/Villains teams who accepted the NCsoft offer to join their new studio in Northern California. The sale of the City of Heroes IP granted Cryptic Studios the freedom to work on its new superhero MMOG (at this time, a RPG/Action hybrid) Online without concerns of conflict of interest.(  )Shortly after having acquired full ownership of the property, NCsoft granted all existing and former City of Heroes account holders access to both games (City of Heroes & City of Villains).(City of Heroes Community Site ) This allowed all Hero players access to Superbases, which initially required a CoV purchase from its release in Issue 7 until Issue 10, and is no longer required as of Issue 11. Before the purchase, NCsoft allowed players with a subscription or a time card for City of Heroes to have the same access to City of Villains as well (at its lowest price point, $14.99 covered access to both titles for a month), whether or not they had purchased the other title. This is still being honored after all accounts who had only City of Heroes received access to City of Villains for free. In a July 2008 press release, NCsoft announced the successful completion of allowing all copies of City of Heroes or City of Villains to access the other game (it claimed that Single Title Retail Boxes recently purchased did not successfully unlock the other game when activated).On April 14, 2009, NCsoft NorCal formally changed its name to Studios to become a fully owned developer subsidiary of NCsoft (similar to Games and ArenaNet) dedicated to City of Heroes. Paragon Studios is credited alongside with Cryptic Studios on the website and NCsoft websites for development of the game.CommunitiesMany on-line communities exist for the discussion of City of Heroes. Some prominent ones include:Official forumsThe official forum for City of Heroes is the web board found at boards.cityofheroes.com. This web board is run by NCsoft themselves, and frequented by various developers and service representatives (referred to by site regulars as red names because their usernames are highlighted in red on their forum posts) as well as players. There are forums devoted to announcements, general issues, player guides, questions, suggestions, each archetype, each of the game servers, and other topics.The European version of City of Heroes previously had its own separate web board, but with the forum migration to VBulletin, all players now use the same forums.SupergroupsA player can join an existing Supergroup (the City of Heroes equivalent of an MMO guild) at any level. If the player reaches Level 10 and is also a subscribed player, they may register a Supergroup of their own creation. When in a Supergroup, the player can edit his or her colors and emblem to match the group. Also, if the player is in Supergroup Mode, the player will earn Prestige and Supergroup achievements for the group. These can be used to improve the players groups Base as well as paying rent on said base. Originally, the game did not have bases for heroes to inhabit between battles, but with the release of City of Villains, the feature was enabled for those who owned both games. Supergroups were originally limited to 75 characters but with the 11th issue update was changed to 150 characters.Fan sitesNumerous City of Heroes fan sites exist with a wide variety of formats and purposes, including roleplaying sites and informational sites. NCsoft maintained a City of Heroes fansite portal() on its official site. When operative, any person may create a fan site and submit it() to NCsoft for publication on the portal, pending review to ensure that the site meets with the guidelines for a fan site submission.()ReferencesGeneral references*City of Heroes, PRIMA Official Game Guide, Chris McCubbin and Christopher Pinckard, Prima Games (2004). ISBN 0-7615-4516-6*City of Heroes Binder, PRIMA Official Game Guide, Eric Mylonis, Prima Games (2005), ISBN 0-7615-5205-7*City of Heroes/City of Villains Bind, Macro & Emote Guide, Shenanigunner (20062009, updated regularly) HEROICA! websiteExternal links* City of Heroes North America official site* City of Heroes Official European Site* City of Heroes Going Rogue teaser site* City of Heroes Going Rogue official site* Paragonwiki - City of Heroes wikiof Heroesof Heroesof Heroesof Heroesof Heroesof Heroesof Heroesof Heroesof Heroesof Heroeszh:
620518
Krasnoarmeysky_District,_Primorsky_Krai
dateJanuary 2011Krasnoarmeysky District () is an administrative( and municipal( district (raion) of Krai, Russia; one of the twenty-two in the krai. It is located in the central portion of the krai and borders with District in the northwest and north, District in the east, the territory of the town of Dalnegorsk in the south, and with District in the southwest and west. The area of the district is .( Its center is the rural locality (a selo) of Novopokrovka. Districts population: 20,172 (2010 est.);(  Population of Novopokrovka accounts for 19.4% of the districts population.(The climate conditions of the Krasnoarmeysky District sharply differ from those on the coast. Sikhote-Alin mountain range is a natural barrier which blocks the penetration of the monsoonal winds from the south and the east, forming a specific microclimate of the district. Frosts of  are very frequent in winter, while in summer the heat exceeds . The mean annual temperature is  (compare with  in the south of the krai). Despite the climate conditions, however, the population of the district grows apples, plums, cherries, and watermelons.Tungsten and timber, fur and gold are produced in the district. The Primorsky Ore Mining and Processing Enterprise operates in the area.Nature Reserve is in the eastern part of the district. The major rivers of the district are the Bolshaya Ussurka and Armu.The Sikhote-Alin newspaper is published on the districts territory.ReferencesSources**rajon (Territorio del Litorale)jrs (Tengermellk) ( )  
621775
Daryl_F._Mallett
signature Daryl Furumi Mallett, (born in Angeles, California on May 3, 1969), is a freelance writer,() editor and publisher; as well as an actor, director, producer and screenwriter.WritingIn the writing world, some of Mallett duties include being series editor of SFRA Press Studies in Science Fiction, Fantasy and Horror; associate editor for Gryphon Publications, Other Worlds and Hardboiled; contributing writer for Water Conditioning & Purification and M&V Magazine, among others; assistant editor at Xenos Books; founder and owner of Angel Enterprises, and publisher and editor of Jacobs Ladder Books.He also works as a reporter for four newspapers in Pinal County (Copper Basin News, Pinal Nugget, San Manuel Miner, Superior Sun); director of marketing and business development at a bookkeeping firm in Arizona; technical writing lead for an e-commerce company in California; and writing books for publishers in South Carolina, Pennsylvania, Louisiana, Ohio and California.Mallett also freelances as a Senior Outside Research Associate at The International Research Center in Phoenix, working on business and competitive intelligence, corporate strategy, management consulting and technical writing, mainly in the telecommunications, Internet and e-Commerce markets, as well as providing the initial layout on the Arizona Telecommunications & Information Council (ATIC) Monthly Events Calendar.Film and TelevisionIn the film and television world, Mallett is the founder and producer at Dustbunny Productions, marketing director and assistant to the producer at Caribou Moving Pictures, associate producer for Draco Productions and a producer at Paddlefoot Productions.Prior to this, he was a data management administrator for Productive Data Solutions on contract to Raytheon Missile Systems; editor at Valley Publishing of three regional newspapers in Mesa/Gilbert; editor at World Publishing of four community newspapers and associate editor/reporter on an as-needed basis for 26 other newspapers and three magazines in Arizona and Nevada. In January 2004, he co-founded Prismic Publishing, a newspaper publishing company which launched its first product in July of that year and went on to publish nine monthly newspapers.BusinessEntrepreneurially, in 1998, Mallett founded and became Chief Evangelical Officer of Blue Fire Technologies Inc., an information technology, hardware and software company focusing on mobile computing technology, which is seeking venture capital funding. Mallett was also a co-founder of AZSNAPArizonas Scottsdale Network at the Airpark, which was absorbed by the Scottsdale Chamber of Commerce.EducationMallett received a dual Interdisciplinary Humanities and Social Sciences Bachelor of Arts degree from the of California, Riverside in 1991, specializing in Theatre Arts/Public Speaking and Creative Writing/Comparative Literatures and Languages (Speculative Fiction) under the direction of Award-winning author E. Slusser. He also studied with authors like Martinez, Straight, Minot, Lawton, Pedrotti, Hammer, Kern, Prize nominee Simon, actor/director Russo, and 5 set designer Iacovelli. Karenga, creator of Kwanzaa, was also his mentor for ethnic studies. Ever the overachiever, Mallett is in the process of returning to school to finish his Master of Library Information Sciences (MLIS) degree, and eventually hopes to get his MBA, MFA and PhD degrees.Published WorksPublished works include a poetry anthology Full Frontal Poetry (w/Chaelyn L. Hakim and Frances McConnel, 1991); Reginalds Science Fiction and Fantasy Awards: A Comprehensive Guide to the Awards and Their Winners (w/Robert Reginald) 2nd Ed. (1991), 3rd Ed. (1993), 4th Ed. (2010); The State and Province Vital Records Guide (w/Michael and Mary Burgess, 1993); The Work of Jack Vance: An Annotated Bibliography and Guide (w/Jerry Hewett, 1994); The Work of Elizabeth Chater: An Annotated Bibliography and Guide (w/Annette Y. Mallett, 1994); Imaginative Futures: Proceedings of the 1993 Science Fiction Research Association Conference (ed. w/Milton T. Wolf, 1995); Pilgrims and Pioneers: The History and Speeches of the Science Fiction Research Association Award Winners (ed. w/Pilgrim Award winner Hal W. Hall, 2001) and Falcon Field (2009). He also served as Associate Editor on Pilgrim Award winner Robert Reginalds massive Science Fiction and Fantasy Literature, 1975-1991 (1992) and Editorial Assistant on Mark Goldsteins Arizona Telecommunications and Information Council Multitenant Building Telecommunications Access Study (2000). His first comic book, Hero-Lore #1, was released at the International ComicCon in San Diego in 1999.His work has appeared in magazines and newspapers as diverse as Alta Mesa Times, Anticipatia, Books at UCR, Buzz, The Clearwater Chronicle, ConNotations, Copper Basin News, Environmental Times, Gilbert Lifestyle, The Grapevine, Hieroglyphs, International Ground Water, ISFA Newsletter, The Islands Current, M&V Magazine, The Newspaper of Cooper Commons, Northeast Mesa Lifestyle, Overstreets FAN, Perry Rhodan Magazine, The Pet Gazette, The Pinal Nugget, Red Mountain Times, Riverside Review, The San Manuel Miner, Senior Lifestyle, SFRA Newsletter, SFRA Review, SoCal Cinema News, Springfield Sunrise, Sun Lakes 2 Update, The Superior Sun, Superstition Springs Community News, Thirteen, Trails & Paths, Val Vista Lakes Community News, Ventana View, Water Conditioning & Purification, Water Technology, and more, as well as in volumes for The Borgo Press, Greenwood Press, Gryphon Publications, Jai Press, M&V Publications, St. James Press and Salem Press. He has been published in the United States, Canada, Ireland, Switzerland and Romania. Of his hundreds of publications, the two which have garnered him the most recognition are Tongue-Tied: Bubos Tale in Wars: Tales from Jabbas Palace (ed. by J. Anderson, Books, 1996) and the storyline from the two-part Trek: The Next Generation episode Birthright (w/Barbra Wallace, Arthur Loy Holcomb and George Brozak). This makes him one of only a handful of writers in the world to have worked on both Trek and Wars.ActingAs an actor, TV and film appearances Mallett has appeared in Cannibal Women in the Avocado Jungle of Death, Trek: The Next Generation; Trek: Deep Space Nine; Trek VI: The Undiscovered Country and Carmadys People: The Case of the Reluctant Major, all in categories for which there is no Award. He was Assistant to the Producer for The Message (Caribou Moving Pictures, forthcoming) and Associate Producer for Illusion (Draco Productions, 2005). Current projects include: Assistant Producer for In Search of Spielberg (Caribou); Associate Producer, co-Screenwriter and acting in the role of Zar in the film The First Rose of Spring (Draco, forthcoming); Script Supervisor and acting in the role of Drax in the fan film Who and the Legends of Time (M&V Studios, forthcoming); co-producer on Turkeystuffer (Paddlefoot Productions, forthcoming); and writer, producer & director of an as-yet untitled documentary film about the exhumation of an Arizona/Indian War era soldier in Arizona.He has also worked on or appeared in the film Sphere, as well as in Disneylands Main Street Electrical Parade and Disneylands Bear Country Hoedown, and stage productions of Mame, Waiting in the Wings, and Sullivans operetta Pirates of Penzance, The Ghost Sonata, The Apple Tree, The Birthday Party, the Christmas program at the Crystal Cathedral, and numerous Shakespearean plays, among others, and won critical acclaim in Southern California with a DramaLogue Award for his performance as Christmas Future in Dickens Christmas Carol.MiscellaneousOther positions Mallett has held include Director of Writing & Business Development at Parker Madison Marketing Studio Inc., as well as serving as a consultant to small, start-up companies such as Keep It SIMple Entertainment, a manufacturer of reality simulators (formerly VP, Corporate Communications); Y-Not Entertainment (formerly Producer and Marketing and Advertising Dir.); The Obsidian Marketing Group (co-founder and formerly Chief Operating Officer); M&V Publishing; Lake Mary Systems; and Tower Communications, among others.Forthcoming books include: Reginalds Science Fiction and Fantasy Awards: A Comprehensive Guide to the Awards and Their Winners, 4th Edition, with Robert Reginald (Borgo Press/Wildside Books, 2010) and The State & Province Vital Records Guide, 2nd Edition, with Michael Burgess & Mary Burgess (Borgo Press/Wildside Books, 2010).He is currently in various stages of completion on numerous projects, including: The Copper Basin, with Lyn Scott, a photographic history book of the mining towns and ghost towns along Arizona Route 177; The Centurions, an encyclopedia of companies over 100 years old; The Praetorians, an accompanying book of essays by business leaders on business longevity; an as-yet untitled history of the Empire Air Training Scheme; Hand of the Romanovs, a mystery/suspense novel; an as-yet-untitled nonfiction work on the history of needlemaking; Lava, a fantasy novel (w/Max Espinoza) based on his comic book w/Ruben Gerard; Like the Awesome Gleam of Crystal, a novel based on the 1954 novel Alien Life, by C. Tubb; Among the Vanguard: An Annotated Bibliography and Guide to the Works of E. van Vogt, which will feature an introduction by Clayton Johnson and remembrances by other writers; Fox: Friend for Christ, a narrative story of the life of the Quaker evangelist; and Priceless: An Annotated Filmography and Guide to the Works of Price.He is also at work as assistant to the producer on In Search of Spielberg, a film written by Trek actor Koenig and to be directed by 5 actor Furst; co-producer (w/Mark Crockett) on Turkeystuffer, a movie based on the novel of the same name by Crockett; and co-producer (w/Sheryl Flournoy) on the script for the fantasy film First Rose.Mallett splits his time between Arizona, California, Minnesota, Mississippi and the rest of the world. His greatest joys in life are spending time with wife Barbara, two sons, Jacob and Christian; and daughter, Maia. This is followed by visiting with friends, traveling and dining, reading and writing...most of which he accomplishes through his nearly lifelong involvement in the for Creative Anachronism (SCA)BibliographyNonfiction Books* Reginalds Science Fiction and Fantasy Awards: A Comprehensive Guide to the Awards and Their Winners, 2nd Ed., by Daryl F. Mallett & Reginald.  San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1991.* Science Fiction and Fantasy Literature, 1975-1991: A Bibliography of Science Fiction, Fantasy, and Horror Fiction Books and Nonfiction Monographs, by Robert Reginald. A. Burgess & Daryl F. Mallett, Associate Editors. Detroit, MI: Gale Research Co., 1992.* Science Fiction Research Association Annual Directory, 1993, ed. by J. Ewald & Gordon, with Daryl F. Mallett. Garden City, NY: Nassau Community College, 1993.* Reginalds Science Fiction and Fantasy Awards: A Comprehensive Guide to the Awards and Their Winners, 3rd Ed., by Daryl F. Mallett & Robert Reginald.  San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1993.* The State and Province Vital Records Guide, by Burgess, Mary A. Burgess & Daryl F. Mallett.  San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1993.* The Work of Jack Vance: An Annotated Bibliography and Guide, by Hewett & Daryl F. Mallett.  Lancaster, PA & Novato, CA: Books; San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1994.*The Work of Elizabeth Chater: An Annotated Bibliography and Guide, by Daryl F. Mallett & Y. Mallett.  San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1994.*Imaginative Futures: The Proceedings of the 1993 Science Fiction Research Association Conference, ed. by T. Wolf & Daryl F. Mallett. Glendale, AZ: SFRA Pr., 1995.*Multitenant Building Telecommunications Access Study, by Goldstein. Daryl F. Mallett & Mead, Editorial Assistants, Tempe, AZ: The Arizona Telecommunications and Information Council (ATIC), March 2000.*& Pioneers: The History and Speeches of the Science Fiction Research Association Award Winners, ed. by W. Hall & Daryl F. Mallett. Tempe, AZ: SFRA Pr., 2001 (with substantial contributions by Kelleghan).*Arizona Telecommunications Directory. Primary Researcher: Mark Goldstein. Assistant Researchers: Daryl F. Mallett, Judi Mead & Neumann, Tempe, AZ: The Arizona Telecommunications and Information Council (ATIC), 2002.*Falcon Field, by Daryl F. Mallett. Charleston, SC: Arcadia Publishing, 2009.Edited Poetry Anthologies*Full Frontal Poetry, ed. by Daryl F. Mallett, L. Hakim & McConnell. Riverside, CA: Publishing, 1991.Short Fiction*A Typical Terrans Thought When Spoken to by an Alien from the Planet Quarn in Its Native Language, by J Ackerman & Daryl F. Mallett, in ISFA Newsletter 2:10 (November 1990): 9. Reprinted in Worlds in Small: An Anthology of Miniature Literary Compositions, ed. by Robert Colombo. Vancouver, British Columbia, Canada: Cacanadadada Press, 1992.*The Possible Death of Christopher Marlowe, in UCR Winter Arts Festival Writers Competition Finalists, 1990-91, ed. by Lehr. Riverside, CA: UCR Performing Arts/ASUCR, 1991.*Tongue-Tied: Bubos Tale, in Star Wars: Tales from Jabbas Palace, ed. by J. Anderson.  York City:  Books, 1996.*Women Without Men, in Other Worlds #6 (Winter 1996). Reprinted in M&V MagaZine 14:2 (Aug./Sep. 1998).*Crystal Clear, in MagaZine, Vol. 14:3 (Aug./Sept. 1999), p. 10-11, 13, 24.*The Inn of Durant, in Tales of the Hero-Lore, ed. by P. Vaughn. Arizona: Prismic Publishing, 2005.Comic Books/Graphic Novels*Hero-Lore #1: The Twelve, Part I: Battlescars, written and co-plotted by Daryl F. Mallett.  Phoenix:  Comics, 1999.Serial Editorial Credits*Tesoros, Co-Editor, 1985-86.*Waymark, Editor, 1988-89.*SFRA Review (formerly SFRA Newsletter), Editor, 1993-94.*Environmental Times, Editor, 1994.*Central American Times, Assistant Editor, 1994.*Extrapolation, Editorial Board, 1994- .*Other Worlds, Associate Editor & Contributing Writer, 1995- .*Hardboiled Detectives, Associate Editor, 1996- .*M&V MagaZine, Contributing Writer & Editor, 1997- .*Alta Mesa Times, Editor, 2004, 2005-06.*Red Mountain Times, Editor, 2004.*Superstition Springs Community News, Editor, 2004, 2005-06.*Trails & Paths, Editor, 2004.*The Islands Current, Associate Editor, 2004, 2005.*The Pride of Cooper Commons, Associate Editor, 2004, 2005-06.*Val Vista Lakes Community News, Associate Editor, 2004, 2005-06.*Inside Ocotillo, Associate Editor, 2004.*Gilbert Lifestyle, Editor, 2004-05.*Northeast Mesa Lifestyle, Editor, 2004-05.*Senior Lifestyle, Editor, 2004-05.*Copper Basin News, Reporter, 2009- .*Pinal Nugget, Reporter, 2009- .*San Manuel Miner, Reporter, 2009- .*Superior Sun, Reporter, 2009- .*Sahuarita Sun, Reporter, 2010- .Non-Proprietary Editorial Credits*One Day with God: A Guide to Retreats & The Contemplative Life, Rev. Ed., by Bishop Karl Prter, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). San Bernardino, CA: St. Willibrords Pr., Dec. 1991. devotional*Inside Science Fiction: Essays on Fantastic Literature, by James E. Gunn, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, Jun. 1992. criticism*Vultures of the Void: A History of British Science Fiction Publishing, 1946-1956, by Philip Harbottle & Stephen Holland, ed. by Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, Dec. 1992. history*The Russian Orthodox Church Outside Russia: A History & Chronology, by Rev. Father Alexey Young, ed. by Bishop Karl Prter, Paul David Seldis Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, Mar. 1993. history*The Transylvanian Library: A Consumers Guide to Vampire Fiction, by Greg Cox, ed. by Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, Mar. 1993. criticism*Adventures of a Freelancer: The Literary Exploits & Autobiography of Stanton A. Coblentz, by Stanton A. Coblentz, with Jeffrey M. Elliot, ed. by Scott Alan Burgess Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, May 1993. Autobiography*Geo. Alec Effinger: From Entropy to Budayeen, by Ben P. Indick, ed. by Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, Aug. 1993. studies/Literary criticism*Mary Roberts Rinehart, Mistress of Mystery, by Frances H. Bachelder, ed. by Dale Salwak & Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, Oct. 1993. studies/Literary criticism*Wilderness Visions: The Western Theme in Science Fiction Literature, 2nd Ed., by David Mogen, ed. by Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, Oct. 1993. history/criticism*Dragons & Martinis: The Skewed Realism of John Cheever, by Michael D. Byrne, ed. by Dale Salwak, Paul David Seldis Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, Oct. 1993. studies/Literary criticism*Libido into Literature: The Primera poca of Benito Prez Galds, by Clark M. Zlotchew, ed. by Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, Oct. 1993. history/Spanish literature*The Price of Paradise: The Magazine Career of F. Scott Fitzgerald, by Stephen Potts, ed. by Paul David Seldis, John Hansen Gurley Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, Oct. 1993. studies/Literary criticism*A Wayfarer in a World in Upheaval, by Bernard L. Ginsburg, ed. by Nathan Kravetz Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1993. history*International Society of Meeting Planners 1993 Directory of Members & Industry Professionals, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Scottsdale, AZ: International Society of Meeting Planners (Todd Publishing), 1993. directory*Association of Construction Inspectors 1993-1994 Directory of Members & Industry Professionals, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Scottsdale, AZ: Association of Construction Inspectors (Todd Publishing), 1993. directory*1994 Directory of Designated Members: CRA  Administrative; CRA  Certified Review Appraiser; RMU  Registered Mortgage Underwriter, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Scottsdale, AZ: National Association of Review Appraisers & Mortgage Underwriters (Todd Publishing), 1994. directory*Federal & State Environmental Agencies Directory, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Scottsdale, AZ: Environmental Assessment Association (Todd Publishing), 1994. directory*The Complete Guide of Environmental Inspection Forms, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Scottsdale, AZ: Environmental Assessment Association (Todd Publishing), 1994. reference*Environmental Assessment Association Directory of Members, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Scottsdale, AZ: Environmental Assessment Association (Todd Publishing), 1994. directory*Complying with the Foreign Investments in Real Property Tax Act: Complete with Appropriate Forms, Daryl F. Mallett. Scottsdale, AZ: International Real Estate Institute, 1994.*British Science Fiction Paperbacks & Magazines, 1949-1956: An Annotated Bibliography & Guide, by Philip Harbottle & Stephen Holland, ed. by Daryl F. Mallett & Michael Burgess. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1994. guide*Speaking of Horror: Interviews with Writers of the Supernatural, by Darrell Schweitzer, ed. by Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1994. Interviews*The Work of William Eastlake: An Annotated Bibliography & Guide, by W. C. Bamberger, ed. by Boden Clarke & Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1994. Bibliography*Firefly: A Novel of the Far Future, by Brian Stableford, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). San Bernardino, CA: Unicorn & Son Publishers, 1994. Novel*Christopher Isherwood: A World in Evening, by Kay Ferres, ed. by Dale Salwak Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1994. criticism*W. E. B. Du Bois: His Contributions to Pan-Africanism, by Kwadwo O. Pobi-Asamani, ed. by Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1994. political studies*Roald Dahl: From the Gremlins to the Chocolate Factory, Second Edition, by Alan Warren, ed. by Dale Salwak & Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1994. criticism*Christopher Hampton: An Introduction to His Plays, by William J. Free, ed. by Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1994. criticism*The Environmental Inspectors Guide to The National Environmental Policy Act. Scottsdale, AZ: Environmental Assessment Association (Todd Publishing), 1995.*The Environmental Inspectors Guide to The Clean Air Act. Scottsdale, AZ: Environmental Assessment Association (Todd Publishing), 1995.*The Environmental Inspectors Guide to The Clean Water Act. Scottsdale, AZ: Environmental Assessment Association (Todd Publishing), 1995.*The Environmental Inspectors Guide to The Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, & Liability Act. Scottsdale, AZ: Environmental Assessment Association (Todd Publishing), 1995.*The Environmental Inspectors Guide to The Resource Conservation & Recovery Act. Scottsdale, AZ: Environmental Assessment Association (Todd Publishing), 1995.*The Environmental Inspectors Guide to The Occupational Safety & Health Act. Scottsdale, AZ: Environmental Assessment Association (Todd Publishing), 1995.*The Environmental Inspectors Guide to The Environmental Protection & Community Right-to-Know Act. Scottsdale, AZ: Environmental Assessment Association (Todd Publishing), 1995.*The Environmental Inspectors Guide to Comprehensive Guidelines. Scottsdale, AZ: Environmental Assessment Association (Todd Publishing), 1995.*Street Kids & Other Plays, by Brio Burgess, ed. by Daryl F. Mallett. Tempe, AZ: Jacobs Ladder Books/Angel Enterprises, Sep. 1995; 2nd print., Jun. 1996. of plays*The Chinese Economy: A Bibliography of Works in English, by Robert Goehlert & Anthony C. Stamtoplos, ed. by Daryl F. Mallett, Mary A. Burgess & Xiwen Zhang. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1995. Reference*Pandoras Box: A Science Fiction Thriller, by E. C. Tubb, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Publications, 1996. fiction novel*Beneath the Red Star: Studies on International Science Fiction, by George Zebrowski, ed. by Pamela Sargent Daryl F. Mallett. San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1996. of literary criticism*Islands in the Sky: The Space Station Theme in Science Fiction Literature, by Gary Westfahl, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1996. history/criticism*Seven by Seven: Interviews with American Science Fiction Writers of the West & Southwest, by Neal Wilgus, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). San Bernardino, CA: Borgo Press, 1996. Interviews*Shroud Me Not: A Harvey St. John Short Novel, by Harold Q. Masur, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett)/Dig My Grave: A Scott Jordan Short Novel, by Harold Q. Masur, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Books, 1996. hardboiled detective novel*Amazing Pulp Heroes: A Celebration of the Glorious Pulp Magazines, by Frank Hamilton & Link Hullar, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Books, October 1996. history*Sarasha: A Novel of the Future, by Gary Lovisi, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Books, 1997. fiction novel*Murder Wears a Halo: A Mystery Crime Thriller, by Howard Browne, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Books, 1997. detective novel*Mitzi: A Mystery Crime Thriller, by Michael Avallone, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Books, 1997. detective novel*The Brothers Challis, Featuring Bart Challis, in The Pop-Op Caper, with A Long Time Dying: Two Bart Challis Detective Thrillers, by William F. Nolan, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett)/The Brothers Challis, Featuring Nick Challis, in The Pulpcon Kill, with And the Beat Goes On, A Special Introduction, by William F. Nolan, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Books, Jan. 1997. hardboiled detective novel*Letters from Dwight, by Gary Kern, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Grand Terrace, CA: Xenos Books, 1998. novel*Alien Life, by E. C. Tubb, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Books, 1998. fiction novel*The Fortress of Utopia, by Jack Williamson, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Books. 1998. fiction novel*The Whispering Gorilla, by Don Wilcox, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett)/Return of the Whispering Gorilla, by David V. Reed, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Books, 1999. science fiction novel*The Slitherers, by John Russell Fearn, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Books, 1999. fiction novel*Lord of Atlantis: A Golden Amazon Adventure, by John Russell Fearn, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Books, 1999. fiction novel*The Gargoyle, by Gary Lovisi, (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Books, 2000. fiction novel*Wail!, by Brio Burgess, ed. by Gail Tolley Daryl F. Mallett. Tempe, AZ: Jacobs Ladder Books/Angel Enterprises, 2002. of plays & poetry*Pulp Crime Classics, ed. by Gary Lovisi Daryl F. Mallett. Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Books, 2002. Collection*True & Almost True Stories, by Howard Schoenfeld (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Publications, 2004. Collection*A Book of Life, by R. E. Hatton (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Gilbert, AZ: Wisteria House Publishers, 2005. Biography*The Sherlock Holmes Stories of Edward D. Hoch, by Edward D. Hoch (ed. by Daryl F. Mallett). Brooklyn, NY: Gryphon Publications, 2008. story collectionStage, Film & Television Production Credits*Mame (VHS Drama Dept.), 1985. Mr. Upson.*Disneylands Main Street Electrical Parade (Disneyland), 1985-86. Toy Soldier.*Disneylands Bear Country Hoedown (Disneyland), 1985-86. Dancer.*Waiting in the Wings (VHS Drama Dept.), 1986. Boy.*A Christmas Carol (UCR Drama Dept.), 1986. Christmas Future.*Pirates of Penzance (Carson Civic Light Opera), 1987. Pirate.*The Apple Tree (Long Beach Civic Light Opera), 1987. Stage Crew.*The Ghost Sonata (UCR Drama Dept.), 1988. Stage Crew.*Cannibal Women in the Avocado Jungle of Death (Guacamole Productions), 1988, Extra.*Star Trek: The Next Generation (Pictures), 1988-95. Extra in several episodes.*The Birthday Party (UCR Drama Dept.), 1989. Audio Crew.*Carmadys People: The Case of the Reluctant Major (Cencom Cable), 1990. Thug #2.*Star Trek VI: The Undiscovered Country (Pictures), 1991. Extra.*Star Trek: The Next Generation: Birthright (Pictures), 1991). Uncredited storyline co-creator, with Barbra Wallace, Arthur Loy Holcomb & George Brozak.*Star Trek: Deep Space 9 (Pictures), 1993-99. Extra in several episodes.*Sphere (Bros.), 1998. Technical Writer.*The Message (Caribou Moving Pictures), 2004. Assistant to the Producer.*Illusion (Draco Productions), 2005. Associate Producer.*In Search of Spielberg (Caribou Moving Pictures), in production. Assistant Producer.*Amish Soldier (Dustbunny Productions), in production. Producer, Director.*Turkeystuffer (Paddlefoot Productions), in development. Producer.*First Rose of Spring (Draco Productions), in developoment. Associate Producer.Honors & Awards*DramaLogue Award (1996), Best Christmas Future for performance as Christmas Future in Dickenss A Christmas Carol at UC Riverside.*Locus Recommended Reading List (1994) for Reginalds Science Fiction and Fantasy Awards: A Comprehensive Guide to the Awards and Their Winners, Third Edition, Revised and Expanded, by Daryl F. Mallett & Reginald.*Locus Recommended Reading List (1992) for Reginalds Science Fiction and Fantasy Awards: A Comprehensive Guide to the Awards and Their Winners, Second Edition, Revised and Expanded, by Daryl F. Mallett & Reginald.*Locus Recommended Reading List (1992) for Science Fiction and Fantasy Literature: A Bibliography, 1975-1991: A Bibliography of Science Fiction, Fantasy, and Horror Fiction Books and Nonfiction Monographs, by Reginald. Associate Editors: A. Burgess & Daryl F. Mallett. Editorial Assistants & Advisors: Alan Burgess, Clute, G. Contento, Hansen Gurley, Menville & David Seldis.*Deans Honor Roll, Rio Salado Community College, 1994.*Winter Arts Festival Writers Competition Finalist: Short Story Competition, University of California, Riverside, 1991.*Winter Arts Festival Writers Competition Finalist: Poetry Competition, University of California, Riverside, 1991.References
623160
Ray_Reardon
 World champ   1970, 1973, 1974, 1975, 1976, 1978Ray Reardon, MBE (8 October 1932)( is a retired Welsh( snooker player. He dominated the sport in the 1970s, winning six World Championships in that decade. A genial figure, his dark peak and sharp-toothed grin nonetheless earned him the nickname Dracula. Early life and careerBorn 8 October 1932, in the mining community of Tredegar in Monmouthshire, Reardon left school and became a coal miner when he was just 14, like many of his generation and earlier. It is rumoured that he used to wear gloves to protect his hands for snooker. Following an accident underground in which Reardon was buried for several hours, he quit mining and became a officer.( ) He played snooker at an amateur level for many years including winning five Welsh Amateur titles and the 1964 English Amateur title, before finally turning professional in 1967.His first appearance at the World Championship was in 1969, and he won his first title the following year, beating Pulman 37-33 at Londons Victoria Hall. After winning the title, Reardon was in big demand for exhibitions and on the holiday camp circuit. Winning the first ever Black in 1969 made him instantly recognisable, and Reardon and John Spencer were the first two men to capitalise on the snooker boom in the early 1970s. Entertainer Reardon also became popular because he added a touch of humour and entertainment to his game. A deadly long potter and tactician in his prime, he played seventeen World Championship matches without defeat and won the title four years in succession. He won his second in 1973 in Manchester when he beat Eddie Charlton 38-32, but the match of the championship was the semi-final between Reardon and Spencer, which Reardon won 23-22.He beat Miles the following year, and in 1975, when it was held in Melbourne, Australia, he had a tough quarter-final with Spencer which he won 19-17. He then beat Higgins 19-14 before meeting local hero Charlton in the final. Reardon initially trailed by 23 frames to 29, putting Charlton two frames away from the title, but Reardon then won seven consecutive frames to lead 30-29. Charlton took the sixtieth frame to tie the match but Reardon took the vital sixty-first and won his fourth title.Reardon won his fifth the next year in Manchester, beating Alex Higgins 27-16. Earlier that year, he had won the Benson and Hedges Masters in London, his second snooker title after the World Championship. His unbeaten run at the World Championship ended at the first Crucible championship in 1977, when he lost to John Spencer in the quarter-finals 6-13, his first defeat since Williams in 1972.He regained the title in 1978  winning it for the sixth time by beating Mans 25-18.() Reardon remains the oldest winner of the World Championship at the age of 45 years and 6 months. He then regained his Pot Black title in 1979. Six world titles After his sixth world title he did not win another, but he remained one of the worlds very best players for some years. He was beaten by Taylor in the 1979 quarter-final, and by David Taylor at the same stage in 1980. He went a step further in 1981, being surprisingly beaten by fellow Welshman Mountjoy in the semi-finals.It was the rise of Steve Davis in 1980-81 that saw  Reardon and his generation lose their grip on the sport as it became a young mans game, having previously been dominated by players in their 30s and 40s.However, despite Davis total domination over an 18-month period between late 1980 and the spring of 1982, Reardon remained a major force in the game. At 49, he reached the World final in 1982, losing to Alex Higgins 15-18.In 1983, Reardons career went through an summer. He reached the final of the Benson & Hedges Masters, losing 7-9 to Thorburn, and went on to win several tournaments including the Yamaha Organs International Masters, where he beat White 9-6 in the final. This led him to be fancied in some quarters for that years World Championship, but he was beaten 12-13 in a high-quality second round match by Tony Knowles.After 1983, he never again looked likely to triumph in major championships although he reached the semi-finals of the World Championships once more, in 1985 (losing 5-16 to Davis). He last played at the Crucible in 1987, losing to Steve Davis again in the second round. World number one When the world rankings were introduced in 1976, Reardon was the first number one, retaining that position until 1981/1982.( His win in the 1982 Professional Players Tournament at the age of 50 led to him recapturing the world number one position in the first set of rankings to be calculated on tournaments other than the World Championship.Reardon remains the oldest player, at 45, ever to win a ranking tournament.  He has also won the State Express World Team Classic for Wales during the first two years of the tournament in 1979 and 1980 with Mountjoy and Griffiths. He also won the Professional Championship in 1981 and 1983. His last final was the 1985 World Doubles when he partnered Tony Jones and lost to Davis and Meo 5-12. He was awarded the MBE in the same year.Later yearsReardon began to struggle in 1982 when his father died. He also developed poor sight and started wearing Taylor-style glasses later on in his career. He went out of the top 16 in 1987 but surprisingly whitewashed Steve Davis 5-0 in the 1988 British Open. He retired in 1992, but maintains an active interest in the game. He also advised OSullivan on his way to his 2004 World Championship victory, giving him psychological and technical help.(Magic Ronnie wows Reardon, BBC Sport, 2 May 2004. Retrieved on 13 July 2008.) He is currently the president of the golf club in Churston, Devon.(A message from the Clubs President Ray Reardon, Club Website. Retrieved on 25 February 2009.)He now lives in Torquay, Devon.Performance timelineWorld Championship finals: 7 (6 titles, 1 runner-up)Tournament winsRanking wins*World Championship - 1974, 1975, 1976, 1978*Professional Players Tournament - 1982Other wins*World Championship - 1970, 1973 (world rankings did not begin until 1974)*Benson & Hedges Masters - 1976*Black - 1969, 1979*Yamaha International Masters - 1983*Professional Championship - 1981, 1983Team wins*World Cup - 1979, 1980 (with Wales team)Referencesrefs()()ReardonReardonReardonReardonReardonReardonReardonReardonReardonzh:
625179
Hucknall
Hucknall, formerly known as Hucknall Torkard, is a town in Nottingham, Nottinghamshire, England, in the district of Ashfield. The town was historically a centre for framework knitting and then for mining but is now a focus for other industries as well providing housing for workers in Nottingham. The town is notable as the site where Rolls-Royce made the first demonstration of vertical take-off (for a plane). It is also the final resting place of Byron and his estranged daughter, the mathematician Lovelace.StatisticsPopulation 29,704 (14,572 (49%) male, 15,132 (51% female). Total households 12,427 (Census 2001, Nottinghamshire County Council). White (94%) Asian (3%) Afro-Caribbean (1%)GeographyHucknall is situated seven miles (11 kilometres) north-west of Nottingham on the west bank of the Leen Valley, on land which rises from the Trent Valley in the south to the hills of the county north of Kirkby-in-Ashfield. The Whyburn or Town Brook flows through the town centre, and Brook marks its southern boundary.The towns highest point is Long Hill which is 460 feet (140 metres) above sea-level.Apart from the southern link to Nottingham, the town is surrounded by farmland.To the north-west lie Hills and Annesley.To the north-east town are the villages of Linby and Papplewick. Beyond them is Abbey, once the residence of Byron.To the west lies Eastwood, birthplace of H. Lawrence, and the inspiration for many of his novels.To the east of the town is Bestwood Country Park.The areas of Hill and Westville often appear as distinct entities on maps, but are generally considered as part of Hucknall.HistoryHucknall was once a thriving market town.Its focal point is the parish church of St. Mary Magdalene, next to the towns market square. The church was built by the Anglo-Saxons and completed after the Norman Conquest, though much of it has been restored during the Victorian era.( The medieval church consisted only of a chancel, nave, north aisle and tower but it was considerably enlarged in the Victorian period. In 1872 the south aisle was added and in 1887 the unusually long transepts while the rest of the building apart from the tower was thoroughly restored. The top stage of the tower is 14th century as is the south porch. There are 25 fine stained glass windows by Eamer Kempe which were added mostly in the 1880s. There is a modest memorial to Lord Byron.(Pevsner, N. (1951) Nottinghamshire. Harmondsworth: Penguin; pp. 85-86)From 1295 until 1915, the town was known as Hucknall Torkard, taken from Torcard, the name of a dominant landowning family. Signs of the old name can still be seen on some of the older buildings. During the 19th and 20th centuries, coal was discovered and mined heavily throughout the Valley, which includes Hucknall. This brought increased wealth to the town along with the construction of three railway lines.The first was the Railway (later part of the LMS) line from Nottingham to Mansfield and Worksop, closed to passengers on 12 October 1964 though partly retained as a freight route serving collieries at Hucknall, Linby and Annesley. The station on this line was known as Hucknall Byron in its latter years. In the 1990s this line was reopened to passengers in stages as the Hood Line, the section through Hucknall in 1993 with a new station on the site of the old Byron, though simply called Hucknall.The second line was the Great Northern Railway (later part of the LNER) route up the Leen Valley and on up to Shirebrook, serving many of the same places as the Midland south of Annesley. It closed to passengers on 14 September 1931 but remained in use for freight until 25 March 1968. The Hucknall station on this line was known as Hucknall Town.The third line was the Central Railway (also later part of the LNER), the last main line ever built from the north of England to London, opened on 15 March 1899. The stretch through Hucknall closed completely on 5 September 1966, but the Hucknall station here (known as Hucknall Central), had closed earlier, on 4 March 1963. From 1894 until 1974 Hucknall was the seat of the Urban District council. Upon the abolition of the UDC, the town was transferred to Ashfield.In 1956 the of St. Peter and St. Paul, Hucknall was built to serve the area of west Hucknall.EtymologyHucknall was recorded as Hokeuhale (n.d.) and Hokenale (n.d.), suggesting nook of land of Hcanere (a tribe, from Old English halh (haugh). This same tribes name occurs in Norton, Oxfordshire. It has been suggested that the name Hucknall once referred to a larger area on the Nottinghamshire/Derbyshire border. Two other settlements in the locality are called Hucknall; Hucknall-under-Huthwaite, in Nottinghamshire, (known today as Huthwaite) and Hucknall in Derbyshire. It is likely that Hucknall Torcard marked the Southern Boundary of this larger Hucknall Area.(huthwaite-online) OrAnglo-Saxons called it  either Occas Knoll, knoll being an Old Saxon word for place, or Oak-en-hall, meaning place of the Oak.In the Book (A.D. 1086) the name appears as Hochenale (volume 1, pages 288-290).TransportThe town is the northern terminus for the Express Transit tram system as well as sharing a station on the Hood Line. There is also a stop at Hill/Broomhill. The town used to be on the A611 but now this has bypassed the town to the west with a single-carriageway road with roundabouts, with access to junction 27 of the M1. The trams were built from 2002-2004 and goes from Hucknall to Station street next to Nottingham train station.Bus services (Nottinghamshire Bus Services)Trent Barton* Rainbow 3: Nottingham - Hucknall - Annesley - Kirkby - Mansfield.* Rainbow 3A: Nottingham - Hucknall - Newstead - Annesley Woodhouse - Kirkby - Sutton - Mansfield.* Rainbow 3B: Nottingham - Hucknall - Annesley - Kirkby - Sutton.* Rainbow 3C: Nottingham - Hucknall - Annesley - Kirkby - Coxmoor Estate - Mansfield.* N3: Nottingham - Hucknall - Kirkby.* 141: Nottingham - Hucknall - Blidworth - Mansfield - Sutton.* Amberline: Derby - Heanor - Eastwood - Hucknall.* Connect: Hucknall Estates - Hucknall - Hucknall Station.Premiere Buses* S43: Bulwell - Hucknall.* S44: Hucknall - Morrisons - Bulwell.* Red 8: Hucknall Estates - City Hospital - Nottingham.* 2: Hucknall - Sherwood Business Park - Brinsley - EastwoodDunn Motor Traction t/a yourbus* 228: Hucknall - Bestwood Village - Bulwell - Phoenix Park - Assarts Farm - Strelley - QMC - Beeston.EducationNational School which was founded in 1788 by Frederick Ward and located at the southern end of Annesley Road.(Hucknall Torkard History) It relocated in the 1970s to a new build still on Annesley Road but at the north end of the town, near the roundabout of the road.(National School Technology College)The National School has a large science block with 10 labs and an astro turf, both opened in 2004 by Princess Anne. A New Eco Building Is Now Open In the School.Holgate Comprehensive School a Specialist in the Arts was given a specialist status of School of arts and is on Hillcrest Drive in Beauvale, to the west of the bypass.(Holgate Comprehensive School site) It has an athletics track.(athletics track)ShoppingHucknalls Tesco superstore opened in 2003, which created a number of jobs for the town. In 2008, the store was extended to make it a Tesco Extra store. A Tesco Express Store Was Open In Early January 2009 On Annesley Road. Other popular shops in Hucknall are Jonathan James, Warehouse, Wilkinsons, March, Argos and many charity/second hand shops.It is in close distance to (a bus or a tram ride) Morrisons in Bulwell, Tesco Top Valley and Tesco Extra in Bulwell.IndustryImage:Hucknall Davey Lamp.jpg|right|thumb|Bronze statue commemorating the lost mining industry seen on the way from Hucknall tram and railway station into the town. The main figure is on top of a lamp, whilst another collier is depicted hewing coal inside the lamp glass.MiningHucknall was a colliery town from 1861 to 1986. The sinking of the coal mines caused the settlement to grow rapidly from a village to a market town in under a hundred years.The Hucknall Colliery Company, formed in 1861 sank two shafts, Hucknall No. 1 colliery (known as Top Pit) in 1861 (off Watnall Road) and Hucknall No. 2 colliery (known as Bottom Pit) in 1866 (off Portland Road).No. 1 closed by 1943, and No. 2 closed in 1986.Rolls-RoyceAirfield was built in 1916, which became Hucknall. From 1927, Rolls-Royce began using the airfield for flight tests. During War II, the aerodrome at Hucknall was the location of the first flight of a Mustang fitted with a Rolls-Royce Merlin Engine. The fitting of the Merlin, replacing the existing V-1710 engine allowed the Mustang airframe to reach its full potential and achieve spectacular high altitude performance, something the Allison engine could not provide.In the early 1950s, the Rolls-Royce site at Hucknall developed the worlds first vertical-takeoff jet aircraft - actually, a test rig, officially called the Thrust Measuring Rig, but soon nicknamed the Bedstead because of its shape. The first untethered flight, piloted by Capt. Ron Shepherd, took place on 3 August 1954 before a distinguished audience.The rig rose slowly into the air and hovered steadily. It then moved forward, made a circuit of the area, then demonstrated sideways and backwards movements before making a successful landing.The flight was a tremendous success and during the next four months a number of free flights were made, up to a height of 50 ft. There are pubs in Hucknall called The Flying Bedstead and The Harrier. Rolls-Royces flight test centre closed in 1971, but engines were still tested there until late 2008. There are still components manufactured at the site. During World War 2, a German prisoner-of-war, von Werra, attempted to escape by posing as a Dutch pilot and flying off in a Hurricane fighter. He was the only German to succeed in returning to the Reich. His exploits can be seen in the film The One That Got Away.TextilesFramework knitting was once the predominant industry in Hucknall.Garden productsOne of the most important local firms in Hucknall is Doff Portland. The company has grown to become the UKs largest independent manufacturer of insecticides, weedkillers, other pesticides, fertilisers and garden products sold nationally through garden centres, independent DIY retailers and large retail multiples. Doff is one of Europes largest producer of premium slug killer pellets. In addition, Doff provides extensive contract formulating and packing opportunities for third parties.(Doff site)PeopleImage:Hucknall Church St Mary Magdalene.jpg|thumb|right|St. Mary Magdalene church is the final resting place of Byron and his daughter, Lovelace.*Blatherwick is a former professional footballer who played for clubs including Nottingham Forest and Chesterfield.*Byron (poet, philosopher and revolutionary) was buried in the parish church (on 16 July 1824).(St. Mary Magdelene parish church, accessed 25 September 2008)*Bailey (19191999), actor.*Caunt (18151861), a bare-knuckle fighter, known as The Torkard Giant, who became Champion of England.( It is after Ben Caunt that the bell Big Ben is named.(more information about his life by one of his descendents, not working September 2008)*Coates (18861957), whose compositions include the theme music for The Dam Busters movie, and the Sleepy Lagoon introduction for Island Discs.(More legends of Light Music, Richard Farnon Society, accessed 25 September 2008)*Philanthropist Green (18171897). Buried in the local Parish church. Has a monument to his memory in Titchfield Park.(Zachariah Green Memorial Drinking Fountain, Ashfield District Council, accessed 25 September 2008)*Jack Hall (18831938) professional footballer who played as an inside-forward or centre-forward for Stoke, Middlesbrough, Leicester Fosse, and Birmingham.*Cecil Howitt, (18891968) an eminent British provincial architect of the 20th Century. The architect of Council House.*Countess Lovelace (18151852), daughter of the Poet Lord Byron, is buried in the church. She is credited as being the first programmer, having assisted in realising the potential of Babbages engine.(*Enoch Knocker West (18861965), a footballer who played for Sheffield United, Nottingham Forest and Manchester United. In 1915 he was banned from playing football for 30 years for allegedly fixing a match. He protested his innocence until his death.*Weller Widdowson, a footballer who played for Nottingham Forest and England.()  He also played cricket for Nottinghamshire and is credited with inventing football shin pads in 1874.SportThe towns football team is Town F.C.. Founded in 1945, originally as a colliery team (Hucknall Colliery Welfare FC), changing its name to Hucknall Town in 1987 after closure of the pit.(Hucknall Town FC)Over the seasons they have risen steadily through the non-league pyramid and have won many honours. They currently (2009) play in the Premier League, and in 2005 reached the final of the Trophy. After a reprieve from relegation in the 2007-2008 season, due to other teams demotions through financial difficulties, Hucknall were relegated for the first time in their history in the 2008-2009 season.( The towns top Sunday side are Plough Barflies FC who play their home games at Hucknall Town FCs Road ground. They have risen from the depths of the Notts Combination League to the top of the Notts Sunday Morning League in consecutive seasons. Royce Leisure F.C. were based near the fire station at the Rolls Royce Leisure Sports Ground on Watnall Road until folding in 2009.(Rolls-Royce Leisure FC, accessed 25 September 2008)Hucknall Cricket Club, founded 1890. The 1st, 2nd and 3rd XIs currently play in various leagues of the South Notts. Cricket League.(Hucknall Cricket Club)ReferencesExternal links* Hucknall Torkard dot com* HucknallDispatch.co.uk local newspaper* Nottinghamshire County Council* Ashfield District Council* Hucknall Huthwaite Online* History of Rolls-Royce at Hucknall* BBC Guide to Hucknall* Hucknall Rolls-Royce Amateur Radio Club* Hucknall Business Voicebg:de:Hucknallit:Hucknallnl:Hucknallnn:Hucknallpl:Hucknallro:Hucknallvo:Hucknall
627759
Kenora_District
footnotes               Kenora District (2006 Census population 64,419) is a district and division in Ontario in the province of Ontario. It was created in 1907 from parts of Rainy River District. It is, geographically, the largest division in that province; at 407,192.66 km2 it comprises almost 38 percent of the provinces land area. It is larger than Paraguay and approximately the size of California. Kenora District also has the lowest density of any of Ontarios census divisions, although it ranks 38th out of 50 by population.The district seat is the City of Kenora. The northern part, north of the River and known sometimes as the Patricia Portion, became part of Ontario in 1912. It was originally designated as the separate Patricia District, but was added to the Kenora District in 1927.PoliticsAs with the other districts of Northern Ontario, Kenora District has no equivalent to the county or municipality level of government that exists in Ontario. All government services in the district are instead provided by the local municipalities, by local services boards in some unincorporated communities, or directly by the provincial government.GeographyThe climate is very harsh because of the influence of the cold waters of Hudson and James Bays: most of the region is taiga characterised by permafrost, but on the extreme northern coast there are - remarkably for a latitude of only 54N - patches of true Arctic tundra and continuous permafrost. This is the southernmost point reached by the circumpolar line of continuous permafrost on any continent.The Kenora District contains the Lake Caldera, which is one of the worlds best preserved Neoarchean caldera complexes and is some 2.7 billion years old.(Caldera Volcanoes Retrieved on 2007-07-20)EconomyMost of the population of the district is concentrated in the extreme south where some agriculture is possible: the main crop is barley. In the north, mining is extremely extensive: northern Kenora district contains among the largest and highest-grade reserves of uranium in the world, and is also one of the worlds major producers of nickel. Traditional native activities such as hunting and fishing dominate the northern half of the district outside of the few mining settlements.A major mining exploration project is currently underway in the Ring of Fire region, centred on the districts isolated Lake.TransportationPermanent roads (Highway 599) only reach about halfway to the northernmost point of Kenora district, with the provincial highway network ending at Pickle Lake, although some more northerly communities have access to a seasonal ice/road network, via the Ontario Resource Trail. Year-round air and summertime river transport are the only means of reaching the most remote parts of the district. The major railroad lines between Toronto and Columbia passes through the south of the district.Patricia Portionthumb|right|Provincial boundaries of Canada prior to 1912. The portion of Ontarios modern boundaries which is not represented as part of Ontario in this map constitutes the Patricia Portion of Kenora District.The Patricia Portion is an informal name for the part of the Kenora District lying north of the River, which was transferred from the Territories to Ontario on May 15, 1912 in the Ontario Boundaries Extension Act, 1912. This area was originally a separate division named Patricia District, but became part of Kenora District in 1927. With the exception of a few communities along the northernmost ends of Highway 599 and the Highway 105/Highway 125 corridor, the Patricia Portion consists almost entirely of remote Nations communities which are only accessible by plane or road. Accordingly, the name Patricia Portion is still sometimes used to distinguish the area from the more populated southern portion of the district.SubdivisionsCities* Dryden* KenoraTowns* Red Lake* LookoutTownships* Ear Falls* Ignace* Machin* Pickle Lake* Sioux Narrows-Nestor FallsFirst Nations reserves*Attawapiskat*Bearskin Lake*Cat Lake*Deer Lake*Eabametoong*Eagle Lake 27*English River 21*Fort Albany 67 (part)*Fort Severn 89*Islington 29*Kasabonika*Keewaywin*Kenora 38B*Kingfisher Lake*Kitchenuhmaykoosib Inninuwug*Lac Seul*Lake of the Woods 31G*Lake of the Woods 37*Marten Falls*Mishkeegogamang*Muskrat Dam Lake*Neskantaga*Northwest Angle 33*North Spirit Lake*Pikangikum*Poplar Hill*Rat Portage 38A*Sabaskong Bay 35D*Sachigo Lake*Sandy Lake*Shoal Lake 39A (part)*Shoal Lake 40 (part)*Shoal Lake 34B2*The Dalles 38C*Wabauskang 21*Wabigoon Lake*Wapekeka*Wawakapewin*Weagamow Lake 87*Whitefish Bay 32A*Whitefish Bay 33A*Whitefish Bay 34A*Wunnumin LakeFirst Nations settlements*Frenchmans Head*Kejick Bay*Lansdowne House*MacDowell Lake*Muskrat Dam*Peawanuck*Slate Falls*Summer Beaver*Webequie*Whitefish BayUnorganized areas*Kenora, Unorganized See also * of Ontario Census DivisionsReferences(Districtde Kenoradi Kenoraja:Kenora(distrito)()piiri
629780
Darryl_Sittler
 halloffame  1989Darryl Glen Sittler (born September 18, 1950) is a retired professional hockey player who played in the Hockey League from 1970 until 1985 for the Maple Leafs, the Flyers and the Red Wings. He was elected to the Hall of Fame in 1989.On February 7, 1976, Sittler set an NHL record that still stands for most points scored in one game. He recorded ten points (six goals, four assists) against the Bruins.Playing careerToronto Maple LeafsSittler grew up in Jacobs, Ontario and played minor hockey in nearby Elmira. He was drafted out of the Junior B Sugar Kings by the Nationals, soon renamed the Knights, and played under coaches Broda and Guidolin. Sittler was selected eighth overall by the Maple Leafs in the NHL Amateur Draft. He was named team captain on September 10, 1975 after Keon left the team to play in the WHA following a contract dispute with Leafs owner Ballard.In his first season as captain, Sittler finished the season with 41 goals and 59 assists, being the first Leaf ever to reach the one hundred point mark. A few months later, he tied the playoff record for most goals in one game, with five against the Flyers. That summer, in the inaugural Canada Cup, he scored in overtime to win the final series for Team Canada over Czechoslovakia.On February 7, 1976 in a game between Toronto and Boston at Maple Leaf Gardens, Sittler set an NHL record that still stands by tallying 6 goals and adding 4 assists for 10 points. All his points were scored against rookie goalie Dave Reece in an 11-4 Maple Leaf victory.In 197778, Sittlers 117 points ranked him third in regular season scoring behind Lafleur and Trottier, and also earned him a Second Team All-Star selection. Sittlers scoring totals remained a Leafs record until being surpassed by Gilmour in 199293. During the 1978 playoffs, the Leafs upset the York Islanders in the quarter-finals, winning on an overtime goal by McDonald in Game 7 before being swept by the eventual Stanley Cup champion Canadiens in the Conference Finals.The 197879 season saw Sittler suffer some knee problems and miss 10 games. It was also the year that Leafs owner Ballard fired and then rehired coach Neilson, a process which saw Sittler lobby on the players behalf for Neilsons reinstatement.Sittlers relationship with Ballard slowly deteriorated, particularly after Ballard hired Imlach as general manager in July 1979. Imlach and Ballard both had strained relations with NHLPA executive director Eagleson who, as a player agent, represented more than a dozen Leafs, including Sittler and his best friend and linemate, Lanny McDonald. Imlach believed Sittler had too much influence on the team and tried to undermine his authority with the players. When Sittler and goaltender Palmateer agreed to appear on the TV show Showdown, as negotiated by the NHLPA, Imlach went to court to try to get injunction to stop them. When Imlach said that he was open to offers for Sittler from other teams, Eagleson said it would cost $500,000 to get Sittler to waive the no-trade clause in his contract. So, instead of trading Sittler, Imlach sent McDonald to the woeful Colorado Rockies on December 29, 1979. In response, Sittler ripped the captains C off his sweater, later commenting that a captain had to be the go-between with players and management, and he no longer had any communication with management.(Daryl Sittlers longest year, Frank Orr, Star, March 16, 1980, p. C3.) Ballard would liken Sittlers actions to burning the Canadian flag.(Maple Leaf forever? Sittler will stay put at least this season, Ken McKee, Star, March 8, 1980, p. C3.)Through the summer, Ballard insisted that Sittler would not be back with the Leafs. But before the start of the 198081 season, Sittler and Ballard appeared together at a news conference described as all smiles and buddy-buddy(Peace is wonderful, but ..., Frank Orr, Star, September 5, 1980, p. D1.) to announce that Sittler would be at training camp. He showed up with the C back on his sweater, reassuming the role of team captain. Sittler had arranged the talks with Ballard on his own.( The discussions took place with Imlach hospitalized following his second heart attack. At the news conference, Ballard said the real battle had been between Imlach and Eagleson, and Sittler just got caught in the crossfire.During the 198182 season, Ballard considered Imlachs health to be too poor for him to continue as general manager. But even with Imlach gone, Sittlers relationship with the Leafs worsened to the point where he told Ballard and acting general manager Gerry McNamara at the end of November that he would waive his no-trade clause if he was sent to the Flyers or the North Stars. In the first week of December, Eagleson agreed to terms with Flyers owner Snider and North Stars general manager Nanne.(Sittler saga finally ends, Wayne Parrish, Star, January 21, 1982, p. D1.) But it took another seven weeks for the Leafs to make a deal. During that time, Sittler added the Islanders and Sabres to the list of teams he could be traded to. On January 5, 1982, on advice from his physician, Sittler walked out on the Leafs, saying he was mentally depressed because a trade was taking so long to complete.Philadelphia FlyersFinally, on January 20, 1982, the 31 year-old Sittler was traded to the Flyers for Costello plus the Whalers second-round pick in the 1982 draft (used by the Leafs to select Ihnak), and future considerations, which ended up being Ken Strong. Only Ihnacak would play regularly for the Leafs. In 1980, Imlach had rejected an offer from Philadelphia, who were said to be willing to trade MacLeish and Dupont for Sittler.(Leafs seek youth in any exchange for Darryl Sittler, Ken McKee, Star, February 19 1980, p. F1.)With the Flyers in 198283, Sittler earned his fourth All-Star game appearance and he returned to the Flyers the following season. Before the 198485 season, Sittler was told that he would be named the Flyers team captain. On the day the announcement was to be madeSittler even had a brief speech prepared(Sittler considering retirement, Rick Fraser, Star, October 12, 1984, p. B1.)he was instead told by Flyers newly-appointed general manager Clarke that he had been traded to the Red Wings for Craven and Joe Paterson. It was this incident that Sittler described as the biggest disappointment of his life. Clarke cant come close to realizing how much he hurt me, and my family, that day, he wrote in his 1991 autobiography.(Sittler, Darryl Sittler & Chris Goyens, Macmillan Canada, 1991, p. 224.) Sittler contemplated retirement and did not report to the Wings for a few days, but then joined the team. He had an unproductive season, struggling to get ice time under coach Polano, and finishing the year with the worst goals-per-game average of his NHL career. The Red Wings bought out Sittlers contract after the end of the season. He received a one-year contract offer from the Canucks, but decided to retire.RetirementSittler was elected to the Hall of Fame in 1989. In 1991, a year after Ballard died, he rejoined the Leafs organization as a consultant under new general manager Fletcher. In 1998, he was ranked number 93 on The Hockey News list of the 100 Greatest Hockey Players and on February 8, 2003, Sittlers number 27 was honoured by the Leafs.(Banner night for Leafs; Sundin hot on Sittlers special evening, Paul Hunter, Star, February 9, 2003, p. E1.)Vancouver songwriters Dan Swinimer and Jeff Johnson wrote a country song commemorating Sittlers 60th birthday called The Darryl Sittler Song. Since retirement Sittler has also been serving as a director to a number of mineral exploration companies, including Royal Nickel and Wallbridge Mining.Terry FoxIn July 1980 Sittler presented Fox with his All-Star Team jersey in Phillips Square in front of a crowd of over 10,000 supporters. Fox had said that Sittler was one of his favourite athletes.Career statisticsSee also* of NHL statistical leaders* of NHL players with 1000 points* of players with 5 or more goals in an NHL gameReferencesExternal links**SittlerSittlerSittlerSittlerja:SittlerSittler
631361
Crowders_Mountain_State_Park
Crowders Mountain State Park is a 5126 acre (20.74 km) North Carolina state park in Gaston County, Carolina in the States. It is near Mountain, North Carolina and on the outskirts of North Carolina, it includes the peaks of Mountain and Pinnacle. Crowders Mountain was named for Crowders Creek which originated near its base. Contrary to some historical information, Crowders Mountain was not named for Crowder. (There is no historical evidence that he was ever in this area.) The cliffs are a popular destination for rock climbers.FeaturesThe mountain itself is a monadnock, an isolated erosional remnant that rises abruptly from the surrounding plain. Geologically neither Crowders Mountain nor Kings Pinnacle are true mountains. Crowders Mountain sharply rises some  above the surrounding countryside, and presents sheer rock cliffs that are 100 -  in height. The mountain rises to  above sea level. The peak is believed to be the remnant of a much higher mountain which formed some 400 - 500 million years ago and was gradually worn down by the elements. The park sets at the northeast end of the Kings Mountain Range, a  long range of low peaks which include the site of the of Kings Mountain of the Revolution.The Park contains two peaks:* Mountain, 1,625 feet (495 m), is in the northeastern section of the park. * Pinnacle, 1,705 feet (520 m), is in the western section of the park. HistoryIn the early 1970s a mining company conducted exploratory sampling on the mountain as preparation to purchase the mineral rights. Thanks to grassroots efforts by local citizens, educational institutions, and organizations the state government was convinced that the area should be set aside and protected due to significant natural communities, plants and animals, intrinsic beauty, and unique recreational opportunities. In 1973 the State of Carolina officially designated the area as Crowders Mountain State Park and it opened to the public in 1974. Kings Pinnacle was added to the park in 1987. Another  was added in the year 2000 and officially connected the park with Mountain State Park and Mountain National Military Park, both in Carolina.TrailsSeveral hiking trails lead to the summit of Crowders Mountain, and from the summit it is possible on a clear day to see the skyscrapers of North Carolina to the east. * Crowders Trail - Strenuous, . This trail winds along the base of Crowders Mountain which ultimately leads to the top of the mountain.* Backside Trail - Strenuous, .7 miles.  From the Crowders Trail this trail leads around the backside of the mountain to the top.* Rocktop Trail - Strenuous, .9 miles.  Admittedly the most difficult and technical trail in the park. It travels along the ridge of Crowders Mountain so each side has steep drop offs and unseen cliffs.ReferencesState Parks of North Carolina, Walter C. Biggs and James F. Parnell, Authors. John F. Blair, Publisher. 1989 ISBN 0895870711External links* Crowders Mountain State Park home page* Photographs at Hiking the Carolinas dtat de Crowders Mountain
633241
Silicosis
 MeshID           D012829 Silicosis, also known as Potters rot, is a form of lung disease caused by inhalation of crystalline silica dust, and is marked by inflammation and scarring in forms of nodular lesions in the upper lobes of the lungs. It is a type of pneumoconiosis.(Derived from Gr.  pnem|a (lung) + buffer vowel -o- +  kni|s (dust) + Eng. scient. suff. -osis (like in asbestosis and silicosis, see ref. 10).)Silicosis (particularly the acute form) is characterized by of breath, cough, fever, and cyanosis (bluish skin). It may often be misdiagnosed as edema (fluid in the lungs), pneumonia, or tuberculosis.  The name silicosis (from the Latin silex, or flint) was originally used in 1870 by Achille Visconti (1836-1911), prosector in the Maggiore of Milan.(United States Bureau of Mines, Bulletin: Volumes 476-478, U.S. G.P.O., (1995), p 63.) The recognition of respiratory problems from breathing in dust dates to ancient Greeks and Romans.(Rosen G: The History of Miners Diseases: A Medical and Social Interpretation. New York, Schuman, 1943, pp.459-476.) Agricola, in the mid-16th century, wrote about lung problems from dust inhalation in miners. In 1713, Ramazzini noted asthmatic symptoms and sand-like substances in the lungs of stone cutters. With industrialization, as opposed to hand tools, came increased production of dust. The pneumatic hammer drill was introduced in 1897 and sandblasting was introduced in about 1904,(Craighead JE et al. National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health. Diseases Associated with Exposure to Silica and Nonfibrous Silicate Minerals. Arch Pathol Lab Med 1988;112:673-720.) both significantly contributing to the increased prevalence of silicosis.ClassificationClassification of silicosis is made according to the diseases severity (including radiographic pattern), onset, and rapidity of progression.(NIOSH Hazard Review. Health Effects of Occupational Exposure to Respirable Crystalline Silica. DHHS 2002-129. pp. 23.)  These include:* Chronic simple silicosisUsually resulting from long-term exposure (10 years or more) to relatively low concentrations of silica dust and usually appearing 1030 years after first exposure.(Weisman DN and Banks DE. Silicosis. In: Interstitial Lung Disease. 4th ed. London: BC Decker Inc. 2003, pp391.) This is the most common type of silicosis.  Patients with this type of silicosis, especially early on, may not have obvious signs or symptoms of disease, but abnormalities may be detected by x-ray. Chronic cough and exertional dyspnea are common findings. Radiographically, chronic simple silicosis reveals a profusion of small (2), is formed from silicon and oxygen atoms. Since oxygen and silicon make up about 75% of the Earth, the compound silica is quite common. It is found in many rocks, such as marble, sandstone, flint and slate, and in some metallic ores. Silica can be a main component of sand. It can also be in soil, mortar, plaster, and shingles. The cutting, breaking, crushing, drilling, grinding, or abrasive blasting of these materials may produce fine silica dust.Silica occurs in 3 forms: crystalline, microcrystalline (or cryptocrystalline) and amorphous (non-crystalline). Free silica is composed of pure silicon dioxide, not combined with other elements, whereas silicates (e.g. talc, asbestos, and mica) are SiO2 combined with an appreciable portion of cations.* Crystalline silica exists in 7 different forms (polymorphs), depending upon the temperature of formation. The main 3 polymorphs are quartz, cristobalite, and tridymite. Quartz is subdivided into alpha and beta forms. In nature, most quartz is alpha-quartz and alpha-quartz comprises the bulk of crystalline silica. Quartz is the second most common mineral in the world (next to feldspar).(Crystalline Silica Primer, US Dept of the Interior and US Bureau of Mines, 1992.)* Microcrystalline silica consists of minute quartz crystals bonded together with amorphous silica. Examples include flint and chert.* Amorphous silica consists of kieselgur (diatomite), from the skeletons of diatoms, and vitreous silica, produced by heating and then rapid cooling of crystalline silica. Amorphous silica is less toxic than crystalline, but not biologically inert, and diatomite, when heated, can convert to tridymite or cristobalite.Silica flour is nearly pure SiO2 finely ground. Silica flour has been used as a polisher or buffer, as well as paint extender, abrasive, and filler for cosmetics. Silica flour has been associated with all types of silicosis, including acute silicosis. Silicosis is due to deposition of fine respirable dust (less than 10 micrometers in diameter) containing crystalline silicon dioxide in the form of alpha-quartz, cristobalite, or tridymite.DiagnosisThere are three key elements to the diagnosis of silicosis. First, the patient history should reveal exposure to sufficient silica dust to cause this illness.  Second, chest imaging (usually chest x-ray) that reveals findings consistent with silicosis. Third, there are no underlying illnesses that are more likely to be causing the abnormalities. Physical examination is usually unremarkable unless there is complicated disease. Also, the examination findings are not specific for silicosis. function testing may reveal airflow limitation, restrictive defects, reduced diffusion capacity, mixed defects, or may be normal (especially without complicated disease). Most cases of silicosis do not require tissue biopsy for diagnosis, but this may be necessary in some cases, primarily to exclude other conditions.For uncomplicated silicosis, chest x-ray will confirm the presence of small ( 1 cm) occurs from coalescence of small opacities, particularly in the upper lung zones. With retraction of the lung tissue, there is compensatory emphysema. Enlargement of the hilum is common with chronic and accelerated silicosis. In about 5-10% of cases, the nodes will calcify circumferentially, producing so-called eggshell calcification.  This finding is not pathognomonic (diagnostic) of silicosis. In some cases, the pulmonary nodules may also become calcified.  A computed tomography or scan can also provide a mode detailed analysis of the lungs, and can reveal cavitation due to concomitant mycobacterial infection.PreventionThe best way to prevent silicosis is to identify work-place activities that produce respirable crystalline silica dust and then to eliminate or control the dust (primary prevention). Water spray is often used where dust emanates.  Dust can also be controlled through dry air filtering.Following observations on industry workers in Lucknow (India), experiments on rats found that jaggery (a traditional sugar) had a preventive action against silicosis.()TreatmentSilicosis is an irreversible condition with no cure.( Treatment options currently focus on alleviating the symptoms and preventing complications.  These include:* Stopping further exposure to silica and other lung irritants, including smoking.* Cough suppressants.* Antibiotics for bacterial lung infection.* TB prophylaxis for those with positive skin test or IGRA blood test.* Prolonged anti-tuberculosis (multi-drug regimen) for those with active TB.* Chest physiotherapy to help the bronchial drainage of mucus.* Oxygen administration to treat hypoxemia, if present.* Bronchodilators to facilitate breathing.* transplantation to replace the damaged lung tissue is the most effective treatment, but is associated with severe risks of its own.* For acute silicosis, Whole-lung lavage (see lavage) may alleviate symptoms, but does not decrease overall mortality.Experimental treatments include:* Inhalation of powdered aluminium, d-penicillamine and pyridine-N-oxide.* Corticosteroid therapy.* The herbal extract tetrandine may slow progression of silicosis.()EpidemiologyOccupational silicosisSilicosis is the most common occupational lung disease worldwide, it occurs everywhere but is especially common in developing countries.()  From 1991 to 1995, China reported more than 24,000 deaths due to silicosis each year.() In the United States, it is estimated that one million-two million() workers have had occupational exposure to crystalline silica dust and 59,000 of these workers will develop silicosis sometime in the course of their lives.(According to CDC data,(Worker Health Chartbook 2004 - Fatal and Nonfatal Injuries, and Selected Illnesses - Respiratory Diseases - Pneumoconioses - Silicosis - NIOSH) silicosis in the United States is relatively rare. The incidence of deaths due to silicosis declined by 84% between 1968 and 1999, and only 187 deaths in 1999 had silicosis as the underlying or contributing cause.(Worker Health Chartbook 2004 - Fig2-192) Additionally, cases of silicosis in Michigan, New Jersey, and Ohio are highly correlated to industry and occupation.(Worker Health Chartbook 2004 - Fig2-190)Although silicosis has been known for centuries, the industrialization of mining has led to an increase in silicosis cases. Pneumatic drilling in mines and less commonly, mining using explosives, would raise rock dust. In the United States, a 1930 epidemic of silicosis due to the construction of the Hawks Nest Tunnel near Bridge, West Virginia caused the death of at least 400 workers.  Other accounts place the mortality figure at well over 1000 workers, primarily African American transient workers from the southern United States.(The Hawks Nest Tunnel, Patricia Spangler, 2008)  Workers who became ill were fired and left the region, making an exact mortality account difficult.(http://www.fayettetribune.com/local/local_story_093161850.html)  The Nest Tunnel Disaster is known as Americas worst industrial disaster.(The Hawks Nest Incident: Americas Worst Industrial Disaster, Dr. Martin Cherniack 1986) The prevalence of silicosis led some men to grow what is called a miners mustache, in an attempt to intercept as much dust as possible.Some have opined that cannabis contaminated with silica may cause silicosis in users,(Europe Flooded with Contaminated Cannabis)(Cannabis contamination in the UK) but there are no scientific data to support this.Chronic simple silicosis has been reported to occur from environmental exposures to silica in regions with high silica soil content and frequent dust storms.(Norboo T, Angchuk P, et al. Silicosis in a Himalayan Village Population: Role of Environmental Dust. Thorax 1991;46:341-343.)Also, the mining establishment of Ghost Town, Nevada was ruined by a dry-mining process that produced a silicosis-causing dust. After hundreds of deaths from silicosis, the town was nicknamed The Widowmaker. The problem in those days was somewhat resolved with an addition of a nozzle to the drill which sprayed a mist of water, turning dust raised by drilling into mud, but this inhibited mining work. Because of work-exposure to silica dust, silicosis is an occupational hazard to mining, sandblasting, quarry, ceramics and foundry workers, as well as grinders, stone cutters, refractory brick workers, tombstone workers, pottery workers, and others. Brief or casual exposure to low levels of crystalline silica dust are said to not produce clinically significant lung disease.(Beckett W, Abraham J, Becklake M, et al. American Thoracic Society Official Statement. Adverse Effects of Crystalline Silica Exposure. Am J Resp Crit Care Med, 1997;155:761-765.)Protective measures such as respirators have brought a steady decline in death rates due to silicosis in Western countries. Unfortunately, this is not true of less developed countries where work conditions are poor and respiratory equipment is seldom used. For instance, life expectancy for silver miners in Potos, Bolivia is around 40 years due to silicosis.Recently, silicosis in Turkish denim sandblasters was detected as a new cause of silicosis due to recurring, poor working conditions.(Denim sandblasters contract fatal silicosis in illegal workshops)Silicosis is seen in horses associated with inhalation of dust from certain cristobalite-containing soils in California.Social Realist artist Counihan depicted men who worked in industrial mines in Australia in the 40s dying of Silicosis in his series the miners (1947 linocuts).Desert lung diseaseA non-occupational form of silicosis has been described that is caused by long-term exposure to sand dust in desert areas, with cases reported from the Sahara, Libyan desert and the Negev.() The disease is caused by deposition of this dust in the lung.() Desert lung disease may be related to Al Eskan disease, a lung disorder thought to be caused by exposure to sand dust containing organic antigens, which was first diagnosed after the 1990 Gulf war.() The relative importance of the silica particles themselves and the microorganisms that they carry in these health effects remains unclear.()Society and culture Longest wordPneumonoultramicroscopicsilicovolcanoconiosis is, according to the English Dictionary, a factitious word alleged to mean a lung disease caused by the inhalation of very fine silica dust, causing inflammation in the lungs. A condition meeting the words definition is normally called silicosis. It occurs chiefly as an instance of a very long word.(Oxford English Dictionary online, Oxford University Press, quote listed in Second Edition 1989 definition. Draft revision Sept. 2006 definition reads a word invented (prob. by Everett M. Smith (born 1894), president of the National Puzzlers League in 1935) in imitation of polysyllabic medical terms, alleged to mean a lung disease caused by the inhalation of very fine sand and ash dust but occurring only as an instance of a very long word. Retrieved on 2007-10-08.) The 45-letter  word was coined to serve as the longest English word and is the longest word ever to appear in an language dictionary. It is listed in the current edition of several dictionaries.(Pneumonoultramicroscopicsilicovolcanoconiosis:  Definitions from dictionary.com. Dictionary.com. Retrieved on 2007-10-09.)See also* Pneumoconiosis* Asbestosis* obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD)* DArcy Hart* Nest Incident* Scott Haldane* The Citadel* pneumonia External links * Imaging Findings in Silicosis by Daniel Powers, MD www.breader.com* Spray-on liquid glass is about to revolutionize almost everything www.physorg.com* Is ecotech the new asbestos? www.lowtechmagazine.com* Risk estimates for silicosis: comparison of animal and human studies by CL Tran, BG Miller and CA Soutar.  of Occupational Medicine Research Report TM/05/02Referencesbg:ca:Silicosics:Silikzade:Silikosees:Silicosiseu:Silikosifr:Silicoseko:hr:Silikozait:Silicosikk:hu:Szilikzisnl:Silicoseja:pcd:Silicosept:Silicosero:Silicozru:simple:Silicosissl:Silikozatr:Silikozisuk:
634827
Flat_Holm
 additional info  Flat Holm island websiteFlat Holm () is a limestone island lying in the Channel approximately  from Point in the of Glamorgan, but in the City and County of Cardiff.  It includes the most southerly point of Wales.The island has a long history of occupation, dating at least from Anglo-Saxon and Viking periods. Religious uses include visits by  disciples of Cadoc in the 6th century, and in 1835 it was the site of the foundation of the Bristol Channel Mission, which later became the to Seafarers. A sanatorium for cholera patients was built in 1896 as the isolation hospital for the port of Cardiff. Marconi transmitted the first wireless signals over open sea from Flat Holm to Lavernock. Because of frequent shipwrecks a lighthouse was built on the island, which was replaced by a House lighthouse in 1737. Because of its strategic position on the approaches to Bristol and Cardiff a series of gun emplacements, known as Flat Holm Battery, were built in the 1860s as part of a line of defences, known as Forts. On the outbreak of War II, the island was rearmed. It is now managed by Cardiff Councils Flat Holm Project Team and designated as a Nature Reserve, of Special Scientific Interest and a Protection Area, because of the maritime grassland and rare plants such as Rock Sea-Lavender (Limonium binervosum) and Leek (Allium ampeloprasum). The island also has significant breeding colonies of Black-backed Gull (Larus fuscus),  Herring Gull (Larus argentatus) and Black-backed Gull (Larus marinus). It is also home to worms (Anguis fragilis) with larger than usual blue markings. History  Bronze Age and Early Christian The first traces of human habitation of the island are from the late Age, 900 to 700 BC, known as the Park Phase. A bronze axe head was discovered on the island in 1988, between the islands modern lone farmhouse and West Beach, at .() In the sub-Roman period of the 6th century AD, it became a retreat for Saint Cadoc, who lived on the island as a hermit for seven years.()  His friend, Saint Gildas lived at the same time on nearby Holm, and the two sometimes met up for prayers.  Gildas left the island to become of Glastonbury.()Image:Flat Holm Cross.jpg|thumb|upright|left|Part of a medieval grave slab  by  and  thick, now in the Museum of Wales()In June 1815, a Dr Thomas Turner visited Flat Holm in a small boat and was stranded for a week due to high winds. He discovered two Christian graves located close together in a field  northeast of the islands present farmhouse; one grave had been opened and contained a male skeleton.() The open graves headstone was made of purbeck marble and engraved with a cross, but had since broken in two.() A second disturbed grave, also marked with a headstone, was found to the southeast and contained a coffin constructed with iron bolts. Inside the coffin were two skeletons which had been doused in lime, indicating that the occupants had probably died from a disease.() Anglo-Saxon and medieval Anglo-Saxons called the island Bradanreolice. Reolice derives from an Irish word meaning churchyard or graveyard, alluding to the belief that the island had religious significance as a place of burial to people at the time.( However, the islands current name of Holm comes from the Norse meaning island in an estuary.() Records indicate that a Viking fleet from the south of Brittany led by two earls, Other and Hroald, took refuge on the island following their defeat by the Saxons at Watchet.(() The Chronicle records that in 1067, Thorkelsdttir, mother of Harold II, the last Anglo-Saxon king of England, stayed on the island before travelling to St Omer in France after the Norman invasion of Britain.() After the invasion, Lord Fitzhamon, a cousin of the Conqueror, formed the Shire of Glamorgan in Wales proper, with Castle at the centre of his new domain. Flat Holm came within the parish boundary of St Marys, one of Cardiffs two parish churches, and was kept as a hereditary property of the Norman Lords of Glamorgan.()A survey by archaeologist Howard Thomas in 1979 unearthed a number of medieval potsherds in the vicinity of the farmhouse and found evidence of continuous occupation of the island including middens containing numerous animal bones along with oyster and cockle shells.() Fragments of green glazed jugs and flagons from the late 12th to 13th century and shards of pottery from the 14th century were also found on the island. The presence of Pennant sandstone roofing tiles and a fragment of a 14th-century glazed ridge tile indicate the existence of a substantial medieval building, possibly a chapel, demolished when the present farmhouse was constructed. Property records from 1542 show that King VIII granted a lease to farm the island to a gentleman by the name of Edmund Tournor. His family remained on Flat Holm until the end of the 17th century when the lease passed to Joseph Robins.( 18th Century - smuggling thumb|right|Cave and mineshaft in the east cliffs of Flat HolmDuring the 18th century, the islands location made it an ideal base for smuggling. It has been alleged that an old mine shaft on the north side of the island connects with a series of natural tunnels, and a concealed exit to the sea.() Although Flat Holm was in full view of both the Welsh and English coasts, customs authorities were powerless to act as they had no boat to take them to the island. According to tradition, a small cave in the east cliff at Flat Holm was used for the storage of contraband, mainly tea and brandy.( 19th Century - Seafarers Mission and Marconi Image:Post Office Engineers.jpg|thumb|left|Office Engineers inspect Marconis equipment on Flat Holm, May 1897In 1835, clergyman John Ashley from Clevedon, England voluntarily ministered to the population of the island. Ashley created the Bristol Channel Mission in order to serve seafarers on the 400 sailing vessels which used the Channel. The mission would later become the to Seafarers, which still provides ministerial services to sailors in over 300 ports.() A service is held annually to bless the island.On 13 May 1897, a 22-year-old Italian inventor named Marconi, assisted by a Cardiff Post Office engineer named George Kemp, transmitted the first wireless signals over open sea from Flat Holm to Lavernock Point near Penarth, Wales.() Having failed to interest the Italian government in his project, Marconi brought his telegraphy system to Britain. Here he met Welshman Preece who was at that time Chief Engineer of the Post Office and a major figure in the field. Marconi and Preece erected a  high transmitting mast on Flat Holm as well as a  receiving mast at Lavernock Point. The first trials on 11 May and 12 failed. On 13 May, the mast at Lavernock was raised to  and the signals were received clearly. The message sent by Code was Are you ready; the original paper Morse slip, signed by both Marconi and Kemp, is now in the Museum of Wales.(The island made communication history again on 8 October 2002, by becoming one of the first areas of South Wales to link to the Internet through a wireless connection deployed by Cardiff Council as part of the Flat Holm Project. The connection is used for Internet, access to Cardiff Councils data network and VOIP telephony. There are two handsets in the main farmhouse that are part of the councils own PBX thus having Cardiff dialling codes. 105 years after Marconi, Spencer Pearson an IT Consultant with Cardiff Council made the first telephone call from the island to his office at County Hall, Atlantic Wharf, Cardiff.() Shipwrecks The treacherous conditions for ships around the island led to several shipwrecks. The British passenger vessel Tapley lost seven passengers when it became stranded on Flat Holm in January 1773 on its passage from Cork, Ireland to Bristol.()On 23 October 1817, a British sloop, William and Mary, foundered after hitting the rock islands near Flat Holm known as Wolves. The ship was en route from Bristol to Waterford and sank within fifteen minutes. The Mate, John Outridge, and two sailors made off in the only lifeboat. Fifteen survivors were later rescued, having clung to the ships rigging,() but fifty-four other passengers were lost.()() Fifty of the bodies were recovered from the ship and were buried on Flat Holm.()In 1938, the steamship Norman Queen ran ashore on Flat Holm but was refloated,( and in 1941 the steamship Middlesex was lost.() Geography Flat Holm is located in the Channel. It is a small, almost circular, limestone island, approximately  in diameter, covering . It rises in a gentle slope from the exposed western rocky shore to more sheltered easterly cliffs, at the top of which stands the prominent lighthouse. At its highest point it is  above sea level. Flat Holm is considered to be part of Wales, whereas the nearby island of Holm is considered part of England. About  northwest of Flat Holm are two very small islands collectively known as Wolves, measuring approximately  by .The range in the Bristol Channel is ;() second only to of Fundy in Canada.()() Geology thumb|upright|right|Flat Holm geologyDuring much of the most recent ice ages, from 1.8 million years ago, the sea level in the Estuary was some  below the current level and Flat Holm was joined to the Somerset coast as an extremity of the Hills.() Sometime since the start of the Mesolithic period, 15,000 years ago, the ice sheets retreated, and the flat plains surrounding the river estuary flooded; the hilltops of Mendip Hills became the islands of Flat Holm and Holm.( Severn Estuary Partnership - landscape and geology)() Flat Holm and Steep Holm form a link with the carboniferous limestones of the west of England, Island and Barry, Wales. Part of the island is designated a Conservation Review (GCR) Site and is a recognised of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI).() The GCR and SSSI interest lies along the south-western shoreline from the north west point to Lighthouse Point where a wave cut portion of the limestone displays large fossil ripple marks.() There are argentiferous (i.e. silver-bearing) galena deposits on Flat Holm; the pits and mounds visible on the surface of the island are a result of trial borings. A dispute over lead mining rights in the 1780s ended with Stuart, Lord Mount Stuart making an official complaint that the lighthouse keeper was using the coals intended for the lighthouse for processing lead.() Mining for lead was not profitable, however, and the works were abandoned.( Red marl from the Triassic period fills joints in the carboniferous limestone showing evidence of karstic (cave forming) processes during this period. Caves on the western and north-eastern sides of the island were used during the years of smuggling.( Buildings  Lighthouse and foghorn station thumb|upright|right|Flat Holm LighthouseFlat Holm Lighthouse is  high and  above mean high water. It has a 100 watt lamp that flashes white and red every ten seconds, with a range of up to .() The first light on the island was a simple brazier mounted on a wooden frame, which stood on the high eastern part of the island.( In 1733 the of Merchant Venturers of Bristol found the brazier to be unreliable and petitioned the Lighthouse Authority, House, for an actual lighthouse, but the petition failed.(  In 1735 Mr. William Crispe of Bristol submitted a proposal to build a lighthouse at his own expense. This initial proposal also failed but negotiations resumed in 1736 when 60 soldiers drowned after their vessel crashed on the Wolves rocks near Flat Holm. Following this disaster, the of Merchant Venturers finally supported William Crispes proposal.() Crispe agreed to pay 800 (110,552, $220,241 in 2008) for the construction of the tower as well as the fees permits.( The construction of the tower finished in 1737 and it began operating on 25 March 1738.()thumb|upright|left|Foghorn buildingThe lighthouse was struck by lightning in a severe storm on 22 December 1790. The keeper narrowly escaped but the top of the tower was severely damaged. A  tall crack on the side had to be repaired as did the oak beams supporting the top platform.( In 1819, the circular stone tower was updated to house a more powerful lantern; the tower was raised from  to . A clockwork mechanism to rotate the light was installed in 1881.( Flat Holm Lighthouse was the last signal station in the country in private ownership. In July 1822, Trinity House finally bought the lease for 15,838.10 (1.2 million, $2.4 million in 2008).( Two years later a fountain oil lamp was installed and the lantern was raised by another . In 1867 a lantern  in diameter was installed.( The lighthouse was renovated in 1929 to include accommodations for up to four keepers. This lasted until 1988, when the lighthouse became fully automated and the keepers were withdrawn. In 1997, the light was modernised and converted to solar power. It is now monitored and controlled by the Trinity House Operations Control Centre at Harwich, in Essex.()Built by House in 1906, the Foghorn building is a II listed building.( The siren was originally powered by a  engine, which gave two blasts in quick succession at two-minute intervals that could be clearly heard by people living on both coasts.() Volunteers from the Flat Holm Society, with help from the Trust, restored the horn and engines in the 1960s. The Foghorn Station was officially reopened by the Welsh Secretary and the Welsh Assembly First Secretary in May 2000 when the foghorn was sounded for the first time since 1988.() Farm House thumb|right|Flat Holm Farm HouseRecords show that monks from Augustines Abbey in Bristol established a dairy farm and grange on the island after Flat Holm was granted to them by Robert, Earl of Gloucester in 1150.() Dr Thomas Turner, who was stranded on Flat Holm during a visit in 1815, passed the time by exploring the island. He noted that the tax-exempt abbey farm was prospering and counted seven cows, two bulls, five sheep, one horse, two pigs and two dogs.( The 1881 census record for Flat Holm shows that the farmhouse was later occupied by Henry and Emily Morgan, their four sons and four daughters, a governess (Henrys niece) and Emma Craddock, a 14-year-old servant.( ) In 1897 the farmhouse was converted into The Flat Holm Hotel, and a bar and skittle alley were added, but the hotel closed after a few years.( The farmhouse has been renovated by the Flat Holm Project and is now used as accommodation for visitors staying on the island. Batteries and barracks thumb|right|Moncrieff disappearing gunFlat Holm was fortified in the 1860s following a visit by Victoria and Albert to France, where they had been concerned by the strength of the French Navy. The Commission on the Defence of the United Kingdom, under direction of Palmerston, recommended fortification of the coast in 1865. The defences on the island, which became part of a line of defences known as the Palmerston Forts, were completed in 1869.(Flat Holm Battery is a series of gun emplacements on Flat Holm built to protect Bristol and Cardiff across the channel. There are remains of four battery sites on the island:()thumb|left|Flat Holm Battery sites* Castle Rock Battery: three guns in two Moncrieff pits and one open-backed pit ()* Farm House Battery: two guns in one full Moncrieff pit and one open-backed pit (* Well Battery: one gun in an open-backed Moncrieff pit.  The gun was removed by Army Apprentices in 1964.(* Lighthouse Battery: three guns in two full Moncrieff pits and one open-backed pit (These four emplacements run from the northern to the southern point of the island, along the western coast. Nine Rifled muzzle loaders (RMLs) on disappearing Moncrieff carriages were built at the Royal Gun Foundry, Woolwich. They were mounted in four separate batteries, all in Moncrieff pits,  in diameter and  deep, constructed of limestone blocks and bricks. These pits had the advantage of being almost invisible to shipping and also offered protection to the gun crews. The 7 inch 7 ton guns were too heavy for mobile land service. They consisted of a steel rifle tube surrounded by wrought iron coils, and cascabel, with an overall length of each gun is . They used a  Palliser shell and were mounted on the Moncrieff disappearing carriage.(  The guns were never needed and were fired only for test purposes.( thumb|right|Canon and Moncrieff Pit near the lighthouseIn 1869, stone barracks were built to sleep up to 50 men.() However, the 1881 Census for Flat Holm shows that the barracks were occupied only by the Master Gunner, Thomas Barrett, his family, and five soldiers.( Barretts son, Albert, was born on the island on 31 December 1881.() The men were stationed on the island to keep the guns in good working order but the garrison would have been reinforced by regular artillery and volunteer troops if ever an invasion had been imminent.() The barracks for the battery were located near the southernmost battery emplacement. Other fortifications included a large drainage basin, underground storage tank, an administrative building and a secure store. A ditch-and-bank system served to protect the Lighthouse Battery from cross-island attack. The barracks were vacated in 1901 and the buildings have now been restored by the Flat Holm Project for educational use.( Radar station At the outbreak of War II over 350 soldiers of the Artillery were stationed on the island.( Flat Holm was re-armed with four 4.5-inch guns and associated searchlights for anti-aircraft and close defence, together with two 40mm Bofors guns.( A GL (Gun Laying) Mk II radar station was also placed in the centre of the island.(() The structures formed part of the Fixed Defences, and protected the Atlantic shipping convoys between Cardiff, Barry, and Flat Holm.() These works were abandoned after the war and the island has had no military use since. Flat Holms helipad still remains, however, at the centre of the island. Isolation hospital thumb|right|Flat Holm Cholera Hospital ruinsIn July 1883, the steamship Rishanglys left three seamen on the island who were believed to be suffering from cholera, one of whom subsequently died.() The only accommodation was a canvas tent, and the regular inhabitants of the island petitioned Cardiff council for compensation, complaining of loss of income from visitors and difficulty in selling vegetables grown on their farm at the market in Cardiff.() In 1896, the of Bute, then-owner of Flat Holm, agreed to lease all the land that was not already in use by the military or the lighthouse to the Cardiff Corporation for 50 per year. The corporation then built a permanent sanatorium on the land for use by cholera patients.( The building was described in Lancet as a pavilion comprising two six-bed wards and a nurses room.( In 1893, three more sailors arrived in Cardiff from Marseilles on the SS Blue Jacket and were suspected of having cholera. The first engineer, Thomas Smith, and able seaman Robert Doran, were deported to the isolation hospital on Flat Holm to prevent spread of the disease. The second mate, P. J. Morris, was also sent to the island as a precautionary measure, but quickly recovered.() The Flat Holm sanatorium is unique in being the only Victorian isolation hospital sited on a British offshore island.() The last patient to die in the hospital, a victim of plague, was cremated on the island at the end of the 19th century. The hospital finally closed in 1935 and has remained derelict since.(() Both the hospital main block and laundry block are Grade II buildings and are on the at Risk Register.() Flat Holm Project thumb|right|Flat Holm Project LogoIn 1975, the Glamorgan County Council leased the island for the next 99 years.( In March 1995, the county council agreed to obtain Flat Holm through a 50-year lease from the Estate starting on 12 December  1995.() Flat Holm is now designated as a Nature Reserve, as stipulated in that lease. It is managed by the Cardiff Council as The Flat Holm Project.() The project team operates the Lewis Alexander, a boat which was purpose-built for the crossing to Flat Holm and which is able to carry up to 45 passengers and essential supplies to the island. The work of the Flat Holm Project is supported by the charity the Flat Holm Society.() Flora and fauna Flat Holm was designated a of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI) in 1972.  The designation covers the maritime grassland which is mainly concentrated around the edges of the island.()thumb|right|Rock Sea LavenderThere are no endemic plant species but the relative isolation of the island has allowed a number of hardy species such as Birds-foot Trefoil (Lotus corniculatus) and Biting Stonecrop (Sedum acre) to thrive. There are also a number of relatively rare plants, such as Rock Sea-Lavender (Limonium binervosum), and Leek (Allium ampeloprasum). The leek grows to  and Flat Holm is one of only five places in the UK where it is found.( Related to the onion, the leek has a bulb that grows for several years producing only leaves, then blooms with large purple flowers that smell of garlic. After flowering the bulb dies and produces up to 150 bulblets.Others plants may have been introduced by the Augustinian Community for their medicinal uses.() These include Doves-foot Cranes-bill Geranium molle, an anodyne plant claimed by Culpeper to have a wide range of medicinal uses and an excellent good cure for those that have inward wounds, hurts, or bruises, both to stay the bleeding, to dissolve and expel the congealed blood, and to heal the parts, as also to cleanse and heal outward sores, ulcers and fistulas.(Culpeper, Nicholas, The English physician: or an astrologo-physical discourse of the vulgar herbs of this nation. London: Peter Cole, 1652) The Wild Peony (Paeonia mascula) was introduced to the island (and nearby Steep Holm), possibly by monks,() and has naturalised. Thirty-seven plants were taken to the island from Steep Holm by Frank Harris, the farmer at the time, in the 1930s, many of which died during the War II occupation and fortification of the island. One remaining plant was reintroduced by David Worall, the Flat Holm Warden, in 1982 and is protected by fencing near the path to the lighthouse. A few plants grown from seed also survive in the islands farmhouse garden.(Cardiff Council Flat Holm Project Records, accessed 2008-05-08)thumb|upright|left|Slow WormThe island has a significant breeding colony of over 4,000 pairs of Black-backed Gulls (Larus fuscus), 400 pairs of Herring Gulls (Larus argentatus), 2 pairs of Black-backed Gulls (Larus marinus) and varying numbers of Shelduck (Tadorna tadorna) and Oystercatchers (Haematopodidae). The feeding habits of Lesser Black-backed Gulls were studied in 1989, and it was shown that smaller clutches were laid than in previous years and that supplementary feeding did not increase egg or clutch size.()()The island is also home to worms (Anguis fragilis). Flat Holms slow-worm population has unusually large blue markings.The islands rabbit population, introduced for farming in the 12th century,( suffers from myxomatosis, which effectively contains the numbers. The island has been grazed since 1989, initially by goats, but also by sheep since 1992. In 1997 sheep were introduced and as of 2008 there are 28 sheep grazing wild on the island.() Sustainability thumb|upright|right|PV array at Flat HolmThe Flat Holm project aims to develop the island as a showcase of sustainable technologies.  The original power supply consisted of several diesel generators at different properties and unconnected to each other. In 2006, underground cables were installed to form a mini-grid between the farmhouse, workshops and the fog horn keepers cottage. This was powered with a (13.5 kW) inverter/charger system located at the farmhouse with the farmhouse diesel generator as back-up. In 2007 the system was extended to include a battery bank charged by two photovoltaic solar arrays, and by a 6 kW turbine sited at a redundant telecommunications tower on the high point of the island.() Severn Barrage study If a Barrage were ever to be constructed it could have consequences for Flat Holm, depending on the design and the route. A number of studies have been proposed, the latest being when John Hutton, of State for Business, Enterprise and Regulatory Reform, announced a further feasibility study on 25 September 2007 to follow on the report by the Sustainable Development Commission.The proposal for a hydro-electric barrier to generate 8.6 GW and meet five percent of Britains power needs, is being opposed by some environmental groups.()() This proposed barrage would pass two miles (3 km) west of Flat Holm.(Tidal Power in the Severn? (accessed 2008-05-12)) The study is expected to last at least two years and will be split into two stages with a decision point at the end of each. The first, which is likely to run until late 2008, will focus on high-level issues and reach an initial view on whether there are any fundamental issues that would preclude a tidal scheme in the Severn Estuary. Subject to the decision at the end of the first phase, the second phase will look at the issues in more detail and culminate in a full public consultation in early 2010.(Severn Tidal Power Q&A (accessed 2008-05-12)) In popular culture * In 1979 the BBCs Lets Look at Wales presented by Parry-Jones featured The Bristol Channel and included the island.()* The BBCs Countryfile programme broadcast on 17 February 2008 featured Flat Holm and the possibility of a Barrage.()* In the TV series Torchwood, the March 2008 episode Adrift featured the island as home to a secret medical facility.()* The BBCs One Show broadcast on 15 May 2008 featured Krestovnikoff travelling to the island to see its slow worms, described as Britains most elusive reptile.( )* In BBCs Not In My Nature broadcast by BBC One Wales on 23 June 2008, presenter Williams visited Flat Holm.() References  External links * Cardiff Council Flat Holm site* 1881 Flat Holm Census*  Flat Holm Island Teachers Pack* The Flat Holm Society* BBC Flatholm Site* The Palmerston Forts SocietyEchniEchniHolmHolmHolmHolmHolm
636219
Pressure_vessel
A pressure vessel is a closed container designed to hold gases or liquids at a pressure substantially different from the ambient pressure.The pressure differential is dangerous and many fatal accidents have occurred in the history of their development and operation. Consequently, their design, manufacture, and operation are regulated by engineering authorities backed by legislation. For these reasons, the definition of a pressure vessel varies from country to country, but involves parameters such as  maximum safe operating pressure and temperature.UsesFile:Propane tanks large.jpg|thumb|right|150px|A few pressure tanks, here used to hold propanePressure vessels are used in a variety of applications in both industry and the private sector. They appear in these sectors as industrial air receivers and hot water storage tanks. Other examples of pressure vessels are cylinder, chamber, distillation towers, autoclaves, and many other vessels in mining or oil refineries and petrochemical plants, reactor vessel, habitat of a ship, habitat of a submarine, pneumatic reservoir, hydraulic reservoir under pressure, rail vehicle airbrake reservoir, road vehicle airbrake reservoir and storage vessels for liquified gases such as ammonia, chlorine, propane, butane, and LPG.Pressure vessel featuresShape of a pressure vesselPressure vessels may theoretically be almost any shape, but shapes made of sections of spheres, cylinders, and cones are usually employed. A common design is a cylinder with end caps called heads. Head shapes are frequently either hemispherical or dished (torispherical). More complicated shapes have historically been much harder to analyze for safe operation and are usually far more difficult  to construct.Theoretically, a sphere would be the best shape of a pressure vessel. Unhappily, a spherical shape is tough to manufacture, therefore more expensive, so most pressure vessels are cylindrical with 2:1 semi-elliptical heads or end caps on each end. Smaller pressure vessels are assembled from a pipe and two covers. A disadvantage of these vessels is that greater breadths are more expensive, so that for example the most economic shape of a ,  pressure vessel might be a breadth of  and a width of  including the 2:1 semi-elliptical domed end caps.Construction materialsTheoretically almost any material with good tensile properties that is chemically stable in the chosen application could be employed. However, pressure vessel design codes and application standards (ASME BPVC Section II, EN 13445-2 etc.) contain long lists of approved materials with associated limitations in temperature range.Many pressure vessels are made of steel. To manufacture a cylindrical or spherical pressure vessel, rolled and possibly forged parts would have to be welded together. Some mechanical properties of steel, achieved by rolling or forging, could be adversely affected by welding, unless special precautions are taken. In addition to adequate mechanical strength, current standards dictate the use of steel with a high impact resistance, especially for vessels used in low temperatures. In applications where carbon steel would suffer corrosion, special corrosion resistant material should also be used.Some pressure vessels are made of materials, such as filament wound composite using carbon fibre held in place with a polymer. Due to the very high tensile strength of carbon fibre these vessels can be very light, but are much more difficult to manufacture.  The composite material may be wound around a metal liner, forming a overwrapped pressure vessel.Other very common materials include polymers such as PET in carbonated beverage containers and copper in plumbing.Pressure vessels may be lined with various metals, ceramics, or polymers to prevent leaking and protect the structure of the vessel from the contained medium.  This liner may also carry a significant portion of the pressure load.(NASA Tech Briefs, Making a Metal-Lined Composite Overwrapped Pressure Vessel, 1 Mar 2005.)(Frietas, O., Maintenance and Repair of Glass-Lined Equipment, Chemical Engineering, 1 Jul 2007.)ScalingNo matter what shape it takes, the minimum mass of a pressure vessel scales with the pressure and volume it contains and is inversely proportional to the to weight ratio of the construction material (minimum mass decreases as strength increases()).Scaling of stress in walls of vesselPressure vessels  are held together against the gas pressure due to tensile forces within the walls of the container. The normal (tensile) stress in the walls of the container is proportional to the pressure and radius of the vessel and inversely proportional to the thickness of the walls.() Therefore pressure vessels are designed to have a thickness proportional to the radius of tank and the pressure of the tank and inversely proportional to the maximum allowed normal stress of the particular material used in the walls of the container.Because (for a given pressure) the thickness of the walls scales with the radius of the tank, the mass of a tank (which scales as the length times radius times thickness of the wall for a cylindrical tank) scales with the volume of the gas held (which scales as length times radius squared). The exact formula varies with the tank shape but depends on the density, , and maximum allowable stress  of the material in addition to the pressure P and volume V of the vessel. (See below for the exact equations for the stress in the walls.)Spherical vesselFor a sphere, the mass of a pressure vessel is:M  {3 \over 2} P V {\rho \over \sigma},where:M is mass,:P is the pressure difference from ambient (the pressure),:V is volume,:\rho is the density of the pressure vessel material,:\sigma is the maximum working stress that material can tolerate.(For a sphere the thickness d  rP/2, where r is the radius of the tank. The volume of the spherical surface then is 4r2d  4r3P/2. The mass is determined by multiplying by the density of the material that makes up the walls of the spherical vessel. Further the volume of the gas is 4/3r3. Combining these equations give the above results. The equations for the other geometries are derived in a similar manner)Other shapes besides a sphere have constants larger than 3/2 (infinite cylinders take 2), although some tanks, such as non-spherical wound composite tanks can approach this.Cylindrical vessel with hemispherical endsThis is sometimes called a bullet for its shape.For a cylinder with hemispherical ends,:M  2 \pi R^2 (R + W) P {\rho \over \sigma},where*R is the radius*W is the middle cylinder width only, and the overall width is W + 2R2:1 Cylindrical vessel with semi-elliptical endsIn a vessel with an ratio of middle cylinder width to radius of 2:1,:M  6 \pi R^3 P {\rho \over \sigma}.Gas storageIn looking at the first equation, the factor PV, in SI units, is in units of (pressurization) energy.  For a stored gas, PV is proportional to the mass of gas at a given temperature, thus:M  {3 \over 2} nRT {\rho \over \sigma}. (see law)The other factors are constant for a given vessel shape and material.  So we can see that there is no theoretical efficiency of scale, in terms of the ratio of pressure vessel mass to pressurization energy, or of pressure vessel mass to stored gas mass.  For storing gases, tankage efficiency is independent of pressure, at least for the same temperature.So, for example, a typical design for a minimum mass tank to hold helium (as a pressurant gas) on a rocket would use a spherical chamber for a minimum shape constant, carbon fiber for best possible \rho / \sigma, and very cold helium for best possible M / {pV}.Stress in thin-walled pressure vesselsStress in a shallow-walled pressure vessel in the shape of a sphere is:\sigma_\theta  \frac{pr}{2t},where \sigma_\theta is hoop stress, or stress in the circumferential direction, p is internal gauge pressure, r is the inner radius of the sphere, and t is thickness of the cylinder wall.  A vessel can be considered shallow-walled if the diameter is at least 10 times (sometimes cited as 20 times) greater than the wall depth.(Richard Budynas, J. Nisbett, Shigleys Mechanical Engineering Design, 8th ed., New York:McGraw-Hill, ISBN 978-0-07-312193-2, pg 108)Stress in a shallow-walled pressure vessel in the shape of a cylinder is:\sigma_\theta  \frac{pr}{t},:\sigma_{\rm long}  \frac{pr}{2t},where \sigma_\theta is stress, or stress in the circumferential direction, \sigma_{long} is stress in the longitudinal direction, p is internal gauge pressure, r is the inner radius of the cylinder, and t is thickness of the cylinder wall.Almost all pressure vessel design standards contain variations of these two formulas with additional empirical terms to account for wall thickness, quality control of welds and in-service corrosion allowances.Winding angle of carbon fibre vesselsWound infinite cylindrical shapes optimally take a winding angle of 54.7 degrees, as this gives the necessary twice the strength in the circumferential direction to the longitudinal.(MIT pressure vessel lecture) Design and operation standards Pressure vessels are designed to operate safely at a specific pressure and temperature, technically referred to as the Design Pressure and Design Temperature. A vessel that is inadequately designed to handle a high pressure constitutes a very significant safety hazard. Because of that, the design and certification of pressure vessels is governed by design codes such as the ASME Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code in North America, the Equipment Directive of the EU (PED), Industrial Standard (JIS), CSA B51 in Canada, AS1210 in Australia and other standards like Lloyds, Lloyd, Norske Veritas, Gnrale de Surveillance (SGS S.A.), Stoomwezen etc.Note that where the pressure-volume product is part of a safety standard, any incompressible liquid in the vessel can be excluded as it does not contribute to the potential energy stored in the vessel, so only the volume of the compressible part such as gas is used.List of standards* 13445: The current European Standard, harmonized with the Equipment Directive (97/23/EC). Extensively used in Europe.* ASME Code Section VIII, in addition supported by Sections II (materials), V (NDT/NDE) and IX (welding). Published by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers.** Code Section VIII Division 1: US standard, design by formula. Almost exclusively used in North America, widely used worldwide.** Code Section VIII Division 2: Alternative Rules, design by analysis.** Code Section VIII Division 3: Alternative Rules for Construction of High Pressure Vessel* 5500: Former British Standard, replaced in the UK by BS EN 13445 but retained under the name 5500 for the design and construction of export equipment.* Merkbltter: German standard, harmonized with the Equipment Directive.* EN 286 (Parts 1 to 4): European standard for simple pressure vessels (air tanks), harmonized with Council Directive 87/404/EEC.* 4994: Specification for design and construction of vessels and tanks in reinforced plastics.* PVHO: US standard for Pressure Vessels for Human Occupancy* CODAP* 1210* 510()* 11439()* IS 2825-1969 (RE1977)_code_unfired_Pressure_vessels* tanks and vessels* AIAA S-080-1998: AIAA Standard for Space Systems - Metallic Pressure Vessels, Pressurized Structures, and Pressure Components* AIAA S-081A-2006: AIAA Standard for Space Systems - Composite Overwrapped Pressure Vessels (COPVs)* B51-09 Canadian Boiler, pressure vessel, and pressure piping code* Stoomwezen: Former pressure vessels code in the Netherlands, also known as RToD: Regels voor Toestellen onder Druk (Dutch Rules for Pressure Vessels)Leak Before BurstLeak before burst describes a pressure vessel designed such that a crack in the vessel will grow through the wall, allowing the contained fluid to escape and reducing the pressure, prior to growing so large as to cause fracture at the operating pressure.Many pressure vessel standards, including the ASME Boiler and Pressure Vessel Code and the AIAA metallic pressure vessel standard, either require pressure vessel designs to be leak before burst, or require pressure vessels to meet more stringent requirements for fatigue and fracture if they are not shown to be leak before burst.(ANSI/AIAA S-080-1998, Space Systems - Metallic Pressure Vessels, Pressurized Structures, and Pressure Components, 5.1) Alternatives to pressure vessels Depending on the application and local circumstances, alternatives to pressure vessels exist. Examples can be seen in domestic water collection systems, where the following may be used:* Gravity controlled systems() which typically consist of an unpressurized tank at an elevation higher than the point of use. Pressure at the point of use is the result of the hydrostatic pressure caused by the elevation difference. Gravity systems produce  per foot of water head (elevation difference).  A municipal water supply or pumped water is typically around .* pump controllers or pressure-sensitive pumps.() History of pressure vessels Large pressure vessels were invented during the revolution, particularly in Britain, to be used as boilers for making steam to drive engines.Design and testing standards and a system of certification came about as the result of fatal boiler explosions.In an early effort to design a tank capable of withstanding pressures up to , a  diameter tank was developed in 1919 that was spirally-wound with two layers of high tensile strength steel wire to prevent sidewall rupture, and the end caps longitudinally reinforced with lengthwise high-tensile rods.(Ingenious Coal-Gas Motor Tank, Science monthly, January 1919, page 27, Scanned by Google Books: http://books.google.com/books?idHykDAAAAMBAJ&pgPA13) See also * Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME)* gas* overwrapped pressure vessel* natural gas* Demister* boiler* cylinder* Gasket* (vessel)* Design Metal Temperature (MDMT)* bomb - a device for measuring leaf potentials* harvesting* valve* valve* and tube heat exchanger* Vapor-Liquid Separator or Knock-Out Drum* breaker* well* boilerFurther reading* Megyesy, Eugene F. (2008, 14th ed.) Pressure Vessel Handbook. PV Publishing, Inc.: Oklahoma City, Oklahoma, USA. www.pressurevesselhandbook.com Design handbook for pressure vessels based on the ASME code.NotesReferences* A.C. Ugural, S.K. Fenster, Advanced Strength and Applied Elasticity, 4th ed.* E.P. Popov, Engineering Mechanics of Solids, 1st ed.* Megyesy, Eugene F.  Pressure Vessel Handbook, 14th Edition. PV Publishing, Inc. Oklahoma City, OK External links *Use of pressure vessels in oil and gas industry*Basic formulas for thin walled pressure vessels; with examples*ASME Boiler and Pressure Vessel website*Journal of Pressure Vessel Technology*EU Pressure Equipment Directive website*EU Pressure Equipment Directive 97/23/EC categorization software*EU Simple Pressure Vessel Directive*EU Classification*Vessels productionde:Druckbehlterbajo presin sous pressionin pressioneindashu:Tartlytekanannl:Drukvatja:spronego powietrzade presso nn presionfi:Paineastiazh:
637348
Afro-Latin_American
An Afro-Latin American (also Afro-Latino) is a Latin American person of at least partial Black African ancestry; the term may also refer to historical or cultural elements in America thought to emanate from this community.(The American Heritage Book of English Usage. Latino discussed. (archived from the original on 2008-07-31)) The term can refer to the mixing of African and other cultural elements found in Latin American society such as religion, music, language, the arts and class.The term Afro-Latin American, as used in this article refers specifically to black African ancestry and not to European colonial or Afro-Arab ancestry, such as white South African or Arab Moroccan ancestry.(6. Names and Labels: Social, Racial, and Ethnic Terms (archived from the original on 2008-06-25)  See also  2. African American / Afro-American (archived from the original on 2008-04-21)for discussion which describes the application of Afro to a term.) The term is not widely used in Latin America outside of academic circles. Normally Afro Latin Americans are called black (in Spanish negro or, in the Caribbean, prieto, in Portuguese negro or preto). More commonly, when referring to cultural aspects of African origin within specific countries of Latin America, terms carry an Afro- prefix followed by the relevant nationality. Notable examples include Afro-Cuban (Spanish:Afro Cubano)(AfroCuba.org) and Afro-Brazilian;(Museu AfroBrasil) however, usage varies considerably from nation to nation.The accuracy of statistics reporting on Afro-Latin Americans has been questioned, especially where they are derived from census reports in which the subjects choose their own designation, because in all countries the concept of black ancestry is viewed with differing attitudes.Approximately 5% of the Latin American population self-identify, or are classified by census takers, as being primarily of black ancestry.HistoryMany people of Black African origin arrived in the Americas with the Spanish and Portuguese in the 15th and 16th centuries. Alonso Nio, traditionally considered the first of many New World explorers of Black African descent() was a navigator in the 1492 Columbus expedition. Those who were directly from West Africa mostly arrived in Latin America as part of the slave trade, as agricultural, domestic, and menial laborers and as mineworkers. They were also employed in mapping and exploration (for example, Estevanico) and were even involved in conquest (for example, Valiente).  They were mostly brought from Africa and Africa in what are now the nations of Nigeria, Ghana, Benin, Angola, and Congo, There are six major groups: the Yoruba, Igbo, Hausa, Oromo, Ewe, Akan, and the Bantu (mostly Zulu). Most of the slaves were sent to Brazil,  and the Caribbean, but lesser numbers went to Colombia and Venezuela. Countries with significant black, mulatto, or zambo populations today include Brazil (86 million, according to how censuses are applied nationwide, considering all the brown Brazilian population as being Black, which must signifies of African descent and makes caboclo identity lacks of space on racial classifications there), Colombia (10 million), Haiti (8.7 million), Republic (up to 8.1 million), Cuba (up to 4 million),  and Rico (20%46%). Recent genetic research in UPR Mayaguez has brought to light that 26.4% of Puerto Ricans have Black African heritage on the X chromosome and 20% on the Y chromosome, thus between 20%46% of the Puerto Rican population has African heritage.(Puerto Rico  DP-1. Profile of General Demographic Characteristics: 2000) (For more on this see of Puerto Rico).Traditional terms for Afro-Latin Americans with their own developed culture include Garfuna (in Nicaragua, Honduras, Guatemala and Belize), cafuzo (in Brazil), and zambo in the Andes and America. Marabou is a term of Haitian origin denoting a Haitian of multiracial ethnicity. The term describes the offspring of a Black African/European or mulatto and an Amerindian, specifically the native Tano, born in Haiti (formerly Saint-Domingue). The heavy population of Africans on the island established by the French and Spanish diluted the generations of so-called marabous over the decades, and virtually all Haitians today of Amerindian descent are assumed to also possess Black African ancestry. Several other terms exist for the marabou racial mixture in other countries.The mix of these African cultures with the Spanish, Portuguese, French, and indigenous cultures of Latin America has produced many unique forms of language (e.g., Palenquero, Garfuna and Creole), religions (e.g., Candombl, Abaku, Santera, Lucumi and Vodou), music (e.g., kompa, salsa, Bachata, Punta, de Mayo, plena, samba, merengue, cumbia) martial arts (capoeira) and dance (rumba, merengue). Many of these cultural expressions have become pervasive in Latin America.thumb|right|Map of Latin AmericaRacial and ethnic distinctionsTerms used within Latin America which pertain to black heritage include mulato (black  white mixture), and zambo (indigenous  black mixture). Mestizo refers to an indigenous  white mixture. The term mestizaje refers to the intermixing or fusing of races, whether by mere custom or deliberate policy. In Latin America this happened extensively between all the racial groups and cultures, but usually involved European men and indigenous and Black African women. Unions of white females and non-white males were taboo.South America Argentina Traditionally it has been argued that the black population in Argentina declined since the early 19th century to insignificance. However, the pilot census conducted in two neighborhoods of Argentina in 2006 on knowledge of ancestors from Subsaharan Africa verified that 5% of the population knew of Black African ancestry, and another 20% thought that was possible but not sure. Given that European immigration accounted for more than half the growth of the Argentine population in 1960, some researchers argue that rather than decrease what they had was a process of invisibility of the population Afro Argentine and their cultural roots.Other researchers have argued that there was a deliberate policy of genocide against the Afro Argentinian, which was openly expressed by many Euro-Argentines as Domingo F. Sarmiento and was probably implemented by using repressive policies during epidemics and wars as a tool of mass destruction. The theories argue that genocide may have been used to explain the decline in the population. Experts were pursuing similar arguments, but differ on the attribution of intent that was first attributed to the ruling classes. Bolivia Black African descendants in Bolivia account for about 2% of the population. They were brought in during the Spanish colonial times and the majority live in the Yungas. There are about 500,000 persons of Black African ancestry living in Bolivia.BrazilImage:Quilombolas.jpg|200px|thumb|right|Brazilian Quilombolas during a meeting in the capital of Brazil, Braslia.Around 6.9% of Brazils 190 million people are Black, and many more Brazilians have some degree of African descent.(Populao residente, por cor ou raa, segundo a situao do domiclio e o sexo - Brasil - 2009)Brazil experienced a long internal struggle over abolition of slavery and was the last Latin American country to adopt it. In 1850 it finally banned the importation of new slaves from overseas, after two decades since the first official attempts to outlaw the human traffic (in spite of illegal parties of Black African slaves that kept arriving till 1855). In 1864 Brazil emancipated the slaves, and on September 28, 1871, the Brazilian Congress approved the Branco Law of Free Birth, which conditionally freed the children of slaves born from that day on. In 1887 army officers refused to order their troops to hunt runaway slaves, and in 1888 the Senate passed a law establishing immediate, unqualified emancipation.  This law, known as urea (Golden Law) was sanctioned by the regent Princess Imperial of Brazil, daughter of the emperor Pedro II on May 13, 1888. Chile Chile enslaved about 6000 Africans, about one-third of whomarrived before 1615; most were utilized in agriculture around Santiago. Today there are very few Afro-Chileans, at the most, fewer than 0.1% can be estimated from the 2006 population.ColombiaAvailable estimates range from 4.4 to 10.5 million Afro-Colombians.(BBC Mundo: Colombia hacia la integracin racial?) According to CIA World Factbook, the makeup of the population is: mestizo 58%, white 20%, mulatto 14%, black 4%, mixed black-Amerindian 3%, Amerindian 1%.(https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/co.html) Afro-Colombians make up approximately 21% (9,154,537) of the population, according to a projection of the National Administration Department of Statistics (DANE),(Microsoft  Encarta  2007.) most of whom are concentrated on the northwest Caribbean coast and the Pacific coast in such departments as Choc, although considerable numbers are also in Cali, Cartagena, and Barranquilla. Colombia is considered to have the third largest Black population in the western hemisphere, following Brazil and the U.S..Approximately 4.4 million Afro-Colombians actively recognize their own black ancestry as a result of inter-racial relations with white and indigenous Colombians.( They have been historically absent from high level government positions. Many of their long-established settlements around the Pacific coast have remained underdeveloped.( In Colombias ongoing internal conflict, Afro-Colombians are both victims of violence or displacement and members of armed factions, such as the FARC and the AUC. Afro-Colombians have played a role in contributing to the development of certain aspects of Colombian culture. For example, several of Colombias musical genres, such as Cumbia, have African origins or influences. Some Afro-Colombians have also been successful in sports such as Asprilla, Rincn or Isabel Urrutia.Basilio de Palenque is a village in Colombia that is noted for maintaining many African traditions. It was declared a of the Oral and Intangible Heritage of Humanity by UNESCO in 2005.() The residents of palenque still speak Palenquero, a Spanish/African creole(A Language, Not Quite Spanish, With African Echoes)EcuadorIn 2006 Ecuador had a population of 13,547,510. According to the latest data from CIA World Factbook, the makeup of the population is: mestizo (mixed Amerindian and white) 65%, Amerindian 25%, Spanish and others 7%, black 3%.(https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/ec)htmlThe Afro-Ecuadorian culture is found in the northwest coastal region of Ecuador and make up the majority (70%) in the province of Esmeraldas and the Valley in the Province. They can be also found in Quito and Guayaquil.  The best known cultural influence known outside of Ecuador is a distinctive kind of marimba music. Bao is a fusion of native rhythms and Caribbean rhythms including candombe, salsa, merengue, reggae and calypso. From the Valley there is (Ecuador) music which is very different from marimba from Esmeraldas. Paraguay Black Paraguayans are descended from West African slaves brought to Paraguay by the 16th century. They became a significant presence in the country, and made up 11% of the population in 1785.  Most Afro-Paraguayans established communities in towns such as Aregu, Emboscada, and Guarambar. Many achieved their freedom during the Spanish rule. In the capital Asuncin, there is a community of 300 Afro-Paraguayan families in the Fernando de la Mora municipality. Peru Afro-Peruvians make up about 34% of the population (close to two million).Over the course of the slave trade, approximately 95,000 slaves were brought into Peru, with the last group arriving in 1850. Today, Afro-Peruvians reside mainly on the central and south coast. Afro-Peruvians can also be found in significant numbers on the northern coast. Recently, it has been verified that the community with the greatest concentration of Afro-Peruvians is Yapatera in Morropn (Piura), made up of around 7,000 farmers who are largely descended from African slaves of malagasy (Madagascar) origin. They are referred to as malgaches or mangaches.Afro-Peruvian music was little known even in Peru until the 1950s, when it was popularized by the performer Santa Cruz.()Afro-Peruvian music was actually well known in Peru since the 1600s but oppressed by the Peruvian elite as was Andean religion and language.Afro-Peruvian culture has not only thrived but influenced all aspects of Peruvian culture without any acknowledgment from mainstream mediaor history. Miguel Sanchez, Perus 71st President was the first Afro-Andean President (19301933). Uruguay African slaves and their descendants figured prominently in the founding of Uruguay.In the late 18th century Montevideo became a major arrival port for slaves, most brought from Portuguese colonies of Africa and bound for Spanish colonies of the New World, the mines of Peru and Bolivia, and the fields of Uruguay.In the 19th century, when Uruguay joined other colonies in fighting for independence from Spain, Uruguayan national hero Artigas led an elite division of black troops against the colonists. One of his top advisors was Lenzina, known as Ansina, a freed slave who composed musical odes about his commanders exploits and is regarded by Afro-Uruguayans as an unheralded father of the nation.VenezuelaBlack Venezuelans are mostly descendants from African slaves brought to Venezuela from the 17th to the 19th century for the coffee and cocoa crops. Most of the African-Venezuelans live in the North-central Region: coastal towns in the area called Barlovento, Northern Yaracuy, Carabobo and States, and Eastern State; but there are areas in South Lake Maracaibo (Zulia State) and Northern State in the Andes, among others with several towns and villages. They have kept their traditions and culture alive especially through music.Venezuela is a very racially mixed nation. Research in 2001 on genetic diversity by the Venezuelan Institute of Scientific Research (Instituto Venezolano de Investigaciones Cientficas, IVIC) in which the population was compared to the historical patterns of the colonial castes. Adding to this new information about genetic diseases and characteristics associated with people from Sub-Saharan Africa, Europe and Native Americans reveals that approximately 5% of the population is of African descent and 29% of the Venezuelans are mulattos (mixed African and European), but no further data about the amount of zambos (mixed black and Amerindian) is provided. This information reveals that at least 34% of the Venezuelan population is, to some extent, of African descent..Afro-Venezuelans have stood out as sportsmen, many of them in the Major League Baseball and other sports (e.g. former NBA/Rockets forward Herrera), however, most of them do not describe themselves as Afro-Venezuelan, but as Latinos or Hispanics or simply Venezuelans. Afro-Venezuelans have also stood out in the arts, especially in music, for example: Snchez, DLen, Muoz, Phillips, Pedro Eustache, Frank Quintero, and many others. Miss Venezuela 1998, Indriago, Miss Venezuela Universe 2006, Via, and Miss Venezuela World 2006, Carrizo are mulatto.Venezuelan President Chvez stated in an interview while visiting the States, When we were children, we were told that we have a motherland, and that motherland was Spain. However, we have discovered later, in our lives, that as a matter of fact, we have several motherlands. And one of the greatest motherlands of all is no doubt, Africa. We love Africa. And every day we are much more aware of the roots we have in Africa...  Racism is very characteristic of imperialism. Racism is very characteristic of capitalism. Katrina isindeed, has a lot to do with racismno doubt about it. Hate against me has a lot to do with racism. Because of my big mouth, because of my curly hair. And Im so proud to have this mouth and this hair, because its African.(Democracy now)Central AmericaThe Afro-Latin Americans of Central America mostly live in or near Caribbean coast. The blacks of Belize, Guatemala, Honduras and Nicaragua, are of Garfuna, Afro-Caribbean and/or Mestizo heritage, as well as of Miskito heritage. Those of Rica and Panama are mostly of Afro-Caribbean heritage. Many Afro-Caribbean islanders arrived in Panama to help build the Canal and to Guatemala, Honduras, Nicaragua and Costa Rica to work in the banana and sugar cane plantations.BelizeNote:Common definitions of Latin America do not include BelizeBelizean culture is a mix of African, European, and Mayan  but only 30% of the population is considered to be of African descent. The main community of African descent are the Kriols and Garifuna concentrated from the District to the District and Creek District (Dangriga) on the Caribbean Sea. City, on the Caribbean coast, is the center of West African culture in Belize, with its population being of mixed Black African, Maya, and European.Costa RicaThree per cent of the population is of Black African descent (called Afro-Costa Ricans) and are English-speaking descendants of 19th century black Jamaican immigrant workers. The indigenous population numbers around 1%, 41,338 individuals. In the Province, a significant portion of the population descends from a mix of local Amerindians, Africans and Spaniards. Most Afro-Costa Ricans are found in the Province. El Salvador A total of 10,000 African slaves were brought to El Salvador. The African population completely mixed into the general  Amerindian/Mestizo population. El Salvador has no English Antillean (West Indian), Garifuna, and Miskito population, largely due to laws banning the immigration of blacks into the country in the 1930s, these laws were revoke in the 1980s.(http://www.bjmjr.net/afromestizo/el_salvador.htm)() Guatemala Only 2% of the Guatemalan population is considered black or mulatto. The main community of African heritage are the Garifuna, concentrated in Livingston and Barrios. The rest are Afro-Caribbean and mulattoes who lives in Barrios and Morales. All these places belong to Izabal department, on the Caribbean coast. Sadly, because of unemployent and lack of opportunities, many Garifuna from Guatemala had left the country and move to Belize and the United States. Also many people of African descent are located in Amatitln, San Jernimo, and Jutiapa, although most of them may not recognize it because the loss of culture in these places.Many of the slaves brought from Africa came to Guatemala to work on cotton, sugar cane, tobacco, and coffee plantations. The main reason for slavery in Guatemala was because of the large sugar cane plantations and haciendas located on Guatemalas Pacific and Caribbean coasts. The national folk instrument, the marimba, has its origins in Africa and was brought to Guatemala and the rest of Central America by African slaves during colonial times. The melodies played on it show native American, West African and European influences in both form and style.Among the notable Garifuna from Guatemala are social leaders (Mario Ellington and Dilia Palacios Cayetano), musicians (Sofa Blanco, Silvia Blanco and Jursino Cayetano), poets (Nora Murillo and Wingston Gonzlez), athletes (Teodoro Palacios Flores and Mario Blanco), soccer players (Guillermo la Pantera Enrquez Gamboa, Toms Enrquez Gamboa, German Trigueo Castro, Clemente Laln Snchez, Wilson Laln Salvatierra, Carlos Delva, Norman Delva, David Suazo, Toms Suazo, Braulio Arz, Trigueno Foster, Ramrez el Pando, Martnez, Renato Blanco and Avila), basketball players (Juan Pablo Trigueo Foster), a wrestler (El Cadete del Espacio) and a model (Deborah David).From the Afro-Caribbean community comes doctors (Henry Stokes Brown and his son, Wilfredo Stokes Baltazar; Arla Cinderella Stokes), psychologists (Elizabeth Stokes), deacons (Sydney Samuels), a poet (Alan Mills), a journalist (Glenda Stokes Weatherborn), athletes (Roy Fearon, Salomn Rowe, Octavio Guillespie and Lidia Graviola Ewing), soccer players (Ricardo Clark, Jorge Lynch, Jerry Slosher, Royston Hall, David Stokes, Tony Edwin, Oscar Sims, Willie Sims, Vicente Charles, Jos A. Charles, Martn Charles, Selvyn Pennant, Douglas Prez McNish, Mynor Prez McNish, Carlos Prez McNish, Leonardo McNish, Arturo McNish, Alfredo McNish, Julio Csar Anderson, Hermenegildo Pepp Castro, Stanley Gardiner, David Gardiner, Kenneth Brown, Mario la Gallina Becker, Thompson, Elton Brown and Jonny Brown), basketball players (Jeremas Stokes, Toms Guillespie and Peggy Lynch), and a former Miss Guatemala (Marva Weatherborn).Today, the Garifuna and Afro-Caribbean people of Guatemala are organized in a group called Organizacin Negra Guatemalteca (Onegua). According to its website, Onegua is a non-governmental organisation established in 1995 with a mandate to promote the interests and fight for the rights of Guatemalas Garifuna and Afrodescendant populations. There is also an association, called Asociacin Races Afrodescendientes Guatemaltecas. Honduras The official census of Honduras indicates that 2% of the population, or about 150,000 individuals, self-identified as black during the last official census.  This number is based on self-identification and does not use the American definition of blood quantum to identify blackness as Gates does in his estimate of the black population of Honduras:  Estimates of people of African descent in Honduras vary widely, from 100,000 to 320,000 (1.8 to 5.8 percent of the countrys 5.8 million people in 1994).()If one uses the blood quantum definition of blackness, then blacks came to Honduras early in the colonial period. One of the mercenaries who aided de Alvarado in his conquest of Honduras in 1536 was a black slave working as a mercenary to earn his freedom. Alvarado sent his own slaves from Guatemala to work the placer gold deposits in western Honduras as early as 1534. The earliest black slaves consigned to Honduras were part of a license granted to the Bishop Cristobal de Pedraza in 1547 to bring 300 slaves into Honduras. Certainly a large part of the modern Honduran population today identified as mestizo has at least some black ancestry, but they do not self-identify as black.The self-identifying black population in Honduras is mostly of Indian (Antillean origin), descendants of indentured laborers brought from Jamaica, Haiti, and other Caribbean Islands. The Garifuna (or Black Caribs), a people of mixed Amerindian and Black African ancestry, were expelled from the island of Saint Vincent after an uprising against the English and in 1797 and were exiled to Roatan. From there they made their way along the Caribbean coast of Belize, mainland Honduras and Nicaragua. Large Garifuna settlements in Honduras today include Trujillo, La Ceiba, and Triunfo de la Cruz. Even though they only came to Honduras in 1797, the Garifuna are one of the seven officially recognized indigenous groups in Honduras.Slaves on the north coast mixed with the Miskito Indians, forming a group referred to as the Zambo Miskito. Today the Miskito consider themselves to be purely indigenous, denying this Black African heritage.()  Today there are a sizable number of people in the department of Olancho (a center of gold mining and cattle ranching) that would be considered black by U.S. standards. They do not, however, identify as such but rather as mestizo.()  The Black Creoles of the Bay Islands are today distinguished as an ethnic group for their racial difference from the mestizos and blacks, and their cultural difference as English-speaking Protestants.There has been practicallyno ethnographic research conducted with this population.()All these circumstances led to a denial by many Hondurans of their Black African heritage which reflects in the census even to this day. Blacks were more problematic as national symbols because at the time they were neither seen to represent modernity nor autochthony, and their history of dislocation from Africa means they have no great pre-Columbian civilization in the Americas to call upon as symbols of a glorious past. Thus Latin American states often end up with a primarily Indo-Hispanic mestizaje where the Indian is privileged as the roots of the nation and blackness is either minimized or completely erased.() Nicaragua About 9% of Nicaraguas population is black and mainly reside on the countrys sparsely populated Caribbean coast. Afro-Nicaraguans are found on the autonomous regions of RAAN and RAAS. The black population is mostly of West Indian (Antillean) origin, the descendants of indentured laborers brought mostly from Jamaica and other Caribbean Islands when the region was a British protectorate. There is also a smaller number of Garfuna, a people of mixed Carib, Angolan, Congolese and Arawak descent. The Garfuna live along in Orinoco, La Fe and Marshall Point, communities settled at Laguna de Perlas. Nicaragua has the largest population of blacks in America.From these regions comes writers and poets like Carlos Rigby, David McField (current Nicaraguan ambassador in Jamaica), Clifford Glenn Hodgson Dumbar, June Beer (also a painter), Andira Watson and John Oliver, and diplomants and politicians like Francisco Campbell (current ambassador in the USA) and Lumberto Campbell. Among the musicians are Caribbean All Stars, Atma Terapia Arjuna Das, Osberto Jerez y Los Gregorys, Caribbean Taste, Spencer Hodgson, Philip Montalbn, Grupo Gamma, Anthony Matthews and Dimension Costea, Charles Wiltshire (also known as Carlos de Nicaragua, who played with Negra in its 1994 record Babylon) and dancer Gloria Bacon. Miss Lizzie Nelson is a cultural promoter, Altha Hooker is the dean of the Universidad de las Regiones Autnomas de la Costa Caribe, Neyda Dixon is a well known journalist and Scharllette Allen was elected as Miss Nicaragua in 2010. Panama Blacks in Panama are the descendants of West African slaves but later on blacks from the Caribbean islands arrived. The Afro Colonials are the group of Hispanics, while the Antillanos are those of Caribbean descent.CaribbeanCubaAccording to a 2001 national census which surveyed 11.2 million Cubans, 1.1 million Cubans described themselves as Black, while 2.8 million considered themselves to be mulatto or mestizo or javao or moro.(Cuba census 2001) Many Cubans still locate their origins in specific African ethnic groups or regions, particularly Yoruba, Igbo and Congo, but also Arar, Carabal, Mandingo, Fula and others.There is also a significant presence of black Haitian immigrants in the country. Creole language and culture first entered Cuba with the arrival of Haitian immigrants at the start of the 19th century. Haiti was a French colony, and the final years of the 17911804 Revolution brought a wave of French settlers fleeing with their Haitian slaves to Cuba. They came mainly to the east, and especially Guantanamo, where the French later introduced sugar cultivation, constructed sugar refineries and developed coffee plantations. By 1804 some 30,000 French were living in Baracoa and Maisi, the furthest eastern municipalities of the province. Later, Haitians continued to come to Cuba to work as brazeros (hand workers, from the Spanish word brazo, meaning arm) in the fields cutting cane. Their living and working conditions were not much better than slavery. Although they planned to return to Haiti, most stayed on in Cuba. For years, many Haitians and their descendants in Cuba did not identify themselves as such or speak Creole. In the eastern part of the island many Haitians suffered discrimination. But since 1959 the Castro regime claims that discrimination against Cubans of Haitian descent has stopped. After Spanish, Creole is the second most-spoken language in Cuba. Over 400,000 Cubans either speak it fluently, understand it but speak with difficulty, or have at least some familiarity with the language. It is mainly in those communities, where Haitians and their descendants live, that Creole is most spoken. In addition to the eastern provinces there are also communities in Ciego de Avila and Camaguey provinces where the population still maintains Creole, their mother tongue. Classes in Creole are offered in Guantanamo, Matanzas and the City of Havana. There is a Creole-language radio program.Some of the most famous Afro-Cubanos are writers Guilln, Gastn Baquero, Morejn, Alberto Guerra Naranjo and Ariel Ribeaux Diago; salsa legend Cruz; Segundo, Gonzlez, Cachaito Lpez, Portuondo and Ferrer of the Buena Vista Social Club; jazz musicians like Bauz, Santamara, Valds, Rubalcaba, Terry, Daz, Orlando Valle Maraca, Jorge Varona and Jorge Alfonso el Nio; songwriters like Carlos Alfonso, Alfonso, Milans and Gerardo Alfonso; other musicians as Valds, Cachao Lpez, Lpez, Eges, Prez Prado, Laserie, Cuni and Gines; and politicians like Almeida and Lazo.Dominican RepublicAccoding to the Factbook, 16% of the Dominican population is White, 11% is Black and 73% is mixed.()This source, however, does not define mixed, nor does it indicate the specific demographic or genetic study from which these percentages were obtained. Other sources give similar figures,(),() but also without naming a specific study.Regardless of the specific racial breakdown of the Dominican population, it is generally acknowledged that a large percentage of it is of mixed ancestry, including Black African. Some commentators and race/ethnicity scholars have been harshly critical of Dominicans of mixed racial background for their reluctance to self-identify as Black.(( However, this reluctance is shared by many people of multiracial background, who find inappropriate to identify with only one side of their ancestry,()().  Those people refuse to express a preference for any of the races that make up their background, and resent being ascribed to any single race.Dominican culture is a mixture of Taino Amerindian, West African, and European origins. While Taino influences are present in many Dominican traditions, the European and West African influences are the most noticeable.Afro-Dominicans make the largest presence along the south coast of the nation in cities like the capital Domingo.Notable Dominicans whose physical features suggest Black African ancestry include bachatero Santos, Sosa, Martinez, salsa singer Alberto, and 2009 Miss Universe runner-up Ada De La Cruz, among others. However, there is no reliable procedure to ascertain the degree, if any, to which their ancestry is Black African.The most common Black African ethnic groups among all Dominicans are the Bantu-Congo peoples and the Yoruba (known as Lucumi). Other small ethnic groups but yet sagnificant are the Akan, Mandinga, Igbo, Ewe, Fon, Bambara, and as well as the Fula.A system of racial stratification was imposed on Santo Domingo by Spain, as elsewhere in the Spanish Empire.HaitiNote: Popular definitions of Latin America do not include HaitiThe population of Haiti is 8.7 million, of which 95% are of Black African descent and the remaining 10%5% is mulatto and white.() Slavery in Haiti was established by the Spanish and French colonialist.Many Haitians are descendants of Taino or Caribs who cohabitated with the African descendant population.Haiti is an Afro-Latin nation with strong African contributions to the culture as well as its language, music and religion. To a lesser degree French, Spaniard, and in rare occasions (food, art, and folk religion) Taino and Arab customs are present in society.MartiniqueNote: Popular definitions of Latin America do not include MartiniqueThe population of Martinique, an overseas region of France, is 436,131 (July 2006 est.), 90% being African and African-white-Indian mixture() Their West African ancestors were imported from the Guinean Coast for sugar cane plantation labor during the 17th and 18th centuries.()The soul of Martinique culture is rooted in its African heritage. Cuisine such as pwa dangole and Angola peas, cultural meals eaten for good luck during the Years, accras, the golden codfish fritters, and Ti-punch, a type of rum display the countries strong West African roots, Colombo is the Martiniquais version of curry. Colombo comes from the Tamil term Kuzhambu. Colombo dishes was made popular by the Indian/Tamil Martiniquais population. During Mardi-Gras the red devil dancers on the day of diables rouges provides hints of Senegalese roots.  Writer Csaire made the comparison in cultures while visiting southern Senegal and seeing red masks with horns and mirrors which looked like those he knew from his native country, Of the gods of Africa, our oppressors have made devils.Crole Patois is the language spoken. Used for more intimate conversations,Martiniquais people switch between it and French taught in their formal schooling.()Puerto RicoAccording to the 2000 U.S. Census taken in Rico, 75.8% of Puerto Ricans identified as White, 12.4% of the population as Black and 11.1% as of mixed or other race.(CIA  The World Factbook  Puerto Rico) An island-wide DNA (mtDNA) study conducted by the of Puerto Rico at Mayagez revealed that 61% of Puerto Ricans have maternal Native American ancestry, 26.4% have maternal West or African ancestry, and 12.6% have maternal European ancestry.() On the other hand, the chromosome evidence showed Puerto Ricans patrilineage to be approximately 75% European, 20% Black African, and less than 5% indigenous. The combined results reveal a mostly mestizo (Taino and European) population with important European and Black African elements (of Puerto Rico).These critics maintain that a majority of Puerto Ricans are racially mixed, but that they do not feel the need to identify as such. They argue, furthermore, that Puerto Ricans tend to assume that they are of Black African, American Indian, and European ancestry and only identify themselves as mixed if having parents appearing to be of separate races. It should also be noted that Puerto Rico underwent a whitening process while under U.S. rule. The census-takers at the turn of the 20th Century recorded a huge disparity in the number of black and white Puerto Ricans between the 1910 and 1920 censuses. Black suddenly began to disappear from one census to another (within 10 years time), possibly due to redefinition of the term. It also appears that the black element within the culture was simply disappearing possibly due to the popular idea that in the U.S. one could only advance economically and socially if one were to pass for white.(How Puerto rico Became White)Misinformation of ethnic populations within Puerto Rico also existed under Spanish rule, when the Native Amerindian (Taino) populations were recorded as being extinct.  Biological science has now rewritten their history books. These tribes were not voluntary travelers, but have since blended into the mainstream Puerto Rican population (as all the others have been) with Taino ancestry being the common thread that binds.Many so-called pure blacks in Puerto Rico are found in the coastal areas, areas traditionally associated with sugar cane plantations (especially in the towns Loiza, Guayama, Ponce, and Carolina). Although, due to the DNA evidence that is being presented by UPR at Mayaguez, many African bloodlines have been recorded in the central mountains of the island, though not written in the Spanish history books of the time.  Consequently, Taino bloodlines have begun appearing in the coastal towns.  All this suggesting that escaped enslaved Black Africans ran off to the mountains to escape the slaveowners, while some Tainos remained close to their main staple food, fish.The Puerto Rican musical genres of bomba and plena are of West African and Caribbean origin, respectively; the are danced to during parties and West African-derived festivals.  Many Taino Boricuas who claim West/Central African ancestry are descendants of enslaved Congo, Igbo and Yoruba from Africa.  After the abolition of slavery in 1873 and the Spanish-American War of 1898 a number of Americans have also migrated and settled in Puerto Rico.Two of the most famous Afro-Latin Americans are Puerto Rican Boxer Felix Tito Trinidad and Hall of Fame baseball player Clemente.North AmericanUnited StatesMany Afro-Latino immigrants have arrived, in waves, over decades in the US.MexicoThe vast majority of contemporary Afro-Mexicans inhabit the southern region of Mexico; those that migrated north in the colonial period assimilated into the general population, making their existence in the country less evident than other groups.  Some Afro-Mexican facts:* Mexicos second President, Guerrero, an Afro-Mexican, issued a decree abolishing slavery and emancipating all slaves in 1829, during his short term as president.* Race is not considered for any official purpose, including the census.* Yanga founded the first free African township in the Americas in 1609.* a Black man named Esteban el Negro (Steven the Black), a North African Moor from Spain, searched for the fabled city of Cbola with Cabeza de Vaca.* Veracruz, Campeche, Pnuco and Acapulco were the main ports for the entrance of African slaves.* In the past, offspring of Black African/Amerindian mixtures were called jarocho (wild pig), chino or lobo (wolf). Today jarocho refers to all inhabitants of the state of Veracruz, without regard to ancestry.Afro-Latino populations in the Americas(*)Note that population statistics from different sources and countries use highly divergent methods of identifying race, ethnicity, or national or genetic origin of individuals, from observing for color and racial characteristics, to asking the person to choose from a set of pre-defined choices, sometimes with an other category, and sometimes with an open-ended option, and sometimes not, which different national populations tend to choose in divergent ways. Color and visual characteristics were considered an invalid way to determine the genetic racial branch in anthropology (the field of science that original conceived of race, as a genetic branch of people who could have a relative success together compared with other branches, now considered invalid) as of 1910. It is likely these numbers do not fully reflect the percentage of the population that is of Black African heritage if you use any method of identification other than that of self-identification such as; the blood quantum definition, identification based on physical characteristics and identification by cultural traces.  Self-identification also fails to identify those who would consider themselves of Black African heritage if the option were given in the national census. Furthermore, the categorization of people of mixed racial background is controversial. Should a person of mostly non-Black African background be categorized as if his or her ancestry was 100% Black African? What percentage of this persons ancestry needs to be Black African in order for him/her to be considered of Black African descent? See also * immigration to Puerto Rico* peoples of the Americas* Afro-Brazilian* Afro-Mexican* diaspora* American* Afro-Caribbean* Creole* people* People* ladino* Cape Verdean* Creoles* of Famous Afro-Latinos* of topics related to Black and African people* Maroons* Miskito* Mulatto* Ngritude* So Tom and Prncipe* Equatoguineans* ZamboReferences External links * Joshua Project  Afro-American, Hispanic* Oro Negro (Afrodescendants Foundation in Chile)* Virginia Rioseco, Oro Negro Foundation: Afro descendants organize themselves, Nuestro.cl (Chilean Cultural Heritage Site).* Black Latin America* Afro Mexico or Bobby Vaughns The Black Mexico website* Latin American Network Information Centers (LANIC) African Diaspora webpage with links to various websites (LANIC is affiliated with the University of Texas at Austin)* Young Lords origins web site* Cowater International Inc of Ottawas preliminary report (1996) for the Inter-American Development Bank titled: Poverty Alleviation Program for Minority Communities in Latin AmericaCommunities of African Ancestry in Latin America: History, Population, Contributions, & Social Attitudes (Social and Economic Conditions with Partial Bibliography). This report is 188 pages and contains history of Spain and Latin America, the African contributions to Latin America and pages 46 to 61 in Acrobat (or pages 31 to 46 in the document) is titled Analysis of Social Attitudes Towards Afro-Latin Americans.* Clare Ribando, CRS Report for Congress: Afro-Latinos in Latin America and Considerations for U.S. Policy, Congressional Research Service, The Library of Congress (January 4, 2005).* The Inter-Agency Consultation on Race in Latin America (IAC) (archived from the original on 2007-05-07)* English version of Judith Morrisons Presentation to the Inter-American Dialogues Working Group session (held on September 23, 2005) in Microsoft Word format. (archived from the original on 2008-06-25) Morrison is the Executive Director or the Inter-Agency Consultation on Race in Latin America.* Judith Morrison, The High Cost of Discrimination in Latin America (2005).* Jere R. Behrman, Alejandro Gaviria, & Miguel Szkelys Social Exclusion in Latin America: Introduction and Overview report for the Inter-American Development Bank.* The World Bank Groups website titled Afro-Latin Americans from 2001 and not updated* The World Banks  Latin American and Caribbean Social Development Units newsletter La Ventana Webpage contains links to three editions to newsletters detailing World Bank activities toward the social inclusion of Afro Latin American and indigenous peoples.* The World Banks Publications on Afro Latin Americans (see column on right side for Acrobat documents available for download).* David de Ferrantis (former Regional Vice President of the World Bank, Latin America & the Caribbean) remarks of June 18, 2002 to the Annual Meeting of the Inter-Agency Consultation on Race in Latin America titled: Advancing Public Policy for Afro-Descendents in Latin America: Social and Economic Development, Legal Issues and Human Rights* Josefina Stubbs, Afro-descendants in Latin America: Poverty, Inequality and Discrimination.* Tanya K. Hernndez (Professor of Law & Justice, Frederick Hall Scholar, Rutgers University School of Law) speech given November 28, 2005 Washington, DC titled: Discrimination and Education in Latin-America The speech was given at the Special Meeting to Examine and Discuss the Nature of a Future Inter-American Convention Against Racism and All Forms of Discrimination and Intolerance.* The World Banks website titled: The World Bank and Afro-Latins  Overview* World Bank webpage announcing their report titled: Inequality in Latin America & the Caribbean: Breaking with History? (archived from the original on 2007-06-15)The webpage includes links to specific report chapters, including Chapter 3, which considers racial factors involved in inequality.* The multiple author publication Race and Poverty: Interagency Consultation on AfroLatin Americans (LCR Sustainable Development Working Paper No. 9) published November 2000 by the Inter-American Dialogue, Inter-American Development Bank, and the World Bank of their roundtables proceedings held June 19, 2000 in Washington, D.C. (archived from the original on 2007-08-09)* Ivan Briscoe, The time of the underdog: rage and race in Latin America, Open Democracy (19 December 2005).* Mayra Buvinic and Jacqueline Mazza with Ruthanne Deutsch, ed. Social Inclusion and Economic Development in Latin America, (Inter-American Development Bank, 2004) (by various authors and with considerable parts dealing with Afro Latin Americans).* Peggy A. Lovell, Gender, Race, and the Struggle for Social Justice in Brazil, Latin American Perspectives (November 2000), pages 85103.* Omar Arias, Gustavo Yamada, & Luis Tejerina, Education, family background and racial earnings inequality in Brazil, (Abstract) the International Journal of Manpower, Volume 25, Number 3/4 (2004), pages 355374.* Maria do Carmo Leal, Silvana Granado Nogueira da Gama and Cynthia Braga da Cunha, Racial, sociodemographic, and prenatal and childbirth care inequalities in Brazil, 19992001, Revista de Sade Pblica, vol. 39, no. 1  (So Paulo Feb. 2005).* Palenque San Basilio, Bolivar, Maroon Community in Colombia (CNN video of Afro-Colombian community).*Colombian 2005 Census Television Commercial  Orgullosamente Afrocolombiano* The World Banks Sector Report The Gap Matters: poverty and well-being of Afro-Colombians and indigenous peoples Click here for the report*Law 70 of Colombia (1993): In Recognition of the Right of Black Colombians to Collectively Own and Occupy their Ancestral Lands. English Translation (April 2007)de:Afro-Lateinamerikaneres:Afroamericanoit:Afro-latinoamericanopt:Afro-latino-americanoru:-
638748
Vidarbha
population_density_cite  (Vidarbha (Marathi: ) is the eastern region of Maharashtra state made up of Division and Division. Its ancient name is Berar.(http://books.google.com/books?idEFDVAAAAMAAJ&pgRA1-PA131&dqAHIR+YADAV++RAJPUTANA&hlen&eiMjccTdTaKcTflge13L22DA&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum7&ved0CEMQ6AEwBg#vonepage&qAHIR%20YADAV%20%20RAJPUTANA&ffalse)(Journal of the Royal Asiatic Society of Great Britain & Ireland By Royal Asiatic Society of Great Britain and Ireland--page-323) It occupies 31.6% of total area and holds 21.3% of total population of Maharashtra.( It borders the state of Pradesh to north, Chattisgarh to east, Pradesh to south and Marathwada and Khandesh regions of Maharashtra to west. Situated in central India Vidarbha has its own rich cultural and historical background distinct from rest of Maharashtra. The largest city in Vidarbha is Nagpur, second largest is Amravati followed by Akola, Yavatmal, Chandrapur and Gondia. A majority of Vidarbhians speak Varhadi a dialect of Marathi.The region is famous for growing oranges and cotton. Vidarbha holds two-thirds of Maharashtras mineral resources, three quarters of its forest resources and is a net producer of power.(http://www.epw.org.in/epw/uploads/articles/6166.pdf) Throughout its history, Vidarbha has remained much calmer during the communal troubles than the rest of India; but it is plagued very much by poverty() and malnutrition.(http://www.shramdeepindia.org.in/melghat.htm WHO declares Melghat as Indias most malnutrition-hit area)  It is less economically prosperous compared to the rest of Maharashtra.(Understanding Underdevelopment in Vidarbha. By Sanjiv Phansalkar. IWMI-Tata Water Policy Program. Article listed here http://www.iwmi.cgiar.org/iwmi-tata_html/PM2003/Schedule/IrrPov.htm.)In recent times, there have been calls for a separate state of Vidarbha, due to the continuous negligence from the of Maharashtra towards this region and the incompetent political leaderships in Vidarbha, except a few. The farmers in the state are living in the worst condition compared to the rest of India. There have been more than 32,000 farmers suicides in Maharashtra in a decade, of which 70% being in the 11 districts of Vidarbha region.() Though rich in minerals, coal, forests and mountains, this region is always underdeveloped because of the continuous dominance of the  political leaderships form the other parts of the state, especially Western Maharashtra. Though being culturally, politically and financially different than the rest of Maharashtra, the calls to a separate state come in picture only when the leaders from this region are sidelined by the other higher authorities in the govt. of Maharashtra.() It has largely become a myth as a separate Vidarbha state, mainly due to the opposition from the state political party Sena.()HistoryImage:Central Provinces India 1903.gif|right||250px|thumb|map of Provinces and Berar regions of India. Nagpur is shown as capital of Central provincesNagpur was the Capital of the Devgadh Sarkar of Subah Berar and Gondwana and the Vidarbha region known as Gulshan-e-Berar in Muedveal period since khilji dynasty to mughal period according Aine-Akbari and Alimgeer Namah report the berar is hole Fourteen sarkar of Vidarhbha region and Sawai Shiri Shrimant Santaji Bhonsle Depute Sena Sahibe -E-Subah of berar and gondwana.He was father Inlaw of Aurangzeb Grand son Bedar Bakht Mirza s/oMirza Mohammed Azam Shah Emperor of India, Buland Bakht the king of Gondwana in 1681 deputed by Aurangzeb Alamgeer Emperor of india after sultan Chand Shah son of Buland Bakht After the death of Sultanchand Shah widow wife call Relative of Sena Sahib-E-Subah. Raghuji Bhonsle I In 1732 Raghuji Bhonsle Iappointed Military officer for collection of revenue and chauth for sultan chand shah family. Then Bhonsle dynasty of Marathas who in the mid eighteenth century created an independent Hindu princely state that covered much of east-central India. After their defeat in the Anglo-Maratha War in 1818, the Bhonsle dominions were reduced to the Nagpur division.  In 1853 the last Maharaja of Nagpur died without a male heir and subsequently Nagpur division was incorporated into mainstream British India. Nagpur division became a part of the Rajs Provinces in 1861.Amravati division, formerly known as Berar, was administered by the Nizam of Hyderabad until 1853. In that year, citing misgovernance by the Nizam, the British colonial administration took direct control over the province. Berar was added to the Provinces in 1903.During Indias independence struggle Nagpur hosted the sessions of National Congress several times. Sevagram was arguably the capital of nationalistic India during the Gandhian era.After Indias independence in 1947, Central Provinces and Berar became the Indian state of Madhya Pradesh. In 1956 Vidarbha was transferred to state along with all Marathi-speaking areas. In 1960 Bombay state was split along linguistic lines into the states of Maharashtra and Gujarat. Marathi-speaking Vidarbha became part of the state of Maharashtra.GeographyGeographically Vidarbha lies on the northern part of Plateau. Unlike the Ghats, there are no major hilly areas . The Range lies to the north of Vidarbha region in Madhya Pradesh. The Melghat area of Amravati district is on southern offshoot of the Satpura Range.(http://amravati.gov.in/htmldocs/melghat.htm) Large basaltic rock formations exists throughout Vidarbha caused by the Deccan lava trap. Gondia district is unique in Maharashtra in the sense that the entire area of the district is occupied by metamorphic rock and alluvium.() Buldhana has the crater created by impact of meteorite or comet. The eastern districts of Gondia, Bhandara, Gadchirolli and Nagpur fall in earthquake zone 1, which is considered safest in India, while other districts fall in zone 2.Wainganga is the largest of all the Vidarbha rivers. Other major rivers that drain Vidarbha region are the Wardha, and Kanhan rivers which are all tributaries of Godavari river. In north, five small rivers, Khapra, Sipna, Gadga and Dolar along with Purna, are the tributaries of Tapti river.Administration & politicsright|thumb|250px|Vidhan Bhavan at Nagpur hosts winter session of Maharashtra AssemblyVidarbha comprises two divisions (Amravati and Nagpur). It has 11 districts namely, Amravati, Akola, Bhandara, Buldana,  Chandrapur, Gadchiroli, Gondia, Nagpur, Wardha, Washim, Yavatmal.District administrationEach district has a collectors office which is responsible for day-to-day administration. The District Collector is a Central Indian Government appointee who is in charge of the governance of a district in a state.(Districts Of Maharashtra) Nagpur city, the largest city in Vidarbha, has a special civic body, the Improvement Trust, which along with Municipal Corporation is responsible for overall development and planning activity. Other significant cities like Amravati and Akola too have their own municipal corporation. The corporators (representatives) in these civic bodies are elected via elections. Urban areas are split in different wards and each ward elects a representative. Rural areas have a panchayat raj system.Representation in Lok SabhaVidarbha is represented at national level by 10 Lok sabha seats. Nagpur district which has the highest population density is split into 2 lok sabha seats of Nagpur and Ramtek while districts with lower population density like Chimur and Gadchiroli are clubbed together. Gondia-Bhandara seats has very important as Praful Patel basically from Gondia is MP from this lok sabha seat. Ramtek and Amravati seats are reserved for caste candidates only while Gadchiroli-Chimur is reserved for Scheduled Tribes.(http://www.eci.gov.in/election_maps/Results/PC/S13/S13_PC.jpg)Representation in Vidhan SabhaVidarbha is represented at state level by 62 assembly seats. Nagpur boasts the densest concentration of assembly seats with the city divided into 6 areas. Certain seats are reserved for Tribe candidates only, while others are open to all to contest.(http://www.eci.gov.in/election_maps/Results/AC/S13/S13_AC.jpg) As part of the Pact the winter session of Maharashtra assembly is held as Nagpur Vidhan Bhavan.DemographicsVidarbha has total population of 20,630,987 according to the 2001 census of the government of India.() Hinduism is the predominant religion in this region. Buddhism is second most followed religion. This is unusual compared to the rest of Maharashtra and even most north Indian states where usually Islam is second most followed religion.  The significant following of Buddhism is due to Buddhist movement started by Dr. R. Ambedkar.Separate Statehood movement# 1853 :- After British conquests from Mughals and Marathas in central India, in 1853 Province  was formed with Nagpur as capital. It was administered by a commissioner under the central government.# 1861 :- Province was formed by the British, with Nagpur as capital.# 1903 :- On 1 October Berar was also placed under the administration of the commissioner of Central Provinces. It was now named as Province and Berar.# 1935 :- Government of India Act, passed by British parliament formed provincial assembly, providing for an election.  Central Province and Berar  was kept a separate entity, with Nagpur as capital.# 1950 :- When constitution of India went into effect in 1950; Central Province and Berar became Madhya Pradesh, with Nagpur as capital.# 1956 :- State with Nagpur as capital was recommended by Fazal Ali commission (appointed in 1953) for reorganisation of states in India.# 1960 :- On 1 May the Vidarbha state, recommended by Fazal Ali commission for reorganisation of states, was merged with, newly formed Maharashtra State.In recent years there have been sporadic calls by its population for Vidarbha to secede from Maharashtra. This is based in part on the feeling of being neglected by the Maharashtra state government and in part on assertion of a distinct political identity. The people have complained that the region has fallen behind others in Maharashtra in attracting investment and development funds. The region is comparatively poorly served by roads, irrigation facilities and educational institutions. However political movements for attaining statehood have failed to hold sway as their leaders have been considered opportunistic. Rajya Party and Rajya Nirman Congress are very small political parties created by leaders that have split from national level parties like INC. Only one national party - BJP has officially included demand for  vidarbha state, in its national manifesto.Vidarbha has total population of 20,630,987 according to the 2001 census of the government of India.( Though rich in minerals, coal, forests and mountains, this region is always underdeveloped primarily because of lack of agriculture. Tata group started the countrys first textile mill at Nagpur, formally known as Central India Spinning and Weaving Company Ltd. The company was popularly known as Empress Mills as it was inaugurated on 1 January 1877, the day queen Victoria was proclaimed Empress of India.(Are Indians Really Dumb?. Rediff.com. http://www.rediff.com/money/2004/aug/10das.htm. Retrieved 2006-06.)EconomyVidarbhas economy is primarily agricultural and also the region is rich in forest and mineral wealth. As per business point of view Chandrapur Amravati and Nagpur are  important cities of Vidarbha. Nagpur is a central hub for business. Amaravari is the city which is well known for film distributors and its cloth market. Chandrapur has the thermal power station which is one of the biggest thermal power station in India and some other heavy industries such as BILT (Paper Industry) MEL, steel industries, cement industries and coal mines.An International cargo hub, (MIHAN), is being developed at Nagpur.()()  MIHAN will be used for handling heavy cargo coming from South-East Asia and Middle-East Asia. Project will also include  Economic Zone (SEZ)( ) for Technology (IT) companies. This will be the biggest development project in India so far.()AgricultureThe main cash crops of the region are cotton, oranges and soya beans. Amravati is the largest Orange growing district. Traditional crops are sorghum (jowar), pearl millet (bajra) and rice. Yavatmal is the largest cotton growing district. Gondia is the largest rice growing district. Gondia is a Rice city. Recently Vidarbha region has become infamous for a large number of farmer suicides occurring. On 1 July 2006 the Minister of India Singh announced a Rs. 3,750-crore (Rupees 37.5 billion) relief package for Vidharbha. The package should help farmers in six districts of the region. However the package was not welcomed by most financial pundits and the journalist Sainath wrote the following() in Hindu newspaper criticising the package and saying that it was destined to fail.Recently it was found that most of the government officials are involved in corruption of the packages which were announced for farmers. Government suspended more that 400 government officials in this scam.Mineral wealthThe Chandrapur, Gondia, Gadchiroli, Bhandara and Nagpur Districts form the main mineral belt, with coal and manganese as the major minerals. Chandrapur district alone contributes 29% of all mineral output of Maharashtra.() ore and limestone are identified as potential mining resources.(Maharashtra Resources)IndustryTraditionally Vidarbha has lagged behind western Maharashtra in industrial growth. Various incentives were granted to attract industries but have failed. Butibori Industrial Area MIDC outside Nagpur is one of the largest industrial areas in country but few industries have actually opened there. MIHAN an international cargo hub project is currently underway at Nagpur. The project aims to exploit the central location of Nagpur and convert the present airport into a major freight hub with integrated road and rail connectivity along with a Special Economic Zone. Ballarpur Industries, Indias largest manufacturer and exporter of paper is located in district.()Farmers suicidesThere have been more than 30,000 farmers who committed suicides in Maharashtra in the last decade, out of which more than 70% farmers belong to the 11 districts of Vidarbha region. This is mainly because of the infertility of the land, lack of ample amount of water resources, lack of new technologies and due to the negligence of the state govt. towards the farmers needs. The main crop in Vidarbha being Cotton, but the farmers growing it do not get their share from the govt., which lead to the high distress among them, leading to the massive suicides. Due to the absence of any responsible counseling either from the government or society there were many farmers who did not know how to survive in the changing economy. Such stresses pushed many into a corner where suicide became an option for them.(Behere PB, Behere AP. Farmers suicide in Vidarbha region of Maharashtra state: A myth or reality?. Indian J Psychiatry online 2008 2009 Oct 23;50:124-7. Available from: http://www.indianjpsychiatry.org/text.asp?2008/50/2/124/42401) This also lead the farmers and others in this region to make a call for a separate Vidarbha state.Tourismthumb|right|300px|Kanha Tiger Reserve (outside province)Image:hrushikesh kulkarni flag shegaon.JPG|left|250px|thumb|Entrance of Anand Sagar, Shegaon, Holy place for Hindus and a famous picnic spot in Vidarbha.Vidarbha has lush green deciduous forests which are home to a variety of flora and fauna. These attract a large number of visitors each year. All Maharashtras tiger reserves are located in Vidarbha. They are Melghat Tiger Reserve in Amravati district, Tadoba Andhari Tiger Reserve in Chandrapur district and Pench Tiger Reserve in Nagpur district. Nagzira wild life sentury and navegoan bandh National Park(bird sentury)of District is also very popular,  Although the eastern region of the Vidarbha is poorer in natural resources in comparison with the west, it contains Maharashtras oldest National Park created in 1955, the Tadoba Tiger Reserve spanning 575.78 km2,() one of Indias 25 Project Tiger Reserves.()The National Park consists of two forested rectangles of the Tadoba and Andhari range. Aside from around 50 tigers, Tadoba Tiger Reserve is home to rare Indian wildlife like leopards, sloth bears, gaur, wild dogs, hyenas, civet and jungle cats, and many species of Indian deer like sambar, cheetal, nilgai, and barking deer. The Tadoba lake sustains the Marsh Crocodile, which were once common all over Maharashtra. Tadoba is also an ornithologists paradise with a varied diversity of aquatic birdlife.Thickly clad hills form the northern and western boundary of the Tiger Reserve. To the southwest is a huge lake which acts as a buffer between the parks forest and the extensive farmland which extends up to Irai Lake.Adjacent to the core forested hills is the Chichghat valley which hosts the forest lodge.(http://www.tigertrails.in Tiger Trails website) The Tadoba Tiger Reserve is an undisturbed forest not crowded by too many tourists. Tadoba Tiger Reserve is open throughout the year and is at three-hour road journey from the city of Nagpur.Scriptural importanceAside from cultural distinctness from the rest of Maharashtra, Vidarbha has evolved historically in a different fashion. Many scriptures mention Vidarbha as the location of:* The marriage of Agastya and Lopamudra.* Rukmini-haran (kidnapping of Rukmini) by god Krishna. Rukmini is described as the princess of the Vidarbha kingdom. Later Rukmini became one of the chief queens of Krishna.* Kundinpur/Kaundinyapur/Kundinapuri, the mythological capital of Vidarbha has been mentioned in Mahabharata* The story of king Nala and Damayanti, also in the Mahabharata.Ramayana has the reference of Vidarbha as one on the Janapadas at that time.Kalidasas epic poem Meghaduta also mentions Vidarbha as the place of banishment of the Yaksha Gandharva.Culture & peopleSituated in central India, Vidarbha has a rich cultural and historical background distinct from rest of Maharashtra. Even though Marathi culture is most dominant, Vidarbha has been a melting pot of Telugu speaking people from south, Hindi speaking central India and tribal people of Chattisgarh. Vidarbha is famous for the Varhdi dialect of Marathi language spoken in the rest of Maharashtra. The Gadchiroli district of Vidarbha has large population of tribal people. Hindu festivals like holi, diwali and Dasara are celebrated throughout the region.() There are many prominent cultural and literary societies working in Vidarbha.Vidarbha Sahitya Sangh (for development of Marathi), Vidarbha Rashtrabhasha Prachar Samiti (promotion and spreading Hindi) and Vidarbha Hindi Sahitya Sammelan (for promoting Hindi). The Nagpur central museum (estb 1863) maintains collections that are mainly from Vidarbha.(Nagpur District Gazetteer) Cricket is the favorite sports as in rest of India and Nagpurs Cricket Association Ground (VCA) hosts international cricket matches.()Notable Indian figures from Vidarbha include Bajaj, B. Hedgewar, Sadashiv Golwalkar, Bhave, Amte, Ganesh Gadkari, Patil, K. Wankhede and K. Nayudu. Many other notable people like Pandit, Khaire and Ramadorai were born in Nagpur. A BJP leader from Nagpur, Gadkari has become `national president` of the party Bharatiya Janata Party. Indias current President Ms. Pratibha Tai Patil belongs to Amravati District of Vidarbha. Human rights activist Adv Jayshree Satpute daughter of senior advocate Purushottam Satpute is among the five Indians who have figured in UK-based The Guardian newspapers list of the worlds 100 most inspirational women was born in Chandrapur.Dr Vijay Bhatkar from Akola is well known name in IT industry. He is instrumental in creating first supercomputer of India and also started many institute like Centre for Development of Advanced Computing and India International Multiversity (IIMv).ReferencesExternal links* Tigertrailsca:Vidarbhahi:kn:mr:ru:sv:Vidarbhate:
641155
Anthony_Field
 notable_instruments  Anthony Donald Field AM (born 8 May 1963 in Kellyville, South Wales) is an Australian musician and actor. He is best known as a member of the childrens group Wiggles and the 1980s and 90s band Cockroaches with his brothers, Paul and John and another future Wiggle, Fatt.Field was the youngest of seven children, and grew up in the suburbs of Sydney.  He came from a long line of musicians, especially the women in his family.  His great-great aunt was Queenie Paul, known for performing at the Tivoli theatre in Sydney, and his grandmother Kathleen accompanied silent movies in the mining town of Cobar.  Fields mother Marie made sure that all of her seven children learned how to play at least one musical instrument.()  In 1979, while still in secondary school (Josephs College, Hunters Hill, a prestigious boarding school), he and his brothers formed the pop group Cockroaches.(()He took a short break from music to serve in the  Battalion, Royal Australian Regiment,  Australias regular army from 1982 to 1985, as an infantry soldier, medic, and rifleman.  He played the bagpipes in parades and on training missions.()()  When The Cockroaches disbanded in the early 90s, Field enrolled in University to study Childhood Education.  There he met the other members of The Wiggles, guitarist Cook, vocalist Greg Page, and pianist Wilcher.  He recruited former bandmember Fatt to record their first CD in 1991.()  Field worked as a preschool teacher for two years before the success of The Wiggles forced him to quit.(  Field originally wore a green shirt during their concerts, but after a short time switched to blue because green became associated with the Wiggles character the Dinosaur, a character Cook created and originally performed.()  Field created and played the original Feathersword; the role was taken over by Paddick in 1993.()  He plays several instruments, including the tin whistle, bagpipes, guitar, drums, trumpet, violin, and didgeridoo.  Fields schtick is eating.In spite of being named as Bachelor of the Year in Cleo Magazine, Field married Michaela Patisteas, a former dancer, in 2003.()  They have three children, who have joined the Field family tradition of involvement in The Wiggles by appearing in several of their TV shows and videos.()  In April 2007, Field cut short his US tour by ten days to return home for the birth of his youngest child; his fellow bandmembers appeared on the U.S. version of or No Deal without him.()  Beginning in 2007, Field did some voiceover work for the TV show Animal Rescue, for Channel 7 in Australia.()  Field is a registered breeder of miniature fox terriers.(  He is a fan of the Australian rugby league club the Tigers,( as well as of singer Iglesias.()  Field went public about his experience with depression in mid 2007 to draw more attention to the condition.()()  He has stated that being on the road is a dangerous job for someone with depression, but has dealt with it through diet, exercise, talking about it, and having a good support system (including his wife, and his friend Cook).(Field is a devout Catholic.(  He wears two large tattoos on his arms, under his blue skivvy: one is the Mary with the words My life is in your hands in Spanish; the other is a heart with the words, My love, my heart in Spanish.  The names of his wife and his three children are also tattooed on his arms.(Field was made a Member of the Order of Australia on 26 January 2010 for service to the arts, particularly childrens entertainment, and to the community as a benefactor and supporter of a range of charities.()ReferencesExternal links* The Official Wiggles Website
642743
Charles_Graner
parents        laterworkCharles A. Graner, Jr., (born 1968) is a former U.S. Army reservist who was convicted of abuse in connection with the 20032004 Ghraib prisoner abuse scandal. Graner, with other soldiers from his unit, the 372nd Military Police Company, was accused of allowing and inflicting sexual, physical, and abuse of Iraqi of war in Ghraib Prison, a notorious prison in Baghdad during the States of Iraq. He was also convicted of conspiracy to maltreat detainees, failing to protect detainees from abuse, cruelty, and maltreatment, as well as charges of assault, indecency, and of duty. He was found guilty of all charges on January 14, 2005, and sentenced to 10 years in prison, demotion to private, dishonorable discharge and forfeiture of pay and allowances. Charges of adultery and of justice were dropped before trial.(Abu Ghraib Court Martial: Ring Leader Spc. Charles A. Graner, Jr., Sentenced to Ten Years, for Defense Information. Retrieved 2008-07-06.)  On August 6, 2011, Graner was released from the States Disciplinary Barracks at Leavenworth, Kansas after serving six and a half years of his 10 year sentence.(Dishneau, David. Key figure in Abu Ghraib abuse freed from prison, Press, August 6, 2011.)Graner held the rank of Specialist() in the company during his tour of duty in Iraq. While in Iraq, Specialist England, also implicated in the prisoner scandal, became pregnant, allegedly by him.Birth and early lifeGraner went to Baldwin High School in Allegheny County, Pennsylvania, a suburb of Pittsburgh. He was a member of the Student Council, Student Council Executive Board, Drama Club and Math League.(John Castaneda, a family friend for 30 years, was quoted as saying I feel so bad. He was a real good guy. I have nothing but good things to say about Chuck. Never once did Chuck give anyone a problem. It was always Yes, sir or No, sir. He wouldnt even call my wife and me by our first names. It was always Mr. and Mrs.(Fuoco, Michael A., et al. (2004-05-08)Suspect in prisoner abuse has a history of troubles Post-Gazette.com. Retrieved 2006-08-21.)After graduating in 1986, Graner attended the of Pittsburgh for two years before dropping out to join the Corps Reserve in April 1988. He had the Marine Corps emblem and the letters USMC tattooed on his upper right biceps.(On June 15, 1990, Graner married Staci M. Dean, a 19-year-old from Pennsylvania. The marriage took place in Farmington after she became pregnant with the first of their two children. On the license application, Graner listed his occupation as construction worker.Trained as a military police soldier, he served in the Persian Gulf War in 1991. He was in the Marines until May 1996, when he left with the rank of Lance Corporal.Persian Gulf WarGraner was deployed during the Persian Gulf War, serving with the 2nd MP Co, originally of 4th FSSG, 4th Marine Division, a Marine Reserve unit based in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. On January 11, 1991, he arrived in Arabia, taking part in Operation Desert Storm. From there, he traveled to the largest prisoner-of-war camp near the Saudi-Kuwaiti border, where he worked for about six weeks.The Angeles Times interviewed Ross Guidotti, who served at the camp with Graner.( Guidotti recalled the night he described as scary as hell for him, Graner and about 110 other Marines standing guard. Around 4,000 of the camps 20,000 captured Iraqis had threatened to riot after a fierce rain and wind storm blew apart a makeshift mess hall where they were being fed. Panicked, Iraqi prisoners pushed other prisoners into the razor wire that surrounded the camp, and screaming in Arabic, Kill us! Were dogs! Were going to die anyway! Guidotti remembered grabbing a loaded shotgun and thinking Im dead. Despite being what Guidotti described as one of those moments when someone could have set off a massacre, the crisis was brought to an end when more rations were found to feed the Iraqis; a simple solution that made it into the official Marine history of Desert Storm. Later, following President H. W. Bushs order for a cease-fire by the end of February 1991, several soldiers including Guidotti and Graner returned home on May 15. Guidotti stated, Before Chuck Graner ever became known as this sadistic criminal, Im going to tell you what I saw  the last image of Chuck Graner burned into my mind: I guess hes 22, his eyes red with tears, crying, holding his little girl with his wife beside him.(Prison guardAfter his marriage, he moved to Pennsylvania, a mining area of 12,500 people in southwestern Pennsylvania, where his wifes family resided. From 1990 to 1994, he worked as a school custodian. In 1994, he began working as a officer at Fayette County Prison in a shift with a no-nonsense reputation. Once, Graner was accused of putting mace in a new guards coffee as a joke, causing him to be sick.(Records Paint Dark Portrait Of Guard, Post, 2004-06-05. Retrieved 2008-07-07.)In May 1996, he moved to the Correctional Institution - Greene, a maximum-security prison in County, Pennsylvania. Almost 70 percent of the inmates were black, many from large cities, but it was located in a rural part of the state and more than 90 percent of the guards were white.(Unveiling the Face of the Prison Scandal, Times, 2004-06-19. Retrieved 2009-03-03.) Guards at the prison were accused of beating and sexually assaulting prisoners and conducting cavity searches in view of other prisoners. There were also reports of racism, including reports of guards writing KKK in the blood of a beaten prisoner. In 1998, two guards were fired and 20 others were suspended, demoted or reprimanded for prisoner abuse.((MP investigated in Iraq was at Pa. prison during abuse scandal, but not implicated, Diego Union-Tribune, 2004-05-07. Retrieved 2008-07-07.)In 1998, a prisoner accused Graner and three other guards of planting a razor blade in his food, causing his mouth to bleed when he ate it.( The prisoner accused the guards of first ignoring his cries for help and then punching and kicking him when they took him to the nurse. Graner was accused of telling him to Shut up, nigger, before we kill you.( The allegations were denied; although a federal magistrate judge ruled that the charges had arguable merit in fact and law, the case was dismissed when the prisoner disappeared after his release.(Graner and four other guards were also accused of beating another prisoner who had deliberately flooded his cell, taunting anti-punishment protesters, using racial epithets and telling a Muslim inmate he had rubbed pork all over his tray of food.(A second lawsuit involving Graner was brought by a prisoner who claimed that guards made him stand on one foot while handcuffed and tripped him. This allegation, however, was ruled to have been made too late under the of limitations.(Guard Left Troubled Life for Duty in Iraq, York Times, 2004-05-14. Retrieved 2008-07-07.)(Domestic abuseIn May 1997, Graners wife and mother of their two children filed for divorce and sought a protection order, saying Graner had threatened to kill her. A six month order was granted, unopposed by Graner. Shortly after the first one expired, Staci Dean was granted a second protection order, saying Graner had come to her house, thrown her against some furniture, thrown her on the bed, grabbed her arm and hit her face with her arm. Three years later, Dean called police after Graner came to her house and attacked her. Dean said Graner had yanked me out of bed by my hair, dragging me and all the covers into the hall and tried to throw me down the steps. Afterwards, Graner called a friend of Deans and allegedly said, I have nothing if shes not my wife, shes dead. Graner admitted the attack and a third order of protection was granted.(Soon after, an order of protection was granted against Graner to protect his estranged wife. This resulted from Graners comment to Dean that she could keep his guns, because he did not need them for what he was going to do to the plaintiff.(Abuse scandal meets disbelief in hometowns. Today, 2004-05-06. Retrieved 2009-03-03.)Abu GhraibIn November 2003, Graner was awarded a commendation from the Army for serving as a MP in Iraq.(AllegationsFile:AbuGhraibAbuse-standing-on-box.jpg|thumb|upright|The picture of Jabar which prompted the investigation Thirteen prisoners were interviewed by military investigators after the abuse allegations emerged. Eight of them named Graner as one of the abusers, and the other five described a person fitting his description.(New Details of Prison Abuse Emerge, Post, 2004-05-21. Retrieved 2008-07-07.) The investigation report named Graner as a ringleader of the abuse.(One of the prisoners, Kasim Mehaddi Hilas, said that one day he asked Graner for the time so that he could pray. Graner handcuffed him to the bars of a cell window and left him there, feet dangling off the floor, for nearly five hours. On another occasion Graner and other soldiers tied a prisoner to a bed and sodomized him with a phosphoric light while another soldier took photographs.(Another prisoner, Abdou Hussain Saad Faleh, said Graner forced him to stand on a food box, naked except for a blanket. Another soldier then put a bag over his head and electrodes on his fingers, toes and penis. The picture of this incident was one of the first pictures whose publication prompted the investigation.(A third prisoner, Mohanded Juma Juma, said Graner often threw food into the toilets and told the prisoners to eat it.(Spec. Sivits, a soldier who pleaded guilty to charges relating to the Abu Ghraib investigation, alleged that Graner once punched a prisoner in the head so hard that he lost consciousness.(3 to Be Arraigned in Prison Abuse, Post, 2004-05-19. Retrieved 2008-07-07.)Timeline* 2002: Graner joins the Army Reserve.* May 5, 2003: Graner called to active duty in Iraq.* 20032004 Abu Ghraib prisoner abuse:** Specialist Sabrina Harman testified as to Graners assignment, It is Graner and Fredericks job ... to get these people to talk for military intelligence officers and for OGA, short for Other Government Agency, a nickname for the CIA.()** Graner appears in several pictures with his fellow guards Lynndie England and Sabrina Harman, giving the thumbs up in front of nude prisoners. In one photo, Graner poses over the dead body of al-Jamadi, an Iraqi prisoner; a small patch of blood can be seen on al-Jamadis right temple and his eyes are sealed closed with tape. According to Spc. Jason Kenners testimony, al-Jamadi was brought to the prison by Navy SEALs in good health; Kenner says he saw that al-Jamadi looked extensively bruised when he was brought out of the showers, dead. According to Kenner a battle took place among CIA and military interrogators over who should dispose of the body. Capt. Donald Reese, company commander of 372nd Military Police Company, gave testimony about al-Jamadis death, saying he saw the dead prisoner. Reese testified, I was told that when he was brought in, he was combative, that they took him up to the room and during the interrogation he passed.(Soldier claims commander present at death of Abu Ghraib prisoner, ABC News, 2004-06-26. Retrieved 2009-03-03.) Reese stated the corpse was locked in a shower room overnight, which is where he first saw him. Reese says he was first told the man had died of a heart attack, but when he saw him he was bleeding from the head, nose, mouth.(  The body was then autopsied, concluding that the cause of death was a blood clot from trauma.(** Prisoner Kasim Mehaddi Hilas testifies regarding his experiences at Abu Ghraib, telling investigators that Graner had cuffed him to the bars of a cell window, after Hilas had asked Graner what time it was because he wanted to pray. Graner left him, feet dangling above the floor, for almost five hours.( Hilas also detailed events he had witnessed of Graner and some of his fellow soldiers sodomizing and otherwise abusing other detainees. These events were also detailed by other prisoners including some of the victims themselves. According to Hilas, Graner also repeatedly threw the detainees meals into the toilets and said, Eat it.(** Spec. M. Darby, who reported what was happening in the prison, was stated that he had asked  Graner, when he was the MP in charge of the tiers night shift, if he had any photographs of the cell where the shooting took place.(Punishment and Amusement, Washington Post, 2004-05-21. Retrieved 2009-03-03.) Darby received two CDs of photographs from Graner. Darby told investigators, I thought the discs just had pictures of Iraq, the cell where the shooting occurred. However, the discs contained hundreds of photographs showing naked detainees being abused by U.S. soldiers. Feeling that what he had seen was just wrong, Darby was compelled to do something about it. Upon being confronted by Darby, Graner responded, The Christian in me says its wrong, but the corrections officer in me says, I love to make a grown man piss himself.(** Julie Scelfo and Rod Nordland of Newsweek reported, One military investigator wrote in his notes on Graner: the biggest S.O.B. on earth, a comment he underlined twice.(Beneath the Hoods, Newsweek. Retrieved 2009-03-03.)* May 14, 2004: U.S. Army files seven criminal charges against Graner under the Code of Military Justice, with punishments ranging up to 24.5 years in prison, forfeiture of pay, in rank and a discharge:(http://articles.latimes.com/2004/may/15/nation/na-womack15Iraq Prison Case Attorney a Military Law Expert, Times,  2004-05-15. Retrieved 2009-03-03.):#Conspiracy to maltreat detainees;:#of duty for willfully failing to protect detainees from abuse, cruelty and maltreatment;:#Assaulting detainees;:# Committing indecent acts;:#Adultery;:#of justice;:# Maltreatment of detainees.: The charges of adultery and obstruction of justice were dropped before the first trial began.(Preferred Charges Against, findlaw.com, 2005-05-14. Retrieved 2009-03-03.) Later, other charges were dropped, leaving only the charges for conspiracy to maltreat detainees, assault and committing indecent acts. This made the maximum penalty 17.5 years instead of 24.5 years.(Defense Witness: Graner Disobeyed Orders, NBC Austin, 2005-01-12. Retrieved 2009-03-03.)*May 19, 2004: Graner is arraigned along with Staff Sergeant Ivan L. Chip Frederick II and Sergeant Davis. All of them waive their right to have charges read aloud. Their pleas were deferred. On the same day, C. Sivits, the first soldier to go on trial, is sentenced to the maximum penalty of one year in prison and a bad conduct discharge.(Soldier Sentenced to One-Year Confinement for Prison Actions, italy.usembassy.gov, 2004-05-19. Retrieved 2009-03-03.)* June 25, 2004: Spc. Israel Rivera, a military intelligence analyst, testifies at a hearing in Baghdad that will decide whether Spc. Harman should be court-martialed. Rivera says Graner shouted homosexual slurs at three naked prisoners, ordering them to crawl along the ground so their genitalia had to drag along the floor. According to Rivera, Graner was shouting things like, Are you guys fucking in there and fucking fags.(The Lucifer Effect, Google books. Retrieved 2009-03-03.)* Three key witnesses refused to testify against Graner during a secret hearing on the grounds they might incriminate themselves (see Amendment to the United States Constitution):(3 witnesses in abuse case arent talking, Francisco Chronicle, 2004-05-19. Retrieved 2009-03-03.)**Lieutenant Colonel L. Jordan, who as director of the Joint Interrogation and Debriefing Center at the prison oversaw the interrogations;**Captain Donald J. Reese, who was commander of the 372nd Military Police Company, in which Graner served; and**Nakhla, civilian translator, employed by military contractor Corporation, assigned to the Military Intelligence Brigade; mentioned in the report as suspect.Court-martialArticle 39a hearingDue to security problems with holding pre-trial hearings in Baghdad, the case was transferred to Germany. On August 23, Graner appeared before military judge Colonel James Pohl at a high-security Army base in the city of Mannheim in southwest Germany. On that day, Article 39a hearings were held. These preliminary hearings usually function as an arraignment and allow the judge to hear and decide on motions made by the prosecutor and the defense. Graner appeared with Specialist Ambuhl, along with his civilian attorneys and appointed military defense lawyers.(Abu Ghraib Article 39A Hearings Held in Germany, U.S. Department of Defense, defenselink.mil. Retrieved 2009-03-05.)During the Article 39a hearing, attorneys for Harman and Graner made discovery motions. Pohn set a deadline of September 10 for the government to provide the defense team with the documents requested, and ordered the release of a U.S. Army report performed by the Criminal Investigational Division on investigative procedures, as well as the Schlesinger panel report.(Graners attorney (as well as attorneys for several others charged) also moved to suppress evidence of statements made to Army investigators during interrogations, as well as seizure of a computer. Also requested was a change of venue, because some witnesses could not be compelled to come to Iraq to testify. In addition, the defense sought from prosecution for several people so they may testify for the defense. The judge denied all three motions, and also ruled that video testimony and depositions could be used as evidence.(October 22 hearingAnother pre-trial hearing was held on October 22, at Camp Victory in Baghdad, with Pohl again presiding as judge. Pohl set January 7, 2005, as the trial date and again denied a defense motion to grant immunity to several witnesses so they could testify without fear of incrimination.(Panel for Detainees Cases Cut in Half, Post. Retrieved 2009-03-05.) On November 11, Lieutenant Colonel Fred Taylor, a judge advocate in the regional defense counsels office at Camp Victory, ordered that all further hearings in the case will be held at Hood, Texas.(THE CONFLICT IN IRAQ: MILITARY JUSTICE; Trials of G.I.s At Abu Ghraib To Be Moved To the U.S., York Times. Retrieved 2009-03-05.)Not guilty plea and court-martial member selectionThe trial officially began on January 7, at the Williams Judicial Center in Fort Hood, with Colonel James Pohl presiding. A ten-member, all-male court-martial was seated, consisting of four officers and six enlisted menall of whom had served in either Iraq or Afghanistan. Under military law, seven court members must vote guilty to convict a person of each charge.(Court-Martial Will Hear Taped Testimony of Prisoners, York Times. Retrieved 2009-03-05.)Graner entered a not-guilty plea to each of the five charges. Two officers detailed as members of the court were not seatedColonel Allen Batschelet for saying he was embarrassed as an Army officer after seeing the photos and had strong views about the case, and Lieutenant Colonel Mark Kormos by the prosecutors for no reason given.(During the session a list of potential witnesses was also made public. It included three other soldiers in Graners unit from western Pennsylvania: Captain Reese of New Stanton, Specialist Sivits of Bedford County, and Sergeant Darby of Somerset County. Reese was the unit commander and had been reprimanded in connection with Abu Ghraib; Sivits had already pled guilty in a plea bargain; Darby was the soldier who first reported the situation at Abu Ghraib. At the hearing several other possible witnesses were listed, including the prerecorded video depositions of three Iraqi prisoners  two for the prosecution and one for the defense. Graners lawyer, Guy Womack, said he was not sure whether Graner would testify for himself.(After the hearing journalists interviewed Graner outside the courtroom, where Graner expressed a positive attitude, saying Whatever happens here is going to happen. I still try to stay positive.((CNNs American Morning Transcript, CNN. Retrieved 2009-03-05.)Testimonystatements began on January 10. During this hearing, witness testimony began. Three soldiers in Graners unit testified; the first was Specialist Matthew Wisdom, who first reported the situation at Abu Ghraib. Wisdom said that Graner had enjoyed beating inmates (saying that he had laughed, whistled, and sung) and was the one who first thought of arranging the prisoners in naked human pyramids and other positions.(Behind Failed Abu Ghraib Plea, a Tangle of Bonds and Betrayals, York Times. Retrieved 2009-03-05.) On this day the judge-advocate Michael Hunter, banned any further reporting of the hearing.(Torture? Not if cheerleaders do it, lawyer claims, Times Online. Retrieved 2009-03-05.)Testimony continued the next day, as Syrian foreign fighter Ameed al-Sheikh told the court in video testimony that Graner has beaten him while he was recovering from a bullet wound. Al-Sheikh described Graner as the primary torturer and said that he had forced him to eat pork, drink alcohol,(Abu Ghraib inmates recall torture, News. Retrieved 2009-03-05.) and thank Jesus for keeping him alive.(THE REACH OF WAR: DETAINEES; Testimony From Abu Ghraib Prisoners Describes a Center of Violence and Fear, York Times. Retrieved 2009-03-05.) Another detainee, Hussein Mutar, testified that Graner had forced him, like al-Sheikh, to eat pork, drink alcohol, and curse Islam. He was also forced to masturbate in public and was one of the men stacked into a pyramid naked.(On January 11, military prosecutors also presented evidence not publicly released, including a video of forced group masturbation and a picture of a female prisoner being forced to show her breasts.(Following ordersThe main defense was that Graner was following orders from, and supervised by, intelligence officers.(Prosecuting Abuse, NewsHour with Jim Lehrer, 2004-05-10. Retrieved 2008-07-07.) Graner and others testified that many senior officers were aware of the activities and actively supported them. This is why he was not worried about taking and distributing the photographs which were later used against him. Referring to military intelligence, Graner testified I nearly beat an MI detainee to death with MI there before Pohl cut him off.()A formal complaint about the abuse was filed by Specialist Matthew Wisdom in November 2003 but was ignored by the military. Private Ivan Frederick (previously convicted of abuse) said he had consulted six senior officers, ranging from captains to lieutenant-colonels, about the guards actions but was never told to stop. Despite this, the prosecution did not call any senior officers to testify. Womack suggests that this was not because they just forgot to do so.(Guard Convicted In the First Trial From Abu Ghraib, Washington Post. Retrieved 2009-03-05.)House Counsel Gonzales had issued a memo which defined torture very narrowly as intentionally causing permanent damage to vital organs or permanent trauma.() This would have excluded Graners acts of intimidation. However the prosecution argued that even if he was following orders from senior officers, he should have known that the orders were illegal.(Soldiers Testify on Orders To Soften Prisoners in Iraq, York Times. Retrieved 2009-03-05.)VerdictOn January 16, Graner was found guilty and sentenced to 10 years imprisonment, reduction in rank to private, a dishonorable discharge, and the loss of all pay and benefits.(Graner gets 10 years for Abu Ghraib abuse, MSNBC. Retrieved 2009-03-05.)Defense lawyer Guy Womack contended that Graner and the six other Abu Ghraib guards charged with abuses were being scapegoated.( For example, the Washington Post reported in 2004 that a torture position known as a Palestinian hanging, where a prisoner is suspended by their hands behind their back, was approved by the Bush administration for use in CIA interrogations (termed an interrogation technique by the CIA).(Torture, American-Style, Washington Post. Retrieved 2009-03-05.)Graners mother, Irma Graner said, You know its the higher-ups that should be on trial... they let the little guys take the fall for them. But the truth will come out eventually.(Australian)Life post-trialFile:USDB2002.jpg|thumb|States Disciplinary BarracksGraner was imprisoned in the States Disciplinary Barracks in Kansas.(CNN Wire Staff. Notorious Abu Ghraib guard released from prison. CNN. August 6, 2011. Retrieved on August 6, 2011.)In 2005, while serving time for his role in the Abu Ghraib scandal, Graner married fellow Abu Ghraib guard Ambuhl. Because she was not permitted to see him for the first 2.5 years of his incarceration, a friend stood in for him during the wedding.( Ambuhl previously pled guilty to two minor charges but served no jail time and was discharged.Upon his release from prison after serving six and one half years of a ten year sentence, Graner and his wife have declined interview requests.(Dishneau, David, Key Figure in Abu Ghraib Abuse Freed From Prison, San Francisco Chronicle, August 6, 2011.) Graner will remain on parole until December 2014.(Dishneau, David, (Associated Press), Abu Ghraib Abuse Ringleader Freed Early From Military Prison, Globe, 7 August 2011.)See also*Operating Procedure (film)Notes and references*Badger, T.A. Jury seated in Graner prisoner abuse case. Associated Press. January 7, 2005.*Cauchon, Dennis. Lawyer wants Rumsfeld to testify in prison-abuse case. USA Today: June 13, 2003.*Fuoco, Michael A., et al. Suspect in prisoner abuse has a history of troubles. Pittsburgh Post-Gazette: May 8, 2004.*Lieberman, Paul, and Dan Morain. Unveiling the Face of the Prison Scandal. Los Angeles Times: June 19, 2004.*Lin, Judy. Soldier target of prior abuse allegations. Associated Press: May 13, 2004.*Peirce, Paul. Graner remains positive before trial. Pittsburg Tribune-Review. January 8, 2005.*Serrano, Richard A., and Greg Miller. Prison intelligence officers scrutinized. The Los Angeles Times: May 23, 2004.External links* Charge SheetGranerGranerGranerGranerGraner
644530
Hanley,_Staffordshire
Hanley, in Staffordshire, England, is one of the six major towns that joined together to form the city of Stoke-on-Trent in 1910. Hanley was the only one of the six towns to be a borough before the merger; its status was transferred to the enlarged borough.  Hanley was incorporated as a borough in 1857 and became a county borough with the passage of the Government Act 1888.It now acts as the citys main city-centre and shopping centre, the principal attraction being the Shopping Centre containing many high street chain stores.HistoryEtymologyThe name Hanley comes from hean lea, meaning high meadow.Garden FestivalThe 1986 Garden Festival led to the reclamation of large areas of land west of the city centre area  including the former Shelton steelworks, which had been derelict since 1978. Ironically, when the Garden Festival closed, the land remained derelict for some time, before being re-developed partly into public parkland and partly for retail and leisure.Coal miningAt one time, there were many coal mines in North Staffordshire. Hanley Deep Pit was opened in 1854. It was the deepest pit in the North Staffordshire coalfield, reaching a depth of 1500 feet. At its peak in the 1930s it employed some 2000 men and boys often producing 9000 tons of coal a year. The pit was closed in 1962 but much of the headgear and spoilheaps were left in situ. Then, in the 1980s, the original site was cleared, landscaped and converted into Hanley Forest Park.(Pictures of Hanley Deep Pit)(History of Hanley Deep Pit from local newspaper extracts)Public transportHanley has a station, on Lichfield Street, with local buses serving much of North Staffordshire, as well as Buxton, Crewe and Stafford. Most services are run by PMT, though there are a number of smaller independent operators. In addition, Express Coaches connect Hanley with destinations including London, Birmingham, Liverpool and Manchester, with additional seasonal services to holiday destinations. As part of the redevelopment of the town and wider city, a new bus interchange will be built on John Street, allowing the current station to be demolished to make room for further redevelopment of the town.Hanley no longer has a railway station but there was once one located on Trinity Street, on the Loop Line, which was opened by the Staffordshire Railway for passengers on July 13, 1864.(The North Staffordshire Railway Rex Christiansen & R. W. Miller. David & Charles Newton Abbot 1971 p. 79) The station survived for 100 years  it was closed in 1964, as part of the Axe, and the land is now a car park.Decline of nameOn 1 April 1910, the town was federated into the county borough of Stoke-on-Trent. By 1925 the area was granted city status.In recent years, there has been a notable decline in the use of the name of Hanley, owing to the towns increasing role as the city centre. Road signs on major roads into and around the city now refer to the area as City centre, although Hanleys name still appears on local road signs. Many documents published by local and national government also refer to the area as the city centre, as does public transport in the region.In 2009,(Stoke-on-Trent City Centre Partnership Business Plan 2009-2010) the City Centre Partnership (a body promoting the development and re-generation of the city centre) proposed officially renaming the town centre (specifically, the area within the ring road) to Stoke-on-Trent City Centre, while keeping the Hanley name for the surrounding area. The Partnership is actively encouraging businesses in the area to remove the name of Hanley from their addresses, and have asked the city council to instruct the Survey to refer to the area as the city centre, instead of Hanley.The reasoning behind these proposals is that while Stoke-on-Trent has been federated for over 100 years, it is still polycentric. In other words, it has the characteristics of (at least) six overlapping towns, instead of a single city. The current situation can also be confusing for visitors to the city, who regularly end up in the town of Stoke-upon-Trent (which has renaming proposals of its own), thinking it is the city centre.These trends and proposals have been met with opposition throughout the city. Residents of Hanley see them as a loss of the towns heritage,(Pits n Pots: Bid to get rid of Hanley) while residents of the other towns in the city see them as promoting Hanley over their respective towns.Cultural sitesHanley also offers several cultural facilities such as The Museum & Art Gallery (a large ceramics collection, and restored Spitfire), the Victoria Hall, the Regent Theatre, Radio Stokes Open Centre and studios, while Piccadilly hosts the annual Fair and French Market events. Hanley is also the location of Stoke Pride, an annual pride event for LGBT people of the city.ReligionChristian Churches and Chapels in Hanley include: Bethesda Town Mission (Jasper Street), Congregational Independent Tabernacle Church (High Street), Elim Church (Bucknall Old Road  corner of Mynors Street, Northwood), Etruria Wesleyan Chapel (Etruria Old Road, Etruria), Holy Trinity C of E (Lower Mayer Street, Northwood), Providence Methodist Church (Junction of Town Road, and Hulton Street), St. Johns C of E (Town Road, Hanley), St. Lukes C of E (Wellington Terrace), St. Marks C of E (Broad Street, Shelton), St. Matthews C of E (Birches Head), Sacred Heart RC (Jasper Street), Trinity Methodist (Keelings Road, Northwood), and St Simon and St Jude (Seaford Street, College (was Victoria) Road, Shelton).Hanley in old Trade JournalsHANLEY a large modern town and chapelry, in the parish of Stoke, is about two miles east by north of Newcastle under-Lyme, and ranks next to Burslem in size, extent and opulence. The town is in an elevated situation, and the streets forming which are irregular, but many of the houses are well built. The chapelry contained, in 1821, 5,622 inhabitants.1828 journalHanley, the most populous town in North Staffordshire, is generally described as the capital of the Potteries, a title to which it has certainly the greatest pretensions; ........ it has during the present century made such strides in the art, as to overtake and pass all competitors. At the census of 1891, the population of the municipal borough reached the total of 54,846; and such is the prosperity of the district, that at the present time this number has been very largely increased.1893 journal *More on Hanley in Trade JournalsNotable people*Alcock, former professional footballer*Bennett, novelist*Matthews, former professional footballer*Edward Smith, captain of the Titanic*Perkin, social historianSee also*Methodist Chapel, HanleyReferencesExternal links*Hanley - one of the Six Towns*The Potteries Museum & Art Gallery, Hanley*Use interactive maps to find historic photographs and objects of old Hanley*Town profile at The Sentinel (local newspaper)(Stoke-on-Trent)fr:Hanleyit:Hanleynl:Hanley(Staffordshire)sv:Hanley
646501
Jack_McCall
known_for      Murder of Bill Hickok, South DakotaJohn Jack McCall (born in 1852 or 1853 in Jefferson County, Kentucky &ndash; died  in Yankton, Territory), known by the nickname Crooked Nose Jack or Broken Nose Jack, was the killer of James Wild Bill Hickok, shooting him from behind, an act that among admirers of Hickok and students of Hickoks history has given rise to the phrase the coward Jack McCall. Life and murder of Hickok Many of the details of McCalls life are lost. He was raised in Kentucky with three sisters but drifted west and became a buffalo hunter. By 1876, he was living in a mining camp called Deadwood, under the alias of Bill Sutherland.On August 2, 1876, in the & Manns #10 Saloon in Deadwood, McCall shot Hickok in the back of the head with a single-action .45-caliber revolver, shouting Take that! Hickok, in contrast to his normal habit of sitting in a corner to protect his back, on that day sat with his back to the door while engaged in a game of poker. The killing was rumored to have been over McCalls drunken resentment of an act of generosity by Hickok, Hickok having offered McCall money to buy breakfast after McCall had lost it all playing poker the previous day. McCall claimed, however, that the killing was retribution for Hickok having previously killed McCalls brother in Kansas. McCall was found innocent after two hours deliberation by an impromptu court in McDaniels Theatre made up of local miners and businessmen, causing the Hills Pioneer to editorialize:Should it ever be our misfortune to kill a man ... we would simply ask that our trial may take place in some of the mining camps of these hills. Escape and retrial McCall then fled town to Wyoming, where he bragged, at length, about the details of how he had killed Hickock in a fair gunfight. Unfortunately for McCall, however, the Wyoming authorities refused to recognize the result of McCalls first trial on the grounds of Deadwood having been in Territory at the time and contended that McCall could legally be tried again. Because Deadwood was an illegal settlement, with no legally constituted law enforcement or court system, the federal court in Yankton, D.T. declared that jeopardy did not apply.He was retried in Yankton, Territory, for Hickoks murder, and was hanged on March 1, 1877 at the age of 24. McCall was the first person to be executed by United States officials in Dakota Territory. In popular culture * Jack McCall was portrayed by Arquette in the 1995 Western Film, Wild Bill. He was also portrayed by Dillahunt in the 2004 HBO television series Deadwood.* Mentioned in the song Ringo by Greene(RINGO by LORNE GREENE, Retrieved on 2010-10-06.) References External links*South Dakota State Historical Society, The 15 Killed in SD Execution List.* Executions in the U.S. 1608-1987: The Espy File (by state) (PDF)McCallMcCallMcCallMcCallMcCallMcCall
648959
History_of_Somerset
altMap of England in pink with the area occupied by Somerset shaded in red|thumb|Ancient extent of SomersetSomerset is a historic county in the south west of England. There is evidence of human occupation since prehistoric times with hand axes and flint points from the Palaeolithic and Mesolithic eras, and a range of mounds, forts and other artifacts dating from the Neolithic, Bronze and Iron Ages. The oldest dated human road work in Great Britain is the Track, constructed across the Somerset Levels with wooden planks in the 39th century BCE.Following the Empires invasion of southern Britain, the mining of lead and silver in the Hills provided a basis for local industry and commerce. Bath became the site of a major Roman fort and city, the remains of which can still be seen. During the Medieval period Somerset was the scene of battles between the Anglo-Saxons against first the Britons and later with the Danes. In this period it was ruled by various kings of Wessex, succeeded by kings of England. Following the defeat of the Anglo-Saxon monarchy by the Normans in 1066, castles were built in Somerset.Expansion of the population and settlements in the county continued during the Tudor and more recent periods. Agriculture and mining expanded until the 18th century, although other industries declined during the industrial revolution. In modern times the population has grown, particularly in the seaside towns, notably Weston-super-Mare. Agriculture continues to be a major business, if no longer a major employer because of mechanisation. Light industries take place in towns such as Bridgwater and Yeovil. The towns of Taunton and Mallet manufacture cider, although the acreage of apple orchards is less than it once was. Palaeolithic and Mesolithic The Palaeolithic and Mesolithic periods saw hunter-gatherers move into the region of Somerset. There is evidence from flint artefacts in a quarry at Westbury that an ancestor of modern man, possibly heidelbergensis, was present in the future Somerset from around 500,000 years ago.() There is still some doubt about whether the artifacts are of human origin but they have been dated within Oxygen Isotope Stage 13 (524,000 - 478,000 BP).() Other experts suggest that many of the bone-rich Pleistocene deposits belong to a single but climatically variable interglacial that succeeded the Cromerian, perhaps about 500,000 years ago. Detailed analysis of the origin and modification of the flint artefacts leads to the conclusion that the assemblage was probably a product of geomorphological processes rather than human work, but a single cut-marked bone suggests a human presence.() Animal bones and artefacts unearthed in the 1980s at Westbury-sub-Mendip, in Somerset, have shown evidence of early human activity approximately 700,000 years ago.()()Homo sapiens sapiens, or modern man came to Somerset during the Early Upper Palaeolithic. There is evidence of occupation of four Mendip caves 35,000 to 30,000 years ago.(The Archaeology of Somerset by C Webster and T Mayberry) During the Last Glacial Maximum, about 25,000 to 15,000 years ago, it is probable that Somerset was deserted as the area experienced tundra conditions. Evidence was found in Cave of deposits of human bone dating from around 12,500 years ago. The bones were defleshed and probably ritually buried though perhaps related to cannibalism being practised in the area at the time or making cups or storage containers.() Somerset was one of the first areas of future England settled following the end of Dryas phase of the last Age c. 8000 BC. Man is the name given to the remains of a human male found in Cave in Gorge. He is Britains oldest complete human skeleton. The remains date to approximately 7150 BC, and it appears that he died a violent death. Somerset is thought to have been occupied by Mesolithic hunter-gatherers from about 6000 BCE with Mesolithic artefacts being found in more than 70 locations. Mendip caves were used as burial places, with between 50 and 100 skeletons being found in Hole. In the Neolithic era, from about 3500 BCE, there is evidence of farming.() At the end of the last Age the Channel was dry land but subsequently the sea level rose, particularly between 1220 and 900 BC and between 800 and 470 BCE, resulting in major coastal changes. The Levels became flooded, but the points such as Glastonbury and Brent Knoll, have a long history of settlement, and are known to have been occupied by Mesolithic hunters.()() The county has prehistoric mounds (such as Littleton Long Barrow), rows (such as the circles at Stanton Drew and Priddy) and settlement sites. Evidence of Mesolithic occupation has come both from the upland areas, such as in Mendip caves, and from the low land areas such as the Levels. Dry points in the latter such as Tor and Brent Knoll, have a long history of settlement with wooden trackways between them. There were also lake villages in the marsh such as those at Lake Village and Meare. One of the oldest dated human road work in Britain is the Track, constructed across the Somerset Levels with wooden planks in the 39th century BC,(()()()() partially on the route of the even earlier Track.()Neolithic, Bronze and Iron AgesImage:Somerset sd stone circle 06.jpg|altLarge stones, some lying and some standing on end in grassy area.|thumb|Drew stone circlesThere is evidence of Exmoors human occupation from Mesolithic times onwards. In the Neolithic period people started to manage animals and grow crops on farms cleared from the woodland, rather than act purely as hunter gatherers.() It is also likely that extraction and smelting of mineral ores to make tools, weapons, containers and ornaments in bronze and then iron started in the late Neolithic and into the Bronze and Ages.()The caves of the Hills were settled during the Neolithic period and contain extensive archaeological sites such as those at Gorge. There are numerous Age Hill Forts, which were later reused in the Dark Ages, such as Cadbury Castle,() Camp() and Ham Hill. The age of the monument at Drew stone circles is unknown, but is believed to be from the Neolithic period.() There is evidence of mining on the Hills back into the late Age when there were technological changes in metal working indicated by the use of lead. There are numerous forts, such as Down Knoll, Hill, Warren and Hill, which seem to have had domestic purposes, not just a defensive role. They generally seem to have been occupied intermittently from the Age onward, some, such as Camp at Cadbury, being refurbished during different eras. Burial Chamber is a Bronze Age burial chamber at Williton which is composed of three round barrows and possibly a long, chambered barrow.()The Age tribes of later Somerset were the Dobunni in north Somerset, Durotriges in south Somerset and Dumnonii in west Somerset. The first and second produced coins, the finds of which allows their tribal areas to be suggested, but the latter did not. All three had a Celtic culture and language. However, Ptolemy stated that Bath was in the territory of the Belgae,() but this may be a mistake.() The Celtic gods were worshipped at the temple of Sulis at Bath and possibly the temple on Down. Iron Age sites on the Hills, include major forts at Dowsborough and Ruborough, as well as smaller earthwork enclosures, such as Ring, Barrows and Camp.RomanBaths in Bath Spa, England - July 2006.jpg|altPhotograph of the Baths showing a rectangular area of greenish water surrounded by yellow stone buildings with pillars. In the background is the tower of the abbey.|thumb|Roman public baths in Bath073 somerset cadbury castle.jpg|altFlat topped hill standing out from the surrounding countryside.|thumb|Cadbury CastleSomerset was part of the Empire from 47 AD to about 409 AD. However, the end was not abrupt and elements of Romanitas lingered on for perhaps a century.Somerset was invaded from the south-east by the Second Legion Augusta, under the future emperor Vespasian. The hillforts of the Durotriges at Ham Hill and Cadbury Castle were captured. Ham Hill probably had a temporary Roman occupation.The massacre at Cadbury Castle seems to have been associated with the later Boudiccan Revolt of 60-61 AD.( The county remained part of the Empire until around 409 AD.()The Roman invasion, and possibly the preceding period of involvement in the internal affairs of the south of England, was inspired in part by the potential of the Hills. A great deal of the attraction of the lead mines may have been the potential for the extraction of silver.(()Forts were set up at Bath and Ilchester. The lead and silver mines at Charterhouse in the Hills were run by the military. The Romans established a defensive boundary along the new military road known the Way (from the Latin fossa meaning ditch). The Fosse Way ran through Bath, Mallet, Ilchester and south-west towards Axminster. The road from Dorchester ran through Yeovil to meet the Fosse Way at Ilchester. Small towns and trading ports were set up, such as Camerton and Combwich. The larger towns decayed in the latter part of the period, though the smaller ones appear to have decayed less. In the latter part of the period, Ilchester seems to have been a civitas capital and Bath may also have been one.( Particularly to the east of the Parrett, villas were constructed. However, only a few Roman sites have been found to the west of the river. The villas have produced important mosaics and artifacts. Cemeteries have been found outside the Roman towns of Somerset and by temples such as that at Lamyatt.( Romano-British farming settlements, such as those at Catsgore and Sigwells, have been found in Somerset. There was salt production on the Levels near Highbridge and quarrying took place near Bath, where the Roman Baths gave their name to Bath.()Excavations carried out before the flooding of Valley Lake also uncovered Roman remains, indicating agricultural and industrial activity from the second half of the 1st century until the 3rd century AD. The finds included a moderately large villa at Chew Park,() where wooden writing tablets (the first in the UK) with ink writing were found. There is also evidence from the Hill Roman Temple at Stoke.(() In October 2001 the Bagborough Hoard of 4th century Roman silver was discovered in Bagborough. The 681 coins included two denarii from the early 2nd century and 8 Miliarense and 671 Siliqua all dating to the period AD 337  367. The majority were struck in the reigns of emperors II and Julian and derive from a range of mints including Arles and Lyons in France, Trier in Germany and Rome.()In April 2010, the Hoard, one of the largest-ever hoards of Roman coins discovered in Britain, was found by a metal detectorist. The hoard of 52,500 coins dated from the 3rd century AD and was found buried in a field near Frome, in a jar  below the surface.() The coins were excavated by archaeologists from the Antiquities Scheme.()Sub-Roman periodThis is the period from about 409 AD to the start of Saxon political control, which was mainly in the late 7th century, though they are said to have captured the Bath area in 577 AD.() Initially the Britons of Somerset seem to have continued much as under the Romans but without the imperial taxation and markets. There was then a period of war in Britain though it is not known how this affected Somerset. The Western Wandsdyke may have been constructed in this period but archaeological data shows that it was probably built during the 5th or 6th century. This area became the border between the Romano-British Celts and the West Saxons following the of Deorham in 577 AD.(The Anglo-Saxon Chronicle, 501-97 AD.) The ditch is on the north side, so presumably it was used by the Celts as a defence against Saxons encroaching from the upper Valley. According to the Chronicle, the Saxon Cenwalh achieved a breakthrough against the British Celtic tribes, with victories at Bradford-on-Avon (in the Avon Gap in the Wansdyke) in 652 AD,(The Anglo-Saxon Chronicle, 645-56 AD) and further south at the of Peonnum (at Penselwood) in 658 AD,(The Anglo-Saxon Chronicle, 658-75 AD) followed by an advance west through the Hills to the Parrett.(The Victoria History of the County of Somerset, Vol 1 (1906))The Saxon advance from the east seems to have been halted by battles between the British and Saxons, for example; at the siege of Badon Badonicus (which may mave been in the Bath region e.g. at Hill),() or Down.() During the 5th, 6th and 7th centuries, Somerset was probably partly in the Kingdom of Dumnonia, partly in the land of the Durotriges and partly in that of the Dobunni.( The boundaries between these is largely unknown, but may have been similar to those in the Age. Various tyrants seem to have controlled territories from reoccupied hill forts. There is evidence of an elite at hill forts such as Cadbury Castle and Camp; for example, there is imported pottery. Cemeteries are an important source of evidence for the period and large ones have been found in Somerset, such as that at Cannington, which was used from the Roman to the Saxon period. The towns of Somerset seem to have been little used during that period but there continued to be farming on the villa sites and at the Romano-British villages.There may have been effects from plague and volcanic eruption during this period as well as marine transgression into the Levels.The language spoken during this period is thought to be Brythonic,() but only one or two inscribed stones survive in Somerset from this period. However, a couple of curse tablets found in the baths at Bath may be in this language. Some place names in Somerset seem to be Celtic in origin and may be from this period or earlier, e.g. Tarnock. Some river names, such as Parrett, may be Celtic or pre-Celtic. The religion of the people of Somerset in this period is thought to be Christian but it was isolated from Rome until after the of Hertford in 673 AD when Aldhelm was asked to write a letter to Geraint of Dumnonia and his bishops. Some church sites in Somerset are thought to date from this period, e.g., Llantokay Street.Most of what is known of the history of this period comes from Gildass On the Ruin of Britain,() which is thought to have been written in Durotrigan territory, possibly at Glastonbury.The earliest fortification of Taunton started for King of Wessex and thelburg, in or about the year 710 AD. However, according to the Chronicle this was destroyed 12 years later.()Early MediaevalImage:Wells Cathedral North side.jpg|altStone building seen above surrounding trees. There are three towers the central one is more ornate and higher than the other two|thumb|Cathedral &ndash; the first church on this site was built in 705 ADThis is the period from the late 7th century (for most of Somerset) to 1066, though for part of the 10th and 11th centuries England was under Danish control. Somerset, like Dorset to the south, held the West Saxon advance from Wiltshire/Hampshire back for over a century, remaining a frontier between the Saxons and the Romano-British Celts.()The Saxons conquered Bath following the of Deorham in 577, and the border was probably established along the line of the Wansdyke to the north of the Hills. Then of Wessex broke through at Bradford-on-Avon in 652, and the of Peonnum possibly at Penselwood in 658, advancing west through the Hills to the Parrett.() In 661 the Saxons may have advanced into what is now Devon as a result of a battle fought at Postesburh, possibly Posbury near Crediton.Then in the period 681&ndash;85 of Wessex conquered King Cadwaladr and advanced as far as the sea, but it is not clear where this was. It is assumed that the Saxons occupied the rest of Somerset about this time. The Saxon rule was consolidated under King Ina, who established a fort at Taunton, demolished by his wife in 722. It is sometimes said that he built palaces at Somerton and Petherton but this does not seem to be the case. He fought against Geraint in 710. In 705 the diocese of Sherborne was formed, taking in Wessex west of Selwood. Saxon kings granted land in Somerset by charter from the 7th century onward. The way and extent to which the Britons survived under the Saxons is a debatable matter. However, King Inas laws make provision for Britons. Somerset originally formed part of Wessex and latter became a separate shire. Somersetshire seems to have been formed within Wessex during the 8th century though it is not recorded as a name until later. Mints were set up at times in various places in Somerset in the Saxon period, e.g., Watchet.Somerset played an important part in defeating the spread of the Danes in the 9th century. Viking raids took place for instance in 987 and 997 at Watchet() and the of Cynwit. King Alfred was driven to seek refuge from the Danes at Athelney before defeating them at the of Ethandun in 878, usually considered to be near Wiltshire, but possibly the village of Edington in Somerset. Alfred established a series of forts and lookout posts linked by a military road, or Herepath, so his army could cover Viking movements at sea. The Herepath has a characteristic form which is familiar on the Quantocks: a regulation 20 m wide track between avenues of trees growing from laying embankments. The Herepath ran from the ford on the Parrett at Combwich, past Cannington hill fort to Stowey, where it climbed the Quantocks along the line of the current Stowey road, to Crowcombe Park Gate. Then it went south along the ridge, to Triscombe Stone. One branch may have led past Lydeard Hill and Buncombe Hill, back to Alfreds base at Athelney. The main branch descended the hills at Triscombe, then along the avenue to Red Post Cross, and west to the Hills and Exmoor.(Greswell, W. H. P. (1922) Dumnonia and the Valley of the Parret) A peace treaty with the Danes was signed at Wedmore and the Danish king the Old was baptised at Aller. Burhs (fortified places) had been set up by 919, such as Lyng. The Jewel, an object about 2.5 inch long, made of filigree gold, cloisonn-enamelled and with a rock crystal covering, was found in 1693 at Petherton Park, Petherton.() Believed to have been owned by the Great() it is thought to have been the handle for a pointer that would have fit into the hole at its base and been used while reading a book.Monasteries and minster churches were set up all over Somerset, with daughter churches from the minsters in manors. There was a royal palace at Cheddar, which was used at times in the 10th century to host the Witenagemot,() and there is likely to have been a central place at Somerton, Bath, Glastonbury and Frome since the kings visited them. The towns of Somerset seem to have been in occupation in this period though evidence for this is limited because of subsequent buildings on top of remains from this period. Agriculture flourished in this period, with a re-organisation into centralised villages in the latter part in the east of the county.In the period before the Conquest, Somerset came under the control of the Danish Godwin family. There seems to have been some Danish settlement at Thurloxton and Spaxton, judging from the place-names. After the Conquest, the county was divided into 700 fiefs, and large areas were owned by the crown,() with fortifications such as Castle used for control and defence.This period of Somersets history is well documented, for example in the Chronicle and Assers Life of Alfred.()Later MediaevalImage:Dunster.jpg|altStreet scene with houses and shops on the left and an octagonal structure has a central stone pier which supports a heavy timber framework which carries a slate roof with central wooden lantern surmounted by a weather vane. In the distance is a castle.|thumb|Dunster yarn market and castleThis is the period from 1066 to around 1500. The county of Somerset was a Norman creation. Following the defeat of the Saxons by the Normans in 1066, various castles were set up in Somerset by the new lords such as that at Dunster, and the manors was awarded to followers of the Conquerer such as de Moyon and of Douai.() Somerset does not seem to have played much part in the civil war in King Stephens time, but Somerset lords were main players in the murder of Becket.A good picture of the county in 1086 is given by Book, though there is some difficulty in identifying the various places since the hundreds are not specified.()() The total population given for the county, which had different boundaries to those today, was 13,399, however this only included the heads of households, so with their families this may have been around 67,000.() Farming seems to have prospered for the next three centuries but was severely hit by the Death which in 1348 arrived in Dorset and quickly spread through Somerset, causing widespread mortality, perhaps as much as 50% in places. It re-occurred, resulting in a change in feudal practices since the manpower was no longer so available.Reclamation of land from marsh in the Levels increased, largely under monastic influence. Crafts and industries also flourished, the Somerset woollen industry being one of the largest in England at this time.() New towns were founded in this period in Somerset, i.e. Newport, but were not successful. mining on the Mendips was an important source of wealth while quarrying also took place, an example is near Bath.The towns grew, again often by monastic instigation, during this period and fairs were started. The church was very powerful at this period, particularly Abbey. After their church burnt down, the monks there discovered the tomb of King Arthur and were able rebuild their church. There were over 20 monasteries in Somerset at this period including the priory at Charterhouse which was founded in 1232 by Ela, Countess of Salisbury who also founded Abbey.() Many parish churches were re-built in this period. Between 1107 and 1129 Giffard the Chancellor of King Henry I, converted the bishops hall in Taunton into Castle. It was his successor, of Blois, who transformed the manor-house here into a mighty castle in 1138.() Castle was built in 1202 by William Brewer.() It passed to the king in 1233() and in 1245 repairs were ordered to its motte and towers. During the 11th century Barons War against Henry III, Bridgwater was held by the barons against the King. In the Civil War the town and the castle were held by the Royalists under Colonel Sir Francis Wyndham. Eventually, with many buildings destroyed in the town, the castle and its valuable contents were surrendered to the Parliamentarians. The castle itself was deliberately destroyed in 1645.During the Ages sheep farming for the wool trade came to dominate the economy of Exmoor. The wool was spun into thread on isolated farms and collected by merchants to be woven, fulled, dyed and finished in thriving towns such as Dunster. The land started to be enclosed and from the 17th century onwards larger estates developed, leading to establishment of areas of large regular shaped fields. During this period a Forest and hunting ground was established, administered by the Warden. The Royal Forest was sold off in 1818.(In the medieval period the Parrett was used to transport Hamstone from the quarry at Ham Hill,()  Bridgwater was part of the of Bristol until the Port of Bridgwater was created in 1348,( covering  of the Somerset coast line, from the Devon border to the mouth of the River Axe.(Lawrence, J.F. (revised and completed by Lawrence, J.C.) (2005). A History of Bridgwater. Chichester: Phillimore. ISBN 1-86077-363-X. Chapter 8: The Medieval Port of Bridgwater.)() Historically, the main port on the river was at Bridgwater; the river being bridged at this point, with the first bridge being constructed in 1200 AD.() Quays were built in 1424; with another quay, the Langport slip, being built in 1488 upstream of the Town Bridge.( A House was sited at Bridgwater, on West Quay; and a dock, launching slips and a boat yard on East Quay.() The river was navigable, with care, to Bridgwater Town Bridge by  vessels.() By trans-shipping into barges at the Town Bridge the Parrett was navigable as far as Langport and (via the River Yeo) to Ilchester.Early ModernImage:Montacute House front Apr 2002.JPG|altFacade of house built of yellow stone. Three floors with large, mullioned windows and Dutch gables to the roof.|thumb|HouseThis is the period from around 1500 to 1800. In the 1530s, the monasteries were dissolved and their lands bought from the king by various important families in Somerset. By 1539, Abbey was the only monastery left, its abbot Richard Whiting was then arrested and executed on the orders of Thomas Cromwell. From the Tudor to the Georgian times, farming specialised and techniques improved, leading to increases in population, although no new towns seem to have been founded. Large country houses such as at St George and House were built at this time.The Bristol Channel floods of 1607 are believed to have affected large parts of the Levels with flooding up to  above sea level.()() In 1625, a House of Correction was established in Mallet and, today, HMP Shepton Mallet is Englands oldest prison still in use.()( Also in updated form as a CD-ROM (2001), see Shepton Mallet Prison: 390 years of prison regime)During the Civil War, Somerset was largely Parliamentarian, although Dunster was a Royalist stronghold. The county was the site of important battles between the Royalists and the Parliamentarians, notably the of Lansdowne in 1643 and the of Langport in 1645.() Castle had fallen into ruin by 1600 but it was repaired during the Civil War.( The castle changed hands several times during  1642-45 along with the town.() During the of Taunton it was defended by Robert Blake, from July 1644 to July 1645. After the war, in 1662, the keep was demolished and only the base remains.( This war resulted in castles being destroyed to prevent their re-use.()In 1685, the Duke of Monmouth led the Rebellion in which Somerset people fought against James II. The rebels landed at Regis and travelled north hoping to capture Bristol and Bath, puritan soldiers damaged the west front of Cathedral, tore lead from the roof to make bullets, broke the windows, smashed the organ and the furnishings, and for a time stabled their horses in the nave.() They were defeated in the of Sedgemoor at Westonzoyland, the last battle fought on English soil.() The Assizes which followed saw the losers being sentenced to death or transportation.()The Society of Friends established itself in Street in the mid-17th century, and among the close-knit group of Quaker families were the Clarks: Cyrus started a business in sheepskin rugs, later joined by his brother James, who introduced the production of woollen slippers and, later, boots and shoes.() Clark still has its headquarters in Street, but shoes are no longer manufactured there. Instead, in 1993, redundant factory buildings were converted to form Village, the first purpose-built factory outlet in the United Kingdom.() The 18th century was largely one of peace and declining industrial prosperity in Somerset. The Revolution in the Midlands and Northern England spelt the end for most of Somersets cottage industries. However, farming continued to flourish, with the Bath and West of England Agricultural Society being founded in 1777 to improve methods. John Billingsley conducted a survey of the countys agriculture in 1795 but found that methods could still be improved.()Arthur Wellesley took his title, Duke of Wellington from the town of Wellington. He is commemorated on a nearby hill with a large, spotlit obelisk, known as the Wellington Monument.In north Somerset, mining in the coalfield was an important industry, and in an effort to reduce the cost of transporting the coal the Coal Canal was built; part of it was later converted into a railway.() Other canals included the and Taunton Canal, Canal, Western Canal, Canal and Canal.( The and Somerset Canal was proposed, but very little of it was ever constructed.Late ModernImage:West Somerset Railway.jpg|altSteam locomotive (number 80136) with carriages at station platform.|thumb|Somerset RailwayThe 19th century saw improvements to Somersets roads with the introduction of turnpikes and the building of canals and railways. The usefulness of the canals was short-lived, though they have now been restored for recreation. The railways were nationalised after the World War, but continued until 1965, when smaller lines were scrapped; two were transferred back to private ownership as heritage lines.In 1889, County Council was created, replacing the administrative functions of the Sessions.The population of Somerset has continued to grow since 1800, when it was 274,000,() particularly in the seaside towns such as Weston-super-Mare. Some population decline occurred earlier in the period in the villages, but this has now been reversed, and by 1951 the population of Somerset was 551,000.(Chard claims to be the birthplace of flight, as it was here in 1848 that the Victorian aeronautical pioneer Stringfellow first demonstrated that engine-powered flight was possible through his work on the Steam Carriage.()() Petherton was the first town in England (and one of the few ever) to be lit by acetylene gas lighting, supplied by the North Petherton Rosco Acetylene Company. Street lights were provided in 1906. Acetylene was replaced in 1931 by coal gas produced in Bridgwater, as well as by the provision of an electricity supply.()Around the 1860s, at the height of the iron and steel era, a pier and a deep-water dock were built, at Portishead, by the Bristol & Portishead Pier and Railway to accommodate the large ships that had difficulty in reaching Harbour.()() The power stations were coal-fed stations built next to the dock. Construction work started on Portishead A power station in 1926. It began generating electricity in 1929 for the Bristol Corporations Electricity Department.()() In 1951, and Wilson built a chemical works on the opposite side of the dock from the power stations. The chemical works produced white phosphorus from phosphate rock imported, through the docks, into the UK.() The onset of new generating capacity at Pembroke (oil-fired) and Didcot (coal-fired) in the mid-1970s brought about the closure of the older, less efficient A Station. The newer of the two power stations (B Station) was converted to burn oil when the Somerset coalfields closed.() and it has now been developed into a marina and residential area.During the World War hundreds of Somerset soldiers were killed, and war memorials were put up in most of the towns and villages; only a few villages escaped casualties. There were also casualties &ndash; though much fewer &ndash; during the Second World War, who were added to the memorials. The county was a base for troops preparing for the 1944 D-Day landings, and some Somerset hospitals still date partly from that time. The Ordnance Factory Bridgwater was constructed early in War II for the Ministry of Supply. It was designed as an ROF, to produce RDX, which was then a new experimental high-explosive.(Cocroft, Wayne D. (2000). Dangerous Energy: The archaeology of gunpowder and military explosives manufacture. Swindon: English Heritage. ISBN 1-85074-718-0) It obtained water supplies from two sources via the Levels: the artificial Huntspill River which was dug during the construction of the factory and also from the Sedgemoor Drain, which was widened at the same time.(Williams, Michael. (1970). The Draining of the Somerset Levels. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0-521-07486-X.) The Stop Line was set up to resist a potential German invasion, and the remains of its pill boxes can still be seen, as well as others along the coast.() A decoy town was constructed on Black Down, intended to represent the blazing lights of a town which had neglected to follow the black-out regulations.( Sites in the county housed Prisoner of War camps including: Fitzwarren, Barwick, Brockley, Goathurst and Wells. Various airfields were built or converted from civilian use including: Charlton Horethorne (HMS Heron II), Weston-super-Mare, Yeovilton (HMS Heron), Airport, Weston Zoyland, Merryfield, Culmhead and Charmy Down.()Exmoor was one of the first British National Parks, designated in 1954, under the 1949 Parks and Access to the Countryside Act.() and is named after its main river. It was expanded in 1991 and in 1993 Exmoor was designated as an Sensitive Area. The Hills were designated as an of Outstanding Natural Beauty (AONB) in 1956, the first such designation in England under the Parks and Access to the Countryside Act 1949. The Hills followed with AONB designation in 1972.()Point A nuclear power station was a Magnox station constructed between 1957 and 1962 and operating until ceasing generation in 2000.() Hinkley Point B is an Advanced Gas-cooled Reactor (AGR) which was designed to generate 1250 MW of electricity (MWe). Construction of Hinkley Point B started in 1967. In September 2008 it was announced, by de France (EDF), that a third, twin-unit Pressurized Reactor (EPR) reactor known as Hinkley Point C is planned,() to replace Hinkley Point B which is due for closure in 2016.()Somerset today has only two small cities, Bath and Wells, and only small towns in comparison with other areas of England. Tourism is a major source of employment along the coast, and in Bath and Cheddar for example. Other attractions include Exmoor, Somerset Railway, Motor Museum and the Air Arm Museum as well as the churches and the various National Trust and Heritage properties in Somerset.Agriculture continues to be a major business, if no longer a major employer because of mechanisation. Light industries take place in towns such as Bridgwater and Yeovil. The towns of Taunton and Mallet manufacture cider, although the number of apple orchards has reduced.In the late 19th century the boundaries of Somerset were slightly altered, but the main change came in 1974 when the county of Avon was set up. The northern part of Somerset was removed from the administrative control of County Council. On abolition of the county of Avon in 1996, these areas became separate administrative authorities, Somerset and and North East Somerset.() The for Communities and Local Government was considering a proposal by Somerset County Council to change Somersets administrative structure by abolishing the five districts to create a Somerset unitary authority. The changes were planned to be implemented no later than 1 April 2009.() However, support for the county councils bid was not guaranteed and opposition among the district council and local population was strong; 82% of people responding to a referendum organised by the five district councils rejected the proposals.() It was confirmed in July 2007 that the government had rejected the proposals for unitary authorities in Somerset, and that the present two-tier arrangements of Somerset County Council and the district councils will remain.( See also * Somerset**of tourist attractions in Somerset**of Somerset history* Hill forts in Somerset* History of Somerset* of Somerset* of England* of the Anglo-Saxon invasion and takeover of Britain.* of places in Somerset* of Sites of Special Scientific Interest in Somerset References Further reading* * *  External links * Aspects of Somerset History* Victoria County History of Somerset* Somerset Archives and Record Service* Somerset Archaeology and Natural History Service* The Aggregate Landscape of Somerset: Predicting the Archaeological Resource* The history and antiquities of Somersetshire, vol. 1 (183638)* The history and antiquities of Somersetshire, vol. 2 (1839)
651450
Norman_Nicholson
Norman Cornthwaite Nicholson OBE, (8 January 1914  30 May 1987), was an English poet, known for his association with the Cumberland town of Millom. His poetry is noted for its local concerns, straightforwardness of language and inclusion of elements of common speech.LifeNicholson was born in 14 St Georges Terrace, a Victorian terraced house and outfitters shop in the small industrial town of Millom in Cumberland, on the edge of the District. He lived in the same house for most of his life and moved from his home only when he needed treatment for pulmonary tuberculosis aged 16, being away for two years in a Hampshire sanatorium. He wore large and distinctive side whiskers which gave him a slightly eccentric air. His writing career stretched from the 1930s up until his death in 1987. He was awarded the Queens Gold Medal for Poetry in 1977, and the OBE in 1981. His works include the typically titled Rock Face (1948) and the later Sea to the West (1981). He is chiefly known for his poetry but was the author of many works in other forms; novels, plays, essays, topography and criticism.WorkNicholsons work is characterised by the simplicity and directness of his language. He attempted to write in the vernacular of the common people in his native town. Much of his work concerned mining, quarrying and ironworksthe dominant industries in his area. Religion and faith were another aspect of his work. His poetry also abounds with direct quotations from everyday life, skilfully woven into the body of the poem. The opening of Old Man at a Cricket Match, is typical:Its mending worse. He said,Bending west his head ... Nicholson is not generally associated with any of the poetic movements of the twentieth century. Rather, like Causley, he seems to be considered more of an isolated figure, working on his poetry outside of the mainstream of poetic trends. Perhaps because of this, Nicholsons work has received relatively little critical attention. He is not without his admirers though. Heaney has said Nicholsons diction and images realise the texture and pieties of a whole way of life. A domestic world of bereavements and nostalgias, riddles and catch-phrases, is caught in poems that are half-humorous, half-melancholy written in a relaxed and colloquial style. Nicholson was the subject of a Bank Show broadcast in the Kingdom on 4 November 1984.Publications (selected)LegacyMillom Library and the Rylands University Library, Manchester have bronze busts of Nicholson by Joan Palmer. A memorial stained glass window created by Christine Boyce can be found in Georges Church, Millom.;ArchiveNicholsons papers are in the John Rylands University Library, Manchester.();ExhibitionMillom Heritage Museum And Visitor Centre houses information about Norman Nicholson, as well a drift mine exhibit.;LibraryNicholsons personal collection of published poetry was acquired by the John Rylands University Library, Manchester from his family.();ResidenceNorman Nicholsons home at 14 St Georges Terrace has become a health food shop and caf with a blue plaque commemorating Nicholson above the door.;Norman Nicholson SocietyThe Norman Nicholson Society was inaugurated in Millom, Cumbria on 31st March 2006 with the intention of celebrating and promoting the work of this distinguished writer as widely as possible. Lord Melvyn Bragg is the Honorary President. The Society aims to be a focal point for appreciation and research and intends to encourage the publication of any Nicholsons works which are currently out of print. Talks and events are arranged throughout the year and a newsletter, Comet, is published and distributed free to members. Comet contains articles on Nicholsons life and work, information about events and original material from members. Contributors to Comet have included U. A. Fanthorpe, Neil Curry, Matt Simpson and David Cooper. Contributions relevant to Nicholsons life and work are invited by the editor, Antoinette Fawcett.ReferencesExternal links* Nicholson in Millom* Five Norman Nicholson poems (one previously unpublished) read by Neil Curry* Location of Nicholsons house* Official Millom websiteNicholson
653341
Greymouth
longEW            EGreymouth (; ) is the largest town in the West Coast region in the Island of Zealand, and the seat of the District Council. The population of the whole Grey District is , which accounts for R/R*100|0}}% of the West Coasts inhabitants. The Greymouth urban area had an estimated population of  The District Council expects growth of 1.5% per year between 2006 and 2016.(Key assumptions... (from the Long Term Community Outcomes Plan: 2006-2016, amended June 2007)) Location The town is located at the mouth of the Grey River, on a narrow coastal plain close to the foot of the Alps. In clear weather, Cook can be clearly seen to the south from near the town. The mouth of the river divides the town into three areas: Blaketown, close to the rivers mouth on the south bank; Karoro, to the southeast, separated from Blaketown by a series of small estuarine lakes; and Cobden, formerly a separate town, on the rivers north bank.Greymouth is on State Highway 6, which connects it with Hokitika in the south and Westport in the north. It also stands at the terminus of State Highway 7,  which runs through Dobson and Reefton, eventually reaching North Canterbury and its junction with State Highway 1 at Waipara (55 km north of Christchurch) via Pass.Highway 73 is accessed just 20 kilometers south of Greymouth, which is the most direct route to or from Christchurch.The town is also the western terminus of the Midland line from Christchurch. Large coal trains often operate from Greymouth on this line to Christchurch. The famous TranzAlpine train also terminates at Greymouth. History Mori had lived in Greymouth for considerable time before European settlement, and called the area Mawhera (for wide spread river mouth,(Greymouth (from New Zealand, the official New Zealand tourism agency)) still an alternative name for the Grey River). The first European to visit the site of what is now Greymouth was Brunner in 1846. Brunner discovered coal in the Grey valley, and several places in the region (notably the town of Brunner and Brunner) bear his name. Brunner himself named the Grey River after prominent 19th century New Zealand politician Sir George Grey.( Together with gold, coal mining was a major impetus in the towns early European history.(From 1853 until the abolition of provinces in 1876, Greymouth was first part of Province (the West Coast part of the Province was known as West Canterbury) and then part of an independent Province. However Cobden, on the north (or right) bank of the Grey River was a part of Province from 1853 to 1876. At one point in this period Greymouth tried to join Province but this movement was ultimately unsuccessful.thumb|300px|Greymouth in 1924Image:Fisherman Statue In Greymouth.jpg|thumb|right|Fisherman statue on the seawall.Greymouth has a history of coal and gold mining. When the mining industry started to decline, forestry became a new staple industry. Fishing has long been important to the town, despite the fact that the entrance to the Grey River has two notoriously dangerous sandbars; an inner and outer bar.Greymouth also has an historic World War II gun emplacement at Cobden. The Grey District Council destroyed part of this site, without consultation, in 2007 to make way for a sewer line.(Cobden Coastal Defence Gun Emplacement (from the nzrifle.com website. Accessed 2008-01-16.))On 10 March 2005, a major tornado, which started as a waterspout, made landfall in Blaketown, a suburb of Greymouth. It quickly moved through the town passing just south of the main town centre. The tornado was one of the largest reported in recent history in the West Coast region and caused millions of dollars in damage and injured several people.()On 19 November 2010, there was an explosion at the Pike River Mine, trapping 29 miners.() Attempts to rescue the trapped miners were repeatedly delayed due to high levels of methane gas until a second explosion on the 24th November was believed to dash all hope of survival for the miners.() Economy The towns major industries include fishing, mining, forestry, and ecotourism, the latter two of these industries holding an uneasy relationship with each other. The Pancake Rocks at Punakaiki, 45 km to the north are a popular local tourist attraction, while many also pass through on the route to or from the glaciers to the south.Greymouth is also known for its Pounamu (Greenstone, a form of Jade) carving industry which goes back to Mori origins.( The town also has a local brewery, Monteiths, which produces beer since 1868,(Greymouth / Blackball (from the Tourism West Coast website)) now sold countrywide.The planned opening of the River mine in early 2008 spurred new investments into upgrading port facilities at the town.(How the West was won:Pike River on track - New Zealand Construction News, Volume 2, Issues 3, July 2007) Without the development, a closure of the port had been mooted, and hopes are now that the coal barges travelling to and from reshipment facilities in Taranaki can also carry containerised cargo to the town. The opening of the new mine, as well as the planned Spring Creek mine, was called the biggest investment happening in the area for a hundred years.()EducationThere are four schools in the central Greymouth area, and other schools in the suburbs or adjoining areas of Blaketown, Cobden and Karoro.High School is a secondary (years 9-13) school with a roll of 655.() Main School is a full primary (years 1-8) school with a roll of 407.()John Paul II High School is a secondary (years 9-13) school with a roll of 138.() The school was formed in 1980 from the merger of Marist Brothers Boys School and St Marys High School.() St Patricks School is a full primary (years 1-8) school with a roll of 135.() Both are state integrated Catholic schools. The schools are adjacent to each other and have a shared Board of Trustees.()()All these schools are coeducational, and have decile ratings of 3 to 5.See also* of regions in New Zealand* Authorities of New Zealand. References Image:Greymouth Beaches Mount Cook.jpg|thumb|right|Cook and other mountains from Greymouths beach.External links* The district councils website* Greymouth Street Map* Photo of the road and rail bridges c1930 * Photo of SS Opouri off Greymouth bar c1948  da:Greymouthde:Greymouthes:Greymoutheo:Greymouthfr:Greymouthja:ko:it:Greymouthmi:Mwheranl:Greymouthno:Greymouthpl:Greymouthpt:Greymouthru:fi:Greymouthsv:Greymouth
656479
Skidoo,_California
 refnum74000349footnotes               Skidoo (formerly, Hoveck)() is an unincorporated community in Inyo County, California.( It lies at an elevation of 5689 feet (1734 m).( Skidoo is a virtual town located in Valley National Park. It is on the Register of Historic PlacesHistorySkidoo was famous in the first decade of the 20th century when gold had been found in the area. Within a decade the town had been abandoned, however, and now no standing structures remain. Skidoos desert location is visited by ghost town aficionados.Skidoo is representative of the boom towns that flourished in Death Valley during the early 20th century. The towns livelihood depended primarily on the output of the Skidoo Mine, a venture operating between 1906 and 1917. During those years the mine produced about 75,000 ounces of gold, worth at the time more than $1.5 million. Two unique items are associated with Skidoos mining heyday. First the town possessed the only milling plant in the desert operated almost completely by water power. Second, the construction of the water pipeline was a phenomenal engineering feat; its scar can still be seen between its origin near Telescope Peak and the mill site.The fifteen-stamp amalgamation and cyanide mill built by the Skidoo Mines Company is a rare surviving example of an early 20th c. gravity-feed system for separating gold from its ore.()Names The name Skidoo comes from the expression 23 skidoo, a slang expression of the time, for which various origins(Phrases.org.uk) have been suggested.The Hoveck post office opened in 1906, changed its name to Skidoo in 1907, and closed in 1917.( The name Hoveck honored Matt Hoveck, manager of the Skidoo Mine.(See also*of ghost towns in CaliforniaFile:SiteofSkidoo.jpg|thumb|left|300px|Site of Skidoo - Valley National Park.References External links *N.P.S.: Death Valley Ghost Towns pl:Skidoo
658511
Eco-industrial_park
Image:View from Asnaes power station Kalundborg Denmark.jpg|300px|right|thumb|View of the Eco-industrial ParkAn eco-industrial park (EIP) is an park in which businesses cooperate with each other and with the local community in an attempt to reduce waste and pollution, efficiently share resources (such as information, materials, water, energy, infrastructure, and resources), and help achieve development, with the intention of increasing economic gains and improving environmental quality. An EIP may also be planned, designed, and built in such a way that it makes it easier for businesses to co-operate, and that results in a more financially sound, environmentally friendly project for the developer.The Eco-industrial Park Handbook(Lowe, Ernest A. 2001. Eco-industrial Park Handbook for Asian Developing Countries. A Report to Asian Development Bank, Environment Department, Indigo Development, Oakland, CA) states thatAn Eco-Industrial Park is a community of manufacturing and service businesses located together on a common property. Members seek enhanced environmental, economic, and social performance through collaboration in managing environmental and resource issues.Based on the concepts of ecology, collaborative strategies not only include synergy (waste-to-feed exchanges), but can also take the form of wastewater cascading, shared logistics and shipping & receiving facilities, shared parking, green technology purchasing blocks, multi-partner building retrofit, energy systems, and local education & resource centres. This is an application of a approach, in which designs and processes/activities are integrated to address multiple objectives.EIPs can be developed as land projects, where the eco-industrial intent is present throughout the planning, design and site construction phases, or developed through retrofits and new strategies in existing industrial developments.Examples250px|right|thumb|Example of Industrial Symbiosis. Waste steam from a waste incinerator (right) is piped to an ethanol plant (left) where it is used as in input to their production process.symbiosis is a related but more limited concept in which companies in a region collaborate to utilize each others by-products and otherwise share resources. In  Kalundborg, Denmark a symbiosis network links a 1500MW coal fired power plant with the community and other companies.  Surplus heat from this power plant is used to heat 3500 local homes in addition to a nearby farm, whose sludge is then sold as a fertilizer.  Steam from the power plant is sold to Nordisk, a pharmaceutical and enzyme manufacturer, in addition to a Statoil plant.  This reuse of heat reduces the amount pollution discharged to a nearby fjord.  Additionally, a by-product from the power plants dioxide scrubber contains gypsum, which is sold to a wallboard manufacturer.  Almost all of the manufacturers gypsum needs are met this way, which reduces the amount of mining needed.  Furthermore, ash and clinker from the power plant is utilized for road building and cement production.(J. Ehrenfeld and N. Gertler(1997), Industrial Ecology in Practice. The Evolution of Interdependence at Kalundborg,Journal of Industrial Ecology, 1:1, pp 6779)The industrial symbiosis at Kalundborg was not created as a top-down initiative, but instead evolved gradually.  As environmental regulations became stricter, firms were motivated reduce the cost of compliance, and turn their by-products into economic products.In Canada, eco-industrial parks exist across the country and have enjoyed some success. The best known example is Burnside Park, in Halifax, Nova Scotia. With support from Universitys Eco-Efficiency Centre,(http://eco-efficiency.management.dal.ca/About_Us/) the more than 1,500 businesses have been improving their environmental performance and developing profitable partnerships. Subsequently, two greenfield industrial developments have been started in Alberta: TaigaNova Eco-Industrial Park(http://www.taiganova.com) is in the heart of the oil sands, while Innovista Eco-Industrial Park(http://www.eip.hinton.ca) is a gateway to the Mountains ~300km west of Edmonton.Other usageEIPs also refer to industrial parks where a green approach has been taken towards the infrastructure and development of the site. This can include infrastructure related to Energy Systems; stormwater, groundwater and wastewater management; road surfaces; and demand management. building practices can also be encouraged or mandatedEIPs are often used as a stimulus for economic diversification in the community or region where they are located. Anchor tenants, such as bio-based product manufacturers or waste-to-energy facilities, etc., can attract complementary businesses as suppliers, scavengers/recyclers, service providers, downstream users and other businesses that could benefit from eco-industrial strategies.Suggested usageIt is suggested that EIPs be used as a means of growing the renewable energy sector. In the case of a Solar Photovoltaic (PV) Manufacturing plant, an EIP can increase the manufacturing efficiency to make it more economical, while reducing the environmental impact of producing the solar cells.In essence,this assists the growth of the renewable energy industry and the environmental benefits that come with replacing fossil-fuels.(J. M. Pearce,Industrial Symbiosis for Very Large Scale Photovoltaic Manufacturing, Renewable Energy 33, pp. 1101-1108, 2008,http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/B6V4S-4PJ6BJ9-1/2/f3df89a481dc23c1853d998d0d282cae)See also* EcoPark - EIP in Hong-Kong* ecology* symbiosis* Eco-industrial ParkSourcesFurther reading*Greening the Asphalt Acres. Alberta Venture. Aug, 2008.*Eco-industrial Zones: Sustaining the wealth of industrial developments. Building Sustainable Communities E-Zine. Jan, 2009.*Eco-Industrial Parks surging in popularity. Business Edge Magazine. Nov, 2008.External links*Industrial Symbiosis*Industrial Ecology Wiki - Repository of information about Eco-Industrial Parks around the world*Indigo Development Eco-Industrial Park page and handbook*Existing and Developing Eco-Industrial Park Sites in the U.S.*Industrial Symbiosis Timeline*Industrial Symbiosis in Action*Zero Emissions Research & Initiatives*TaigaNova Eco-Industrial Park in Fort McMurray, AB, Canada*Innovista Eco-Industrial Park in Hinton, AB, Canada*The Eco-Efficiency Centre in Burnside, Nova Scotia, Canada*CleanTech Park in Singapore fr:copleindustrialzh:
661379
Heriot-Watt_University
 website          http://www.hw.ac.uk/Heriot-Watt University is a university based in Edinburgh, Scotland.  The name commemorates Heriot, the 16th century financier to King James, and Watt, the great 18th century inventor and engineer.The university originated as the School of Arts of Edinburgh, founded in 1821 as the worlds first Institute. Heriot-Watt is the eighth-oldest higher education institution in the Kingdom. The institution received its charter in 1966 and is currently ranked 4th among the top five universities in Scotland.3Originally based in the centre of Edinburgh, Heriot-Watt University now has four campuses. The main campus is located in Riccarton in the Currie area on the outskirts of the city. Satellite campuses are located in Galashiels in the Borders (Scottish Borders Campus, formerly the Scottish College of Textiles), Stromness (Orkney campus) and most recently in Dubai Academic City (Heriot-Watt University Dubai campus). Moreover, the Orkney Campus in Stromness is home to The International Centre for Island Technology (ICIT) which is part of Heriot-Watt Universitys Institute of Petroleum Engineering. There is also a wide network of about 50 Approved Learning Partners, in over 30 countries, such as  Tomsk Polytechnic University http://hw.tpu.ru in Tomsk. The Annual Statistics publication (2006/07) shows that the University has a total population of 17,700 students, full-time, part-time and distance and supported learning around the world. Of these 10,500 are on international programmes, including the MBA programme and those studying through one of 50 Approved Learning Partners worldwide. Heriot-Watt has around 7,000 on-campus students in Scotland, with about one third of whom are from outside the UK. History thumb|left|upright|The entrance to main reception at the Edinburgh campusThe institution that became Heriot-Watt University began with a conversation between the Edinburgh businessmen Leonard Horner and Robert Bryson about the lack of technical education for the classes. This led to the opening of the School of Arts of Edinburgh for the Education of Mechanics in Such Branches of Physical Science as are of Practical Application in their several trades, in October 1821 as the worlds first Mechanics Institute, which revolutionised access to education in science and technology for ordinary people.In 1852 the name of the school was changed to the Watt Institution and School of Arts, in memory of the engineer and inventor Watt. In 1869 women were permitted to attend classes, mainly due to the campaigning of Mary Burton, making Heriot-Watt a pioneer in opportunities in education.During the 1870s a new building on Chambers Street was constructed, causing the institution severe financial difficulties that were resolved by an association with George Heriots Hospital for needy orphans. In 1885 the name was changed to Heriot-Watt College; the name Heriot deriving from the jeweller, financier and philanthropist Heriot.thumb|A view of the loch in the Edinburgh campus.The college continued to expand throughout the 20th century and became a university in 1966, following the recommendations of the Report.In 1969 the former Gibson-Craig estate at Riccarton, 7 miles (11 km) to the south-west of Edinburgh, was gifted to the University and was purchased for one penny. Between 1971 and 1992 the University moved to a purpose-built campus on this site; however, being situated within a city green-belt, buildings on the campus cannot be greater than four floors in height. The Campus occupies  of what was mature meadow and woodland to the west of Edinburgh, just six minutes from Edinburgh airport, and some 20 minutes from the city centre by car.The Business School, a component of Heriot-Watt, boasts one of the worlds largest of Business Administration programs,() offered on-campus or around the world by education, and assessed by rigorous subject exams. A of Business Administration program, along similar lines but also containing a major research component, was launched in 2003.In 2005, the university announced plans to open a campus in Dubai, Arab Emirates. Heriot-Watt Universitys Dubai Campus is a purpose-built modern campus of over  in Dubai Academic City formally opened in March 2006. The campus offers a range of undergraduate and postgraduate courses which reflect the Universitys Scottish Schools and Institutes as well as student exchanges and campus transfers. University Dubai offers of Arts degrees in Business, Accounting, Finance and Management as well as a degree in Technology. Engineering degrees (especially Engineering) are likely to be introduced in the near future. On February 1, 2006, the neuroscientist Baroness Greenfield became Chancellor of Heriot-Watt University.(http://hw-news.hw.ac.uk/story.asp?sStory2248&Link2)In 2008, Heriot-Watt University appears in the list of the QS World University Rankings for the first time.()The university approved construction of a Postgraduate Centre in 2005, building commenced in Summer 2007, and was to be completed in the summer of 2008 at an estimated cost of 6.8 million.()() The building opened in summer 2009 and includes a lecture theatre, three seminar rooms, cafe and meeting rooms.( Some of the centres funding came from Energy, who donated 1.4 million to the university and will also appoint a Programme Coordinator for Innovation and Enterprise within the Centre and create a new Chair, the Cairn Professor of Petroleum Engineering.()()In 2010 the university announced a 35 million expansion of its Dubai Campus catering for an additional 3000 enrolments. This is scheduled to open in September 2011.(Heriot-Watt University expands Dubai Campus to treble capacity)Sports UnionHeriot-Watt University Sports Union has its 30 year anniversary in 20062007. It has 32 clubs that compete in the Universities Sports Association (BUSA) leagues on a Wednesday and in many Scottish National leagues on Saturdays and Sundays. There have been many athletes that have progressed through the ranks to represent their country at the Scottish Universities level and on the National and International Stage.In recent years, many of the sports clubs have enjoyed success in the BUSA leagues, including the Hockey Club after both the Mens and Womens 1st XI reached the knock out stages of the competition. The football club is one of the sports unions most popular and best supported clubs with many members. They also boast a very successful history (most notably winning the top division of BUSA for 5 years in a row). The annual varsity match against Edinburgh is the highlight fixture of the year.Media*The Journal is a very recent addition to the student media scene at the university. It is an independent publication, established in 2007 by three students at the of Edinburgh, and also distributes to the three other higher education institutions in the city - University, Margaret University and the College of Art. It is the largest such publication in Scotland, with a print run of 14,000 copies and is produced by students from across the city.RankingSchoolsthumb|Statue of James Watt outside the main entrance*School of Engineering and Physical Sciences**Chemical Engineering**Chemistry**Physics**Electrical, Electronic and Computer Engineering**Mechanical Engineering**Combined Studies*School of Mathematical and Computer Sciences**Actuarial Mathematics & Statistics**Computer Science**Mathematics*School of the Built Environment**Architectural Engineering**Civil Engineering**Construction Management & Surveying**Facilities Management**Urban Studies*School of Life Sciences** Applied Marine Biology** Applied Psychology** Biological Science** Brewing and Distilling** Food Science** Sport and Exercise Science*School of Management and Languages**Accountancy & Finance**Economics**Languages**Law**Management*School of Textiles and Design*Business School*Institute of Petroleum Engineering Notable alumni See also Alumni of Heriot-Watt UniversityImage:Hwcow.JPG|thumb|Watt a Clever Cow Heriot-Watts contribution to the Edinburgh CowParade.*Buchan, Founder of Kinross Gold Corporation, one of the worlds leading gold mining firm (BSc Mining 1969)*Clear, Formula One engineer (BEng Mechanical Engineering 1987)(Heriot Watt University: Mechanical Engineering - School of Engineering and Physical Sciences. 31 January 2008. Retrieved 23 August 2009.)*Cohen, fashion designer and Founder of Pleasure State, a lingerie apparel label*Crozier, Chief Executive of media company ITV plc, and former Chief Executive of the Royal Mail and the English Football Association*Godal, former Member of the Norwegian Parliament, and former Chairman of the Norwegian Support Committee for Chechnya*Grant, Britains first Afro-Caribbean Member of Parliament*Professor Peter Grant, Emeritus Regius Professor of Engineering at the University of Edinburgh (BSc Electrical and Electronic Engineering 1966)(University of Edinburgh staff news. 11 August 2009. Retrieved 27 September 2010.)*Jenkins (banker), former Chief Executive of Barclays Private Equity, Principal Investments and Structured Capital Markets*Kirkwood, Baron Kirkwood of Kirkhope (BSc Pharmacy 1971)*Cruickshank Miller, chemist *Monteith, former Member of the Scottish Parliament*Robertson, double Olympic gold medallist and TV presenter*Ross, former Scottish professional footballer (MA Economics 1998)*Skumsvoll, Member of the Norwegian Parliament*Richard Tait, creator of Cranium, the fastest-selling independent board game in history (BSc Computer Science 1986)(Inventor of Cranium. Helensburgh Heroes website.)*Ho Pin, Member of Parliament and District Mayor in Singapore (MSc Project Management 1987, PhD Building 1990) *Tripathi, former correspondent with BBC News*Watson, political affairs officer*Watson, Liberal Democrat Member of the European Parliament, and former leader of the Liberal Democrats in Europe*Watson, Baron Watson of Invergowrie (BA Economics and Industrial Relations 1974)*Welsh, writer (MBA 1991)*Younge, journalist and writerSee also*Chapman (Principal and Vice-Chancellor)*Cameron (university administrator)*Air (Edinburgh)ReferencesExternal links* Heriot-Watt University website* Heriot-Watt University Students Union* Heriot-Watt University Centre for Sport and Exercise* Heriot-Watt University Dubai Campus websiteUniversitylikoolHeriot-WattHeriot-Wattth:--zh:
663797
English_Tangier
English Tangier was a colony of the of England and a military and naval base in Tangier, held by the English from 1661 to 6 February 1684, when it returned to being part of Morocco.HistoryEnglish take possessionIn 1661 King Charles II married the Portuguese of Braganza, and as part of her dowry Charles was granted the ports of Tangier and Bombay (now Mumbai). As soon as Charles and Catherines marriage treaty had been signed, Admiral Montagu, 1st Earl of Sandwich, was sent to take possession of Tangier.(John Wreglesworth, Tangier: Englands Forgotten Colony (1661-1684) at elsewhereonline.com.au, accessed 28 February 2011) Tangier commanded the entry into the Sea and was the principal commercial centre on the North West coast of Africa. However, there had been years of conflict between the Portuguese garrison and the Moroccans.( On September 6, 1661, King Charles appointed Mordaunt, 2nd Earl of Peterborough, as Governor and Captain General of all the forces in Tangier. When Peterborough landed he found the town derelict, and under constant attack from some 17,000 Berbers.(The Regiment (later known as the Regiment of Foot) arrived in Tangier on January 29, 1662 and was joined by Parliamentarian companies from the garrison of Dunkirk and two units from the Royalist Force, which had been serving in Flanders; they officially took over Tangier from Montagues small naval garrison. The Regiment remained in Tangier for 23 years, until the port was finally evacuated in 1684.Three additional regiments from the Dunkirk garrison were also placed under Peterboroughs command, and he arrived in Tangier with a force of 500 horse and 2,000 foot, with the wives of 200-300 of the soldiers, to serve in a domestic capacity, the first time that wives had officially accompanied an English army to an overseas garrison. The Portuguese government was not in the least reluctant to part with Tangier. The anchorage was unsafe for shipping, and beyond the landward fortifications lived the Moroccans, who were looking for an opportunity to take back the city. The Portuguese inhabitants were not happy with these arrangements and departed on British ships, leaving a civilian population made up of only the wives and families of the English military.Work began on a fortified harbour at the end of November. It was to be 600 yards long, 30 feet deep at low tide and be able to keep out the roughest of seas. Each redoubt had 400 men guarding the excavation site, whilst to the front balls of spikes, stakes and piles of gunpowder-and-stone mix, which acted as basic landmines were laid.(Tangier declared a free cityOn June 4, 1668, Tangier was declared a free city by charter, with a mayor and corporation to govern it instead of the army.( In 1674, William OBrien, 2nd Earl of Inchiquin took up the post of Governor. In 1675, a garrison school was founded, led by the Rev. Dr George Mercer.On December 30, 1676, Charles ordered a survey of the city and garrison of Tangier, which was costing about 140,000 a year to maintain. The survey showed that the total inhabitants numbered 2,225, of whom fifty were army officers, 1,231 other ranks, with 302 army wives and children. Amongst the buildings was a hospital and an army school.In 1680, the pressure from the Moroccans increased, as the Moroccan Sultan Ismail joined forces with the Chief of Fez in order to pursue a war against all foreign troops in his land. Reinforcements were needed at the Garrison, which was raised to 3,000 in number. Also in 1680 the Earl of Inchiquin resigned and was replaced by Butler, 6th Earl of Ossory, who died before taking up his post.(The Scots, shortly followed by a further foot regiment, the Tangier Regiment raised on July 13, 1680, were sent to Tangier.  The new regiment was accompanied by the Kings Battalion, which was formed from the Grenadier and Guards. The Battalion landed in July 1680, and fierce attacks were made against the Moors, who had gained a footing on the edge of the town, finally defeating them by controlled and well-aimed musket fire. The Battalion remained in Tangier until the fort was abandoned.Growing concerns about the cost of the colonyFor some time Parliament had been concerned about the cost of maintaining the Tangier garrison. By 1680 the King had threatened to give up Tangier unless the supplies were voted for its sea defences, intended to provide a safe harbour for shipping. The fundamental problem was that in order to keep the town and harbour free from cannon fire the perimeter of the defended area had to be vastly increased. A number of outworks were built but the siege of 1680 showed that the Moroccans were capable of isolating and capturing these outworks by entrenchments and mining.The garrison at Tangier had to be constantly reinforced, having cost nearly two million pounds of royal treasure, and many lives had been sacrificed in its defence. Merchant ships continued to be harassed by pirates, and undefended crews were regularly captured into slavery. The so-called Plot in England had intensified the dread of Catholicism, and the Kings frequent request for more troops to increase the size of the garrison raised suspicions that a standing army was being retained in Tangier to ensure a Catholic succession and monarchy.In October 1680, Colonel FitzCharles, 1st Earl of Plymouth, arrived as Governor,  but was taken mortally ill soon afterwards. Colonel Edward Sackville took over the governorship temporarily.( On December 20, 1680, the of Commons of England petitioned the King to give his assent to a Bill of Exclusion to disinherit the of York; adding that, unless and until the bill was passed, Parliament could not give any supplies to Charles. The King refused to sacrifice his brothers right of succession to save Tangier.On December 28, 1680 Colonel Kirke was appointed Colonel and Governor.Evacuation of TangierFinally, in 1683, Charles gave Admiral Lord Dartmouth secret orders to abandon Tangier. Dartmouth was to level the fortifications, destroy the harbour, and evacuate the troops. In August 1683 Dartmouth, as Admiral of the Fleet and captain general in Tangier, sailed from Plymouth. He was accompanied by Pepys who wrote an account of the evacuation.(All the forts and walls were mined for last-minute destruction. On February 5, 1684 Tangier was officially evacuated, leaving the town in ruins, thereafter Kirkes Regiment returned to England.One of Lord Dartmouths main concerns was the evacuation of sick soldiers and the many families and their effects to be brought off. The hospital ship Unity sailed for England on October 18, 1683 with 114 invalid soldiers and 104 women and children. The main force of 2,830 officers and men and 361 wives and children finally completed the demolition of the harbour wall and fortifications, and evacuated the garrison during the early months of 1684. The Tangier Regiment left late in the second week of February for Plymouth with some six hundred men and thirty wives and children.( The Earl of Dumbartons regiment went into quarters at Rochester, and Trelawneys Regiment to Portsmouth.Before leaving, Dartmouth was able to purchase the release of many English prisoners from Ismails bagnio, including several officers and about 40 men, some of whom had spent 10 years in the hands of the Moroccans.Some of the departing soldiers were to be rewarded with large land grants in the newly acquired of New York.  Dongan, 2nd Earl of Limerick, a Lieutenant-Governor of Tangier, would become New York Provincial Governor and Tangier Smith, the last mayor of Tangier, would get 50 miles of Ocean front property on Island.Governors{| classwikitable|-|}ReferencesBibliography*E. Chappell, ed., The Tangier Papers of Samuel Pepys (London: Navy Records Society, vol. LXIII, 1935)*John Childs, The Army of Charles II (London: 1976)*Sir James Halkett, Tangier  1680: The Diary of Sir James Halkett, in Journal of the Society for Army Historical Research (1922)*W. F. Lord, The Lost Possessions of England (London: 1896)*E. M. G. Routh, Tangier: Englands Lost Atlantic Outpost, 1661-1684 (London: 1912)*A. J. Smithers, The Tangier Campaign: the Birth of the British Army (Stroud: 2003)*Clifford Walton, A History of the British Standing Army, 1660-1700 (London: 1894)Public Records Office*ADM 106/294 Roger Allsopp 1673*ADM 106/314 *ADM 12/18*ADM 12/28BBritish Library*Manuscript Collection: 1671-1675 - Samuel Luke, Merchant, Tangier, Morocco. Reference Sloane MSS*B. Museum Add. Mss.36528 Diary of John Luke (see & Judge Advocate to John Middleton, Earl of Middleton, Govr of Tangier)See also*Spotswood*Heads of Tangier*Elliott (surgeon)*Churchill, 1st Duke of Marlborough*Elliott*Crisis*Protocol*Tangier Regiment and Tangier Regiment
666329
Hazelton,_British_Columbia
footnotes              Hazelton is a small town located at the junction of the Bulkley and Rivers in northern Columbia, Canada. It was founded in 1866 and has a population of 293 (2006 Census). New Hazelton is also the northernmost point of the Highway, a major interprovincial highway which runs from Rupert, British Columbia to Winnipeg, Manitoba.The Hazelton area comprises two municipalities (the Village of Hazelton and District of New Hazelton), three unincorporated settlements (South Hazelton, Two Mile and the Valley), four Nations villages: 3 of which are of the Gitxsan people - (Gitanmaax, Vowell and Kispiox) and 1 of the Wetsuweten people - (Hagwilget).First Nations historyThe Hazeltons are home to the Gitxsan and Wetsuweten Nations.Old Hazelton and Two MileHazelton is one of the oldest settlements in Northern British Columbia, its European settlement dates back to 1866 when the Overland telegraph went through.()thumb|left|Hazelton Hospital 1911Hazelton was the original gateway and staging area for the Gold Rush of 1869-73. Besides the hunt for riches, there was one other important reason to visit: it had the only proper hospital for hundreds of miles in any direction. One of its other, less appreciated, distinctions was in having dozens of roaming, foraging and howling dogs, as nearly everyone had their own team and many were allowed to run free. Transportation options got better in 1891 when the Bay Companys sternwheeler Caledonia arrived from Port Essington. Being the head of navigation on the Skeena, Hazelton was to play host to more than a dozen sternwheelers throughout the next twenty-two years.Two Mile was a community two miles out of Hazelton. During the gold rush and rail construction, it was home to a roadhouse and a prosperous district.New Hazelton and South Hazeltonthumb|right|The Bulkley River (left) flowing into the Skeena River (right) near KsanWhen it was announced in 1903, that the Trunk Pacific Railway would be coming through near Hazelton, another flurry of excitement erupted and hundreds of settlers poured into the district, buying whatever land they could get a hold of. Everyone was certain there was a fortune to be made and Hazelton was widely advertised as the Spokane of Canada. What made Hazelton even more attractive was her mines, the Silver Standard and the Rocher de Boule. In 1911 two rival town-sites, Robert Kellys New Hazelton and the Grand Trunk Pacifics South Hazelton both came into existence and competed to sell the most lots. Thus, the original Hazelton was called Old and they all became known as the Three Hazeltons. Where the railway station would be built was an issue for many years until both South and New Hazelton received one.The first car in Hazelton 1911thumb|right|First Car in HazeltonThe first car, a Flanders 20, arrived in Hazelton on October 5, 1911. It came from Seattle. It did not arrive by rail, which wouldnt be completed from  Prince Rupert until 1912, nor did it come in by sternwheeler. It was brought in overland. None of the people in town believed that story, as it was nearly impossible to walk into Hazelton overland in 1911, much less drive. Everyone went to go see the car where it was parked in front of the Hazelton Hotel and questioned the owner, PE Sands, on how he had accomplished the feat. At a banquet held in his honor later that evening, Sands revealed his secret. He had brought along two mechanics and they had often had to disassemble the car and load it unto mules. Clearly theyd had enough of doing that by the time they reached Hazelton. They packed the car up on a sternwheeler and went to Vancouver.The Union Bank robberies of 1913 and 1914thumb|right|200px|Union BankIn November 1913, the Union Bank at New Hazelton was robbed by armed gunmen. In the commission of the crime, a young bank teller by the name of Jock McQueen was mortally wounded. Even though a posse was swiftly formed to go after them, the bandits got away with $16,000, a great deal of money in those days.thumb|left|120px|The 1st Bandit to Fall - Reverend Dan MacLean is man on rightThe second robbery occurred on April 7, 1914, already a red letter day for the area as the last spike of the Grand Trunk Pacific Railway was being driven 180 miles away in Fraser. Little did anyone know that an equally historic event was about to happen right there in New Hazelton, one that would be remembered in hundreds of Canadian history books. Luckily, someone was there with a camera. Those pictures would become among the most famous of that era in British Columbia.Home of legendary charactersHazelton was home to several famous and infamous characters.Catalinethumb|right|Catalines Mule Train at HazeltonCataline, the most famous packer in British Columbia, served Hazelton throughout most of his career and also chose to retire there and died at the Hazelton hospital. People who knew his love for his mules, which he called his ponees, were not surprised to hear what his biggest concern about the afterlife was. On the night before he died, Cataline asked his nurse if she believed that God would let him have a least one ponee in Heaven. When she replied that she believed He would, Cataline was satisfied and never spoke another word. He is buried at the Hazelton cemetery.Simon GunanootWillie MansonWilliam Willie Manson came to Canada from the Islands in 1869. In 1871 went to the Omineca district and staked a claim on a small stream that ran into Babine Lake. His claim was one of the richest ever found in that area at Creek. Wille, like most of the other gold rush miners, would buy his supplies in Hazelton. Besides having one of the richest claim, one other thing set Willie apart, he was careful with his money. Willie worked the claim himself and then sold out to a mining syndicate and returned to the Shetland Islands. Back at home, he couldnt help but notice the poverty of some of his countrymen and he decided to do something about it. Using his gold rush wealth, he purchased large flocks of sheep from Scotland and sold them to his neighbors at cost and on credit. Then he built a wool processing mill and a knitting mill, which employed many more Shetland Islanders. Dutch Sperry ClineDutch Cline was a decorated War veteran, who spent his many years in Hazelton in several different occupations, from mushing the huskies down the frozen River to deliver the mail, to canoe freightman, mine boss and frontier policeman.Black Jack MacDonellBlack Jack MacDonell, who owned the Ingenika Hotel in Old Hazelton had been known from Francisco to City as the king of saloon keepers. In September 1911 on the eve of the federal election, Black Jack kept the Ingenika open, even though it was against the law to do so, and served free drinks all night long. Soon he had many happy and talkative customers who were quite willing to tell him who they were going to vote for. Black Jack didnt want Laurier re-elected because of his stance on Trade, so every customer that commented he was going to vote Liberal found themselves sitting in the jail on drunk and disorderly charges the next day, while the others who were voting Conservative were all free men.Harry Tracys horseThere was even a famous horse, Tracy who was named after the Pacific Northwest outlaw Tracy who had stolen him as a colt. With Oregon lawmen hot on his trail, Harry Tracy was forced to abandon the horse, which was returned to its owners and eventually ended up working on a Pat Burns cattle drive from the Chilcotin country before finally winding up in Hazelton.ClimateNotable peopleHuynh - 2008 Freestyle Wrestling Olympic gold medalistAttractions* Ksan Historical Village is a world-famous native heritage site located right where the Bulkley and Skeena rivers meet.* Canyon Bridge is one of North Americas highest suspension bridges.* Steelhead Fishing can be done at the nearby Kispiox River.Special events* Kispiox Valley Rodeo is held the first weekend in June,* Kispiox Valley Music Festival is held the last weekend of July.* Pioneer Day takes place on the second Saturday of August.Book references* The Far Land, Eva MacLean ISBN 0-920576-41-91* The Skeena River of Destiny, Dr. RG Large ISBN 1-895811-19-8* Pioneer Legacy Chronicles of the Lower Skeena River, Norma Bennet ISBN 0-9683026-0-2* A Thousand Blunders, the Grand Trunk Pacific Railway and Northern British Columbia, Frank Leonard ISBN 0-7748-0532-3Musical references* Hazelton, on Hazeltons by Justin VernonNotesExternal links*Hazelton, British Columbia Homepage*Village of Hazelton Homepage*Ksan Native Village & Museum*Kispiox Valley Music Festival* Canadian Encyclopedia-Simon Gunanoot(British Columbia)(Colombie-Britannique)
670477
Goldsworthy
Goldsworthy is a Cornish surname, and place name, from the language gol-erewy, meaning field of feast. It can can refer to:* Goldsworthy (born 1969), British historian* Goldsworthy (born 1956), British artist* Goldsworthy (born 1974), Australian pianist and writer, daughter of Peter Goldsworthy* Goldsworthy (born 1944), Canadian ice hockey player* Goldsworthy (c.1705-1774), 18th century English Consul at Leghorn and later Cadiz* Goldsworthy, a fictional character in Degrassi* E. Goldsworthy (born 1914), American Air Force lieutenant general * Goldsworthy (born 1978), British politician* Goldsworthy (born 1956), Australian anglican bishop* Goldsworthy (1953), Australian writer* Goldsworthy (born 1951), Australian author, father of Anna Goldsworthy* Goldsworthy (1839&ndash;1900), President of Nevis; Governor of Saint Lucia; Governor of the British Honduras; and Governor of the Falkland Islands* Goldsworthy (1855&ndash;1889), Wales international rugby player* Brandt Goldsworthy, the pioneer of pultrusion* Lowes Dickinson(1863&ndash;1932), Historian and political activist;Places named Goldsworthy* Western Australia, a former mining town in the Shire of East Pilbara* railway, an iron ore railway line operated by BHP Billiton* Goldsworthy, Gwennap, Cornwall* Goldsworthy, Crowan, CornwallSee also*Source*White, G. Pawley, A Handbook of Cornish Surnames.(Penrose mentioned by name)de:Goldsworthyko:
674227
Murchison,_New_Zealand
thumb|Aerial view of Murchison in 1978Murchison is a town in the Region of the Island of Zealand. It is near the western end of the Four Rivers Plain, at the confluence of the River and the River. The other two rivers are the River, and the River.It is a rural service town for the surrounding mixed farming district, on Zealand State Highway 6 approximately halfway between Westport and Nelson.Twinned with Royston Vasey, it is recognised as the Whitewater Capital of New Zealand, nearby rivers include the River, River, Matiri River, River, Matakitaki River, Maruia River, and the Buller, with many excellent whitewater runs along its length. These rivers vary from Class 2 to 4 whitewater. These rivers are also world renowned for fly fishing for large brown trout in gin-clear water. Being on the edge of both Kahurangi and Nelson Lakes National Parks, there are many interesting walks nearby. Lake Matiri and Mt Owen define southern access points for entering Kahurangi and both are spectacular. There are also many other areas of native bush where hikers/trampers can experience the great outdoors.The district is steeped in history from the days of the gold miners and early settlers. Lyell, once one of the largest gold mining settlements in the South Island, is nearby, and offers an interesting example of how quickly the bush can wipe away traces of civilization. Murchison was the epicentre of the Murchison earthquake (also known as the Buller earthquake).  Each summer, Murchison is a mecca for visitors seeking the great outdoors - fishing, rafting, walking, white water kayaking, jet boats, horse treks, mountain biking, gold panning and line dancing. There is a wide range of accommodation available ranging from backpackers, campgrounds to luxury lodges in spectacular settings. The local museum has information on local people and events. The Murchison golf course is set alongside the Buller River - nine holes in a lovely setting. Other services include cafes, two pubs, gift shops, information centre, supermarket, general store, antique store, hospital, petrol station, and the New Zealand Kayak School. Fishing guides and helicopter services are available too. External links * Murchison Visitor Centre* Murchison Tourism New Zealand(Neuseeland)
676678
Nigel_Kneale
horrorNigel Kneale (18 April 1922  29 October 2006) was a British screenwriter from the of Man. Active in television, film, drama and prose fiction, he wrote professionally for over fifty years, was a winner of the Maugham Award and was twice nominated for the British Film Award for Best Screenplay. In 2000 he received the Lifetime Achievement Award from the Horror Writers Association.Predominantly a writer of thrillers which used science-fiction and horror elements, he was best known for the creation of the character Professor Bernard Quatermass. Quatermass was a heroic scientist who appeared in various television, film and radio productions written by Kneale for the BBC, Film Productions and Television between 1953 and 1996. Kneale wrote original scripts and successfully adapted works by writers such as Orwell, Osborne, G. Wells and Hill.He was most active in television, joining Television in 1951 as one of its first staff writers; his final script was transmitted on ITV in 1997. Kneale wrote well-received television dramas such as Year of the Sex Olympics (1968) and Stone Tape (1972) in addition to the Quatermass serials. He has been described as one of the most influential writers of the 20th century,() and as having invented popular TV.() Early life and career Kneale was born Thomas Nigel Kneale in Barrow-in-Furness, England.()() His family came from the of Man, and returned to live there in 1928, when Kneale was six years old.()() He was raised in the islands capital, Douglas, where his father was the owner and editor of the local newspaper, The Herald.()() He was educated at St Ninians High School, and after leaving studied law, training to become an advocate at the Manx Bar.(( He also worked in a lawyers office,( but became bored with his legal training and eventually abandoned the profession.( At the beginning of the Second World War Kneale attempted to enlist in the Army, but was deemed medically unfit for service( due to photophobia from which he had suffered since childhood.(Murray, Into the Unknown, p. 9 and p. 12.)On 25 March 1946 Kneale made his first broadcast on Radio, performing a live reading of his own story Tomato Cain in a strand entitled Stories by Northern Authors on the BBCs North of England Home Service region.(Pixley, p. 2.) Later that year he left the Isle of Man and moved to London, where he began studying acting at the Academy of Dramatic Art (RADA).(  He made further radio broadcasts in the 1940s, including a reading of his story Zachary Crebbins Angel on the Light Programme, broadcast nationally on 19 May 1948.() He also had further short stories published in magazines such as Argosy and The Strand.( He began using the name Nigel Kneale for these professional credits, but continued to be known as Tom to his family and friends up until his death.()After graduating from RADA, Kneale worked for a short time as a professional actor performing in small roles at the Stratford Memorial Theatre in Stratford-upon-Avon.( He continued to write in his spare time and in 1949 a collection of his work, entitled Tomato Cain and Other Stories, was published.( The book sufficiently impressed the writer Bowen that she wrote a foreword for it,( and in 1950 the collection won the Maugham Award.( (His son, Kneale, would later win the same award in 1988 for his novel Whore Banquets.())Following this success, Kneale gave up acting to write full-time.( He did take small voice-over roles in some of his 1950s television productions, such as the voice heard on the factory loudspeaker system in II (1955), for which he also narrated most of the recaps shown at the beginning of each episode.(Pixley, p. 23.) Kneales publisher was keen for him to write a novel,( but Kneale himself was more interested in writing for television.( A keen cinema-goer, he believed that the audience being able to see human faces was an important factor in storytelling.(Murray, Into the Unknown, p. 26.)His first professional script writing credit came when he wrote the drama The Long Stairs, broadcast by the BBC on 1 March 1950( and based on a historical mining disaster on the Isle of Man.( In 1951 he was recruited as one of the first staff writers to be employed by Television;(Jacobs, p. 111.) before he started working for the BBC, Kneale had never seen any television.()  Kneale was initially a general purpose writer, working on adaptations of books and stage plays and even writing material for entertainment and childrens programmes.(  The following year, Michael Barry became the Head of Drama at BBC Television, and spent his entire first years script budget of 250 to hire Kneale as a full-time writer for the drama department.( Kneales first credited role in adult television drama was providing additional dialogue for the play to the Heart, broadcast on 20 July 1952.() This play was adapted and directed by the Austrian director Cartier, who had also joined the staff of the BBC drama department in 1952.(Jacobs, p. 134.) It was the beginning of a successful working relationship between the pair, that would lead to some of Kneales best known work. BBC staff screenwriter Neither Kneale nor Cartier were impressed with the state in which they found BBC television drama. At his initial job interview with Michael Barry, Cartier had criticised the departments output as being too sedate and theatrical,() while Kneale was frustrated at what he saw as the slow and boring styles of television drama production then employed, which he felt wasted the potential of the medium.(Jacobs, p. 135.) Together they would help to revolutionise British television drama and establish it as an entity separate from its theatre and radio equivalents; the television historian Lez Cooke wrote in 2003 that Between them, Kneale and Cartier were responsible for introducing a completely new dimension to television drama in the early to mid-1950s.(Cooke, p. 20.) Jason Jacobs, a lecturer in film and studies at the of Warwick, wrote in his 2000 history of early British television drama that It was the arrival of Nigel Kneale... and Rudolph Cartier... that challenged the intimate drama directly... Kneale and Cartier shared a common desire to invigorate television with a faster tempo and a broader thematic and spatial canvas, and it was no coincidence that they turned to science-fiction in order to get out of the dominant stylistic trend of television intimacy.(Jacobs, pp. 130134)The science-fiction production to which Jacobs referred was Quatermass Experiment, broadcast in six half-hour episodes in July and August 1953.(Pixley, pp. 4344.) The serial told the story of Professor Quatermass of the British Experimental Rocket Group, and the consequences of his sending the first manned mission into space when a terrible fate befalls the crew and only one returns. The Quatermass Experiment was the first adult television science-fiction production,(Pixley, p. 3.) held a large television audience gripped across its six weeks,( and has been described by the of Broadcast Communications as dramatising a new range of gendered fears about Britains postwar and post-colonial security.() Kneale was inspired in choosing the characters unusual surname by the fact that many Manx surnames began with Qu;(Pixley, p. 6.) the actual name itself was picked from a London directory.( The Professors first name was chosen in honour of the astronomer Lovell.(The BBC recognised the success of the serial, particularly in the context of the impending arrival of television to the UK. Controller of Programmes McGivern wrote in a memo that: Had competitive television been in existence then, we would have killed it every Saturday night while Quatermass Experiment lasted. We are going to need many more Quatermass Experiment programmes.(Quoted in Johnson, p. 21.) Like all of Kneales 1950s television work for the BBC, The Quatermass Experiment was transmitted live.() Only the first two episodes were telerecorded and survive in the BBCs archives.(Kneale and Cartier next collaborated on an adaptation of Heights (broadcast 6 December 1953) and then on a version of Orwells novel Nineteen Eighty-Four (12 December 1954).(Pixley, p. 16.) Nineteen Eighty-Four was a particularly notable production; many found it shocking, and questions were asked in Parliament about whether some of the scenes had been suitable for television.() There was also prominent support for the play; the Duke of Edinburgh made it known that he and the Queen had watched and enjoyed the programme,() and the second live performance on 16 December gained the largest television audience since her coronation the previous year.( Guardian newspapers obituary of Kneale in 2006 claimed that the adaptation had permanently revived Orwells reputation,( while the Film Institute included it in their list of the Greatest British Television Programmes of the 20th century in 2000.()The Creaturean original script by Kneale concerning the legend of the snowmanwas his next collaboration with Cartier, broadcast on 30 January 1955,( followed by an adaptation of Ustinovs play The Moment of Truth (10 March 1955),( before Kneale was commissioned to write II.() Specifically designed by the BBC to combat the threat of the new ITV network,(( which launched just a month before Quatermass II was shown,() the serial was even more successful than the first, drawing audiences of up to nine million viewers.(Pixley, p. 45.) Kneale was inspired in writing the serial by contemporary fears over secret Ministry of Defence research establishments such as Down, as well the fact that as a BBC staff writer he had been required to sign the Secrets Act.(Almost simultaneously with the transmission of Quatermass II in the autumn of 1955, Film Productions released Quatermass Xperiment, their film adaptation of the first serial.(Pixley, p. 21.) Kneale was not pleased with the film,( and particularly disliked the casting of Donlevy as Quatermass, as he explained in a 1986 interview. Donlevy was then really on the skids and didnt care what he was doing. He took very little interest in the making of the films or in playing the part. It was a case of take the money and run. Or in the case of Mr Donlevy, waddle.()Quatermass II was Kneales final original script for the BBC as a staff writer.( He left the corporation when his contract expired at the end of 1956;(Pixley, p. 27.) Five years in that hut was as much as any sane person could stand, he later told an interviewer.(Hearn & Rigby, p. 7.) He continued to write for the BBC on a freelance basis. Freelance film and television work The same year that he left the BBC, Kneale wrote his first feature film screenplay, adapting Quatermass II for Hammer Film Productions along with producer Hinds and director Guest.( Hinds and Guest had overseen the first Quatermass film, upon which Kneale had been unable to work due to his BBC staff contract.( Kneale was disappointed that Brian Donlevy also returned in the role of Quatermass.( The film premiered at the end of May 1957,(Hearn & Rigby, p. 14.) and was reviewed positively in Times: The writer of the original story, Mr. Nigel Kneale, and the director, Mr. Val Guest, between them keep things moving at the right speed, without digressions. The film has an air of respect for the issues touched on, and this impression is confirmed by the acting generally.() 1957 also saw the release of another cinematic collaboration between Kneale and Guest, when Kneale adapted his 1955 BBC play The Creature into The Abominable Snowman;() in this case, Hammer retained the star of the BBC version, Cushing.(In May 1957, Kneale was contracted by the BBC to write a third Quatermass serial,( and this was eventually transmitted as and the Pit across six weeks in December and January 195859.(Pixley, p. 47.) On this occasion Kneale was inspired by the racial tensions that had recently been seen in the United Kingdom, and which came to a head while the serial was in pre-production when the Hill race riots occurred in August and September 1958.(Kneale, Nigel in ) Drawing audiences of up to 11 million,( Quatermass and the Pit has been referred to by the BBCs own website as simply the first finest thing the BBC ever made.() It was also included in the British Film Institutes TV 100 list in 2000, where it was praised for the themes and subtexts it explored. In a story which mined mythology and folklore... under the guise of genre it tackled serious themes of mans hostile nature and the militarys perversion of science for its own ends.()Despite the success of the serial, Kneale felt that he had now taken the character of Quatermass as far as he could. I didnt want to go on repeating because Professor Quatermass had already saved the world from ultimate destruction three times, and that seemed to me to be quite enough, he said in 1986.( It was also his final new collaboration with Rudolph Cartier, although the director did later handle a new version of Kneales 1953 adaptation of Wuthering Heights for the BBC in 1962.()In 1958 Kneales play Mrs Wickens in the Fall, transmitted by the BBC the previous year, was remade by the CBS network in the United States, retitled The Littlest Enemy.( Broadcast on 18 June as part of United States Steel Hour anthology series, the script was severely cut back in length.( It was Kneales only involvement with American television, and he was not pleased with the result. I made up my mind I would never ever again have anything done on a television network in America, he later commented.(Murray, Into the Unknown, pp. 6566.)For the next few years, Kneale concentrated mostly on film screenplays, adapting plays and novels for the cinema. Described by Independent as one of the few writers not to fall out with Osborne,( Kneale adapted Osbornes plays Back in Anger and The Entertainer in 1958 and 1960 respectively, both for director Richardson.( Kneale knew Richardson through having previously adapted a Chekhov short story for the BBC, which Richardson had directed.(Murray, Into the Unknown, p. 62.) Kneale was nominated for the British Film Award (later known as a BAFTA) for Best Screenplay for both films.( producer Saltzman, who had produced the two Osborne adaptations, approached Kneale about scripting a project he was working on to adapt Flemings Bond novels for the cinema; Kneale was not a fan of Flemings work and turned the offer down.(Murray, Into the Unknown, p. 76.) Further adaptations Kneale did work on were Defiant (1962, from the novel Mutiny by Tilsley)() and First Men in the Moon (1964, from the novel by G. Wells).() Less successfully during this period, Kneale completed screenplays for adaptations of the novels of the Flies by Golding and New World by Huxley.( Neither of these scripts ever saw production, as the companies making them went out of businessKneale commented in a 2003 interview that I reckon I closed down at least two film companies.( Another screenplay that went unproduced was a Kneale original, a drama involving a wave of suicides called The Big Giggle,( or The Big, Big Giggle.( Written in 1965 while Kneale was suffering from a mystery illness and forced to stay in bed for a long period, the concept started life as a drama serial for the BBC, before the corporation had second thoughts about the nature of the storyline and the possibility of suicides;( Kneale later agreed that they were probably right not to make it for television.( The production was nearly made as a film by Century Fox, but John Trevelyan, Chief Executive of the British Board of Film Censors, forbade the scripts production.((In 1966 Kneale worked again for Hammer Film Productions when he adapted Loftss 1960 novel The Devils Own into the film The Witches.() Kneale had first worked on the screenplay for the adaptation in 1961,( the same year in which he had begun to adapt Quatermass and the Pit for Hammer.(Pixley, pp. 3839.) Like The Witches, the film version of Quatermass and the Pit took several years to reach the screen, eventually being released in 1967.() Ward Baker directed, with Keir starring as Quatermass.( Kneale was much happier with this version than the previous Hammer Quatermass adaptations,(Pixley, p. 39.) and the film was described by The Independent in 2006 as one of the best ever Hammer productions.( Quatermass and the Pit was Kneales final credited film work; 1979s The Quatermass Conclusion was only released to cinemas in overseas markets after having been made for television in the UK,() and he had his name removed from the credits of III: Season of the Witch (1982).(Kneale had returned to writing for television with the BBC for the first time since Quatermass and the Pit when his play The Road was broadcast in September 1963.( The play concerned the population of an 18th century village who become haunted by visions of a future nuclear war,( and was followed by several further one-off dramas for the BBC over the following decade, including two entries into BBC1s Wednesday Play anthology strand.( During this period he was regarded as one of the finest writers working for the BBC.(Sutton, p. 20 and p. 54. Sutton was the Head of Drama at the BBC during this period, and twice lists Kneale while citing examples of the finest single plays made during his tenure.) Kneale did his first work for the ITV network during this time, writing one-off play The Crunch for the ATV company in 1964.(Murray, Into the Unknown, p. 82.)A particular critical success was Year of the Sex Olympics, broadcast as part of BBC2s 625 series in July 1968.() Kneales first television work to be made in colouralthough only a black-and-white copy now survivesthe story was based in a future where the majority of the population are kept in a docile state by constant broadcasts of pornography and other low-brow television programming. The Live Life Show, in which a family are watched twenty-four hours a day as they struggle to live on an isolated rural island, becomes a massive success, especially when a murderer is introduced into the set-up.The Year of the Sex Olympics has been praised for its foreshadowing of the rise of reality television programmes such as Big Brother (1999present) and Love Island (20052006).( The critic Banks-Smith wrote in 2003 that: In The Year of the Sex Olympics Kneale foretold the reality show and, in the scramble for greater sensation, its logical outcome... This is satire from a TV insider, but it mutates into something far more desolate and disorientating.() The island locations scenes for the production were filmed on the Isle of Man, Kneales homeland.(In 1965 Kneale had been approached by the producer of the BBC2 science-fiction anthology series of the Unknown to write a new one-off 75-minute Quatermass story for the programme.( Nothing came of this, but seven years later he was commissioned by the BBC to write a new four-part Quatermass serial, based in a dystopian near future world overrun with crime, apathy, law and youth cults.( The serial was announced as a forthcoming production by the BBC in November 1972,() and some model filming was even begun in June 1973,( but eventually budgetary problems and the unavailability of Stonehengea central location in the scriptsled to the projects cancellation.( It lingered through the summer and slowly died as a project, he later commented.(Kneales next script for the BBC was Stone Tape, a scientific story broadcast on Christmas Day 1972.() Lez Cooke praised the production, when writing in 2003, describing it as one of the most imaginative and intelligent examples of the horror genre to appear on British television, a single play to rank alongside the best of for Today.(Cooke, p. 126.) His final BBC work was an entry into a series called Bedtime Stories, adapting traditional tales into adult dramas. Kneales script, Jack and the Beanstalk, was transmitted on 24 March 1974, and marked the end of his BBC writing career.(Murray, Into the Unknown, pp. 121122.) ITV and Hollywood Image:Knealedvds.JPG|thumb|A selection of Kneales material available on DVD.Kneales remaining television work was written for ITV.( His first script for ITV was the one-off play Murrain, made by the networks Midlands franchise holders TeleVision (ATV) in 1975.() The play, a horror piece based around witchcraft, led the following year to a series called Beasts, a six-part anthology where Kneale created six different character-based tales of horror and the macabre.( Beasts did not gain a full network run on ITV; different regions transmitted the episodes in different timeslots and some in different sequences.(Murray, BeastsProgramme Notes, pp. 1213.)In the mid-1970s, Kneale made his only attempt at writing a stage play. Called Crow, it was based upon the memoirs of real-life Manx slaver Captain Hugh Crow.( Kneale was unable to find backing to produce the play for the stage, but sold the script to ATV who put it into pre-production for television.( However, shortly before filming it was cancelled by order of ATVs managing director, GradeKneale was never told why.(Following the cancellation of Crow, Kneale moved to work for another of the ITV companies, Television, who in 1977 commissioned the production of the scripts of Kneales previously abandoned fourth Quatermass serial, to be produced by their Films subsidiary film company.( The production was structured to work both as a four-episode serial for transmission in the UK, and a 100-minute film version for cinema release overseassomething Kneale later regretted agreeing to.( Starring Mills as Quatermass and with a budget of over 1 million(more than fifty times the budget of Quatermass and the Pit in 1958(Pixley, p. 36.)the serial was not as critically successful as its predecessors. Thematically no less awesome than Mr Kneales earlier science-fiction essays for BBC Television, his ITV debut has proved only a so-so affair, was the verdict of The Times when previewing the final episode.() Tying in with the series, Kneale returned to prose fiction when he wrote his only full-length novel, Quatermass, a novelisation of the serial.(Kneales next television series was a departure from his usual styleKinvig, his sole attempt at writing a sitcom, produced by Weekend Television and broadcast on ITV in the autumn of 1981.( Although his first out-and-out comedy, Kneale was keen to stress that there had always been elements of humour present throughout his scripts,( and some of the press reaction to Kinvig was positive. If you like the idea of the Hitch-Hikers Guide but found its realization tiresomely hysterical you may well prefer Kneales relaxed wit. Cast splendid, direction deft, was The Timess preview of the first episode.() However, the series was not a success, although Kneale later remained personally pleased with it.(In 1982, Kneale made another one-off diversion from his usual work when he wrote his only produced Hollywood movie script, III: Season of the Witch. Kneale had initially been approached by the director Landis to work on the screenplay for a remake of from the Black Lagoon,() and he and his wife spent some time living at the Hotel in Hollywood while Kneale worked on the project.( The Black Lagoon script never went into production, but while in America Kneale met the director Dante, who invited him to script the third film in the Halloween series, on which Dante was working.( Kneale agreed, on the proviso that it would be a totally new concept unrelated to the first two films, which he had not seen and did not like what he had heard of.(Kneales treatment for the film met with the approval of Carpenter, the producer of the Halloween series, although Kneale was required to write the script in only six weeks.( Kneale got on well with the director assigned to the film, Lee Wallace,( but when one of the films backers, De Laurentiis, insisted upon the inclusion of more graphic violence and a rewrite of the script from Wallace, Kneale became displeased with the results and had his name removed from the film.( He returned to writing scripts for British television, including Gentry with Daltrey for ITV in 1987, and the 1989 adaptation of Hills novel Woman in Black for transmission on ITV on Christmas Eve.() Truss, reviewing a repeat broadcast of the production on 4 for The Times in 1994, wrote that: Clip-clop is not usually a noise to get upset about. But it will be an interesting test, today, to go up behind people and whisper clip-clop, to find out whether they saw The Woman in Black last night. People who made the bold decision to watch this excellent drama will respond to any clip-clop by gratifyingly leaping in the air and grabbing the backs of their necks.() The adaptation nearly went unmade; Kneale had written the script in ten days but been advised by his agent to wait before submitting it to the producers Independent Television so that they would not think he had rushed it.() When he did submit the script three weeks later, he discovered that Central had been about to cancel the production as they had assumed that Kneale, then 67, had not been able to complete the work due to his age.(Susan Hill herself did not like some of the changes that Kneale had made to The Woman in Black.( It has been observed that Kneale on some occasions operated a double-standard with adaptations; being unhappy when others made changes to his stories, but willing to make changes to stories he was adapting into script form. Referring to The Woman in Black adaptation, the writer and critic Newman noted that: He was very offended at the notion of Susan Hill using the name of Kipps from HG Wells as the hero of The Woman in Black, and so he decided not to use it and to change the heros name to Kidd. Im sure if somebody thought that Quatermass was a silly name and changed it, hed be furious!(Murray, Into the Unknown, p. 169.) However, an adaptation he wrote in 1991, a four-part version of Amiss novel Stanley and the Women, met with approval from the original author, with Amis regarding it as the most successful adaptation of any of his work.(Murray, Into the Unknown, p. 172.)Kneale also adapted Sharpes Gold for ITV in 1995, as part of their series of adaptations of Cornwells Sharpe novels.( This was an assignment that surprised his agent; We didnt think hed want to bother with them but he did. That was probably because he liked the producer.( He returned to writing for radio for the first time since the 1950s in 1996, when he wrote the drama-documentary Quatermass Memoirs for Radio 3.(Pixley, p. 40.) Partly composed of Kneale looking back at the events that led to the writing of the original three Quatermass serials and using some archive material, there was also a dramatised strand to the series, set just before the ITV Quatermass serial and featuring Keir, star of the Hammer version of Quatermass and the Pit, as the Professor.(While recording an commentary for that film in 1997, Kneale speculated about a possible Quatermass prequel set in 1930s Germany.( According to The Independent, Kneale conceived a storyline involving the young Quatermass becoming involved in German rocketry experiments in the 1930s, and helping a young Jewish woman to escape the country during the 1936 Berlin Olympics.(Kneale was invited to write for the successful American science-fiction series X-Files (19932002), but declined the offer.( His final professional work was an episode of the ITV legal drama QC, starring Thaw.( Kneales episode, Ancient History, was about a Jewish woman who during the Second World War had been subjected to horrific experiments in a camp.( Transmitted on 17 January 1997 and cited as one of the programmes finest episodes,() it brought Kneales writing career to a close after more than fifty years.He continued to appear as an interview subject in various television documentaries,( and also recorded further audio commentaries for the release of some of his productions on DVD. In 2005, he acted as a consultant when the television channel Four produced a live remake of The Quatermass Experiment.() He lived in London, until his death on 29 October 2006 at the age of 84, following a series of small strokes.( Legacy The writer and actor Gatiss, paying tribute to Kneale on the News Online website shortly after his death, indicated that he was among the first rank of British television writers, but that this had been overlooked. He is amongst the greatshe is absolutely as important as Potter, as David Mercer, as Bleasdale, as Bennett, but I think because of a strange snobbery about fantasy or sci-fi its never quite been that way.( Similarly, his obituary in The Guardian commented that: Kneale was by no means the only author to have been largely wasted by television, and to have seen his status overtaken by opera hacks. But his place is secure, alongside Wells, C. Clarke, Wyndham and Aldiss, as one of the best, most exciting and most compassionate English science fiction writers of his century.(Writing about The Year of the Sex Olympics in 2003, Nancy Banks-Smith felt that Kneale was one of the few television writers whose work was particularly memorable. Once upon a time, Lord Hailsham, proceeding to the chamber of the House in black stockings and full-bottomed wig as Lord High Chancellor, spotted a friend and cried lustily, Neil! They say a whole party of American tourists fell to their knees. At the name of Kneale, I feel, every knee should bow. How much TV do you remember from last night... last year... last century? Quite. Curiously, I can remember clearly the first time I saw The Year of the Sex Olympics by Nigel Kneale. It was 35 years ago.(Kneale was admired by the film director Carpenter,(( who hired Kneale to write the screenplay Halloween III.  Carpenter also wrote the screenplay for his 1987 film Prince of Darkness under the pseudonym Martin Quatermass (a reference to Kneales work).() The fiction writer King has also cited Kneale as an influence,(( with Kim Newman suggesting in 2003 that King had more or less rewritten Quatermass and the Pit in Tommyknockers.(Newman, Kim in ) Other writers to have acclaimed Kneale as an influence on their work have included comics writer Morrison(Murray, Into the Unknown, p. 182.) and television screenwriter T Davies,(Murray, BeastsProgramme Notes, p. 6.) who described the Beasts episode Baby as the most frightening thing Ive ever seen... Powerful stuff.( Film screenwriter and director OBannon was also an admirer of Kneales writing,( and in 1993 wrote a potential remake of The Quatermass Experiment,(Murray, Into the Unknown, p. 183.) of which Kneale approved,(Murray, Into the Unknown, p. 184.) but the film was never made.(High profile entertainment industry figures have publicly expressed admiration for Kneales work, including Beatles drummer Starr,(Murray, Into the Unknown, pp. 9899) members of the rock group Floyd( and Pythons Flying Circus writer/performer Palin.(Kneale never saw himself as a science-fiction writer,( and was often critical of the genre. He particularly disliked the BBC series Who (196389; 1996; 2005present), for which he had once turned down an offer to write.( It sounded a terrible idea and I still think it was, he commented in 1986. The fact that its lasted a long time and has a steady audience doesnt mean much. So has Crossroads and thats a stinker.  He also slammed 7, which he described as the lowest point of British television science-fiction: I think the low point for me would be the very few bits Ive seen of a thing called 7 which I found paralytically awful. The dialogue/characterisation seemed to consist of a kind of childish squabbling and Doomwatch: I was approached to write Doomwatch. That didnt seem to be much good either. ( Doctor Who was heavily influenced by Kneales Quatermass serials,()()() in some cases even using specific storylines that were very similar to those from Quatermass.()() Family In the early 1950s Kneale met fellow BBC screenwriter Kerr, a Jewish refugee, in the BBC canteen.( They married on 8 May 1954(Murray, Into the Unknown, p. 36.) and had two children; Matthew, who later became a successful novelist,( and Tacy, an actress and later a special effects designer who worked on the popular Potter series of films.( Kerr became a successful childrens writer, with the Mog series of books( and Hitler Stole Pink Rabbit, which was based on her own experiences of fleeing Nazi Germany in her youth.( Kneale worked with Kerr on an adaptation of When Hitler Stole Pink Rabbit in the 1970s, but the eventual makers of the film version disregarded their script.(Murray, Into the Unknown, p. 134.) Similarly, in 1995 Kneale scripted a four-part adaptation of one of Kerrs sequels to the book, A Small Person Far Away, but this also went unproduced.(Murray, Into the Unknown, p. 176.)Kneale was proud of his sons success as a writer. When his novel Passengers won the Whitbread Book of the Year award in 2001, his father commented that: Matthews much better than I am. I just wrote screenplays.()Kneales younger brother is the renowned artist and sculptor Kneale, who was Master and then Professor of Sculpture at the Academy from 1982 to 1990.() Bryan Kneale painted the covers for the Quatermass script books released by Books in 1959 and 1960.(Pixley, p. 38.) He was also responsible for a painting of a lobster from which effects designers Bernard Wilkie and Jack Kine drew their inspiration for the Martian creatures they constructed for the original television version of Quatermass and the Pit.() Footnotes  References * * * * * * * *  External links * * Article by Mark Holcomb from The Believer, March/April 2010* Nigel Kneale - An Appreciation* British Film Institute biography* Nigel Kneale at Four, including clips from their 2003 documentary on him.* The Quatermass Trilogy - A Controlled Paranoia* Quatermass.org.uk - Nigel Kneale & Quatermass Appreciation SiteKnealeKnealeKnealeKnealeKneale
679039
Anthony_Williams
Anthony Williams, Antony Williams or Tony Williams may refer to:Anthony Williams*A. Williams (born 1951), former Washington D.C. mayor, 1999-2007*D. Williams, co-author of Wikinomics*Joseph Williams, mining executive*H. Williams, Pennsylvania State Senator*Williams (bishop), Anglican bishop in the Caribbean*Williams (comics), Welsh artist*Williams (Medal of Honor) (1822-?), American Civil War sailor and Medal of Honor recipient*Williams (musician) (born 1931), Trinadadian music pioneer and inventor of the Steel Pans*James Williams, former British Ambassador to Argentina and Cambodia*Raida (1972-2009), American turntablist and hip hop deejayAntony Williams*John Williams (born 1964), Welsh chemist, president of ChemSpider*Williams (technologist), English physicist, Microsoft software architect, designer of OLE and COMTony Williams*Williams (American football) (born 1975), former American football defensive tackle*Williams (drummer) (1945&ndash;1997), jazz drummer*Williams (English musician) (born 1947), bassist in Stealers Wheel and Jethro Tull*Williams (footballer) (born 1977), Welsh goalkeeper who plays for Wrexham A.F.C.*Williams (rugby league) (born 1986), Australian National Rugby League player*Williams (singer) (1924&ndash;1992), lead singer with The Platters*Williams (soul singer), american R&B and soul singerWilliams
683036
Basque_Country_(greater_region)
:Not to be confused with its homonym constituent parts: the autonomous community of the Basque Country in Spain, and the Basque Country in France.The Basque Country () is the name given to the home of the people in the western Pyrenees that spans the border between France and Spain on the Atlantic coast. It comprises the Communities of the Basque Country and Navarre in Spain and the Basque Country in France.Even though they are not necessarily synonyms, the concept of a single culturally Basque area spanning various regions and countries has been closely associated since its very inception to the politics of nationalism. As such, the region is considered home to the people (), their language (), culture and traditions. Nevertheless the area is neither linguistically nor culturally homogeneous, and the very Basqueness of parts of it, such as southern Navarre, remains a very contentious issue. Territorial extension The modern claim for the extent of the Basque Country, coined in the nineteenth century, is seven traditional regions. Some Basques refer to the seven regions collectively as Bat, meaning The Seven are One.Spanish Basque CountryImage:San Sebastian from Igeldo.jpg|thumb|right|Sebastin or Donostia in the languageImage:Zazpiak Bat.svg|thumb|100px|right|Coat of arms of Basque Country or Euskal Herria, as claimed by nationalismThe Spanish Basque Country (, ) includes two main regions: the Basque Autonomous Community (capital: Vitoria-Gasteiz) and the Chartered Community of Navarre (capital: Pamplona).The Basque Autonomous Community (7,234 km)(Area figures for Spanish Autonomous Communities have been found on the Instituto Geogrfico Nacional website ) consists of three provinces, specifically designated historical territories:* lava (capital: Vitoria-Gasteiz)* Biscay (capital: Bilbao)* Gipuzkoa (capital: Donostia-San Sebastin)In addition, some sources consider two enclaves as part of the Basque Autonomous Community:(For instance, as concerns Trevio, Eugne Goyheneche writes that it is and integral part of lava, administratively belonging to the province of Burgos , p. 25.)* of Trevio (280 km),(This figure has been obtained by addition of the area of the municipalities of de Trevio (261 km) and Puebla de Arganzn (19 km), as read on the website of the Nacional de Estadstica (Spain) ) a Castilian enclave in lava* de Villaverde (20 km), a Cantabrian enclave in BiscayThe Chartered Community of Navarre (10,391 km)( is a uniprovincial autonomous community. Its name refers to the medieval charters, the of Navarre. The Constitution of 1978 states that Navarre may become a part of the Autonomous Community of the Basque Country if it was so decided by its people and institutions.  To date, the results of regional elections have shown a clear rejection of this option.  The ruling Peoples Union has repeatedly asked for an amendment to the Constitution in order to remove this clause.(UPN recuerda a Chivite que dej muy claro que la Transitoria Cuarta no tena sentido) French Basque Country thumb|right|Town of Maule (Maulon) in Zuberoa (Soule)The French Basque Country (Basque: Iparralde) is the western part of the French dpartement of Atlantiques. In most contemporary sources it covers the arrondissement of Bayonne and the cantons of Maulon-Licharre and Tardets-Sorholus, but sources disagree on the status of the village of Esquiule.(See for instance ,  or the statistical data of the Euskal Herria Databank  for sources including Esquiule, and  or  for sources excluding Esquiule.) Within these conventions, the area of Northern Basque Country (including the 29 km of Esquiule) is 2,995 km.(This result is obtained by addition of the communal areas given by the Gographique National ; we used for this addition the provincial subtotals as computed by .)The French Basque Country is traditionally subdivided into three provinces:* Labourd, historical capital Ustaritz, main settlement today Bayonne* Navarre, historical capitals Saint-Jean-Pied-de-Port and Saint-Palais, main settlement today Saint-Jean-Pied-de-Port* Soule, historical capital Maulon (also current main settlement)However, this summary presentation makes it hard to justify the inclusion of a few communes in the lower Adour region. As emphasized by Jean Goyhenetche, it would be more accurate to depict it as the reunion of five entities: Labourd, Lower Navarre, Soule but also Bayonne and Gramont.() History Image:Biandintz eta zaldiak - modified2.jpg|thumb|right|Horses in Bianditz mountain Navarre Best Wikimedia Commons photo 2008 According to some theories, Basques may be the least assimilated remnant of the Paleolithic inhabitants of Western Europe (specifically those of the region) to the Indo-European migrations. Basque tribes were mentioned by Roman writers Strabo and Pliny, including the Vascones, the Aquitani and others. There is considerable evidence to show their Basque ethnicity in Roman times in the form of place-names, Caesars reference to their customs and physical make-up, the so-called Aquitanian inscriptions recording names of people and gods (approx. 1st century, see language), etc. Geographically, the Basque Country was inhabited in Roman times by several tribes, i.e. the Vascones, the Varduli, the Caristi, the Autrigones, the Berones, the Tarbelli and the Sibulates. While we are led to think that except for the Berones and Autrigones they were non-Indo-European peoples, the ethnic background of the most westerly tribes is not clear due to the lack of evidence. Some ancient place-names, such as Deba, Butrn, Nervin, Zegama, suggest the presence of non-Basque peoples at this point of protohistory. The ancient tribes are last cited in the 5th century, after which track of them is lost and only Vascones are still accounted for, but even far beyond their former boundaries, e.g. in the current lands of lava. The Cantabri, encompassing probably present-day Biscay, Cantabria, Burgos and at least part of lava and La Rioja, lived to the west of Vascon territory in the Early Middle Ages, but the ethnic nature of this people often at odds with and finally overcome by the Visigoths is not certain. The Vascones around Pamplona, after much fighting against Franks and Visigoths, founded the Kingdom of Pamplona (824), inextricably linked to their kinsmen the Qasi. All other tribes in the Iberian Peninsula had been, to a great extent, linguistically and culturally assimilated by Roman culture and language by the end of the Roman period or early period of the Early Middle Ages (ethnic Basques extended well east into the lands around the Pyrenees until the 9-11 centuries though). In the Early Middle Ages (up to the 9-10th centuries) the territory between the Ebro and Garonne rivers was known as Vasconia, a blur ethnic area and polity struggling to fend off the pressure of the Iberian Visigothic kingdom and Muslim rule on the south and the Frankish push on the north. By the turn of the millennium, after Muslim invasions and Frankish expansion under Charlemagne, the territory of Vasconia (to become Gascony) fragmented into different feudal regions, e.g. the viscountcies of Soule and Labourd out of former tribal systems and minor realms (of Vasconia), while south of the Pyrenees, besides the above of Pamplona, Gipuzkoa, lava and Biscay arose in the current lands of the Basque Country from the 9th century and onwards.These westerly territories pledged allegiance (though intermittently) to Navarre in their early stages, but they were annexed to the of Castile at the end of the 12th century, so depriving the Kingdom of Navarre of direct access to the ocean. In the Late Middle Ages, important families dotting the whole Basque territory came to prominence, often quarrelling with each other for power and unleashing the bloody of the Bands, only stopped by royal intervention and the gradual shift of power from the countryside to the towns by the 16th century. Meanwhile, the viscounties of Labourd and Soule under English suzerainty were finally annexed to France after the Years War at the capitulation of Bayonne in 1451.   In Navarre, the civil wars between the Agramontese and the Beaumontese paved the way for the Spanish conquest of the bulk of Navarre from 1512 to 1521. The Navarrese territory north of the Pyrenees remaining out of Spanish rule would end up being formally absorbed to France in 1620. In the coming decades after the annexation, the Basque Country suffered attempts of religious, ideological and national homogenization, coming to a head in the 1609-1611 witch trials at either side of the border of the kingdoms.Nevertheless, the Basque provinces still enjoyed a great deal of self-government until the French Revolution in the Northern Basque Country, when the traditional provinces were reshaped to form the current Pyrnes-Atlantiques department along with Barn. On the Basque Country, the Charters were upheld up to the civil wars called Wars, when the Basques supported heir apparent Carlos and his descendants to the cry of God, Fatherland, King (Charters abolished definitely in 1876). The ensuing centralised status quo bred dissent and frustration in the region, giving rise to nationalism by the end of the 19th century, influenced by European Romantic nationalism.Since then, attempts were made to find a new framework for self-empowerment. The occasion seemed to have reached on the proclamation of the Spanish Republic in 1931, when a draft statute was drawn up for the Basque Country (Statute of Estella), but was discarded in 1932. In 1936 a short-lived statute of autonomy was approved for the Gipuzkoa, lava and Biscay provinces, while war foiled any progress. After Francos dictatorship, a new statute was designed that resulted in the creation of the current Basque Autonomous Community and Navarre, with a limited self-governing status, as settled by the Spanish Constitution. However, a significant part of Basque society is still attempting higher degrees of self-empowerment (see nationalism), sometimes by acts of violence. The French Basque Country, meanwhile, lacks any political or administrative recognition whatsoever, while a large number of regional representatives have lobbied to create a Basque department, to no avail so far. Demographics The Basque Country has a population of approximately 3 million as of early 2006. The population density, at about 140/km (360/sq. mile) is above the average of Spain or France, but the distribution of the population is fairly unequal and it is concentrated around the main cities. A third of the population is concentrated in the Bilbao metropolitan area, whilst most of the interior of the French Basque Country and some areas of Navarre remain sparsely populated: density culminates at about 500/km for Biscay but goes down at 20/km in the northern inner provinces of Navarre and Soule.(A very readable map of population density for each municipality can be consulted online on the website muturzikin.com)A significant majority of the population of the Basque country live inside the Autonomous Community (about 2,100,000, that is 70% of the population) while about 600,000 live in Navarre (20% of the population) and about 300,000 (roughly 10%) in Basque Country.(See these sources for population statistics: Datutalaia and INE.)Jos Aranda Aznar writes(La mezcla del pueblo vasco, Empiria: Revista de metodologa de ciencias sociales, ISSN 1139-5737, N 1, 1998, pags. 121-180.) that 30% of the population in the Basque Country Autonomous Community were born in other regions of Spain and that 40% of the people living in that territory do not have a single Basque parent.Most of these peoples of Galician and Castilian stock arrived in the Basque Autonomous Community in the late 19th century and throughout the 20th century, as the region became more and more industrialized and prosperous and additional workers were needed to support the economic growth. Descendants of immigrants from other parts of Spain have since been considered Basque for the most part, at least formally.(Over the last 25 years, some 380,000 people have left the Basque Autonomous Community, of which some 230,000 have moved to other parts of Spain. While certainly many of them are people returning to their original homes when starting their retirement, there is also a sizeable tract of Basque natives in this group who have moved due to a Basque nationalist political environment (including ETAs killings) which they regard as overtly hostile.(http://paralalibertad.org/modules.php?opmodload&nameNews&filearticle&sid17223) These have been quoted to be as many as 10% of the population in the Basque Community.(Spanish devolution) Biggest cities # Bilbao 354,145 inhabitants (Basque Autonomous Community, BAC)# Vitoria-Gasteiz 235,661 inhabitants (BAC)# Pamplona 195,769 inhabitants (Navarre)# Sebastin 183,308 inhabitants (BAC)# Barakaldo 95,640 inhabitants (BAC)# Getxo 82,327 inhabitants (BAC)# Irun 60,261 inhabitants (BAC)# Portugalete 49,118 inhabitants (BAC)# Santurtzi 47,320 inhabitants (BAC)# Bayonne 44,300 inhabitants (Pyrnes Atlantiques Department) Non-Basque minorities in the Basque Country  Historical  minorities Various Romani groups existed in the Basque Country and some still exist as ethnic groups. These were grouped together under the generic terms ijituak (Egyptians) and buhameak (Bohemians) by Basque speakers.*The (C)agots also were found north and south of the mountains. They lived as untouchables in Basque villages and were allowed to marry only among themselves. Their origin is unclear and has historically been surrounded with superstitions. Nowadays, they have mostly assimilated into the general society.*The Cascarots were a Roma subgroup found mainly in the Northern Basque Country.*A subgroup of Kalderash Roma resident in the Basque Country were the Erromintxela who are notable for speaking a rare language. This is based on Basque grammar but using Romani-derived vocabulary.(Erromintxela: Notas para una investigacin sociolingstica, Oscar Vizarraga.)*The Mercheros were Quinqui-speakers, travelling as cattle merchants and artisans. Following the industrialization, they settled in slums near big cities.In the Ages, many so-called Franks of language settled along the of Saint James in Navarre and Guipuscoa but were eventually assimilated. Navarre also held Jewish and Muslim minorities but these were expelled or forced to assimilate after the Spanish conquest in the 16th century. One of the outstanding members of such minorities was of Tudela. Recent immigration Since the 1980s, as a consequence of its considerable economic prosperity, the Basque Country has received an increasing number of immigrants, mostly from Europe, Africa, America, Africa, Asia, and China. The vast majority of these immigrants have settled in the major urban areas. Language thumb|180px|right|Percentage of fluent speakers of Basque. Those areas where Basque is not a native language are included within the 0-20% interval)Currently, the predominant languages in the Spanish Basque Country and French Basque Country are, respectively, Spanish and French. In the historical process of forging themselves as nation-states, both Spanish and French governments have, at times, tried to suppress Basque linguistic identity.(Torrealdi, J.M. El Libro Negro del Euskera (1998) Ttarttalo ISBN 84-8091-395-9) The language chosen for education is the most obvious expression of this phenomenon, something which surely had an effect in the current status of Basque.Despite being spoken in a relatively small territory, the rugged features of the Basque countryside and the historically low population density resulted in Basque being a historically heavily dialectalised language, which increased the value of both Spanish and French, respectively, as francas. In this regard, the current Batua standard of the Basque language was only introduced by the end of the 20th century, which helped Basque move away from being perceived  even by its own speakers  as a language unfit for educational purposes.( El vascuence subvena perfectamente a las necesidades de pequeas comunidades agrcolas o de pescadores, a la vida religiosa y poltica de un mundo bastante aislado y de dimensionas pequeas... Pinillos, Jose Luis Coloquio sobre el problema del bilingismo en el Pas Vasco Bilbao 1983)While the French Republics the epitome of the nation-state have a long history of attempting the complete cultural absorption of ethnic minority groups including the French Basques Spain, in turn, has at most points in its history granted some degree of linguistic, cultural, and political autonomy to its Basques. Basques have been historically overrepresented both in the Spanish Marine and military ever since the times of the Empire until recently, same as Basque ports have been historically crucial to inland Spain. Until they became progressively undone starting with the Wars, these historical ties resulted in the generation of a local Basque bourgeoisie, clergy and military men, historically close to the Monarchy, especially in the colonization of the Americas. In all, there was a gradual absorption of Spanish language in the Basque-speaking areas of the Spanish Basque Country, a phenomenon initially restricted to the upper urban classes, but progressively reaching the lower ones as well. Notice that Western Biscay, most of Alava and southern Navarre have been Spanish-speaking (or Romance-speaking) for centuries.But under the regime of Francisco Franco, its government tried to suppress the newly born Basque nationalism, as it had fought on the Republican side of the Spanish Civil War in Gipuzkoa and Biscay. In general, during these years, cultural activity in Basque was limited to folkloric issues and the Catholic Church, while a higher, yet still limited degree of tolerance was granted to Basque culture and language in lava and Navarre, since both areas mostly supported Francoist troops during the war.Nowadays, the Basque Country within Spain enjoys an extensive cultural and political autonomy and Basque is an official language along with Spanish. In Spain, it is favoured by a set of language policies sponsored by the Basque regional government which aim at the generalization of its use. It is spoken by approximately a quarter of the total Basque Country, its stronghold being the contiguous area formed by Guipzcoa, northern Navarre and the Pyrenean French valleys. It is not spoken natively in most of lava, western Biscay and the southern half of Navarre. Of a total estimation of some 650,000 Basque speakers, approximately 550,000 live in the Spanish Basque country, the rest in the French.(Basque language - English Pen)The education system in Spain has three types of schools differentiated by their linguistic teaching models: A, B and D. Model D, with education entirely in Basque, and Spanish as a compulsory subject, is the most widely chosen model by parents. In Navarre there is an additional G model, with education entirely in Spanish.In Navarre the ruling conservative government of del Pueblo Navarro opposes Basque nationalist attempts to provide education in Basque through all Navarre (which would include areas where it is not traditionally spoken). Basque language teaching in the public education network is therefore limited to the Basque speaking north and central regions. In the central region, Basque teaching in the public education network is fairly limited, and part of the existing demand is served via private schools or ikastolak. Spanish is spoken by the entire population, with few exceptions in remote rural areas.The situation of the Basque language in the French Basque Country is tenuous, where monolingual public schooling in French exert great pressure on the Basque language. Basque teaching is mainly in private schools, or ikastolak.UniversitiesThe earliest university in the Basque Country was the of Oati, founded in 1540 in Hernani and moved to Oati in 1548. It lasted in various forms until 1901.(http://www.ehu.es/ingles/paginas/prin_i.htm http://www.ehu.es) In 1868, in order to fulfill the need for college graduates for the thriving industry that was flourishing in the Bilbao area, there was an unsuccessful effort to establish a Basque-Navarrese University. Nonetheless, in 1897 the Superior Technical School of Engineering (the first modern faculty of engineering in Spain), was founded as a way of providing engineers for the local industry; this faculty is nowadays part of the of the Basque Country. Almost at the same time, the urgent need for business graduates led to the establishment of the Commercial Faculty by the Jesuits, and, some time thereafter, the Jesuits expanded their university by formally founding the of Deusto in Deusto (now a Bilbao neighbourhood) by the turn of the century, a private university where the Comercial Faculty was integrated. The first modern Basque public university was the Basque University, founded November 18, 1936 by the autonomous Basque government in Bilbao in the midst of the Civil War. It operated only briefly before the governments defeat by Francos fascist forces.(http://basque.unr.edu/09/9.3/9.3.35t/9.3.35.07.univ.htm http://basque.unr.edu)Several faculties, originally teaching only in Spanish, were founded in the Basque region in the Franco era. A public faculty of economics was founded in Sarriko (Bilbao) in the 1960s, and a public faculty of medicine was also founded during that decade, thus expanding the college graduate schools. However, all the public faculties in the Basque Country were organized as local branches of Spanish universities. For instance, the School of Engineering was treated as a part of the of Valladolid, some 400 km away from Bilbao. Indeed, the lack of a central governing body for the public faculties of the Bilbao area, namely those of Economics in Sarriko, Medicine in Basurto, Engineering in Bilbao and the School of Mining in Barakaldo (est. 1910s), was seen as a gross handicap for the cultural and economic development of the area, and so, during the late 1960s many formal requests were made to the Francoist government in order to establish a Basque public university that would unite all the public faculties already founded in Bilbao. As a result of that, the of Bilbao was founded in the early 1970s, which has now evolved into the of the Basque Country with campuses in the western three provinces.In Navarre, Dei manages the of Navarre with another campus in San Sebastin. Additionally, there is also the University of Navarre managed by the Foral Government.Corporacin Cooperativa has established its institutions for higher education as the University, based in Mondragn and nearby towns.There are numerous other significant Basque cultural institutions in the Basque Country and elsewhere. Most Basque organizations in the States are affiliated with NABO (American Basque Organizations, Inc.).Politics Parties with presence in all the Basque Country as considered in this article *The Nationalist Party (EAJ-PNV-PNB) is the oldest of all nationalist parties, with over 100 years of history. It is Christian-democrat and has evolved towards rather moderate positions though it still keeps the demand for self-determination and eventual independence. It is the main party in the Basque Autonomous Community (BAC) and is the most voted party (about 40% population), but its presence in Navarre and especially in the French Basque country is marginal.*Alkartasuna (EA) (Basque Solidarity). A splinter from PNV since 1984, under the leadership of charismatic lehendakari Garaikoetxea,(Nordberg. Regionalism and revenue. The moderate Basque Nationalist Party, PNV, 19801998. Doctoral dissertation: Department of History, of Helsinki, 2005) as EAJ-PNV had pacted with the Spanish right in Navarre (against the opinion of the local federation) in exchange for support in Bilbao. They are defined as social-democrats and are quite more emphatic in their nationalist claims. Their presence in the French Basque Country is marginal, if any.*Batasuna (Unity) was formerly known as Batasuna (Peoples Union) and Herritarrok (We Basque Citizens). Its ideology is radical nationalist and socialist. It was declared illegal in 2003 after the Spanish parliament passed a new Law of Political Parties, due to its relation(Las caras de Batasuna. http://www.elmundo.es/eta/entorno/batasuna.html) with the terrorist organization ETA. It formerly had representation in the Southern Basque Country, including Navarre, where it is the main Basque independentist force, despite being now forbidden to run in the elections: the last year they were able to participate in elections of Navarre was 1999, getting 15.58% of the votes, while the second nationalist party, EA/EAJ-PNV got just 5.44%.  Its presence in the French Basque Country is marginal. Parties with presence only in the French Basque Country *French Socialist Party, social-democrat, France-wide.*for a Popular Movement, conservative, France-wide.*Batasuna (Patriots Union), the radical left wing Basque nationalist force of the North (allied with Aralar).*Euskal Herria Bai (EH Bai), a coalition party formed by Abertzaleen Batasuna, Batasuna and Alkartasuna. Parties with presence in all of the Spanish Basque Country *Spanish Socialist Worker Party (PSOE), social-democrat, with its branches:**PSE-EE (Mixed Spanish and Basque acronym for: Socialist Party of the Basque Country - Basque Countrys Left) in the Basque Autonomous Community (BAC)**PSN (Socialist Party of Navarre) in Navarre*Peoples Party (PP), conservative, with its branches:**Partido Popular de Navarra (Peoples Party of Navarre) in Navarre**Partido Popular del Pas Vasco (Peoples Party of The Basque Country) in the BAC*United Left (IU), left-wing around the former Communist Party, federalist and republican, with its branches:**Ezker Batua (United Left) (EB-IU) in the BAC**Izquierda Unida de Navarra (United Left of Navarre) (IUN) in Navarre*Party: a breakaway faction separated from Batasuna, stronger in Navarre. Independentist and left-leaning, rejects the use of violence (allied with Batasuna). Parties with presence only in Navarre *Peoples Union, formerly attached to Peoples Party. It has been the ruling party in Navarre since 1996, and is a firm opponent of Basque nationalism and the idea of a greater Basque Country. They stress the singularities and own history of Navarre instead.*Batzarre (Assembly), left-wing coalition around neo-communist Zutik (Stand), mostly internationalist but favorable to self-determination.*Eusko Alkartasuna, Aralar, Batzarre and EAJ-PNV run together to the latest Navarrese elections under the name Bai (Navarre Yes) Basque Nationalism  Political status and violence Image:Flag of the Basque Country.svg|thumb|The Ikurrina, the official flag of the Basque Community, also used informally in Navarre, the French Basque country and abroadSince the 19th century, nationalism (abertzaleak) has demanded the right of some kind of self-determination, which is supported by 60% of Basques in the Basque Autonomous Community, and independence, which would be supported in this same territory, according to a poll, by approximately 25%(http://www.elpais.com/articulo/espana/Solo/25/vascos/apoya/independencia/sondeo/Gobierno/Vitoria/elpporesp/20021225elpepunac_1/Tes elpais.com) of them, the 5% decrease from the previous poll suggesting that the desire for independence is steadily decreasing. This desire for independence is particularly stressed among leftist Basque nationalists. The right of self-determination was asserted by the Parliament in 1990, 2002 and 2006.(EITB: Basque parliament adopts resolution on self-determination)Since self-determination is not recognized in the Constitution of 1978, some Basques abstained and some even voted against it in the referendum of December 6 of that year. However, it was approved by a clear majority at the Spanish level, and simple majority at Navarrese and Basque levels. The derived autonomous regimes for the BAC was approved in later referendum but the autonomy of Navarre (amejoramiento del fuero: improvement of the charter) was never subject to referendum but just approved by the Navarrese Cortes (parliament).There are not many sources on the issue for the French Basque country. ETA Ta Askatasuna (ETA) is recognized as a terrorist organization by the Union and the States. In 2006, ETA declared a permanent ceasefire after nearly 40 years fighting for independence from Spanish and French authorities and the annexation of all Basque lands to a united, socialist state. In June 2007, ETA officially ended the permanent ceasefire. Since then it has committed several bomb attacks and assassinations. In September 2010 ETA again announced a permanent cessation of violence.(ETA announce ceasefire, Sept 2010) Sports The Basque Country has also contributed some sportsmen, primarily in football, cycling, jai-alai, union and surfing.The main sport in the Basque Country, as in the rest of Spain and much of France, is football. The top teams Bilbao, Sociedad, Osasuna, Eibar, Alavs, Unin and Barakaldo play in the Spanish national league. Athletic Bilbao has a policy of hiring only Basque players. This policy has been applied with variable flexibility. Real Sociedad used to practice the same policy, until they signed Irish striker Aldridge in the late 80s.Football is not that popular in the north but the region has produced two very well known and successful football players, Lizarazu and Deschamps.Cycling as a sport is very popular in the Basque Country. Cycling races often see Basque fans lining the roads wearing orange, the corporate color of the telco Euskaltel, coining the term the orange crush during the Pyrenees stages of the de France. Indurain was born in Atarrabia (Navarre), and he won 5 French Tours.Fellow Basque cyclist Olano has won the a Espaa and the World Championship.Two professional, ProTeam teams hail from the Basque Country  and .() The Caisse dEpargne cycling team traces its history back to the Banesto team that included  Indurain. The Euskaltel-Euskadi cycling team is commercially sponsored, but also works as an unofficial Basque national team and is partly funded by the Basque Government. Its riders are either Basque, or at least have grown up in the Basque cycling culture, present and former members of the  team have been strong contenders in the de France held annually in July and Vuelta a Espaa held in September. Team leaders have included riders such as Mayo, Zubeldia and Etxebarria.In the north, union is another popular sport with the Basque community. In Biarritz, the local club is Biarritz Olympique Pays Basque, the name referencing the clubs Basque heritage. They wear red, white and green, and supporters wave the Basque flag in the stands. They also recognize 16 other clubs as Basque-friendly. A number of home matches played by Biarritz Olympique in the Cup have taken place at Anoeta in San Sebastian.The most famous Biarritz & Basque player is the legendary French fullback Blanco, whose mother was Basque. Celaya captained both Biarritz and France. French number 8 Harinordoquy is also a Biarritz & Basque player. Bayonnais is another top-flight rugby union club with Basque ties.Before the banning of league in 1940, a Basque club was the last to celebrate winning the cup.Image:Sara JaI Alai Lapurdi.JPG|thumb|190px|Alai court in Sara. Lapurdi. Pelota courtPelota (alai) is the Basque version of the European game family that includes tennis and squash. Basque players, playing for either the Spanish or the French teams, dominate international competitions.Mountaineering is popular due to the mountainous terrain of the Basque Country and its proximity to the Pyrenees. Iurrategi Iriarte (Aretxabaleta, 1968) is one of the most respected mountaineers in the world. The Basque mountaineer has managed to crown the 14 eight thousands in the world, all of them Alpine style, i.e. without oxygen and few camps and without Sherpas. This is something only 8 people on the planet have achieved. Oiarzabal (from Vitoria) holds the world record for number of climbs above 8,000 meters, with 21. There are also great sport climbers in the Basque Country, such as, Bereziartu, the only female to have climbed the grade 9a/5.14d; and Pou, one of the most versatile climbers in the world. Usobiaga, proclaimed world champion in Xining, China, 2009. Pasaban is already the first woman climbing the fourteen eight-thousanders.One of the top basketball clubs in Europe, Caja Laboral, is located in Vitoria-Gasteiz.In recent years surfing has taken off on the Basque shores, and Mundaka and Biarritz have become spots on the world surf circuit. Traditional Basque sports See also*Country (autonomous community)*Basque Country, in France*people*cuisine*mythology*of active autonomist and secessionist movements*in Spain*of Basques*NavarreReferencesExternal links* Eusko Jaurlaritza/Basque Government* The Basque People in the Middle Ages (historical article)* Bubers Basque Page* Euskara Kultur Elkargoa-Basque Cultural Foundation* EuskoSare Global Basque Communityaf:BaskelandHerriabscoHerriabs:Baskijabr:Euskadi Basccs:Baskickoy Basgda:Baskerlandetde:Baskenlandet:BaskimaaHerriaeo:EskioHerriabasquena mBascachheer Vascagh (thalloo shendeeagh)nam Basgach (mr-chern)Vasco - Euskal Herriako:hr:BaskijaHerriabascoBaskBask(territorium)zeme (reions)(istorinis regionas)li:Baskelandjbo:auskalerik(rgi)Herrianl:Baskenland()no:Baskerlandnn:Baskarlandoc:Bascoat(Region)pl:BaskoniaBascoBascu (Euskal Herria)Kintra (greater region)HerriaCountrydeelesh:Baskija(kulttuuris-maantieteellinen alue)sv:Baskienuk:HerriaBasquewuu:zh:
683996
Economy_of_England
The Economy of England is the largest economy of the four of the United Kingdom, and the sixth largest in the world if the of the United Kingdom were compared with other countries.England is a highly industrialised country. It is an important producer of textiles and products. Although automobiles, locomotives, and aircraft are among Englands other important industrial products, a significant proportion of the countrys income comes from the City.Since the 1990s, the financial services sector has played an increasingly significant role in the English economy and the of London is one of the worlds largest financial centres. Banks, insurance companies, commodity and exchanges are heavily concentrated in the City.The service sector of the economy as a whole is now the largest in England, with manufacturing and primary industries in decline. The only major secondary industry that is growing is the construction industry, fuelled by economic growth provided mainly by the growing services, administrative and financial sector.The British sterling is the official currency of England and the central bank of the United Kingdom, the of England, is located in London.HistoryIn medieval times (c. 11th15th century), the trade was the major industry of England and the country exported wool to Europe. Many market towns and ports grew up on the industry. Poor infrastructure hampered the development of large scale industry. This changed when the canals and railways began to be built, in the late 18th century and early 19th century.England became the worlds first industrialised nation, with the revolution taking place in the late 18th century. This was also the age of British overseas expansion, where England relied upon colonies (such as India,  America, Canada, or Australia) to bring in resources such as cotton and tobacco. English factories then processed goods and sold them on in both the quickly growing domestic market or abroad. Cities grew and large industrial centres were established, especially in the Midlands and England.Heavy industries, such as coal mining, steel production and shipbuilding, declined in England during the second half of the 20th century and were replaced by service industries and hi-tech industries, such as the computer and pharmaceutical industries.SectorsAgriculture and fishingAgriculture is intensive, highly mechanised, and efficient by European standards, producing about 60% of food needs with only 2% of the labour force. It contributes around 2% of GDP. Around two thirds of production is devoted to livestock, and one third to arable crops. Agriculture is heavily subsidised by the European Unions Agricultural Policy and it is not known how large a sector it would be if the market was unregulated.The main crops that are grown are wheat, barley, oats, potatoes, beetsEngland is one of the worlds leading fishing nations. Its fleets bring home fish of every kind, ranging from sole to herring. upon Hull, Grimsby, Fleetwood, Yarmouth, and Lowestoft are among the coastal towns that have large fishing industries.FinanceEnglands capital is London. The of London is Londons major financial district, and one of the worlds leading financial centres. The city is where the Stock Exchange, as well as many other exchanges, are based.Service industries, particularly banking, insurance, and business services, account by far for the largest proportion of GDP and employ around 80% of the working population.Leeds is the UKs second largest financial centre,(http://www.cityoflondon.gov.uk/Corporation/media_centre/files2007/Leeds+key+to+the+UKs+lead+in+financial+services.htm) with over 30 national and international banks based in the city.(http://www.leedsfinancial.co.uk/42_SectorOverviews.html) Over 124,000 people are employed in banking and financial services in Leeds, and over in the wider Leeds City Region.()(http://www.leeds.gov.uk/files/Internet2007/2009/19/04%20leeds%20economy%20-%20updated%20with%20new%20data%2008%2009.pdf)(http://www.leedsfinancialservices.org.uk/7_LFSINews.html?article65)Manchester is the largest financial and professional services sector outside of London and is the mid tier private equity capital of Europe.(http://menmedia.co.uk/manchestereveningnews/news/business/s/1387825_a_capital_way_to_strengthen_links)ManufacturingManufacturing continues to decline in importance. In the 1960s and 70s manufacturing was a significant part of Englands economic output. However, a lot of the heavy manufacturing industry was government-run and had failed to respond to world markets. State industries were sold off and over the 20th century many closed as they were unable to compete; a situation largely reflected in other Western industrialised countries. However, manufacturing still accounts for some 26% of the UKs GDP. England remains a key player in the aerospace, defence, pharmaceutical and chemical industries, and British companies worldwide continue to have a role in the sector through foreign investment.TourismTourism accounts for 96 billion of GDP (8.6% of the economy) as of 2009. It employs over 2 million people  around 4% of the working population.() The largest centre for tourism is London, which attracts millions of international tourists every year.Regional variationthumb|300px|A map of England divided by the average GVA per capita in 2007 showing the distribution of wealthThe strength of the English economy varies from region to region. GDP, and GDP per capita is highest in London. The following table shows the GDP (2004) per capita of England as a whole and each of the nine regions.Two of the 10 economically strongest areas in the European Union are in England. London is number 1 with a 71 338 GDP per capita (303% above EU average); Berkshire, Buckinghamshire & Oxfordshire is number 7 with a 40 937 GDP per capita (174% above EU average).Although being in South West England, which is the 4th strongest region in England, Cornwall and the of Scilly (combined into a NUTS:3 region for statistical purposes) is the weakest area in England, with a GDP per capita of 18 645 per capita, or 79% of the EU average of 21 503.See also*of Northern Ireland*of Scotland*of Wales*of the United Kingdom*of Europe*of country subdivisions by GDP over USD 100 billionsReferencesExternal links*CIA World Factbookde Inglaterrada Inglaterra
690139
Aquilino_Pimentel,_Jr.
 website     Aquilino Nene Quilinging Pimentel, Jr. (born December 11, 1933) is a Filipino politician who served as the of the Senate of the Philippines from 2000-2001.Early Life and CareerDelegate to the 1971 Constitutional ConventionBorn into a political family in de Oro in Mindanao, Pimentel rose to national prominence as an elected delegate to the Constitutional Convention of 1971, representing Misamis Oriental.   The nature of the Constitutional Convention changed when then President Marcos declared Martial Law on September 21, 1972. Pimentel and a few like-minded delegates feared the Constitutional Convention would produce a Marcos-scripted Constitution and were vocal in their opposition.   Pimentel also protested certain provisions as being contrary to the peoples interest.   In the subsequent roundup of those who opposed Marcos, he was arrested in early 1973 and jailed for three months at Camp Crame.  Pimentel, who had a young family, bade his wife Bing Be brave. Dont cry, and submitted to the incarceration.  He was released from prison in time for the signing of the Constitution.  Along with a few other delegates, Pimentel refused to sign the Constitution.He then went to work as a lawyer for the National Secretariat for Social Action of the Catholic Bishops Conference.1978 Interim Batasang Pambansa ElectionsIn April 1978, Pimentel ran for a post in the Interim Batasan elections as an official candidate of the Laban party of Manila with S. Aquino, Jr..  Members of Marcos KBL party swept the seats.  Pimentel and other opposition leaders like Senator M. Taada, Soc Rodrigo, Guingona, Fr. Archie Intengan SJ, and Chino Roces loudly protested the defeat of all opposition candidates and denounced the massive cheating that had taken place.  Pimentel was one of those arrested for leading a demonstration against what he termed farcical elections.  He had spoken out against Marcos bid to produce a rubber stamp legislature to win legitimacy for his iron-fisted regime which was increasingly being criticized here and abroad.  Pimentel was jailed for two months in Camp Bicutan, Metro Manila.Pimentels second stint in prison did not silence him.  In fact, it strengthened his resolve to fight for freedom and to oppose electoral fraud.  Ever the parliamentarian, he brought the battle from the streets to the polls in January 1980 when Marcos allowed local elections.Mayor of Cagayan de OroHis wife Bing recalled they launched his mayoralty bid in Cagayan de Oro with a mere P2,000 in his war chest  all the money the couple could muster.  But  Cagayanons who believed in him contributed to his campaign and penned his name on their ballot.  Pimentel won by a 3-1 margin over his KBL rival, who was fielded by Marcos.  Pimentel ran under the coalition banner of the National Union for Democracy and Freedom and the Mindanao Alliance which busted KBL dominance in Misamis Oriental.  He and his entire slate of candidates for vice mayor and seven city councilors swept the elections in Cagayan de Oro.  His candidates for governor and vice governor also won.Pimentel was not to govern his city unhindered.  In 1981, while he was on a five-week training course in the United States, the Comelec ousted him for political turncoatism, installing the KBL candidate as mayor.  The Comelec cited Pimentel for switching from Laban in April 1978 to the Narional Union for Democracy and Freedom in December 1979 and then running as candidate of the Mindanao Alliance in January 1980.The Comelecs move ired the Cagayanons.  Pimentel partisans immediately staged peaceful demonstrations to express their displeasure.  About 30 of his supporters also started fasting in protest.  Six days later, 10,000 of his supporters marched around the city in a nonviolent show of support for Pimentel who was then on an official trip to the US.  Thousands more lined the streets to cheer them on.  This first-ever demonstration of People Power came at a time when Marcos did not lightly tolerate dissent.Meanwhile, in Manila, Pimentels lawyer, headed by opposition leaders former Senators Lorenzo Taada and Soc Rodrigo, along with Abraham Sarmiento, Raul Gonzales and Joker Arroyo, claimed that the Comelec had acted without jurisdiction and contented that the electorates will should be respected.  The Comelec, however, reaffirmed its decision to oust Pimentel.The conflict made national headlines and photos of demonstrations in Cagayan de Oro appeared in a major daily.  To defuse the escalating turmoil, Marcos engineered a truce and reinstalled Pimentel as mayor, pending a Supreme Council decision.  Pimentel arrived from the US in time to pick up the reins of city government that had briefly been wrested from him.In 1983, while he was in Cebu City, Pimentel was arrested on charges of rebellion and was detained.  He had allegedly given P100 to new Peoples Army commander.  Bing Pimentel recalled it was horrible time as the family did not know where he was.  They traced him to Camp Sergio Osmea and later to Camp Cabahug in the City of Cebu.  Even as he was held in the military detention centers, his followers from Cagayan De Oro and other parts of the country visited him by the hundreds to boost his morale and keep his spirits high.Nene Pimentel disputed the charges and was later released.  Returning home, he was mobbed by thousand of his supporters upon his arrival at the pier of Cagayan De Oro.  Later, he was again arrested for allegedly engaging in ambuscades.  His supporters contributed centavos and pesos in small denomination to bail him out.  Subsequently, Pimentel was placed under house arrest which lasted for almost seven months.Assemblyman for Batasang PambansaFrom the confines of his home, Pimentel continued to keep abreast of national news.  He helped rally the opposition, ran the city and launched his bid as assemblyman for the Batasang Pambansa.  He was, if anything, not quite.  He protested relentlessly and fearlessly against injustice, fraud, corruption and Marcos dictatorial rule.Then, in the aftermath of the assassination of Marcoss chief rival, Benigno Ninoy Aquino in 1983, Pimentel won a seat in the Batasan Pambansa elections of 1984.  But the Marcos government ousted him on the allegation that he had cheated in the elections.  The Supreme Court itself recounted the ballots in an electoral contest.The feisty Pimentel, a relentless critic of the Marcos regime, was often seen with Ninoys widow, Cory, as they rallied the opposition.  At one point, Cory asked him to be her running mate in the 1986 Snap Elections and he agreed.  However, at the 11th hour, when Cardinal Jaime Sin brokered a political marriage between Cory and Salvador Doy Laurel, Jr., Pimentel graciously stepped aside and let history run its course.The widow toppled the dictator who fled the country.  Upon her ascent to power President Aquino appointed Pimentel as Minister of Local Government.  He had the unenviable task of dismantling the structure of dictatorship and corruption left behind by the Marcos regime.  Pimentel wielded the axe deliberately, gaining a breathing space for the new administration.  His critics alleged he had sold positions in the new government, but none could make the charge stick.  Pimentel incurred the ire of some but also the respect of those who saw that he did it without fear or favor or taint of corruption.Senator of the PhilippinesLegislationHe then was elected Senator (19871992), authoring the seminal Local Government Code. As Senator, he authored and sponsored several key pieces of legislation, among them the Local Government Code of 1991, the Cooperative Code, the Philippine Sports Commission Act, the Act Creating the Autonomous Region in Muslim Mindanao, and the Peoples Small-Scale Mining Act.  He also authored and co-sponsored the Generic Drugs Act and the Act Establishing the Philippine Police under a Reorganized Department of Interior and Local Government.1992 Vice-Presidential bidHe then launched a bid for the vice presidency in 1992, running under the Liberal Party with Salonga running for president, finishing fifth among the vice presidential candidates by garnering 9.9% of the vote. He was cheated of victory in the 1995 national elections after running for another term as senator; he took the case to the Supreme Court eventually winning the suit in 2004.Senate PresidencyIn 1998, he ran successfully for another term in the of the Philippines, from 1998-2004. On October 2000 Senate President Drilon issued a statement about the Juetengate Scandal of President Estrada. Drilon was removed as Senate President the next month through a Senate revamp and Pimentel Jr. was installed as Senate President. On December 2000, an impeachment case was filed on the Senate. On January 13, 2001, Pimentel was one of those who voted in favor of the opening of the second bank envelope. Their vote was outnumbered and some of the opposition senators cried in front of Senate President Pimentel. Estrada was ousted in January by the second EDSA People Power Revolution.Pimentel occupied the Senate Presidency until the end of the regular session on June 2001.Blue Ribbon Committee ChairHe was reelected in the May 10, 2004 National Elections attaining the third highest number of votes nationally of nearly 80 candidates for 12 Senate seats.As chair of the Blue Ribbon Committee, he has recommended the prosecution of top government officials of previous administrations in relation to the Expo Pilipino centennial scam and the misuse of the funds of the Retirement and Separation Benefits Systems of the Armed Forces.  He has also recommended the prosecution of certain personnel of the Land Registration Administration for involvement in faking of land titles.  Recently his committee also conducted series of investigations into the allegation of Governor Luis Chavit Singson on jueteng scandal. As Chair of the Committee on Local Government, he has supported far-reaching amendments to further strengthen the role of local government units in national development.  He has also gotten senate approval to return the police to the supervision of LGUs and has authored a law to fix the date for elections of ARMM officials.He is the president and founder of the PDP-Laban party. On April 25, 2008, Senator Pimentel authored a bill that would shift the Philippines into a Republic of the Philippines.Post-Senate CareerPimentel left office on June 30, 2010 after serving three senate terms and briefly as Senate President.NotesExternal links*Senate of the Philippines*Aquilino Pimentels Official Personal Website*Aquilino Pimentels Assets and LiabilitieslistPimentelPimentel, Jr.Pimentel jr.Pimentel, Jr.Pimentel, Jr.
692999
Malaysian_Chinese
postscript)|popplace|relsPredominantly Buddhism and Christianity , folk religion, Confucianism, and Taoism; Guan Dao; relatively small numbers of Muslims(Dept. of Statistics: Population and Housing Census of Malaysia 2000, Table 4.1; p. 70, Kuala Lumpur: Department of Statistics Malaysia, 2001)|langs languages, Mandarin, Cantonese, Foochow , Hakka, Hokkiens, Teochew, English and Malay|relatedChinese, Singaporean, Peranakan, Chindian}}Malaysian Chinese () is a Malaysian of origin. Most are descendants of Chinese who arrived between the fifteenth and the mid-twentieth centuries. Within Malaysia, they are usually simply referred to as Chinese in all languages. The term Chinese Malaysian is also sometimes used to refer to this community.HistoryFirst WaveThe first wave of Chinese settlers came during the Malacca Empire in the early 15th century. The friendly diplomatic relations between China and Melaka culminated during the reign of Sultan Mansur Syah who married Li Po from China. A senior minister of state and five hundred youth of noble births and handmaidens in waiting accompanied the princess to Malacca.(Malaysia-Singapore-6th-Footprint-Travel, Steve Frankham, ISBN 9781906098117) The descendants of these people are called Baba (men) and Nyonya (women).Second WaveThe second and much bigger wave of Chinese immigrants came during the 19th century and early 20th century as coolies. These immigrants were running away from China due to the fighting of the War in 1840. Their immigration to Malaya was encouraged by the British who needed Chinese coolies to work on their rubber plantations and tin mines. The immigrants came as free labour or labour on a credit ticket system. Free labour meant they financed their own journey with savings or loans from their kinsman. These groups of early Chinese coolies are not surprisingly the most exploited by their employers. They worked long hours to pay off the high interest rates on credit ticket system.(http://www.chinatownology.com/overseas_chinese_malaysia.html)OriginsThe Chinese form the largest Chinese group in Malaysia and they came from Fujian, eastern Guangdong and Hainan provinces. Min Nan peopleHokkienThe Hokkiens () are the largest Chinese dialect group in Malaysia. Chinese settlers from the southern regions of Fujian constitute the largest group, and generally identified as Hokkien. The bulk of Chinese settlers in Malaya before the 18th century came from Amoy and Zhangzhou and settled primarily in Penang and Malacca, where they formed the bulk of the local Chinese populace. More Hokkiens settled in Malaya from the 19th century onwards, and dominated the rubber plantation and financial sectors of the Malayan economy.(Yan (2008), p. 71) The bulk of Hokkien-speaking Chinese settled in the Peninsula and formed the largest dialect group in many states, specifically in Penang, Malacca, Kelantan, Terengganu,(Tan (2002), p. 1) Kedah and Perlis.(Tan, Kam (2000), p. 47) In Malaysian Borneo, the Hokkiens make up a sizeable proportion within the Chinese community, and are primarily found in larger towns, notably Kuching and Sibu.(Pan (1999), p. 185-6)TeochewTeochew immigrants () from the Chaoshan region began to settle in Malaya in large numbers from the 18th century onwards, mainly in Wellesley and Kedah (mainly around Muda). These immigrants established were chiefly responsible for setting up gambier and pepper plantation industries in Malaya. More Teochews immigrated to Johor at the encouragement of Temenggong Ibrahim in the 19th century, and many new towns were established and populated by plantation workers from the Chaoshan region. The Teochews constitute a substantial percentage within the Chinese communities in Bahru(Pan (1999), p. 173) and principal towns along the coasts of Western Johor (notably Pontian, Muar and to a smaller extent, Pahat) as well as selected hinterland towns in the central regions of the state.( Many rural communes in Sarawak and Sabah were also populated by the Teochews, many of them being descendants of plantation workers which came to set up gambier and pepper plantations, following the administrative pattern of their countrymen in Johor.(Tan, Kam (2000), p. 39) Smaller communities of Teochews can also be found in other states, notably in Bernam in Selangor, where many Teochews settled down as rice agriculturalists,( as well as in the hinterlands of  Malacca.(Villagers, church authorities in standoff in Malacca, 22 October 2008, Star (Malaysia))HainaneseChinese immigrants () from Hainan began to migrate to Malaya and North Borneo from the 19th century onwards, albeit in much smaller numbers than the aforementioned speech groups. The Hainanese were employed as cooks by wealthy Straits Chinese families, while others were engaged in food catering business or the fishery business and formed the largest dialect group in Kemaman district of Terengganu(Tan (1984), p. 20-2) and Ketam (Selangor) as well as sizeable communities in Penang and Bahru.(Butcher (2004), p. 80) Smaller communities of Hainanese are also found in Sarawak and Sabah, where they work as coffee shop owners and are mainly found in large towns and cities.(Pan (1999), p. 43)Hing HuaThe Henghua people () came from Putian. Their numbers were much smaller than the other Min Chinese from Fujian and they were mostly involved in the bicycle, motorcycle and automobile spare parts industry.Min Dong peopleDong settlers () from Fuzhou (, also known as Hokchew or Foochow among the Hokkiens and Cantonese respectively) and Fuqing () also came in sizeable numbers during the 19th centuries and dominated the corporate industry in the 20th century. They speak a distinct dialect and are classified separately from the Hokkiens and a large number are Christians. The Foochow formed the largest dialect group in Sarawak&ndash;specifically in areas around the River,(Backman, Butler (2003), p. 27) namely in the towns of Sibu, Sarikei and Bintangor. The Foochow also settled in large numbers in a few towns in Peninsular Malaya, notably Sitiawan in Perak and Peng in Johor.(Toong, Siong Shih, p. 1976)Hakka peopleThe Hakka people () came from both Guangdong and Fujian provinces. They form the second largest group of people after the Hokkiens. Large numbers of Hakka settled in the western parts of Malaya and North Borneo and worked as miners in the 19th century as valuable metals such as gold and tin were discovered. Descendants of these miners formed the largest community among the Chinese in  Selangor(Constable (2005), p. 138) and very large communities in Perak (specifically Taiping and Ipoh),(Constable (2005), p. 129) Sarawak , Sabah and Negeri Sembilan.(Constable (1988), p. 137) As the gold and tin mining industries declined in economic importance in the 20th century, many turned to the rubber industry, and large numbers of Hakka settled in Kedah and Johor (principally in Kulai and Kluang).(Hara (2003), p. 24) In Sabah, many Hakkas were involved in agriculture. They cut down the forests to make way for tobacco, rubber and coconut plantations. In time, the Hakka community also dominated the states industry and economy. However, even today, many Sabahan Hakkas are still involved in agriculture, especially those living in rural towns such as Tenom and Kudat where they are often the backbone of the local industry.Cantonese peopleThe Cantonese () mostly came from Guangdong province and a minority from Guangxi province. They form the third largest group of people after the Hakkas. They settled down in Lumpur of the Valley, Ipoh of the Valley in Perak, Pahang as well as Seremban in Sembilan and Sandakan of Sabah. They started the development and turn these early settlement into principal towns. Most of the early Cantonese worked as coolie laborers, engaged in tin mining and rubber plantation.  From the late 19th century onwards as the tin mining industry declined in economic importance, the Cantonese as well as other Malaysian Chinese gradually shifted their focus to business and contribute much to the social and economic development in Malaya.DemographicsAn early census of ethnic groups in the British Malay states, conducted by the British in 1835, showed that ethnic Chinese constituted 8 percent of the population and were mainly found in the Settlements, while the Malays and Indians made up 88 percent and 4 percent of the population respectively.(Yamashita, Eades (2003), p. 7) Malayas population quickly increased during the 19th and 20th centuries, although the majority of Chinese immigrants were males rather than females.(Ooi (1963), p. 122) By 1921, Malayas population had swelled to nearly three million, and the Chinese constituted 30 percent of Malayas population while the Malays constituted 54.7% of Malayas population, whose growth was fueled by immigrants from neighboring Indonesia (the Indians made up most of the remainder). While the Chinese population was largely transient, and many coolies returned to China on a frequent basis, 29 percent of the Chinese population were local born, most of whom were the offspring of first-generation Chinese immigrants.(Chandler, Owens (2005), p. 312) The British government began to impose restrictions on migration during the 1930s, but the difference between the number of Chinese and Malays continued to close up even after World War II. The 1947 census indicated that the Malays constituted 49.5% of the population, compared to the Chinese at 38.4%, out of a total population of 4.9 million.(Hwang (2005), p. 22)By state & territoryThe 2000 Population and Housing Census Report gives the following statistics (excluding non citizens) ():States with large Chinese populationAs of 2008, the majority of Chinese people are mainly concentrated in the west coast states of west Malaysia with significant percentage of Chinese (30% and above) such as Penang, Perak, Selangor, Kuala Lumpur, Johor. Areas with significant Chinese populations(40% and above) for each state are:Kuala Lumpur Kepong, Cheras, Bukit Bintang, Old Klang Road, Petaling, Pudu, Segambut.Selangor Subang Jaya/USJ, Puchong, SS2, Petaling Jaya, Damansara Jaya/Utama, Bandar Utama, Serdang, Port Klang.Penang Penang island, Bukit MertajamPerak Ipoh, Taiping, Batu Gajah, SitiawanJohor Johor Bahru, Kluang, Batu Pahat, Muar, SegamatStates with medium Chinese populationThese are states where the Chinese are a significant minority (10% - 29.9%) such as Malacca, Negeri Sembilan, Pahang, Sarawak and Sabah.The major Chinese population areas (40% and above) for each state areMalacca Malacca CityNegeri Sembilan Seremban, RasahPahang Bentong, Raub, Mentakab, KuantanSarawak Kuching, Sibu, Bintulu, Miri, Sarikei, Sri Aman, Marudi, Lawas, Mukah, Limbang, Kapit, Serian, BauSabah Kota Kinabalu and Sandakan. Tawau, Kudat and scattered regions in the south (most notably Beaufort and Keningau) also have small but significant Chinese communitiesLanguagesA governmental statistic in 2000 classifies the dialect affiliation of the ethnic Chinese in Malaysia:(Dept. of Statistics: Population and Housing Census of Malaysia 2000, Kuala Lumpur: Department of Statistics Malaysia, 2001)Although their ancestral origin are different but due to intermarriages between the different linguistic groups and also due to regional influences, different regions are formed each with its own defacto lingua franca to facilitate communication between the different Chinese dialects in the same region. Furthermore, the younger generations have generally lost command of their own subdialect (e.g. Hainanese, Hing Hua) and prefer to speak the lingua franca in each region.HokkienNorthern Peninsular Malaysia Penang, Kedah, Perlis, East Coast, Taiping are predominantly Hokkien speaking.Klang and Malacca groups are also predominantly Hokkien speaking but the variant spoken is Malaysian Hokkien which has a similar accent to Hokkien. Thus, Sarawak Chinese speak their own accent of Hokkien in various places in Kuching. In Sibu and Sitiawan, Fuzhou (or Foochow) is widely spoken but it is not a lingua franca.HakkaHakka, specifically the Huiyang (, Hakka: Fui Yong) variant, is the main Chinese dialect in the East Malaysian state of Sabah. According to a census in 1991, 113000 Sabahans identified themselves as being of Hakka descent. This is a clear majority over the Cantonese, of whom there were 28000, making them a distant second.(http://www.asiawind.com/forums/read.php?f1&i4039&t4028) This makes Sabah the only state in Malaysia where Hakka is clearly the predominant dialect among the local Chinese. In other regions of Malaysia, there are significant numbers of Hakka people, for example in the town of Miri in Sarawak and in major cities in Peninsular Malaysia. However, many do not speak Hakka due to the stronger influence of Hokkien and Cantonese in Peninsular Malaysia. The variants of Hakka most widely spoken in Malaysian states other than Sabah are the Ho Poh and Moiyan (Meixian) variants, which are very seldom spoken in Sabah itself.CantoneseCentral Peninsular Malaysia Lumpur, Jaya, Jaya, Seremban, Ipoh & Kuantan are predominantly Cantonese speaking.Cantonese is also the main dialect in Sandakan. The only district dominated by Cantonese dialect in Johor is Mersing.Many Chinese of other dialect subgroups are able to understand and/or speak Cantonese at various levels due to the influence of movies and television programs from Kong, which are aired on the TVB channel through the Astro pay television service. The Hakkas, especially, are able to pick up Cantonese with ease due to the similarities between the Hakka and Cantonese dialects.MandarinSouthern Peninsular Malaysia especially Johor are predominantly Mandarin speaking.This is a result of influence from the Mandarin dominant media from Singapore and proximity of Johor to Singapore. Johor and parts of Malacca are able to receive Singapores free-to-air TV.Many Chinese educated Malaysian Chinese families have taken to speaking Mandarin with their children due to the notion that other Chinese dialects are growing increasingly redundant in an era where Mandarin is increasing in importance. This has led to the emergence of a community of young Chinese who are fluent in Mandarin but unable to speak their native Chinese dialect, understand but do not speak it, or prefer not to speak it in public. Unlike Singapore which has a single medium of instruction, not all families send their children to Chinese medium schools so there still exists Malay or English educated Chinese who dont know how to speak Mandarin. Morever, a significant percentage of older generation regardless of education are more comfortable speaking non Mandarin dialects.Education of Malaysian ChineseMalaysian Chinese can be categorised to be educated in 3 different streams of education i.e. English educated, Chinese educated and Malay educated. This is due to the different era and type of education offered mentioned below.Public education in Malaysia is free. There are two types of pre-tertiary schools in MalaysiaNational schools (the medium of instruction is the National language Malay) and National-type schools (the medium of instruction is in either Chinese or Tamil). In all schools, the National language is a compulsory subject and English is taught as a second language.) Malaysian Chinese citizens can therefore choose to attend either Chinese or Malay medium schools.(http://www.portal.mohe.gov.my/portal/page/portal/ExtPortal/Agencies/Study_in_Malaysia/National_Education_System)Most Bachelors degree courses offered at public universities are taught in the national language, that is, Bahasa Malaysia, while post-graduates studies are usually conducted in English. English is used as the primary medium of instruction at most private higher educational institutions.(About 90% of Malaysian Chinese children in Malaysia today go to Mandarin-medium primary schools, while only a small group of 10% or so attend Malay medium primary schools. However, most Malaysian Chinese (more than 95%) switch to Malay medium schools for their secondary education. The rationale behind this is because Malay-medium secondary schools are free while Mandarin-medium secondary schools are fee paying.(postscript   ) The switch from Mandarin medium primary school to Malay medium secondary school for the majority of Malaysian Chinese has resulted in many school dropouts as students are unable to cope with the difference in the medium of instruction. The Chinese Association (MCA) pointed out an estimated 25% of Chinese students dropout before reaching the age of 18; the annual dropout rate is estimated to be over 100,000 and worsening. Certain dropouts become apprentices in workshops, picking up skills like plumbing or motor-repair. Others eager to make a quick buck find themselves involved in illicit trades, such as peddling pirated DVDs or collecting debts for loan sharks.(An older group of Malaysian Chinese who attended school before the 1970s when Malaysia was still a colony are English educated as national schools in Malaysia then used English as the medium of instruction. English-medium teaching was phased out of Malaysian schools by the 1970s and all national schools used Malay as the medium of instruction.() In 2003 to 2011, the Malaysian government introduced an experimental policy of using English as the language of instruction for Science and Mathematics. The policy did not turn out well as only 8% of teachers were using English exclusively in classes while the use of Bahasa Melayu was still common and schools could not find enough staff who could teach in English. In March 2009, 5,000 ethnic Malays who took to the streets to voice their opposition to the policy and in July, the education minister announced that the medium of instruction for Science and Mathematics would revert back to Bahasa Melayu starting from 2012.(Name FormatNon MandarinBefore Mandarin gained popularity among Malaysian Chinese in the late 20th century, Malaysian Chinese romanised their names according to the pronunciation of their Chinese names in their respective original dialect. E.g.: Male: Ah Loy  (Hakka) Male: Chee Hood Siong (Baba) ( http://thestar.com.my/news/story.asp?file/2011/10/5/nation/9630673&secnation)MandarinThe younger generations tend to retain the original dialect for the surname while using Mandarin pronunciation and romanisation for the given name. E.g.:Male: Chan Yung Choong  (Surname: Cantonese, Given name: Mandarin)In recent years, it has become increasingly common for given names to be romanised according to the Pinyin system. E.g.:Female: Wee Xiao Wen  (Surname: Hokkien/Hokchiu, Given name: Mandarin, according to Pinyin romanisation)EnglishSome Chinese will adopt an English nickname for the convenience of Westerners e.g.Yeoh Choo Kheng , Michelle commonly written as YeohMuslimThose who marry Muslims and converted into Muslim will have a Muslim name in front e.g.Tan Yew Leong, Abdullah(Husband of Ahmad) commonly written as Abdullah TanReligionbarsA majority of the Chinese in Malaysia claim to be Buddhist or Taoist, though the lines between them are often blurred and, typically, a syncretic Chinese religion incorporating elements of Buddhism, Taoism, Confucianism and traditional ancestor-worship is practised, with the fact that each individual follows it in varying degrees. Thus, Chinese Buddhism is traditionally embraced by the Chinese which is brought over from China and handed down over the generations of Malaysian Chinese born in Malaysia.About 9.6% are Christian (Mainstream Protestants, Catholics and other denominations including a fast-growing number of Evangelicals and Charismatics). This is largely due to the influences of Western educated Malaysian Chinese who went overseas either for studies or work.A small number (0.7%) profess Islam as their faith due mostly to the compulsory conversion to Islam should a Chinese marry a Muslim in Malaysia.IntermarriageThe Chinese in Malaysia maintain a distinct communal identity and rarely intermarry with native Muslim Malays for religious and cultural reasons. According to Muslim Laws, the Chinese partner would be required by law to renounce their religion and adopt the Muslim religion. Most Malaysian Chinese consider their being Chinese at once an ethnic, cultural and political identity. However, there are many who have intermarried with Indians, who are predominantly Hindu. The children of such marriages are known as Chindians.(postscript ) Chindians tend to speak English as their mother tongue.In the Bornean states of Sabah and Sarawak, Malaysians of mixed Chinese-Native parentage (native referring to the indigenous tribes in those states, e.g. Iban and Melanau in Sarawak as well as Kadazan and Murut in Sabah) are referred to as Sino (e.g. Sino-Iban, Sino-Kadazan). Depending entirely on their upbringing, they are either brought up to follow native customs or Chinese traditions. A small minority forgo both native and Chinese traditions, instead opting for a sort of cultural anonymity by speaking only English and/or Malay and not practicing both Chinese and tribal customs.FoodMalaysian Chinese eat all types of food which includes Chinese, Indian, Malay and Western cuisines. Some Malaysian Chinese are vegetarians, as they may be devoted followers of Buddhism, while others do not consume beef, especially those worshipping the Goddess of Mercy (Guan Yin). Malaysian Chinese food contains similarities and differences with the Chinese food in China.ChinaThe cuisine of Malaysian Chinese food are similar to the food in Southern China as they are primarily from the cuisine, cuisine and cuisine.LocalHowever, there are local inventions such as Loh Mee , thick noodle in clear gravy found only in the Klang Valley and dark gravy in Penang. Bak Kut Teh  originated from Klang and not China.(http://www.astro.com.my/epg/event.php?id4703434) Influences from the spicy cuisine can be found in local inventions such as Curry Mee, Curry Chicken and Chili Crab. The influence from the cuisine can be found in dishes such as Laksa and Mee Siam.CultureThere exist some degrees of differences in the Malaysian Chinese culture compared to that of China. Some traditional festivals celebrated by the Chinese community in Malaysia are no longer celebrated in China after the Chinese Revolution. This is especially true of regional rites and rituals that are still celebrated by the Malaysian descendants of the peasant migrants from China. Some have attributed the traditional practices  of Malaysian Chinese to a little backwater of Chinese culture as it was in China 80 years ago.(BBC News: Chinese diaspora: Malaysia (URL last accessed on May 17, 2007))Socio-economic position within MalaysiaEconomic statusMalaysian Chinese have the highest household income among the 3 ethnic groups in Malaysia. According to Sulaiman Mahbob, as of December 2007, the monthly average household income was at 4,437 ringgit (Malaysian Indians richer than ethnic Malays)Malaysian Chinese are dominant in both business and commerce sectors in Malaysia.(http://www.malaysiaexplorer.net/malaysia_people.html) As a result, they are the biggest taxpayers among all ethnic groups in the country.(The Sun, http://www.sun2surf.com, 27 March 2006, P.10) They contribute almost 90 percent of the countrys income tax.(http://www.malaysia-today.net/mtcolumns/letterssurat/39979-malaysias-malay-dilemma-to-chinese-dilemma-)Non bumiputera153 of the Constitution of Malaysia grants the Yang di-Pertuan Agong (King of Malaysia) responsibility for safeguarding the special position of the Malaysand natives of any of the States of Sabah and Sarawak and the legitimate interests of other communities and goes on to specify ways to do this, such as establishing quotas for entry into the civil service, public scholarships and public education.(http://www.jac.gov.my/jac/images/stories/akta/federalconstitution.pdf)Partly in line with the constitution, Malaysia has devised a long-standing policy of providing action to Bumiputeras (the ethnic Malays) which spans over four decades. action is provided in the form of the New Economic Policy or what is now known as the Development Policy () Under such action, various concessions are made to Bumiputeras. Amongst many other concessions, 70% of seats in public universities are to be allocated to Bumiputeras, all initial public offerings (IPOs) must set aside a 30% share for Bumiputera investors and monetary support were provided to Bumiputeras for entrepreneurial development.(http://staroba.my/index.php?optioncom_content&viewarticle&id36:expensive-race-to-higher-education&catid4:education&Itemid4)(http://dmscairo.net/download/Economy/New%20Economic%20Policy.pdf)Malaysian Chinese along with Indians are considered non bumiputera and hence do not enjoy these concessions.Prominent Malaysian ChineseMiscellaneousEmigrationAmong emigrants, Chinese Malaysians form the largest outflow amongst all ethnic groups in Malaysia. It is forecasted that the proportion of Malaysian Chinese in Malaysias total population will fall from 45% in 1957 to 18.6% in 2035 if current trends continue.(http://english.cpiasia.net/index.php?optioncom_content&viewarticle&id1804:honey-i-shrunk-the-chinese-&catid198:helen-ang&Itemid156)See also*Singaporean*Peranakan*Chinese*Chinese religion*of Malaysia*in China*13 Incident*VillageReferences;Notes;Bibliography*Backman, Michael; Butler, Charlotte, Big in Asia: 25 strategies for Business Success, Palgrave Macmillan, 2003, ISBN 0333985117*Ball, James Dyer, Things Chinese: Or Notes Connected With China, 4th edn., Hong Kong*Butcher, John G., The Closing of the Frontier: A History of the Marine Fisheries of Southeast Asia, c. 1850-2000, Institute of Southeast Asian Studies, 2004, ISBN 9812302239*Constable, Nicole, Chinese Politics in Malaysia: A History of the Malaysian Chinese Association, Oxford University Press, 1988, ISBN 0195888812*Constable, Nicole, Guest People: Hakka Identity in China and Abroad, University of Washington Press, 2005, ISBN 0295984872*Goh, Beng-Lan, Modern Dreams: An Inquiry into Power, Cultural Production, and the Cityscape in Contemporary Urban Penang, Malaysia, 2002, Cornell Univ Southeast Asia, ISBN 0877277303 (0-87727-730-3)*Hara, Fujio, Malayan Chinese and China: Conversion in Identity Consciousness, 1945-1957, NUS Press, 2003, ISBN 9971692651*In-Won Hwang, Personalized politics: The Malaysian state Under Mahathir, Institute of Southeast Asian Studies, 2003, ISBN 9812301852*International Conference of South-East Asian Historians, Papers on Malayan History, Journal of South-east Asian History., 1962*Megarry, Jacqueline, World Yearbook of Education: Education of Minorities, Taylor & Francis, 2006, ISBN 0415392977*Ooi, Jin-Bee, Land, People, and Economy in Malaya, Longmans, 1963*Owen, Norman G.; Chandler, David, The Emergence of Modern Southeast Asia: A New History, University of Hawaii Press, 2005, ISBN 0824828410*Pan, Lynn, The Encyclopedia of the Chinese Overseas, Harvard University Press, 1999, ISBN 0674252101*Tan, Chee Beng, Chinese Minority in a Malay State: The Case of Terengganu in Malaysia, Eastern Universities Press, 2002, ISBN 9812101888*Tan, Chee Beng; Kam, Hing Lee, The Chinese in Malaysia, University Press, 2002, ISBN 9835600562*Tan, Sooi Beng, Ko-tai, A New Form of Chinese Urban Street Theatre in Malaysia, Southeast Asian Studies, 1984*Toong, Siong Shih, The Foochows of Sitiawan: A Historical Perspective, Persatuan Kutien Daerah Manjung, ISBN 9834182406*Yamashita, Shinji; Eades, Jeremy Seymour, Globalization in Southeast Asia: Local, National and Transnational Perspectives, Berghahn Books, 2003, ISBN 1571812563*Yan, Qinghuang, The Chinese in Southeast Asia and Beyond: Socioeconomic and Political Dimensions, World Scientific, 2008, ISBN 9812790470External links*The Malaysian Chinese experiencede Malaisieid:Tionghoa-MalaysiaCina MalaysiaMaleisirsw Malezji Malaysia gc Hoazh:
694021
Norton,_Doncaster
Norton is a civil parish in the Borough of Doncaster (part of Yorkshire, England), on the border with Yorkshire. The northern boundary of the parish is marked by the Went, while the Great North Road forms the western boundary.  It has a population of 4,381.(Office for National Statistics : Census 2001 : Parish Headcounts : Doncaster Retrieved 2009-08-27) now there is plans to put 2 Windfarms in the areaNorton contains the following settlements:Campsallright|thumb|200px|St. Mary Magdalenes church, CampsallCampsall is a village to the north-west of Askern. It is located at approximately , at an elevation of around 50 feet above level. The village contains Campsall Country Park. Campsall is the central village in the former Campsall Parish located in the Riding of Yorkshire. The Parish also includes the settlements of Norton (North settlement) and Sutton (South settlement), which are to the north and south respectively. The Parish is situated on the Magnesian Limestone Belt, a landscape feature formed by a narrow north-south trending escarpment. The Magnesian Limestone Belt is typified by well drained and fertile soils which were ideal for agriculture and the establishment of settlements like Campsall. Prior to the revolution, the area to the east was occupied by the inaccessible and waterlogged marshes of the Humberhead Levels, whilst to the west was the Barnsdale Forest, an area associated with the legend of Hood and various outlaws and bandits who preyed upon travellers on the Great North Road.Following the departure of the Romans, who had a small fort two miles to the west which guarded the crossing of the River Skell by the Great North Road, an early wooden Saxon church was established at Campsall, although nothing of this remains today. Following the Conquest a large Norman church was built out of the local stone to serve the local population who were engaged with agricultural and rural employment during the mediaeval period. During this time Campsall was rapidly growing in importance and was granted a Charter in 1294 entitling it to a weekly Thursday market and an annual four-day fair.  These had ceased by 1627.(David Hey, Medieval South Yorkshire)  A public house, the Ring of Bells (now called the Old Bells) was opened near the church and this pub is believed to be one of the oldest in Yorkshire. However, it has now been closed down after the owners got into financial trouble, leaving the village without a pub for the first time in over 100 years. The Old Bells re-opened in 2010 so that the villagers can once again enjoy a gil or two in this beautiful old building. During the 18th century the village was dominated by the landed gentry. At opposite ends of the village, the Bacon-Franks constructed Campsall Hall and the Cooke-Yarboroughs built Campsmount. The villagers were still mostly employed with farming and working on the two estates and even the establishment of nearby Askern Colliery in 1910 had little impact on the work force of Campsall.It was not until the 1950s that major changes began to affect the village. During this time the Bacon-Franks abandoned Campsall Hall; it was rumoured that Mrs Bacon-Frank was growing tired of the view of Askern Colliery from the Hall. From 1956 the local authority and the National Coal Board developed a large area of housing in Campsall Park and Campsall Hall was converted into flats until 1986 when it was demolished. The Cooke-Yarboroughs had left Campsmount in the late 1930s and the building was used as a military hospital until demolition in the 1950s. A private housing estate was built during the 1970s in the grounds of Campsmount Park.Today Campsall has become established as a village of two parts. There is the old village near the church which still retains some of its rural charm, its cottages occupied by commuters who work in Leeds, Sheffield, Pontefract and Doncaster. There is also the newer part of Campsall formed in the 1950s from the Council and NCB housing projects. Askern Colliery ceased production in 1993 and after several years of relatively high unemployment the local people are beginning to find new employment opportunities, although many of the social problems associated with former mining areas remain. It is hoped that regeneration money from British and European taxpayers will help to solve some of these problems.Campsall hosts the secondary school Campsmount, which over the past 5 years has undergone large scale change. Now being classed as Campmount Technology College there has been financial advantages, leading to structural development including a new sports hall named the David Ashton Sports Hall after the legendary PE teacher who worked there for over 30 years. However, the school caught fire at around 1:30 a.m. on 13 December 2009, and has suffered unrepairable damage with only the David Ashton Sports Hall and The Expressive Arts block/ Library surviving the devastating blaze.()Campsall is very famous for the number of high speed MGF racers who frequent the local side roads and meet regularly at the Old Bells public house which is one of the oldest in Yorkshire.NortonThe village of Norton is located at approximately 53 38 North, 1 10 30 West, at an elevation of around 33 feet above sea level. Although the Sutton Common Iron Age site officially falls within its parish, little is known about Norton until it was recorded in the Domesday Survey of 1086 when it probably had a population of 100 who were solely concerned with agriculture. During the medieval period that followed, Hood was associated with Barnsdale Forest to the west whilst the nearby village of Campsall grew in importance, gaining a chartered market and Norman church. However, Norton gets few mentions in any surviving records from this time.At a later date, Norton Priory was developed on the banks of the Went but this never grew to be particularly significant and was subsequently demolished following the dissolution of the monasteries in 1588. In 1745, Mary Ramsden of Norton died and left 50 shillings to the poor of Norton and several estates to the master and fellows of Hall, Cambridge. Thus a Cambridge College became the of the Manor of Norton and a handsome manor house was built in the village. In the 1800s the Forresters Arms and the School Boy Inn were both established to serve the local population which would still be devoted to agriculture. Following the revolution and the expansion of the railways, a station was opened in Norton in 1855 on the & Yorkshire Railways Knottingley Branch. At the start of the 20th century there were rumours of the development of collieries at nearby Kirk Smeaton and Askern. As Norton was located between the two, a number of rows of red brick terraces were erected speculatively to house the anticipated influx of miners. Subsequently, Askern Colliery was opened in 1910 and a new red brick pub, the Royal Hotel, was built in Norton to serve the colliers of the village.Throughout the 20th century small areas of housing have been built throughout the village and many of the original stone cottages with their long gardens have been demolished, and infilled with housing. The Manor House was pulled down in the 1970s and other older buildings have suffered the same fate since then, e.g. Hope Farm was demolished in 2002 to be replaced a small development of private housing.In the 21st century Norton serves as a pleasant commuter village for people working in the nearby towns such as Doncaster and Pontefract. It still retains two pubs, a post office and two village shops but the only structure left of historic importance is the Grade 2 listed village water pump.Norton means North Farm in old English.SuttonSutton or South Farm in old English, is a small village to the south-west of Askern, and is located at approximately 53 36 20 North, 1 10 West, at an elevation of around 26 feet above sea level. References((Doncaster)(South Yorkshire)(Doncaster)
695922
Santa_Ana_River
 footnotes The Santa Ana River is the largest river of Southern California in the States.  Its basin spans four counties.() It rises in the Bernardino Mountains and flows past the cities of San Bernardino and Riverside, before cutting through the northern tip of the Ana Mountains and flowing southwest past Santa Ana to spill into the Ocean. The Santa Ana River is  long,(U.S. Geological Survey. National Hydrography Dataset high-resolution flowline data. The National Map, accessed March 16, 2011) and drains a watershed of .For its size the Santa Ana drainage basin is quite diverse. It ranges from high peaks of inland mountains in the north and east, to the hot, dry interior and semi-desert basin, to flat coastal plains in the west.  Its climates range from dry alpine to chaparral and desert, and the watershed as a whole is very arid. Relatively little water actually flows in the river or most of its tributaries. One of its largest tributaries, the San Jacinto River, rarely reaches the Santa Ana except in extremely wet years. The relative lack of vegetation also makes the river prone to flooding. Even so, a wide variety of animal and plant life has always been dependent on the river.People have lived on the Santa Ana River for at least 9,000 years. There were four distinct indigenous groups in the area, all of which depended heavily on the river for their livelihoods. The river was first explored by Europeans in 1769, and received its name from Spanish mission fathers in the 19th century. Because it is one of the largest water sources in the four-county region, many large ranchos developed alongside the river and one of its major tributaries, Creek. This period of growth culminated in the establishment of many large cities on the river, including Santa Ana and Riverside, both of which derived their names from the River. In the early 20th century, devastating floods poured down the Santa Ana River, leading to much of the river being channelized and dammed in recent times.Coursethumb|left|altA dry wash threads through a deep evergreen forested canyon between two high gray peaks|Mill Creek is one of two major headwaters forks of the Santa Ana RiverThe Santa Ana River rises in Santa Ana Canyon in the southern Bernardino Mountains, at the confluence of two tiny streams, Heart Bar Creek and Coon Creek, at an elevation of .()() Its highest sources are Dollar Lake, at ,() and Dry Lake, at ,() both on the northern flank of Gorgonio Mountain, at the headwaters of a small left tributary, the South Fork Santa Ana River.(101 Hikes in Southern California, p. 110) The river initially flows west through this broad and deep gorge, and about  from its headwaters, receives its first major tributary from the right: Bear Creek, flowing southwest from well-known Bear Lake.(From Crest to Coast, p. 10) The river turns south, passing through the Oaks Dam, flowing out of its canyon into the arid interior basin of San Bernardino County and Riverside County, and receives Mill Creek from the left as it winds westwards towards the city of San Bernardino. As it passes through the urban area, it receives City Creek from the right and enters a control channel flanked by earthen levees on both sides.()Not long after the confluence with City Creek, Lytle Creek enters from the right. Lytle Creek is one of the largest tributaries of the Santa Ana river, rising in three forks in the San Gabriel Mountains and flowing southeast, becoming the Lytle Creek Wash before discharging into the main stem. From there, the Santa Ana flows southwest, and after passing through the city of Riverside, it discharges into the normally dry flood control reservoir formed by Dam. Two major tributaries of the river join in the reservoir area: Creek from the right, and Temescal Creek from the left.() Temescal Creek drains the largest area of all the tributaries, because it provides the outflow from Elsinore, into which the San Jacinto River flows. It is also one of the longest, at  in length. Except during the wettest years, Temescal Creek contains little or no water because Lake Elsinore is not high enough to overflow.((From Crest to Coast, p. 11)After flowing out of the Prado Dam, the Santa Ana River cuts a second Ana Canyon, a gap, between the northern Santa Ana Mountains and the Hills and Hills, crossing into Orange County. The river roughly bisects the county as it flows southwest towards the ocean. The river is then entirely diverted into spreading grounds for recharge of the aquifer of north Orange County, providing about half of the entire countys municipal water. Downstream of there, the river serves only for flood control and waste drainage purposes, and typically has no more than a trickle of water. Passing the cities of Orange and Tustin, it receives Creek from the left as it enters the city of Anaheim. Here, the river is entirely confined to a concrete flood control channel between earthen levees. After crossing under 5 near Santa Ana the riverbed again becomes earthen as it flows to its mouth between Huntington Beach and Newport Beach. The river accretes in a small lagoon before flowing out to sea at the northern end of Santa Ana River County Beach.((From Crest to Coast, p. 12)WatershedOne of the largest river basins in Southern California and the largest on the South Coast,( the Santa Ana River watershed covers  in parts of four California counties. The main stem of the river flows through three of these counties, and tributaries drain parts of Angeles County into the Santa Ana. The watershed is characterized by the flat, arid basin of the Inland Empire and the coastal plain of north-central Orange County, and is bisected by the Santa Ana Mountains, which run nearly perpendicular to the rivernorthwest to southeast.() There are over 50 major tributaries to the once free flowing and perennial river. The Temescal Creek valley constitutes a major portion and physiographic feature of the Santa Ana River watershed. The area drained by Temescal Creek and the San Jacinto River constitute some 45% of the watershed and extend its boundaries as far south as the State Park area.()About 4.8 million people lived in the Santa Ana River basin as of 2000.(() Most of the population is concentrated close to the river in urban centers such as San Bernardino, Riverside, and Santa Ana. In the Inland Empire, most people live in a thin ribbon of land along the river, while the rest of the land is used for agriculture and ranching. In Orange County, however, nearly all the land is urban. As a result, the Santa Ana River watershed can be thought of as having two distinct parts, separated by the Santa Ana Mountains. Some major bodies of water in the watershed include Elsinore, Irvine, Mathews, Perris, Valley Lake, Skinner, and Bear Lake.( Only one, Lake Elsinore, is naturally formed.( The rest are all formed by dams constructed by county or state water agencies. As an example, Diamond Valley Lake is for the State Water Project.thumb|left|altA river flows out to sea between stone jetties|The channeled mouth of the Santa Ana River between Huntington Beach and Newport BeachSeveral major Southern California drainage basins border on that of the Santa Ana River. In the northwest is the San Gabriel River, another major river with its mouth in Long Beach. On the southwest, the Diego Creek watershed forms much of the boundary within Orange County. Some of the rivers and streams that drain the area between the southwestern boundary of the watershed and the Pacific Ocean are Aliso Creek, Juan Creek,() San Mateo Creek, the Margarita River, and the Luis Rey River. On the east are the drainage basins of the Whitewater River and the Valley, flowing into the Sea,( and on the north is the River, which flows into the basin of the Desert.However, the area that the river drains in Orange County downstream of Santiago Creek is extremely narrow,() because of the diversion of its former Orange County drainage area to the Talbert and Huntington Beach flood control channels, which empty into the Pacific very near the mouth of the Santa Ana. Most of the Santa Ana through Orange County now functions as a conduit to carry runoff from upstream areas directly to the Pacific and drains very little area downstream of the Santiago Creek confluence. About  of land that originally drained to the Santa Ana River in Orange County now is drained by the two flood control channels, colloquially called the Talbert watershed.() The river originally had many different outlets to the Pacific, one of which even extended as far north as the San Gabriel River() or as far south as Harbor. In fact, the original mouth of the river which drained eventually into the Pacific Ocean, was located at what is today the entrance to Newport harbor. Based on a U.S. Coastal Survey from 1878, Newport Bay was predominantly a river estuary with few open channels. The river flowed into the bay bringing with it heavy silt and making boating difficult. To eventually create Newport Harbor, sand that was deposited by the Santa Ana River had to be kept from choking the bay. In 1920, the Bitter Point Dam was built to divert the river away from the bay and on its current course to the ocean at Huntington Beach. Stone jetties were built to form the new river mouth. All of the Islands in Newport Harbor are the product of dredging and man made forming from the sands and silt deposited over time by the Santa Ana River. (http://www2.ocregister.com/multimedia/newportharbor/ Accessed 5-25-11)GeologyImage:San Bernardino Mountains, San Gorgonio Peak, Big Bear Lake, aerial.jpg|thumb|right|200px|altThree mountain ridges cross the foreground with a large lake visible beyond the third ridge and rolling hills beyond the lake|The Transverse Ranges were formed by uplift along the San Andreas Fault. Santa Ana Canyon is between the first and second ridges and Bear Lake is in the background.Ancient igneous, metamorphic and rock underlie and form the geologic base of the Santa Ana River. Most of the strata in the flat valleys and basins of the watershed are underlain by thousands of feet of sediment deposited by transient seas during climate changes and by erosion.(From Crest to Coast, p. 17) Most of the mountains in and rimming the basin consist of granite batholiths only about 75 million years old.( However, much of the rock overlying the highlands, above elevations of , is ancient metamorphic rock up to 1.7 billion years old.(From Crest to Coast, p. 16) This rock originally formed at the bottom of the ancient Pacific Ocean and was uplifted to the highest peaks of the mountains. Even in ages, glaciers have rarely occurred on Southern California mountains, so the rock has remained there for tens of millions of years without significant erosion.(Diverse and complex faulting and geologic instability have shaped the Santa Ana River watershed. The Andreas Fault runs across the northern section of the watershed and was responsible for causing the uplift of the San Bernardino Mountains, part of the Ranges of Southern California.() The Elsinore-Fault Zone crosses the Santa Ana River further downstream, near the Orange County/Riverside County line.( This fault caused the rising of the Santa Ana Mountains, Puente Hills, East Orange Hills, Chino Hills, Loma Ridge, and the other mountain ranges and ridges that run northwest-southeast across the lower section of the watershed, comprising the coastal Ranges.(From Crest to Coast, p. 15) While the larger San Andreas Fault allowed the Transverse Ranges to rise to above  in many places, the Peninsular Ranges are only about half that height.(During the glacial period, when climate change during the Glaciation caused rivers in Southern California to increase greatly in volume, the Santa Ana was able to cut across the Peninsular Ranges, creating the only gap across the range.() During this period, the Santa Ana changed course multiple times, creating wind gaps in the Peninsular Range and occasionally entrenching into the channel of the ancestral Diego Creek. The river later returned to its old course and abandoned the San Diego Creek channel, leaving it a wind gap across the Huntington Beach/Newport Beach mesa.(EcologyImage:Horned lizard defense.JPG|thumb|left|altA spiny reptile on stony, sandy ground|The lizard is one of 13 reptile species that inhabit the Santa Ana River watershed.Hundreds of species of animals and plants characterize the Santa Ana Rivers diversity of climates and vegetation zones. There are over ten of these vegetation zones in the watershedincluding the sparsely vegetated alpine and zones in the mountains, mid-elevation forests of pine, lodgepole and oak, chaparral, sage scrub, the increasingly rare riparian forest and marshes along the river bed, lined with trees and rushes, and the thinly vegetated coastal areas virtually flush with level. The watershed supports up to 200 bird species, fifty mammal species, 13 reptile species, 7 amphibian species, and 15 fish species, including trout.(From Crest to Coast, p. 13)The largest portion of the watershed, the Inland Empire portion, is dominated by a hot, dry desert climate that supports little wildlife, while the climate and vegetation of the San Jacinto River and Temescal Creek watershed is similar to that of the southern Central Valley.(Flora of the Santa Ana River and Environs, p. 4) Downstream of the desert was once the sage scrub and dry grassland community of the Orange County coastal plain, but that region has been almost entirely lost to urbanization. Rimming the arid portions of the watershed are the chaparral zones, consisting of sclerophyllous, thick, low bushes and small trees. The chaparral generally is found between elevations of  and , and occurs mainly closer to the coast on the windward side of the Peninsular Ranges. The oak is one of the most common plants in chaparral regions, forming a dense groundcover that makes it difficult for humans and large animals such as lions, coyotes, and bobcats to traverse.(From Crest to Coast, pp. 23-25) Chaparral growth is determined by wildfires and droughts, and depends on the semi-arid climate of the region.()Perennial and seasonal streams often are lined with oak and sycamore, which transition into the riparian zones of the main stem Santa Ana River. The inland riparian marshes upstream of the Riverside/Orange County line, although degraded by pollution, have otherwise been mostly left in their natural state.(Flora of the Santa Ana River and Environs, p. 3) Although much of the riparian system along the river has been degraded, one of the largest places where it occurs is the enormous marsh behind Dam, an area closed to development because it functions as a flood control basin, similar to the Dam. The Ana sucker, a small bottom-dwelling fish, once was found throughout riparian zones, but now is rarely seen in the Santa Ana River drainage.() Near the mouth, the river was once abundant in marshes, which stretched for miles on either side of the river, even near Newport Bay, which has also served as an alternate mouth of the river.(The alpine and subalpine zones, despite their high elevation (above 9500 feet, 2900 meters) and significant rainfall (up to 35 inches, 89 cm per year), are sparsely vegetated. The windswept terrain of the alpine zone is primarily small brush and weeds, while treesmostly small gnarled pines and junipersoccur in canyons and shielded depressions in the subalpine zone. Inland elevations above  support much denser forest. pine, pine, black oak, pine, and willow constitute most of the forested lands. The mountain habitats of the watershed support many animals typical of Californian mountain regions, including squirrels, chipmunks, black bears, deer, and many species of migratory birds.(From Crest to Coast, pp. 21-22) In the canyons of the San Bernardinos, the river is abundant in landlocked trout and is lined with alders, willow and cottonwoods.(From Crest to Coast, p. 55) Where the river and its large upper tributaries empty out of the mountain canyons into the Inland Empire basin, they are surrounded by the alluvial scrub zone, a mix of desert and upper riparian vegetation. Along the main stem, this zone begins at the base of Oaks Dam and ends at the Lytle Creek confluence.(Image:SAR-Mentone2.jpg|thumb|right|altA clear stream flows between stands of tall grass with a sheer rocky cliff in the background|This segment of the Santa Ana River just downstream of Oaks Dam marks the beginning of the inland riparian zoneHistorically, the Santa Ana was named the best stream in Southern California steelhead trout habitat.() The steelhead is an fish, similar to salmon, that migrates up rivers and streams to spawn. Unlike salmon, which usually only reproduce once, steelhead may reproduce multiple times and have a much longer life span. Steelhead was once found along the entire main stem of the Santa Ana River, as well as on some of its main tributariesCreek, San Antonio and Chino Creeks, Cucamonga Creek, Lytle Creek, City Creek, and Mill Creek. Few, if any, steelhead were present in Temescal Creek (although one of its tributaries was stocked in the 1930s() and none inhabited the San Jacinto River, because it is disconnected from most of the Santa Ana River system.( Up to the 1950s, significant numbers of steelhead trout still migrated in from the ocean.( Because of pollution and modifications to the river, very few steelhead still use the river.() The exception is the presence of landlocked rainbow troutthe freshwater phase of steelheadupstream of Seven Oaks Dam and in the upper reaches of a few tributaries.( Despite the rarity of steelhead, in recent years fin samples from 13 trout were collected from Harding Canyon in the Creek tributary of the Santa Ana River and genetic analysis has shown them to be of native and not hatchery stocks.( )Invasive speciesthose that are not native to the regionhave caused problems in the watershed for many years. One of the most troublesome invasive species is the reed, which plagues many coastal Southern California waterways. The giant reed is similar to a tall grass or thin bamboo, but grows quickly and can take over native stands of vegetation, block the streambed, hurts the habitat of native animals, and increases the hazard of wildfires.() Perhaps the largest effect that giant reed has is its usage of water. To supplement its fast growth growth rate, the giant reed population in the Santa Ana River watershed can consume  of water per year.(()Other invasive species also have affected the Santa Ana River. One of the most prominent is the cowbird, which feeds off parasites and insects identified with cattle, which were brought to Southern California during the Spanish Rancho period. The brown-headed cowbird is a brood parasite, or a bird that lays its eggs in another birds nest. One of the most afflicted birds is the Bells Vireo, whose population also suffers from the loss of riparian habitat. The Least Bells Vireo is considered an endangered species, as is the southwestern willow flycatcher, whose habitat is often shared with the other bird.( The saltcedar is another invasive large weed that also, like the giant reed, uses large amounts of water. Unlike giant reed, the saltcedar has deeper roots, not only making it more difficult to remove but allowing it to access and use up deep groundwater. However, the saltcedar is similar in that it also provides little usable habitat for native animals.()HistoryFirst peoplesHuman habitation on the Santa Ana River dates back 9,000 to 12,000 years ago, close to the early stages of the Holocene period. The first Native Americans to live in the area were nomadic tribes that traveled from place to place, grazing animals on fertile grasslands and gathering fruits and seeds for food. The ancestors of these early people originated from the Shoshone and Uto-Aztecan people of the northwestern United States. Eventually, the human population of the watershed reached a peak of about 15,000.(From Crest to Coast, p. 35) About 8,000 years ago, the climate experienced a change becoming more arid and the originally nomadic tribes began to stay in individual places longer, becoming semi-nomadic. However, they did not establish agriculture, nor did they raise animals or live in villages.( Like many Native American tribes in California, acorns were a staple food of many of the inland valley people. People closer to the ocean often fished and hunted small animals, often from pools and coastal stream areas, for food.(From Crest to Coast, p. 33-34)Several major premodern Native American groups eventually gained control of lands along the river: the Yuhaviatam or Yuharetum people in the upper basin, the Payomkowishum in the southeastern basin, the Cahuilla in the desert areas of the watershed, and the Tongva people in the lower basin.()(From Crest to Coast, p. 36) The Yuhaviatum generally lived in the mountain headwaters of the Santa Ana River and its tributaries rimming the present-day Inland Empire basin, in present-day San Bernardino County, as well as in the foothills of the San Bernardino Mountains.( The Tongva lived on the flat plains of present-day Orange County south of the Santa Ana Mountains. They were also the larger of the two groups, controlling all the coastal lands from the Gabriel Mountains in the north to Aliso Creek in the south, including all of the Angeles Basin.(Spanish periodImage:Bernardo Yorba Adobe.jpg|thumb|right|altBlack and white photo of a small brick house between fields of crops|Bernardo Yorba Adobe was built by Mexican settlers in Can de Santa Ana in 1835When Spanish explorer Rodriguez Cabrillo sailed along the Southern California coast on a voyage to the Islands in 1542, he passed the mouth of the Santa Ana River.( Over 200 years later in 1769, de Portola led an overland expedition northwards through coastal Southern California  now an overseas territory of Spain  and gave the river its name. On Saint Annes Day, July 26, 1769, his party camped near where the Santa Ana River empties from the canyon through the northern Santa Ana Mountains. They named the valley for Saint Anne, and the name of the mountain range and the river derives from there. Fray Crespi, one of the members of the expedition, stated that the river was named El Rio del Dulcissimo de Jesus de los Temblores, referring to an earthquake that struck when they were camped alongside its banks.( The river was soon renamed Rio de Santa Anna  River of Saint Anne  a name that remains today.(From Crest to Coast, p. 37)Although no missions were actually located along the Santa Ana River or within the watershed,(From Crest to Coast, p. 38) the river basin was nearly depleted of native people because the Spanish forced them to work at nearby missions, including San Gabriel Arcangel and San Luis Rey. The affected tribes were usually renamed after the missions, resulting in tribal names such as Gabrielio and Luiseo. Difficult working and living conditions and European diseases such as smallpox killed much of the native population during the roughly 50-year-long Mission Period. The Act of 1833, passed by the newly independent country of Mexico, eventually brought an end to the Mission Period.() The post-Mission Period native population was almost entirely devastated. The population was very little, their native religions were nearly lost, and most of their land had been taken by Spanish settlers.( Although the Mexican governments original intention with the Secularization Act was to provide the Native Americans with their own land and property, most of the provisions made by the act never actually happened. Spanish settlers continued to press into the remaining tribal lands, and eventually, the tribes were forced into the surrounding desert lands or into the high mountains.(Following the Mission Period came the Rancho Period. This occurred when the enormous land holdings of the missions were subdivided into ranchos owned by wealthy individuals. The first of these ranchos along the Santa Ana River was Santiago de Santa Ana, a  rancho on the left bank of the lower Santa Ana River. This rancho was acquired by Don Juan Pablo Grijalva as early as 1801.(Hoover and Kyle, p. 266) Other ranchos on the river followed, including ones in inland areas that had not been exploited in the Mission Period.( The establishments of the ranchos began the tradition of raising cattle in coastal Southern California, a custom upheld until the late 19th century.( Agriculture, however, although established, was not yet a major industry.( A flood that raged down the Santa Ana in 1825 caused the rivers course to change temporarily to an outlet at Bay, depositing sediment that partially created Island.() Spread throughout the ranchos on the Santa Ana River were a few towns, military outposts and trading posts. The Santa Ana River valley was one of the most prosperous regions in Southern California for many decades.American settlementIn the late 1840s, California fought for its independence from Mexico in the War. The Santa Ana river played an important part in the victory of the Americans over the Mexican army. In 1847, one year after the Flag Revolt, a Mexican military force set out northwards to attack a smaller American force in the Los Angeles area. However, the Santa Ana River flooded, preventing the Mexicans from crossing the river to attack the Americans. When the rivers flow finally subsided, the Americans prepared themselves enough to drive the Mexicans out of the region.(From Crest to Coast, p. 41)thumb|left|altA broad river runs between rocky banks|The Santa Ana River near RiversideWhen the Republic was assimilated into the United States in 1848, American settlers began to move into the Santa Ana River region in great numbers. The Mexican ranchos were divided into smaller individual properties, and irrigated agriculture began on a large scale. The city of Santa Ana Viejo, the original location of Santa Ana, was founded in this period. In 1854, Mormons settled in the upper Inland Empire area and started the city of San Bernardino, gaining prosperity by using water from the river, as well as Lytle Creek and Mill Creek, to irrigate crops.( The cattle industry began to decline as farms began to replace ranches. Soon, white settlers in the region were more numerous than Hispanics as well. The Gold Rush around this time was responsible for attracting many of these people to the state, but many remained in Southern California afterwards.(In 1860, a much closer gold rush occurred in the San Bernardino Mountains when prospector William Holcomb discovered significant deposits, just over the northern drainage divide of the Santa Ana River. This discovery exploded into a full-scale gold mining operation in days.( The Santa Ana River served as a conduit for miners traveling to the region and many of the forests in the upper basin experienced clearcutting as a result of the high resource demands of the boom. Gold was also discovered in Lytle Creek in that same year.( Following the gold rush, the cultivation of citrus became the mainstay of the economy of the lower Santa Ana River area.( Through the late 19th century, citrus fields covered much of the coastal plain and led to the naming of Orange County.(Floods, droughts and legacyImage:1938 flood Santa Ana River.jpg|thumb|right|altA river flows past between broken levees, spreading over an extensive flat landscape before continuing to the ocean|The Santa Ana River flooding in 1938, just downstream of Ana Canyon. This view, taken by a Angeles Times photographer from a Air Lines Mainliner, shows flooded agricultural fields in central Orange County, with the Pacific Ocean in the distance.Notwithstanding the increased prosperity in the 1860s, this decade was also the scene of a series of natural disasters. In the Flood of 1862, heavy rains dropped by a series of hurricanes caused the Santa Ana to burst its banks, flooding thousands of acres of land and killing 20 to 40 people in the greatest flood it had experienced in recorded history.(() The levees along the river burst in many places, flooding part of the Inland Empire into a continuous body of water several miles wide stretching from the mouth of Santa Ana Canyon to where the river cuts through the Santa Ana Mountains. Downstream in Orange County, the river overwhelmed nearly all the existing floodworks and transformed the coastal plain into a transient inland sea. The flow, now calculated as a 1,000-year flood, peaked at roughly , over half the average flow of the River.(From Crest to Coast, p. 42)() Even after the flood, detrimental conditions continued in the region. For the two years following the flood, an intense drought caused the deaths of tens of thousands of head of livestock. Despite all of the hardships experienced in the three years, after conditions finally returned to normal, the Santa Ana River watershed again became a prospering agricultural region.( The cities of Santa Ana and Riverside were established in 1869 and 1870, respectively.(From Crest to Coast110 Miles Along Southern Californias Largest River System, p. 43)1934 and 1938 saw a further pair of devastating floods that in part brought an end to the areas citrus industry.() In 1938, the Santa Ana again burst its banks and flooded Anaheim and Orange in up to  of water, stripping away thousands of acres of rich topsoil and destroying many of the citrus groves. Almost 60 people were killed in the disaster and about  of land were flooded,( despite the fact that the flow in the river was only one-third of that of the 1862 flood.(From Crest to Coast, p. 44) With the extreme damage from the floods, the Army Corps of Engineers made the decision to dam and concrete the river beginning in the 1940s, and declared it as the greatest flood hazard in the U.S. west of the River.( Dam, built in 1941, was designed to capture floodwaters from the Inland Empire about  upstream from the rivers mouth. The dams impoundment, Prado Flood Control Basin, was designed to handle a 70-year flood.()thumb|right|altA map showing the Santa Ana River, a few of its tributaries, county boundaries, and a floodplain boundary|Army Corps of Engineers map of the 100-year floodplain of the Santa Ana RiverWith the increased flood protection afforded by the Prado Dam, major industrial development migrating south from the Los Angeles Basin, and the Southern California housing boom in the 1950s and 1960s, the Santa Ana River watershed began its third and final transitionfrom agricultural to urban.( The population of the Santa Ana River basin increased dramatically, but brought with it the threat of greater damage from floods, somewhat compromising the protection afforded by Prado Dam. Because housing and urban areas encroached on the rivers historic floodplainan area once occupied by farmsand the river became confined to a narrow channela flood similar to the ones surrounding the turn of the 20th century would cause much more damage. The construction of roads and buildings also heightened the runoff that would flow into the river during rainfall, a process known as runoff.( In fact, the river flooded again in 1969, and while much of the runoff from the Inland Empire was captured behind Prado Damprobably saving Orange County from an even greater floodSantiago Creek, a large tributary flowing from the Santa Ana Mountains, eroded its banks until it swept away portions of residential communities in the cities of Tustin and Orange.(From Crest to Coast, p. 46)In 1964, the Santa Ana River Mainstem Project, which involved concreting the lower  of the river, was first proposed. Construction work began in 1989, and today, through much of Orange County, the rivers channel is essentially an enormous box culvert.()() The second dam, Seven Oaks Dam, was completed in 1999. This dam captures flood runoff from Santa Ana Canyon before it can enter the Inland Empire.( The dam was designed to withstand a 350-year flood.() Today, the river lies mainly between levees and concrete channels, and especially in its lower course, functions only as a flood drainage channel.(From Crest to Coast, p. 47)Present-day activitiesPollution and restorationthumb|right|Pools of water separated by narrow strips of vegetation with mountains in the distance|The Prado Flood Control Basin on the Santa Ana River has one of the largest remaining riparian zones along the main stem.As with many Southern California rivers, the Santa Ana is heavily polluted and used. The main stem above Oaks Dam is free flowing, as are many of its upper tributaries. Once the river enters the Inland Empire basin, however, much of its flow is diverted for municipal and agricultural water use. Most of the flow in the river below the city of San Bernardino consists of effluent from 45 wastewater treatment plants and dry season runoff, which is collected behind Dam.(New strategies for Americas watersheds, p. 102) Any flow that makes it downstream to Orange County is diverted by another pair of dams into approximately  of groundwater recharge basins, providing approximately  of municipal water for the county every year, or one-third of its water supply.() Downstream of that dam, the river gathers further urban runoff before finally making it into the Pacific.( The Santa Ana River is included on the Environmental Protection Agencys (EPA) list of 304 (l) toxic hot spots list of impaired waterways.(A number of organizations have been formed to try and gain public interest in restoring the river. One of the most prominent is the Santa Ana Watershed Project Authority (SAWPA), formed by five municipal water districts in the Santa Ana River area. A second one is the Santa Ana River Dischargers Association. Both have conducted studies as to what beneficial uses the Santa Ana River would have aside from water supply and flood control, as well as the removal of some of the concreted sections of the lower river. This set of studies is known as the Use-Attainability Analysis, which was submitted to the state Congress, which approved it. However, upon submission to the EPA, it was rejected. As a result, little work has been done to repair the ecological damage that has been caused by urbanization along the river.(New strategies for Americas watersheds, p. 103) Other projects include the Santa Ana Watershed Planning Advisory Committee,( and the Santa Ana River Watershed Alliance (SARWA).()Recreationthumb|left|A path runs alongside a broad river with trees and buildings on the opposite bank|The Santa Ana River bicycle pathThere are many recreational opportunities along the Santa Ana River. The Ana River bicycle path which, when complete, will run from the rivers mouth at Huntington Beach to near the San Bernardino Mountains, currently extends about  along the river to Prado Dam.()() The proposed distance along the trail is over . In Riverside County, the Hidden Valley Wildlife Area also has  of recreational paths.() The Santa Ana River watershed includes parts of the National Forest, Bernardino National Forest, National Forest, Mount San Jacinto State Wilderness Area, Hills State Park, and Lake Perris State Recreation Area. Some entities have been opting for a Santa Ana River Park, which would encompass a strip of land on either side of the river for its entire course. Bear Lake, Elsinore, and Irvine are popular recreational lakes in the watershed. The river never actually flows through any of these lakes, but they each have drainage to the river via tributaries. The Santa Ana River Lakes, located near Anaheim, are a popular recreational fish farm fed with water from the river.CrossingsThe Santa Ana River has over 50 significant crossings, bridges and dams. This list places them from mouth to source.*State Route 1 20px (Pacific Coast Highway)*Victoria Street*Adams Avenue*Interstate 405 20px (Diego Freeway)*Talbert Avenue/MacArthur Boulevard*Slater Avenue/West Segerstrom Avenue*Warner Avenue*Harbor Boulevard*Edinger Avenue*McFadden Avenue*Lyon St							*Bolsa Street/1st Street (Santa Ana)*5th Street (Santa Ana)*Former Pacific Electric Railway Bridge*Fairview Street*Westminster Avenue/17th Street (Santa Ana)*Garden Grove Boulevard/Memory Lane*State Route 22 20px (Grove Freeway)*Interstate 5 20px (Ana Freeway)*Chapman Avenue*State Route 57 20px (Freeway)*Metrolink County Line & Amtrak Surfliner*Katella Avenue*Railroad Bridge*Taft Avenue*Lincoln Avenue*Glassell Street*Metrolink Empire-Orange County Line*Tustin Avenue*State Route 91 20px (Freeway)*Lakeview Avenue*State Route 90 20px (Highway)*Weir Canyon Road*Gypsum Canyon Road*Green River Road*Metrolink 91 & Inland Empire-Orange County Lines*State Route 71 20px (Valley Freeway)*Dam*River Road*Hamner Avenue*Interstate 15 20px (Ontario/Freeway)*Van Buren Boulevard*Metrolink Riverside Line*Mission Boulevard/Buena Vista Avenue*State Route 60 20px (Pomona/Valley Freeway)*Market Street*Riverside Avenue*La Cadena Drive*Metrolink Inland Empire-Orange County Line*Railroad Bridge*Mount Vernon Avenue*Amtrak Limited & Eagle*Interstate 10 20px (San Bernardino/Freeway)*Interstate 215 20px  (San Bernardino/Freeway)*E Street*Waterman Avenue*Pacific Railroad (proposed San Bernardino-Redlands passenger rail line)*Orange Show Road*Tippecanoe Avenue*Alabama Street*State Route 210 20px (Freeway)*Orange Street								*Greenspot Road*Santa Ana Canyon Road*Oaks DamSee also*of rivers of Orange County, California*of tributaries of the Santa Ana River*Populated places on the Santa Ana River*of rivers of California:Terms:*of watershed topics*(river or stream) - aka: watershed and headwaters*Confluence - aka: headwaters*basin - aka: watershed*zone**zone restorationNotesReferences****External links* Santa Ana Watershed Association* Santa Ana River Watershed AllianceAna (eka)Ana Riverja:Ana (rzeka)Ana RiverAna River
698219
Alan_Bond_(businessman)
  children       Alan Bond (born 22 April 1938) is an Australian businessman noted for his criminal convictions and high-profile business dealings, including what was at the time the biggest corporate collapse in Australian history. Bond was born in the Hammersmith district of London, England, and emigrated to Australia with his parents and sister Geraldine in 1950. Beginning his career as a signwriter, he formed what was to be Corporation in 1959. He became a public hero in his adopted country after bankrolling challenges for an international racing trophy, the Cup, which resulted in his selection in 1978 as of the Year() (awarded jointly with Yunupingu). In 1983, his II syndicate won the trophy, which had been held by the York Yacht Club since 1851. In 1992, Bond was declared bankrupt with personal debts totalling A$1.8 billion. He was subsequently convicted of fraud and served four years in prison. Following release, he became active in mining investment, and was included in Review Weeklys Rich 200 List in 2008. But this apparent success soon proved to be hollow and built on speculative investments by associates, one of whom, in December 2010, described Bond as a master manipulator who should be stopped before he does any more damage to anyone.(Alan Bond master manipulator Adelaide Sunday Mail 11 December 2010, at AdelaideNow) History thumb|300px|right|Lippo Centre in Hong Kong, 1987. Bought by Alan Bond.The Perth-based Bond made his fortune initially in property development and at one time was one of Australias most prominent businesspeople. In 1970 he bought three Americas Cup bid yachts from Sir Packer. He later extended his business interests into other fields including brewing (he controlled Castlemaine Tooheys and Heileman Brewing Company in Crosse, Wisconsin, USA), mining, television, and airships. Australias first private university, University, bears his name.He purchased QTQ-9, Brisbane and settled an outstanding defamation dispute the station had with the Queensland premier, Bjelke-Petersen by paying out A$400,000. He said in a television interview several years later that he paid because Sir Joh left no doubt that if we were going to continue to do business successfully in Queensland then he expected the matter to be resolved.In 1987, Bond purchased Van Goghs renowned painting, Irises, for $54 million&mdash;the highest-ever price for a single painting. However the purchase was funded by a substantial loan from the auctioneer, Sothebys, which Bond failed to repay. The transaction was criticised by art dealers as possibly a manipulated sale designed to artificially inflate values generally (which it seems to have done).(Reif, Rita A $27 Million Loan by Sothebys Helped Alan Bond to Buy Irises New York Times, 18 October 1989) The painting was subsequently re-sold in 1990 to the J. Paul Getty Museum in Angeles.(Irises, image at the J. Paul Getty Museum) Also in 1987, he bought the Bond Center in Kong. It is currently known as the Centre, Hong Kong. Purchasing the Nine Network In 1987 he paid $1 billion for the Australia-wide Channel Nine television network from Packers PBL. In a 2003 interview with Andrew Denton, Bond described the negotiations as follows:...when we first sat down, we said, Were either going to sell our stations to you for $400 million, or youre going to sell your stations to us. And he said, Well, I dont really want to sell my stations. And I said, Oh, is that right? So, anyway, after much discussion, Kerry thumped the table and said, Listen, if you can pay me $1 billion, Ill sell them to you, otherwise bugger off... then I rang the Australia Bank. I said, Look, Im in discussions here to buy these television stations. Kerry will sell to me, and what I want to do is put our stations together and then, with Channel, Im going to float it off as a separate entity and raise the capital to pay for it... Packer said $1 billion his asking price, but I think Ill get it for $800 million... bank manager duly rang back and said yes. I said, Thank God. Ill go and have some further negotiations with Kerry, which I did. And true to his word, he never budged one penny off it. So I settled the deal with $800 million and a $200 million note. So he put his own $200 million in. So I had $1 billion. And we put our other two stations up as collateral, which were worth probably $400 million.(Alan Bond interview transcript from Rope, ABC TV interview with Andrew Denton, 3 November 2003)Bond later ended up selling the network back to PBL in 1990 for $700 million in the midst of his business empire collapsing. Packer was quoted as saying You only get one Alan Bond in your lifetime, and Ive had mine.( Bankruptcy In 1992 Bond was declared bankrupt with personal debts totalling A$1.8 billion. In 1995 Bonds family bought him out of bankruptcy, with creditors accepting a payment of A$12 million, a little over half a cent per dollar.In 1997 Bond was sentenced to 7 years in prison after pleading guilty to using his controlling interest in Bell Resources to deceptively siphon off A$1.2 billion into the coffers of Bond Corporation. The funds were used to shore up the cash resources of the ailing Bond Corporation, which spectacularly collapsed, leaving Bell Resources in a precarious situation. Bond was released in 2000, having served four years in prison.()Return to investment activitiesIn 2003, Bond was inducted into the Cup Hall of Fame. Since 2003, Bond has worked closely with his son Craig and long-time business partner Robert Quinn through Strategic Investments Ltd.(Mottram, Linda; Daniel, Zoe Bonds latest venture in liquidationABC Radio AM report, 20 March 2002)(Reece, Damian; Fagan, Mary Bond on comeback trail The Telegraph (UK), 17 September 2000) Since 2004, interests related to the Bond family have held a block of shares in Oil, a business he co-founded with Malin and Robert Nelson, of which the acting chief executive officer is J. Laurie Hunter, Robert Quinns son-in-law. Interests related to the Bond family also control Diamond Resources plc (formerly Lesotho Diamond Corporation) which is developing the Kao diamond pipe in the Kingdom of Lesotho.In 2007, the Federal Court rejected an attempt by Bond to sue freelance journalist Barry over an article Barry wrote about his dealings in Africa with the Lesotho Diamond Company.(Court dismisses case against journalist Paul Barry ABC News 22 September 2007) Bond had claimed that the article had several false statements. In 2008 Bond appealed but this, too, was rejected by the same court which found Mr Bonds claims had no reasonable prospects of success.(Bond loses Federal Court appeal - ABC News 23 June 2008)In 2008, Bond made a return to the Review Weeklys Rich 200 List, in 157th spot, with an estimated wealth of $265 millionthanks primarily to his stakes in Madagascar Oil and Global Diamond Resources.() The wealth may have been short-lived, because a December 2009 press report said he had lost it all and was being pursued by creditors.( References  Books * Terence Maher, Bond, William Heinemann Australia, 1990 ISBN 0-85561-336-X* Paul Barry, The Rise And Fall Of Alan Bond, Bantam Books, 1991 ISBN 1-86359-037-4* Alan Bond and Rob Mundle, Bond, HarperCollinsPublishers Pty Limited, 2004 ISBN 0-7322-7494-X* Reference in living next door to alan - Bloody Wilson song (Australian comedian/songwriter) External links * * Strategic Investments Ltd websiteBond
702678
George_L._Shoup
RepublicanGeorge Laird Shoup (June 15, 1836 December 21, 1904) was the first Governor of Idaho, serving a short time after statehood in 1890 before becoming one of the states first United States Senators.Laird Shoup (NSHC.After being devastated financially in the panic of 1857, Shoup moved to Territory in 1859 to engage in mining and merchandising near Peak. During the Civil War he enlisted with the independent scouts working in Mexico, Colorado, and Texas. He was commissioned colonel when the Colorado Cavalry was formed and took part in the of Apache Canyon during the Civil War and the Creek massacre during the War.(Page 148 and pages 162 and 163, Life of George Bent: Written From His Letters, by George E. Hyde, edited by Savoie Lottinville, University of Oklahoma Press (1968), hardcover, 390 pages; trade paperback, 280 pages (March 1983) ISBN 0806115777 ISBN 978-0806115771)After the war Shoup moved to Virginia City, Territory, and then settled in Salmon, Territory, a city that he helped found. Shoup was appointed commissioner to organize Lemhi County, and in 1874 he was elected to the territorial legislature. With few interruptions, he served on the National Committee for Idaho from 1880 to 1904.In April 1889, President Harrison appointed Shoup governor of Idaho Territory. Shoup remained in the position until July 1890, when Idaho became a state and Idaho Territory ceased to exist. Shoup was elected the states first governor in October.Shoup served as governor of the new state for only a few weeks. In November 1890 the Idaho Legislature elected him to the States Senate. Shoup resigned as governor in December to take his Senate seat. He was succeeded as governor by Lieutenant Governor B. Willey.In the Senate Shoup had many interests, including pensions, education, and military affairs. He was chairman of the Committee on Territories. In that position he advocated liberal and just treatment of the Native Americans. Shoup was reelected to a full six-year term in the Senate by the Idaho Legislature in 1894, but in 1900 he was defeated by  Democrat Dubois.In 1910, the state of Idaho donated a marble statue of Shoup to the Statuary Hall Collection.NotesExternal links**Laird ShoupL. Shoupja:Laird Shoup
704325
Pend_Oreille_River
 map_caption                  Map of the Pend Oreille River and its main tributaries. The Pend Oreille River is a tributary of the River, approximately  long, in northern Idaho and northeastern Washington in the States, as well as southeastern Columbia in Canada. In its passage through British Columbia its name is spelled Pend-dOreille River.(BC Geographical Names, GeoBC, British Columbia Government)  It drains a scenic area of the Mountains along the U.S.-Canada border on the east side of the Columbia. The river is sometimes defined as the lower part of the Clark Fork, which rises in western Montana. The river drains an area of ,( mostly through the Clark Fork and its tributaries in western Montana and including a portion of the River in southeastern British Columbia. The full drainage basin of the river and its tributaries accounts for 43% of the entire River Basin above the confluence with the Columbia.(Water Quality Assessment of Pend dOreille River at Waneta, Ministry of Environment, Canada) The total area of the Pend Oreille basin is just under 10% of the entire  Columbia Basin.CourseThe Pend Oreille River begins at Pend Oreille in County, Idaho in the Idaho Panhandle, draining the lake from its western end near Sandpoint (The Clark Fork River enters the lake from its eastern end). It flows west, receiving the Priest River from the north at the town of Priest River, then flows into southern Pend Oreille County in northeastern Washington at Newport. Once in Washington it turns north, flowing along the eastern side of the Mountains. It flows roughly parallel to the Idaho border for approximately , through the National Forest, past Tiger and Metaline Falls. It crosses the international border into southeastern British Columbia, looping west for about  and joining the Columbia from the east, approximately  north of the international border and approximately  south of Montrose.WatershedSpreading across , the Pend Oreille River watershed stretches across most of western Montana, northern Idaho and northeastern Washington, as well as tiny portions in southern British Columbia drained by the Fork Flathead River and the lower Pend Oreille River. Much of the southern drainage divide of the watershed forms the border of Idaho and Montana, and a very short portion of the northeastern divide forms the border of British Columbia and Alberta. The river is sometimes considered as one with the Clark Fork, which is the primary river flowing into Lake Pend Oreille. For example, in Stewart Holbrooks book The Columbia, he repeatedly refers to the Pend Oreille River as the Clark Fork. If the lengths of the North Fork Flathead, main Flathead, Clark Fork and Pend Oreille are added together, the total is over  stretching from the Rocky Mountains north of Glacier National Park to the Canada-U.S. border south of British Columbia. This makes the Pend Oreille system the second longest tributary of the Columbia River (after the River). It is the fourth largest by discharge (after the Snake, Kootenay and Rivers) and drains the second largest area (second only to the Snake).The Pend Oreille River watershed divide is formed on the east side by the Divide. On the south, the River and Snake River drainage basins border on the Clark Fork. To the west smaller rivers such as the Colville River and tributaries of the Spokane drain the lands past the watershed divide. In the north is the Kootenay River, a similar-sized tributary of the Columbia. To the east, in Montana, is the River and tributaries such as the River and Milk River. In the southwest the watershed borders on the Hole River and River, headwater streams of the Missouri. The Pend Oreille/Clark Fork system is notable in that it cuts right between the Range and Range, two major chains of the Mountains. The only other river to do so is the Kootenay, just to the north. The Mountain Trench runs across the northeast part of the watershed, through the Flathead Valley, and eventually terminating in mountains near the Clark Forks confluence with the Flathead.GeologyMuch of the Pend Oreille valley consists of relatively ancient rock, uplifted over 500 million years ago from the former floor of the Precambrian sea that covered the region during that period. Granite batholiths overlain by layers of sedimentary rock compose most of the higher terrain, such as the Mountains. The age of the rocks along the Pend Oreille generally decreases as one travels downstream (north), and the terrain is also more rugged towards the north than in the south. About 200 million years ago, increased tectonic activity caused the uplift of the Idaho Batholith, a portion of which cooled and eroded to become the present main body of the Range, a major physiographic feature of the watershed which sweeps from northwest to southeast along the entire Clark Fork valley (and the border of Idaho and Montana), by about 70 million years ago. This time period is generally accepted as when the entire Mountains system was formed, although age of the rocks varies with location. In the previous Age, a massive glacier of the Ice Sheet advanced southwards through the Idaho Panhandle, burying the Lake Pend Oreille and upper Pend Oreille River valley with ice hundreds to thousands of feet thick. This formed a pair of ice dams, one gigantic, and one significantly smaller. The one that caused the water of the Clark Fork and other smaller streams to back up into Lake Missoula, which stretched over two hundred miles southwest across western Montana, containing some  of water, was over  high. The second one blocked the upper Pend Oreille River near Sandpoint, creating an enlarged Lake Pend Oreille that could have connected with a similarly enlarged Lake in the north. Water pressure and glacial melt destroyed the larger of the two ice dams several times, causing massive amounts of water to rush out across eastern Washington through the upper Pend Oreille River. A mistaken belief is that these cataclysmic floods, known as the Floods, traveled down the Pend Oreille Valley into the Columbia. Rather, it is now thought that the water completely breached the western divide of the Pend Oreille River valley and rushed out towards the direction of Spokane.()HistoryNative people who lived along the river included the Pend dOreilles and Kalispel (considered as a single tribe by the of Indian Affairs). Archaeological evidence suggests that people lived in the region as early as the end of the last Age, about 11,000-12,000 years ago. The name Pend dOreille or Pend Oreille is variously stated to mean earring, hang from ears, or shape of an ear. Kalispel is thought to mean camas people, referring to the roots that provided their primary food. Both tribes lived around the area of Lake Pend Oreille occasionally ranging lower onto the Pend Oreille River (or maybe they did have settlements along the river?) but the lower (north) basin was generally less populated than the upper (south) portion. The tribe inhabited the upper (Clark Fork) part of the basin, especially the Valley. The Ktunaxa lived just to the east of the Pend Oreille river.The first non-indigenous people to see the Pend Oreille were French-Canadian fur trappers working for various fur trading companies to provide beaver pelts to trade overseas. Some of these people were the ones to coin the term Pend dOreille. Canadian explorer David Thompson saw the river in 1807, after a long and arduous journey from Saskatchewan. His primary mission was to find the source of the Columbia River (Lake), which he did. Afterwards he proceeded to establish trading posts throughout the region, including House on the north shore of Lake Pend Oreille. In 1808, Thompson again traveled into the Pend Oreille region. The following spring, he tried to reach the Columbia River by way of the Pend Oreille, but rapids and waterfalls hampered his attempt. He ended up retreating to another trading post in British Columbia a few months later.(Holbrook, p. 43) After these early explorations, however, there still were no permanent white settlements along the Pend Oreille River.thumb|left|The Pend Oreille River at the town of Metaline FallsBy the 1840s, Europeans and Americans were pouring into the region in increasing numbers, although growth was slow. These newcomers did not strike good relations with the Native Americans of the area, and diseases such as smallpox wiped out many indigenous (this happened with many other tribes across North and Middle America as they were not used to such a sickness). After numerous wars and treaties, much of the land in the Pend Oreille basin especially the upper Clark Fork area had been ceded to the settlers. The last land in the Bitterroot area was given up in 1889, and many tribes of the Pend Oreille basin were moved to reservations in northwestern Montana. In the late 1850s, a major influx of non-indigenous peoples occurred when gold was discovered near Falls on the Pend Oreille River. The first major white settlements in that area, however, were not created until 1884. Mining for gold soon ceased but lead and zinc mining continued, reaching a peak in War II when the metals were desperately needed for the productions of weapons, ships, planes.In the 19th century, logging was the other major industry of the Pend Oreille River area, and attracted hundreds to thousands of men to the region, many of them Scandinavian. Logging was profitable because almost the entire Pend Oreille watershed was forested with various types of trees. However, shipping logs to ports lower on the Columbia River (to the southwest of the Pend Oreille River) was a problem. Not only was the river riddled with frightening waterfalls and rapids, but it flows north, in the opposite direction that the logging companies wanted to move their logs. At about this time, steamboats were introduced to the Pend Oreille River. The first steamboat on the river was The Bertha, buiilt in 1887 at Falls. Other well-known craft included Ione, Spokane, and Metaline (Pend Oreille). These boats carried passengers and ore and also towed log rafts up the river. (Since it flows north, they had to tow the logs south, against the current, to ship it a shorter distance to the lumber mills and factories lower in the Columbia Basin.) Navigation on the Pend Oreille presented few problems upstream of the Box Canyon rapids about three-fourths of the way down the Pend Oreille River (today close to the site of Box Canyon Dam). Many boats were wrecked in the stretch between Box Canyon and the rivers mouth (including Metaline, which was the only large steamer to operate on the lower river on a regular basis). After the Idaho & Washington Northern Railroad was built in the area, steamboat commerce faded and the logs were transported by rail. The Idaho & Washington Northern was eventually succeeded by the Milwaukee Road.The Pend Oreille River valley was never easy for early or later emigrants to settle in. The little arable land that did exist was mostly within the rivers floodplain, and in many places there was only a narrow strip of flat ground that would soon run against vertical cliffs or dense forests with rocky soil. Nevertheless, some permanent settlements persisted, at Newport, Albeni Falls, Ione, Dalkena, Metaline Falls, Cusick, Usk, and many at the sites of the sawmills that cut the lumber extracted from the region. Some emigrants also settled along the Clark Fork, but there were similar problems because for most of its course, the Clark Fork, like the Pend Oreille, flows in a steep and narrow gorge. Larger amounts of people settled in the River valley, around Lake and Lake Pend Oreille, in the Priest River valley, and in the Valley of south-western Montana. Sandpoint (population 7,000), near where the river flows out of Lake Pend Oreille, remains the largest city in close proximity to the river.Damsthumb|right|Map showing dams in the Pend Oreille River watershed (Clark Fork-Lake Pend Oreille-Pend Oreille system highlighted in blue)There are five dams on the Pend Oreille River: Waneta (owned by Teck Cominco) and Seven Mile (B.C. Hydro) dams in Canada, Boundary (Seattle City Light), Box Canyon, (Pend Oreille County PUD), and Albeni Falls (U.S. Army Corps of Engineers) dams in the United States. None provide for fish passage or navigation.NamesVariant names, according to the USGS, include: Bitter Root River, Bitterroot River, Clark Fork, Clarke Fork, Clarkes Fork, Clarks Fork, Deer Lodge River, Hell Gate River, Missoula River, Pend dOreille River, Silver Bow River, Clarks Fork, and Pend-dOreille River.Conservation*Pend Orielle Basin Commission formed to oversee any issues relating to water quality and/or water quantity in Lake Pend Oreille, Pend Oreille River, Priest Lake and Priest River BasinSee also*of tributaries of the Columbia River*of rivers of Washington*of rivers of British Columbia*of rivers of Idaho*of northward-flowing rivers of the United StatesReferencesCitationsBooks*Oreille RiverPend OreilleOreille 
707064
Mount_Kembla
 location1 Mount Kembla () is a mountain in South Wales, Australia, as well a semi-rural township of Wollongong, which gets its name from the mountain. Kembla is an Aboriginal word meaning plenty of game. It is a coal mining area, notable for the Mount Kembla Mine disaster of 1902 in which 96 people lost their lives. Four sub-areas are often classified collectively as Mount Kembla: Kembla Heights, Windy Gully, Cordeaux Valley and Kembla Village (known formerly as American Creek and Violet Hill, respectively). Mount Kembla Village is considered the main village. The village includes a local primary school, church and graveyard, several hundred houses and the Mount Kembla Hotel, which was built during 1896. The general store/post office closed during 2010, making it the first time in 145 years the village has been without one. The village also has a heritage centre showcasing local history, emphasizing the mining disaster. An annual Heritage Festival and 96 Candles Ceremony, commemorating the victims of the mine disaster, have been performed consistently every year since the disaster. The village is accessible from Wollongong, via Cordeaux Road, named after early settlers; and from Keira via Harry Graham Drive. The small village of Kembla Heights is to the northwest, reached by Harry Graham Drive. The Mount Kembla Colliery was established during 1883, and the purpose-built township was constructed by the company to house the employees. The community thrived until late-1970 when the mine closed and the town went into decline, losing its general store, post office, Presbyterian church, tennis courts and public telephones during the following years. Billiton is a mining/steel export company which owns substantial property on and around Mount Kembla. It is currently mining at the Dendrobium site, half a kilometre west of the village. Mount Kembla is joined to the west by the escarpment and, in particular, a mass with two lower summits, Kembla West (512 m) and Mount Burelli (531 m). The mountain forms a prominent peak pointing approximately eastward.Mine disasterThe Mount Kembla Mine disaster was the worst peace-time disaster of Australias history, until the 2009 Saturday bushfires in Victoria. It occurred at the colliery adjacent to the village at 2pm on 31 July 1902. The explosion was caused by ignition of gas and dust by flames used as torches by the miners. 96 workers were killed by the explosion. Hundreds of people helped in the rescue of survivors.A quote from the mine manager, William Rogers, stated that the mine was absolutely without danger from gases, the Mercury reported that gas had never been known to exist in the mine before and the Morning Herald recorded one of the best ventilated mines in the State.()However, after the explosion left 33 widows and 120 fatherless children; an enquiry returned a conclusion that Mount Kembla Mine was both gassy and dusty and that the Meurant brothers and William Nelson came to their death  from carbon monoxide poisoning produced by an explosion of fire-damp ignited by the naked lights in use in the mine, and accelerated by a series of coal-dust explosions starting at a point in or about the number one main level back headings, and extending in a westerly direction to the small goaf, marked 11 perches on the mine plan.(A royal commission concerning the disaster, held in March, April and May 1903, confirmed the gas and coal-dust theory accepted by the earlier coroners jury. Rather than holding any individual official of the Mount Kembla Company responsible, the Commission stated that only the substitution of safety lamps for flame lights could have saved the lives of the 96 victims.( However, flame lights continued to be used well into the 1940s.Some of the dead were buried in Mount Kemblas village cemetery, which also contains a 2.5-metre-tall memorial to the disaster, listing the names of the miners and two rescuers who perished.  The majority were buried in the more remote Windy Gully cemetery, 1.5 kilometres south-west of the village,(Mount Kembla remembers 1902 tragedy Wollongong & Northern Leader 31 July 2008) at which an annual memorial ceremony is observed during the Mt Kembla Mining Heritage Festival on the weekend after 31 July.()HistoryLocal Aboriginal legends told of Mount Kembla and Keira being sisters and the Five Islands being daughters of the wind. The first European to observe the mountain was Captain Cook on his voyage from Whitby. While navigating the east coast of Australia, he noted it as a round hill, its top resembling a hat. The village was first settled during 1817 by George Molle.Two old pit-pony watering holes on the ring track are still visible, as are the remains of an intended carriageway to the top (suspended during the 19th century and never completed) to the north of the Summit Track. On the eastern part of the Ring Track there are two mine entrances. Lantana weed has become a problem in the bushland of Mount Kembla, as have feral goats and deer.During European times Mount Kembla has had a very significant role in mining industry. Mount Kembla is noted as being the home of the first kerosene mine in Australia. This mine was located near American Creek on land owned by John Graham, who remained one of the proprietors once mining operations commenced during mid July 1865. Coal mining has been the main industry in the area and continues presently with Dendrobium Mine still operating.In addition to mining, Mount Kembla has a significant agricultural history; in particular the Cordeaux Valley area which was one of Australias top fruit growing industries, exporting as far away as London in its hey day as one of the countrys best apples producers.  Mount Kembla is known for producing or attracting many creative people; painters, poets, writers, photographers and history buffs are inspired by this beautiful and fascinating area. Notables are Richardson OAM (playwright), Ivan ( and Patricia Englund ( ( both renowned potters) and Leo McNamara OAM (poet and historian), Moore (miner and activist).Mount Kembla forms part of the Illawarra Escarpment State Conservation Area, which stretches from Stanwell Park in the north to Wongawilli in the south. The SCA is managed by the New South Wales National Parks and Wildlife Service.GeographyMount Kembla is joined to the sandstone cliffs of the escarpment, overlooking Wollongong.The summit is 534 metres above sea level and is a prominent local landmark, where it has a lookout linked to a 5.5 km ring track. The mountain has a unique collection of flora, being the fusing point for northern and southern types of eucalypt growth and containing many types of rainforest. It also has two orchards on the western slope. American Creek flows down the mountain, past the mine and village. The mountain is a high outcrop of mainly sandstone in a roughly east-west ridge extending from the escarpment to about two kilometres to its east. It has a summit plateau divided into two sections, the higher one raised slightly above the west one, forming a small rise at the top. The ridge descends from the plateau and the mountain is generally quite thin at the top, widening below to create foothills that extend into the outer western suburbs of Wollongong and Unanderra. Many high trees are to be found there and pockets of rainforest grow about Dapto Creek and American Creek. American Creek flows to the north of the mountain from the joint to the escarpment and Dapto Creek from the southern side. A prominent foothill is at its southeast side, which juts out above farmland.Flora and faunaFlora on the mountain includes blackwood, native peach, bastard rosewood, native cucumber,Sandpaper Fig, Moreton Bay Fig, native Ginger, native Raspberries and hibiscus.Fauna on the mountain includes swamp wallabies, Deer, spotted-tailed quolls, southern brown bandicoots, grey-headed flying foxes, sugar gliders, wombats, possums, burrowing frogs, red-crowned toadlets,  Striped Marsh Frogs, Eastern Water Dragons, Water Skinks, blue-tongued lizards, Diamond Pythons, red-bellied black snakes, Golden-Crowned Snakes and broad-headed snakes, although it is not common to see snakes, as some sources state incorrectly. Common birds are Lyrebirds,  spotted turtle doves, kookaburras, bower birds, superb blue wrens,Crimson Rosellas, King Parrots, White-Headed Pigeons, Brown Cuckoo-Doves, Silvereyes, Eastern Yellow Robins, Rainbow Lorrikeets, Little Wattlebirds, grey and pied butcherbirds, Yellow-Tailed Black Cockatoos, Golden Whistlers, Topknot (Flocker) Pigeons, Wonga Pigeons, magpies, currawongs, ravens, miners, honeyeaters (Lewins, New Holland, Spinebill, Yellow-Faced) Eastern Whipbirds, White-Browed Scrub Wrens, Rufous Fantails, Red-Browed Finches,  and swallows. In 1804 a logrunner bird was collected on Mount Kembla, this being the first to be scientifically described, although it is not common to see logrunners, or brush turkeys as some sources incorrectly state. The European and scientific discovery of the koala in Australia was made at Mount Kembla and took place between JuneAugust 1803 and involved type specimens collected and  brought in to Sydney during August 1803 where they were immediately figured by botanical draughtsman Ferdinand Bauer (17601826) and described by noted botanist Robert Brown (17731858). Koalas disappeared from the area probably during a subsequent gradual period of time due to the affect of clearing of forest in the habitat by settlers -  however they were noticeably absent after a great fire of 1909 swept the Cordeax Valley and Mount Kembla area. The last report of suspected koala activity was during 1919 in the Cordeaux area.Walking TracksThe Mount Kembla Ring Track follows a course around the mountain starting from the Kembla Lookout carpark on Cordeaux Road. It goes down some stone steps into a gully that flows down into Dapto Creek and then goes along the southern side of the mountain through palm and fern growth before turning at a junction. At this junction there is one of two pit pony watering holes on the east side of the mountain. The right turnoff goes into private property on Farmborough Road, but the left goes north to the second watering hole and a mine entrance. Another deviation on this side goes to another mine entrance, both are closed due to tunnel collapse risk. From here it goes through more open canopied Sclerophyll growth before coming out at Cordeaux Road near private property, though the track is legal for walking as long as within this marked section one does not deviate from the track itself. To complete the walk one must go up the road back to the lookout. This is generally done as described in an anti-clockwise fashion. Deer and Wallabies are a not uncommon sight, with occasional snakes and feral goats seen.thumb|Mount Kembla summit trackThe Mount Kembla Summit Track goes along the same small stretch of dry bush that begins the Ring Track but then branches to the left after a map/information stand. It climbs gradually up the summit ridge and on to the two summit plateaus, one by one, before going along the second to the trigonometry station.thumb|Boulders on Summit Trackthumb|Kembla West seen from Mount Kembla summit trackThe plateaus are both thin and go in an east-west direction along the ridge. The track is signposted near the beginning warning of crumbling edges but is also known for being saved from weathering and allowing easy access to the top. Beside this track to the left (north) is an old carriageway built but not completed, after finding large sandstone boulders at the top, during the late 19th century. It is still clear though overgrown. Halfway along this track there are several rock outcrop lookouts where good views south and west can be seen, the summit offering views northeast to southeast. Lyrebirds are often seen as well as pigeons and occasional wild turkeys.thumb|Bushland at Mount KemblaA former bridle track, the now somewhat overgrown after a while track that starts on the west side of the Cordeaux Road carpark at the Kembla Lookout is known as the Bridle Track on most maps. It goes along the escarpment, just below the edge, and can be quite slippery during moist conditions, several stages requiring jumping from rock to rock, however for the most part it is accessible if careful. The track goes through Illawarra rainforest with Lyrebirds quite common as well as swamp wallabies. The track used to go all the way to the - Moss Vale railway line but is now overgrown beyond several hundred metres or so.Further up Cordeaux Road, the Ridge Track used to give walkers access to Harry Graham Drive, bypassing the summits of both Mount Burelli (531 m) and Kembla West (512 m), but this was closed recently and included in the catchment zone. A small section was still open to walking as of the 2005 map upgrade.See also*Wollongong*Illawarra*Keira*escarpment*New South WalesExternal links*Account of 1902 explosion and list of deceased*Mt Kembla Mining Heritage Inc and Heritage Festival Official site References * Wollongong City Council
711229
List_of_hospitals_in_the_Philippines
This is a partial list of hospitals in the Philippines. Luzon  Abra *Abra Provincial Hospital - Capitulacion Street, Calaba, Bangued*Christian Hospital - Torrijos Street, Bangued*Bucay Municipal Hospital - Siblong, Bucay*Dolores Medicare Community Hospital - Dolores*Dr. Petronilo V. Seares, Sr. Memorial Hospital - Zone 4, Bangued*La Paz District Hospital - La Paz*Saint Jude Medical Clinic - Rizal Street, Bangued*Saint Theresa Wellness Center - Talogtog, Dolores*Vallera Medical Hospital - Zone 7, Bangued*Villaviciosa Medicare Community Hospital - Apaya, Villaviciosa Albay File:US Navy 070623-N-4954I-313 Cpl. Zachary Wendt, with the U.S. Marine Corps Forces Pacific Band, kneels down in front of a Filipino family and plays his trombone at Ziga Memorial Hospital.jpg|thumb|right|280px|U.S. Marine Corps Forces Pacific performs at the Memorial District Hospital to promote goodwill throughout the region.*Ago General Hospital - Rizal Street, City*Aquinas University Hospital - Washington Drive, City*Bicol Regional Training and Teaching Hospital - Rizal Street, City*Cabredo General Hospital - Moses Street, City*Cagraray District Hospital - Cabasan, Bacacay*Casimiro General Hospital - Ilaor Sur, Oas*Dr. Amando D. Cope Memorial Hospital - Ruivivar Street, Tayhi, City*Dr. Esteban V. Ante Memorial Hospital - Barangay 18, City*Dr. Manuel R. Rebueno Memorial Hospital - Iraya Sur, Oas*Dr. Sofronio B. Garcia Memorial Hospital - Concepcion Street, Dunao, City*Estanislao Clinic - Pavia Boulevard, Pio Duran*Estevez Memorial Hospital, Inc. - Guevarra Subdivision, City*G. Gonzales Medical Clinic - Naga, Tiwi*Gata General Hospital - General Simeon Ola Road, Iraya, Guinobatan*Isip General Hospital - Gabon, Polangui*Jaime B. Berces Memorial Hospital - V. Demetriou Street, City*Josefina Belmonte Duran Memorial District Hospital - Purok II, Tuburan, City*Liankos Medical Clinic - Poblacion, Malinao*Ludovice General Hospital - T. Perez Street corner General Luna Street, Daraga*Lumbis Rances General Hospital - Ilaor Sur, Oas*Manito Municipal Hospital - Manito*Naveras Clinic - Rizal Street, Guinobatan*Pantao District Hospital - Pantao, Libon*Perillo General Hospital - Sabido Road, Magurang, Polangui*Perpetual Health Clinic - San Jose Street, Dunao, City*Pio Duran Memorial District Hospital - Orogo Street, Barangay II, Pio Duran*Rapu-Rapu District Hospital - Rapu-Rapu*Retuerma General Hospital - Rizal Street, Guinobatan*Ricos Hospital - J. B. Berces Street, Cornidal, City*Sacred Heart Clinic - Aguinaldo Street, City*Saint Claire Medical Clinic - San Lorenzo Street, Poblacion, Tiwi*Saint Michael General Hospital - Barreda Street, Bacacay*Tabaco College Hospital - Tomas Cabiles Avenue, City*Tanchuling Hospital - Imperial Court Subdivision, City*Tapworks Hospital - City*Zapanta General Hospital - Banawan, Pio Duran*Memorial District Hospital - Karangahan Boulevard, City Apayao *Amma Jadsac District Hospital - Pudtol*Apayao District Hospital - Calanasan*Apayao Provincial Hospital - Poblacion, Kabugao*Conner District Hospital - Ripang, Conner*Far North Luzon General Hospital and Training Center - Luna*Flora District Hospital - Flora*San Juan Medical Clinic - Malama, Conner*Santa Marcela District Hospital - Santa Marcela Aurora *Aurora Memorial Hospital - San Luis Street, Baler*Casiguran District Hospital - Marikit, Casiguran*Dingalan Community Hospital - Caragsacan, Dingalan*Maria Aurora Community Hospital - Maria Aurora City *Baguio Filipino-Chinese General Hospital and Medical Research Center - M. Roxas Street*Baguio General Hospital - Gov. Pack Road*Baguio Medical Center - Military Cut-Off Road*BCU-Sto. Nio de Jesus Medical Center Foundation, Inc. - Lower P. Burgos Street*Fort del Pilar Station Hospital - PMA Fort del Pilar*Notre Dame de Chartres Hospital - Gen. Luna Road*Pines City Doctors Hospital - Magsaysay Avenue*Saint Louis University Hospital of Sacred Heart - Assumption Road Bataan *Arsenal Kalusugan Hospital - Camp Gen. A. Luna, Lanao, Limay*Bagac Medicare Community Hospital - Atilano Ricardo, Bagac*Bataan Doctors Hospital - Doa Francisca Subdivision, City*Bataan General Hospital - Tenejero, City*Bataan Peninsula Medical Center - San Ramon, Dinalupihan*Bataan Saint Joseph Hospital, Inc. - Don Manuel Banzon Avenue, City*Isaac and Catalina Medical Center - Calero Street, Ibayo, City*Jose C. Payumo, Jr. Memorial Hospital - San Ramon, Dinalupihan*Mahesco Multi-Purpose Coop. Hospital - Lakandula Street, Poblacion, Mariveles*Orani District Hospital - Maria Fe, Orani*Orion St. Michael Family Hospital - Wakas, Orion*Rotary Club International Hospital - Orani*Womens General Hospital -  St. Joseph Subdivision, CityZuniga Medical Clinic - Orani, Bataan*k-ward- namgalunya ako kay ericson cruz at tyrone galang. -mariveles mental hospital Batanes *Batanes General Hospital - Kayhuvuban, Basco*Itbayat District Hospital - Itbayat Batangas *Apacible Memorial District Hospital - Lumbangan, Nasugbu*Assumpta Medical Hospital - A. Bonifacio Street, Taal*Batangas Healthcare Hospital - Gulod Itaas, City*Batangas Provincial Hospital - Lemery*Batangas Regional Hospital - Kumintang Ibaba, City*Bathan Medical Center - Tawilisan, Taal, Batangas Taal*Bauan Doctors General Hospital - Poblacion I, Bauan*Bauan General Hospital - S. Ylagan, Bauan*Bric Hospital - Taal*C. P. Reyes Hospital - A. Mabini Avenue, City*Calatagan Medicare Community Hospital - Barangay II, Calatagan*Cayetano Medical Clinic - Ibaan*Central Azucarera Don Pedro Hospital - Lumbangan, Nasugbu*Daniel O. Mercado Medical Center(DMMCINC.com) - President Laurel Highway, City*Dianes Maternity and Lying-in Hospital - Barangay 10, City*Divine Care Hospital - Sico 2, San Juan*Divine Love General Hospital - Sinagtala, City*Don Manuel Lopez Memorial District Hospital - Gumamela, Balayan*Dr. Kisons Clinic - Galo Reyes Street, City*Dr. Mario D. Bejasa General Hospital - J. P. Rizal Street, Bauan*Dr. Romeo Isana Rosales General Hospital - Padre Garcia*Duque General Hospital - Mabalanoy, San Juan*Fernando Air Base Hospital - Air Base, City*Golden Gate General Hospital - P. Prieto Street, City*Gonzales Medical and Childrens Hospital - Sixto Castillo Street, City*H. M. Corachea General Hospital - Collantes Street, Barangay 7, City*Holy Family Medical Clinic - C. M. Recto Avenue, City*Holy Infant Hospital - President Katigbak Street cor. C. M. Recto Avenue, City*Hospital de San Juan Bautista - Captain Isko Street, Lian*Jesus of Nazareth Hospital - City*Jose P. Laurel Memorial District Hospital - Santor, City*Laurel Municipal Hospital - Ticub, Laurel*Lemery Doctors Medical Center - R. Diokno Street, Lemery*Lipa City District Hospital - Granja, City*Lipa Doctors Hospital - Rizal Street, City*Lipa Medix Medical Center - Ayala Highway, Balintawak, City*Little Angels Medical Hospital - V. Ilustre Avenue, Lemery*Lobo Municipal Hospital - Fabrica, Lobo*Mabini General Hospital - Pulong Niogan, Mabini*Madonna General Hospital - Antorcha Street, Balayan*Medical Center Western Batangas - Lanatan, Balayan*Mahal na Virgen Maria Hospital - Namunga, Rosario*Martin Marasigan Memorial Hospital - Malvar Street cor. Mabini Street, Cuenca*Mary Mediatrix Medical Center(Mediatrixmedcenter.com) - J. P. Laurel Highway, City*Metro Lemery Medical Center - V. Ilustre Avenue, Palanas, Lemery*Metro Lipa Medical Center - J. P. Laurel Highway, City*N. L. Villa Memorial Medical Center - F. Manalo Street, City*Nasugbu Doctors General Hospital, Inc. - P. Rinoza Street, Nasugbu*Our Lady of Caysasay Medical Center(OLCMCINC.com) - V. Ilustre Avenue, Lemery*Palma-Malaluan Hospital - Magtibay, Rosario*Padre Garcia Hospital - Padre Garcia*Queen Mary Hospital - J. Pastor Street, Ibaan*Saint Andrew Hospital - Tumaway, Talisay*Saint Nicholas Doctors Hospital - Abelo, San Nicolas*Saint Patricks Hospital Medical Center - Lopez-Jaena Street, City*Saint Vincent de Paul Hospital - Poblacion II, Santo Tomas*Salazar Polyclinic - Atienza Street cor. Rajah Matanda Street, Lemery*San Antonio General Hospital - C. M. Recto Avenue, City*San Jose District Hospital - Banay-Banay I, San Jose*San Juan District Hospital - Talahiban II, San Juan*San Juan Doctors Hospital - Calitcalit, San Juan*Santo Tomas General Hospital - San Roque, Santo Tomas*Silvas Medical Clinic - F. Platon Street, Barangay 5, City*Solomon Hospital - General Luna Street, San Juan*St. Frances Cabrini Medical Center - Poblacion II, Santo Tomas*St. James the Greater General Hospital - Santiago Street, City*St. Joseph Healthcare Inc. - A. Mabini St. Cor E. Mayo St. and P. Torres St, City, Batangas*St. Martin General Hospital - Lemery*St. Nazarius Medical Clinic - San Pio Quinto, Malvar*Sto. Nio Medical Clinic - National Highway, Cuenca*Sto. Rosario Hospital - V. Escano Street, Rosario*Taal Polymedic Hospital and Medical Center - Diversion Road, Carasuche, Taal*The Community Hospital of Mataas na Kahoy - Mataas na Kahoy*Tuy General Hospital - Burgos Street, Tuy*Untalan General Hospital - Gualberto Avenue, Poblacion, Rosario*Vilela General Hospital - Poblacion, Rosario*Zigzag Hospital - P. Niogan, Mabini Benguet *Abatan Emergency Hospital - Buyacaoan, Buguias*Atok District Hospital - Paoay, Atok*Benguet General Hospital - La Trinidad*Dennis Molintas Municipal Hospital - Daclan, Bokod*Itogon Municipal Hospital - Tinogdan, Itogon*Kapangan Medicare Community Hospital - Kapangan*Lepanto Hospital - Lepanto, Mankayan*Lutheran Medical Mission and Rehab Foundation, Inc. - Abatan, Buguias*Sto. Nio of Philex Mines Hospital - Tubal; Bulacan *B. A. Hospital - Saluysoy, City*Balagtas Doctors Medical Foundation, Inc. - Wawa, Balagtas*Baliuag District Hospital - Carpa Village, Sabang, Baliuag*Bulacan Maternity and Childrens Hospital - Caniogan, Calumpit*Bulacan Medical Center - Mojon, City*Bulacan Medical Mission Group Pharmacy and Hospital - Turo, Bocaue*Bulacan Polymedic Hospital, Inc. - Cagayan Valley Road, Santa Cruz, Guiguinto*Castro Maternity Hospital - M. Ponce Street corner F. Rustia Street, Baliuag*Community Medical Clinic of Balagtas, Co. - Borol 1st, Balagtas*De Castro Medical Clinic - Baliuag*De Jesus General Hospital - Baliuag*De Leon Medical Center - Paombong*Divine Word Hospital - San Pedro, Hagonoy*Dr. Yangas Hospital, Inc. - P. Burgos Street, Bocaue*E. S. Garcia Hospital - Malusak Street, Santa Ana, Bulacan*Ed and Tita Cruz Maternity and Surgical Hospital - Santa Maria*Emmanuel Hospital - San Jose, San Miguel*Evangelista Hospital and Pharmacy - Hulo, City*F. M. Cruz Orthopedic and General Hospital - Doa Remedios Trinidad Highway, Pulilan*Garden Village County Hospital - Garden Village, Pulong Buhangin, Santa Maria*Grace Memorial Foundation Hospital, Inc. - Borol 2nd, Balagtas*Gregorio del Pilar District Hospital - Bagong Bayan, Balagtas*Gubatan Clinic - Borol 2nd, Balagtas*Holy Family Hospital - Balagtas*J. N. Gran General Hospital - Calumpit*Jesus of Nazareth Hospital - Poblacion, Guiguinto*Jesus, The Good Shepherd Hospital - National Road, Poblacion, Pulilan*Lozadas General and Maternity Hospital - City*Ma. STMA De la Paz Hospital - Marilao*Magpoc Maternity Hospital, Inc. - Ilang-Ilang Street, Santa Cruz, Guiguinto*Malolos EENT Hospital - City*Malolos Maternity Hospital and Eye Center - McArthur Highway, City*Malolos San Ildefonso County Hospital - Lovely Street, Canalate, City*Malolos San Vicente Hospital - Caniogan, City*Marcelo Hospital - Ponce Street, Baliuag*Marcello-Padilla Childrens Medical Hospital - Banga I, Plaridel*Marilao St. Michael Family Hospital - Poblacion II, Marilao*Mary Immaculate Maternity Hospital - F. Estrella Street, Santo Rosario, City*Mary the Queen Maternity and General Hospital Foundation, Inc. - Sto. Nio, Plaridel*Mateos Diagnostic Clinic and General Hospital, Inc. - Gov. F. Halili Avenue, Bagbaguin, Santa Maria*Mayor Emilio G. Perez Memorial District Hospital - Sto. Nio, Hagonoy*Mendoza General Hospital - Poblacion, Santa Maria*Meycauayan Doctors Hospital - City*Mt. Carmel Hospital - Bunlo, Bocaue*Nazarenus College Foundation Hospital - McArthur Highway, Saluysoy, City*Nodado General Hospital - Bigte, Norzagaray*Norzagaray Emergency Hospital - Bigte, Norzagaray*Norzagaray Municipal Hospital - Poblacion, Norzagaray*Ofelia Mendoza Maternity and General Hospital - Mojon, City*Ospital ng Lungsod ng San Jose del Monte - Bagong Buhay, of San Jose del Monte*Our Lady of Mercy General Hospital Corporation - Longos, Pulilan*Our Lady of Salambao Hospital - Lawa, Obando*Padriguilans Maternity and Medical Clinic - McArthur Highway, Bancal, City*Plaridel County Hospital - Tabang, Plaridel *Plaridel Emergency Hospital - Poblacion, Plaridel*Poscablo Clinic and Hospital - Siling Bata, Pandi*Reyes Medical Clinic - Baliuag*Rogaciano M. Mercado Memorial Hospital - Poblacion, Santa Maria*Romel Cruz Hospital - Baog, Matimbo, City*Roquero General Hospital - Sapang Palay, of San Jose del Monte*Rugay Maternity and General Hospital - M. Cruz Street, Cara Village, Sabang, Baliuag*Sacred Heart Hospital of Malolos, Inc. - Dr. Peralta Street, Guinhawa Subdivision, City*Sagrada Familia Hospital - Tangos, Baliuag*San Agustin Hospital - Hagonoy*San Diego General Hospital, Inc. - Gov. Padilla Road, Banga I, Plaridel*San Miguel District Hospital - Santa Rita, San Miguel*San Pascual Baylon Maternity and General Hospital - Sto. Nio, Paombong*San Rafael Rural Health and Community Hospital - Poblacion, San Rafael*San Roque Hospital - Liang, City*Santiagos Pediatric Hospital - Poblacion, Santa Maria*Santissima Trinidad Hospital - Mabini, Pinagbakahan, City*Santos Clinic, Inc. - McArthur Highway, City*Santos General Hospital of Malolos, Inc. - F. Estrella Street, Santo Rosario, City*St. Annes - Hagonoy*St. Francis of Assisi Maternity and General Hospital - Gasak, City*St. Martin of Tour Hospital - Bocaue*St. Marys Medical Services, Inc. - Poblacion, Santa Maria*St. Michael Clinic and Maternity Hospital - City*St. Michael Family Hospital - Marilao*St. Paul Hospital Bulacan, Inc. - Binang II, Bocaue*St. Vincent EENT Hospital - Poblacion, Bustos*Sta. Ana Hospital -  Hagonoy*Sta. Clara de Montefalco Medical Center, Inc. - Malhacan, City*Sta. Cruz Hospital - Poblacion, Calumpit*Sta. Dolorosa County Clinic - Norzagaray*Sta. Rita Doctors Hospital - Bulacan*Sto. Nio Hospital - Poblacion, Bustos*The Lords Hospital - Calvario, City *Tolentino Clinic - Baliuag*Torres Health Center - Pulilan Cagayan *Alameda Clinic - Aparri*Alcala Municipal Hospital - Alcala*Alfonso Ponce Enrile Memorial District Hospital - Gonzaga*Aparri Christian Hospital, Inc. - Punta, Aparri*Aparri Medicare Community Hospital - Bangag, Aparri*Aparri Provincial Hospital - Aparri*Baggao Medicare Community Hospital - Poblacion, Baggao*Baggao Municipal Hospital - Tallang, Baggao*Ballesteros District Hospital - Ballesteros*Ballesteros Maternity and Lying-in Clinic - Centro East, Ballesteros*Cagayan Valley Medical Center - Carig, City*Clinica de Leon, Inc. - Centro, City*Clinica Salvacion - Centro East, Ballesteros*Divine Mercy Wellness Center - City*Dr. Estrella P. Fernandez Medical Clinic - Ballesteros*Dr. Tomas L. Nolasco, Sr. Hosp. Reproductive Health Center - Centro Sur, Gattaran*Dr. Ronald P. Guzman Medical Center - City*Gonzaga Community Clinic - Gonzaga*Holy Infant Hospital - City*Lasam District Hospital - Ignacio B. Jurado, Lasam*Lyseum of Appari Hospital - Macanaya, Aparri*Matilde A. Olivas District Hospital - Camalaniugan*Northern Cagayan District Hospital - San Andres, Sanchez-Mira*Nuestra Seora de Piat District Hospital - Maguilling, Piat*Peneyra Clinic and Hospital - Bagumbayan, Lal-Lo*Puyaoan General Hospital - Bulala, Camalaniugan*R. C. Nicolas Clinic and Hospital - Centro, Gonzaga*Saint Anthony Charity Hospital - Santa Cruz, Santa Ana*Saint Paul Hospital - City*Tuao District Hospital - Tuao*Tuguegarao City Peoples General Hospital - City*V. A. Agra Emergency Hospital - Claveria Norte *Camarines Norte Provincial Hospital - Bagasbas Road, Camarines Norte*Capalonga Medicare Community Hospital - Catioan, Capalonga*Dr. Miguel V. Alegre Hospital - Burgos Street, Gumamela, Labo*Jose Panganiban Primary Hospital Services Coop. - North Poblacion, Jose Panganiban*Labo District Hospital - Talobatib, Daet*Leon D. Hernandez Memorial Hospital - Dasmarias Street, Daet*Our Lady of Lourdes Hospital - Vinzons Avenue, Daet*Rosary of Virgin Mary Hospital - M. Roxas Street, Poblacion, Santa Elena*Saint John the Apostle Hospital - Villaflores Street, Labo*Saint Jude Hospital of Labo - Villaflores Street, Labo*Santissima Trinidad Hospital of Daet - Diversion Road, Camambugan, Daet*Santo Nio Hospital - Mercedes Road, Daet Sur *Ago Foundation Hospital - Concepcion Grande, City*Bicol Medical Center() - Panganiban Street, Concepcion Pequea, City *Bicol Sanitarium - San Pedro, Cabusao*Caramoan Municipal Hospital - Tawag, Caramoan*Clinica Elgar - Santo Domingo, Nabua*Dr. Johnnel R. Zapanta General Hospital - San Agustin, Pili*Dr. Nilo O. Roa Memorial Foundation Hospital - Dimasalang Street, City*Dr. Robosa Hospital - Santa Cruz, Baao*Figuracion Hospital - San Juan, Nabua*Garchitorena Medicare Community Hospital - Garchitorena*Iriga City Hospital - City*Libmanan District Hospital - Bagumbayan, Libmanan*Lourdes Hospital - San Roque, City*Mother Seton Hospital - Roxas Avenue, City*Naga City Hospital - Peafrancia Avenue, City*Ocampo Municipal Hospital - Manawan, Ocampo*Omeabel Center - Rizal Street, Goa*Our Lady of Mediatrix Hospital - San Jose, City*Our Lady of Salvacion Clinic - Mirate Street, Sipocot*Ragay District Hospital - Andaya Drive, Poblacion Ilaod, Ragay*Rinconada Medical Center - Baras, Nabua*Saint John Hospital - San Jose Street, Goa*Saint John Hospital, Inc. - Panganiban Street, City*Saint Jude Clinic and Hospital - Luneta Street, Santa Cruz, Baao*Saint Raphael Hospital - San Nicolas, Baao*San Jose Medicare Community Hospital - Del Carmen, San Jose*Santa Maria Josefa Foundation Hospital - Zone 2, Francia, City*Sipocot District Hospital - Sipocot Catanduanes *Bato Maternity and Childrens Hospital - Tamburan, Bato*Caramoran Municipal Hospital - Datag, Caramoran*Dr. Antonio B. Zantua Memorial Hospital - Francia, Virac*Eastern Bicol Medical Center - San Isidro Village, Virac*Gigmoto District Hospital - Gigmoto*Immaculate Heart of Mary Hospital, Inc. - Virac*Juan M. Alberto Memorial District Hospital - Belmonte, San Andres*Our Lady of Fatima Hospital - Panganiban*Viga District Hospital - San Vicente, Viga Cavite *Asia Medic Family Hospital and Medical Center- Old Pala-Pala Road City*Adventist University of the Philippine Health Service - Puting Kahoy, Silang*Bautista Hospital - P. Burgos Avenue, Caridad, City*Catalan Medical Hospital - Carmona*Catbagan General Hospital - Espiritu Street, Carmona*Cavite Center for Mental Health - Martires City*Cavite Doctors Medical Center, Inc. - Gen. Trias*Cavite Medical Center - Dalahican, City*Cavite Municipal Hospital - Maragondon*Cavite Naval Hospital - Fort San Felipe, City*Contreras Medical Clinic - General Trias Drive, Rosario*Crisostomo General Hospital - Dulong Bayan, Bacoor*DBB Municipal Hospital - San Esteban, City*DLSU-Dr. Rodolfo Poblete Memorial Hospital - Barangay I, Alfonso*De La Salle University Medical Center(HSC.dlsu.edu.ph) - Congressional East Avenue, City*Del Rosario Hospital - San Agustin Street, Tanza*Dela Cruz Maternity Hospital - Crescini Street, Caridad, City*Divine Grace Medical Center - Bacao, Gen. Trias*Dr. Jose P. Rizal National Medical Research Center - City*Dr. Olivia Salamanca Memorial District Hospital - P. Gomez Street, City*Emilio Aguinaldo College Medical Center of Cavite  - City*Estrella Hospital - General Aguinaldo Highway, Silang*First Filipino Saint Hospital - Governors Drive, Naic*General Emilio Aguinaldo Memorial Hospital - Luciano, Martires City*General Trias Maternity and Pediatric Hospital - Tejero, Gen. Trias*General Trias Medicare Hospital - Pinagtipunan, Gen. Trias*GMA Medicare Hospital - Memije, Gen. Mariano Alvarez*HCGC Medical Plaza - Carmona*Imus Family Hospital - Palico I, Imus*Kawit Kalayaan Hospital - San Sebastian, Kawit*Korea-Philippines Friendship Hospital - Martires City*M. V. Santiago Medical Center - De Ocampo, Martires City*Major Danilo Atienza Air Base Hospital - Sangley Point, City*Maluto Family Health Specialists Lying-in Diagnostic Clinic - Cabeza Street, Molino, Bacoor*Medical Center Imus - Diversion Road, Palico IV, Imus*Metro South Medical Center - National Road, Molino IV, Bacoor*Molino Doctors Hospital - Molino II, Bacoor*Naic Doctors Hospital - Daang Makina, Naic*Naic Medicare Hospital - A. Soriano Highway, Naic*Ospital ng Tagaytay - Bacolod Street, Kaybagal South, City*Our Lady of the Pillar Medical Center - Tamsui Avenue, Bayan Luma, Imus*Our Lady of the Way Medical Pediatric Center - Cabulusan, Magallanes*Our Savior Hospital - General Trias Drive, Rosario*Prime Global Care Medical Center, Inc. - Bacoor*Saint Dominic Medical Center, Inc. - Talaba, Bacoor*Saint Martin Maternity and Pediatric Hospital - Salcedo II, Noveleta*Saint Michael Medical Hospital - Molino II, Bacoor*Saint Paul Hospital Cavite - Burol II, Bagong Bayan, City*San Agustin Medical Clinic - Bacoor*San Jose Hospital and Trauma Center - Maderan, Gen. Mariano Alvarez*San Lorenzo Ruiz Hospital - Naic*Silang General Hospital - Silang*South Super Highway Medical Center Hospital - Gateway Business Park, Jalavera, Gen. Trias*Sto. Nio de Tanza Medical and Diagnostic Center - Daang Amaya, Tanza*Tagaytay Hospital Systems, Inc. - City*Tagaytay Medicare Hospital - City*Tanza Family General Hospital and Pharmacy - Daang Amaya, Tanza*Velazco Hospital - J. P. Rizal Street Ifugao *Aguinaldo Peoples Hospital - Talite, Aguinaldo*Good News Clinic and Hospital - Tama-an, Banaue*Hungduan Municipal Hospital - Hapao, Hungduan*Ifugao Provincial Hospital - Lagawe*Mayoyao District Hospital - Acacoy, Bato-Alatbang, Mayoyao*Panopdopan District Hospital - Lamut*Potia District Hospital - Santa Maria, Alfonso Lista*Tinoc District Hospital - Tinoc Norte *Bangui District Hospital - Abaca, Bangui*Dingras District Hospital - Suyo, Dingras*Doa Josefa Edralin Memorial District Hospital - Lidia, Marcos*Dr. Antonio A. Ranada Clinic and Lying-in Hospital - A. Hernando Avenue, City*Dr. Bonifacia V. Albano Memorial Hospital - Libtong, Bacarra*Gaoat General Hospital - City*Gertes Clinic and Hospital - San Nicolas*Laoag City General Hospital - Nalbo, City*Laoag Pediatric Lying-in Hospital - A. Castro Street, City*Mariano Marcos Memorial Hospital and Medical Center - San Julian, City*Northern Doctors General Hospital - J. P. Rizal Street, City*Our Lady of Fatima Medical Clinic and Hospital - A. Mabini Street, City*Piddig District Hospital - Piddig*Ranada General Hospital - Balintawak Street, City*Santos Clinic and Hospital - City*Sta. Teresita Hospital - Marcos*Vintar District Hospital - Vintar Sur *Acas Clinic and Hospital - Tamag, City*Adora Clinic and Hospital - Rizal Street, City*Ancheta Clinic and Hospital - Liberation, City*Bessang Pass Memorial Hospital - Cervantes*Candon General Hospital - Tablac, City*Central Ilocos Sur District Hospital - Narvacan*City of Candon Hospital - City*Corpuz Clinic and Hospital - Namnama, Sinait*Figuerres Clinic and Hospital - Gov. Mena Crisologo Street, City*Gabriela Silang General Hospital -  Tamag, City*Holy Family Hospital, Inc. - Calaoa-an, City*Ilocos Cooperative Medical Mission Group and Hospital - Jose Singson Street, City*Lahoz Clinic and Hospital - Jose Singson Street, City*Magsingal District Hospital - Santa Monica, Magsingal*Metro Vigan Coop. Hospital - Roxas Dike, Bantay*Paencia Gonzales Memorial Emergency Hospital - Tagudin*Patao District Hospital - Bantay*Pira Hospital - Rizal, Cabugao*Quibiran Clinic and Hospital - Santa Maria*Rabaras Clinic and Hospital - Rizal Street, City*Recel Medical Clinic and Hospital - Poblacion, Santa Catalina*Reasonable Hospital - San Jose, City*Reyes Clinic and Hospital - Poblacion Sur, Santa Maria*Saint James Hospital - Pantay Daya, City*Saint Martin de Porres Clinic and Hospital - San Antonio, City*Salcedo Medicare and Community Hospital - Salcedo*Santa Lucia District Hospital - Santa Lucia*Sinait District Hospital - Sinait*Southern Ilocos Sur District Hospital - Tagudin*Sto. Nio Hospital - Baliw Laud, Santa Maria*Tejano Clinic and Hospital - Quirino Boulevard, City*Tolentino Clinic and Hospital - Santo Domingo*Vigan Polyclinic, Inc. - Quirino Boulevard, City*Suero General Hospital - Cabugao Isabela *Bucags Hospital - Don Jose Canciller Avenue, City*Cabatuan Family Clinic - Centro, Cabatuan*Cagayan Valley Sanitarium and Hospital - Mabini, City*Camp Melchor dela Cruz Station Hospital - Upi, Gamu*Cauayan District Hospital - District I, City*Cauayan Medical Specialists Hospital - District II, City*Cruz Medical Hospital - Burgos Street, Ilagan*Dayos-Pascual Hospital - Rang-ayan, Roxas*Dr. Adolfo O. Flores Memorial Hospital - A. O. Flores Street, Villasis, City*Dr. Ester R. Garcia General Hospital - San Fermin, City*Dr. Noel de Leon Maternity Clinic and Hospital - Vira, Roxas*Dumlao Hospital - Vira, Roxas*Echague District Hospital - Ipil, Echague*Elvin Masigan Municipal Hospital - Bliss Site, Santa Maria*Gambalan Hospital - San Antonio, Delfin Albano*Gines Hospital - Roxas Street, City*Gov. Faustino M. Dy, Sr. Memorial Hospital - Ilagan*Isabela Doctors General Hospital - Baligatan, Ilagan*Javonillo Hospital - Magsaysay, Cordon*Jones Medicare Community Hospital - Jones*Lucas-Paguila Medical Clinic and Hospital - Magsaysay, Alicia*Manango Hospital - San Antonio, Alicia*Manuel A. Roxas District Hospital - San Antonio, Roxas*Milagros District Hospital - Cabagan*Soller Medical Clinic and Pharmacy - Vira, Roxas*Southern Isabela General Hospital - Rosario, City*Tomas-Cacal Medical Clinic and Hospital - Magsaysay, Alicia*Tumauini Community Hospital - Lingaling, Isabela Kalinga *Almora General Hospital - Bulanao, City*Holy Trinity Medical Clinic - Bulanao, City*Juan M. Duyan Memorial District Hospital - Babalag West, Rizal*Kalinga District Hospital - Poblacion, Lubuagan*Kalinga Provincial Hospital - Purok 6, Balanao, City*Pinukpuk District Hospital - Pinukpuk*St. Jude Hospital - Poblacion, City*St. Peter Claver Hospital - Poblacion, City*Tabuk Family Clinic and Hospital - Poblacion, City*Western Kalinga District Hospital - Balbalan Union *Agoo Family Hospital - San Pedro, Agoo*Agoo Medical Clinic - Consolacion, Agoo*Bacnotan District Hospital - Poblacion, Bacnotan*Bethany Hospital, Inc. - Widdoes Street, San Fernando City*Caba Medicare and Community Hospital - Caba*Clinica Villanueva - Poblacion, Aringay*Concepcion Medical Clinic and Hospital - Balaoan*Ilocos Training and Regional Medical Center(Doh.gov.ph) - Parian, San Fernando City*La Union Medical Center(Web.archive.org) - Nazareno, Agoo*La Union Medical Diagnostic Center and Hospital, Inc. - Ancheta Street corner Bucaneg Street, San Fernando City*Lopez Clinic and Hospital - Balaoan*Lorma Medical Center(LMC.lorma.org) - Carlatan, San Fernando City *Martinez Maternity and Lying-In Hospital - Governor Lucero Street, San Fernando City*Naguilian District Hospital - Natividad, Naguilian*Northern La Union Maternity and Childrens Hospital - Bungol, Balaoan*Rosario District Hospital - Concepcion, Rosario*Salun-at Medical Center - Taboc, La Union San Juan*Torio Maternity and Medical Clinic - Santa Barbara, Agoo*Urgent Surgical and Medical Care Hospital - San Antonio, Agoo Laguna *Balibago Polyclinic and Hospital, Inc. - Provincial Road, Balibago, Rosa City*Bian Doctors Hospital, Inc.(Binandoctors.ph) - Platero, City*Calamba Doctors Hospital - Parian, City*Calamba Medical Center - Real, City*Christian General Hospital - A. Mabini Street corner Crisostomo F. de San Juan Street, Pagsanjan*Community General Hospital of San Pablo City, Inc. - C. Colago Avenue, Pablo City*Divine Mercy Hospital - Amante Subdivision, San Pedro*Dr. Jose G. Tamayo Medical Center (UPHSL Hospital) - Sto. Nio, City*Dr. Jose P. Rizal Memorial District Hospital - Bucal, City*Evangelista Medical and Specialty Hospital - Pacita Complex, San Pedro*Family Care Hospital - Pacita Complex, San Pedro*Gamez Hospital - J. P. Rizal Street, City*General Juan Cailles Memorial District Hospital - Tavera Street, Pakil*Healthserv Los Baos Medical Center - Batong Malake, Los Baos*Holy Family Clinic - J. de Leon Street, Santa Cruz*Hospital of St. Gerard, Inc. - Gomburza Street, Pablo City*Immaculate Concepcion Hospital, Inc. - P. Alcantara Street, Pablo City*Jesus the Savior Hospital - Sto. Angel Central, Santa Cruz*Jose Yulo Foundation Canlubang Industrial Hospital - Canlubang, City*Laguna Doctors Hospital - P. Guevarra Street, Santa Cruz*Laguna Holy Family Hospital - J. de Leon Street, Santa Cruz*Laguna Provincial Hospital - J. de Leon Street, Santa Cruz*Los Baos Doctors Hospital - Grove, College, Los Baos*Luisiana District Hospital - Fabricante Street, Luisiana*Majayjay Medicare and Community Hospital - Talortor, Majayjay*Marian Hospital Inc. - Tagapo Sta. Rosa*Nagcarlan District Hospital - F. Baltazar Street, Nagcarlan*New Sinai Hospital and Medical Center - Tagapo, Rosa City*Ospital ng Bian - City*Ospital ng Cabuyao - Limcaoco Subd. Bgy.Tres, Cabuyao*Paete General Hospital - J. Rizal Street, Paete*Pagamutang Pangmasa ng Laguna - Maitim, Bay*Pagsanjan Medical Clinic, Inc. - Sampalocan, Pagsanjan*Pamana Medical Center - Halang, City*Panlalawigang Pagamutan ng Laguna - Gen. Luna Street, Pablo City*St. James Hospital, Inc. - Dita, Rosa City*Saint John the Baptist Medical Center, Inc. - Parian, City*Saint Joseph Family Hospital of Cabuyao - Barangay I, Cabuyao*Saint Jude Family Hospital - Lopez Avenue, Batong Malake, Los Baos*Saints Francis and Paul General Hospital - Farconville Subdivision, Pablo City*San Antonio Medical Clinic - Batong Malake, Los Baos*San Jose Hospital and Trauma Center - Mapayapa, City*San Pablo Colleges Medical Center - San Rafael, Pablo City*San Pablo Doctors Hospital- 55 A. Mabini Street, Pablo City*San Pedro Doctors Hospital - Pacita Complex, San Pedro*San Pedro Municipal Hospital - San Antonio, San Pedro*Santa Cruz District Center - Santa Cruz*Santa Cruz Laguna Polymedic, Inc. - Patimbao, Santa Cruz*Santa Rosa Community Hospital - Poblacion, Rosa City*Santa Rosa Hospital and Medical Center - Balibago, Rosa City*Southern Luzon Hospital and Medical Center - Rosa City*Sy Medical Clinic - Dita, Rosa City*University Health Service - UPLB College, Los Baos Marinduque *Dr. Damian J. Reyes Memorial Hospital - Santol, Boac*Marinduque Provincial Hospital - Boac*Santa Cruz District Hospital - Lapu-Lapu, Santa Cruz*Torrijos Municipal Hospital - Torrijos Masbate *Aroroy Municipal Hospital - Jaboyoan, Aroroy*Balud Municipal Hospital - Balud*Cataingan District Hospital - Cataingan*Cawayan Municipal Hospital - Cawayan*Claveria District Hospital - Claveria*De Castro Hospital Foundation, Inc. - Milagros*Dubonggos Medical Clinic - Milagros*Heyrosa Clinic - Placer*Hingca Hao Memorial Hospital - Dimasalang*Mandaon Medicare Community Hospital - Mandaon*Masbate Doctors Hospital - Rosero Street, City*Masbate Hosp. and Health Services Coop. - Danao Street, City*Masbate Maternity and Child Health Clinic - Quezon Street cor. Nursery Street, City*Masbate Provincial Hospital - Hospital Road, City*Our Lady of Lourdes Clinic - Ibingay Street, City*Saint Joseph Medical Clinic - Poblacion, Dimasalang*Saint Martin de Porres Medical Clinic - Domingo Street, City*Saint Vincent Medical Hospital - Cagba, City*Ticao District Hospital - San Jacinto Manila  City *Acebedo General Hospital - Gen. Luis Street, Bagbaguin, JRM*Baesa Advent Polyclinic and General Hospital - Retiro Street corner Baesa Road*Bazarte Well Family Midlife Clinic - San Isidro, Camarin*Col. Salvador T. Villa Memorial Hospital - Caimito Road*Committee of German Doctors - Phase 8A, Bagong Silang*Dantes Well Family Midlife Clinic - Bagong Silang*Dr. Jose N. Rodriguez Memorial Hospital - Administration Site, Tala*Fernandez General Hospital - F. Roxas, Grace Park*Francisca dela Cruz Well Family Midwife Clinic - Caybiga*Jean Demegillo Maternity and Lying-in Clinic - J. P. Ramoy Street, Talipapa*John Paul Hospital - M. Ponce Street, Tirad Pass*Lady of Lourdes Hospital of Caybiga, Inc. - Caybiga*MCU-Filemon Dionisio Tanchoco Medical Foundation Hospital - EDSA*Martinez Memorial Hospital(Martinezmemorialhospital.com) - Mabini Street*Nephrology Center of Caloocan Dialysis Center, Inc. - Barangay 86, District II, Calaanan East*Nodado General Hospital - Area A, Camarin*North Caloocan Doctors Hospital - Bangkers Village 2, Quirino Highway*Our Lady of Grace Hospital - 8th Avenue corner F. Roxas Street, Grace Park*President Diosdado Macapagal Memorial Medical Center - Mabini Street*Ronn-Carmel Hospital and Fertility Control Center - Ponce Street*San Lorenzo General Hospital - Barangay 170, Zone 15, Deparo Pias City *A. Zarate General Hospital - Naga Road, Pulang Lupa I*Alabang Medical Clinic - Alabang-Zapote Road, Pelayo Village, Talon*Callejo Medical Clinic - A. Real Street, Talon I*Christ the King General Hospital - Real Street, Pamplona*Golden Acres Doctors Hospital - Crystal Street, Golden Acres Subdivision, Talon V*Las Pias City Medical Center - Talon V*Las Pias Doctors Hospital - J. I. Aguilar Avenue, Pulang Lupa II*Las Pias General Hospital and Satellite Trauma Center - Diego Cera Avenue, Pulang Lupa*Pamplona Medical Clinic - Real Street, Pamplona*University of Perpetual Help Rizal Delta Medical Center(UPHMC.com.ph) - Alabang-Zapote Road, Pamplona City *Beverly Hills Medical Group(Beverlyhills.ph) - Paseo de Roxas Street*Fort Bonifacio General Hospital - Fort Bonifacio*M. Tech Medical Center - Senator Gil Puyat Avenue*Medical Center(Makatimed.net) - Amorsolo Street, Legaspi Village*Maria Lourdes Maternity Hospital - Don Chico Roces Avenue*Ospital ng Makati - Jupiter Street, Bel-Air*Ospital ng Makati - Sampaguita Street, Pembo*St. Clares Medical Center - Dian Street City *A. P. Cruz Community Hospital - M. H. del Pilar Street, Santolan*Alfonso Medical Clinic - Santulan*Dela Cruz Well Family Midwife Clinic - P. Aquino Avenue corner Letre Road*Franco Clinic - Letre Road, Tonsuya*Pagamutang Bayan ng Malabon - Maya-Maya Street cor. Dagat-Dagatan Avenue*Punzalan Clinic - Tonsuya*San Lorenzo Ruiz Womens Hospital - O. Reyes Street City *Asia Renal Care Philippines, Inc. - EDSA corner Reliance Street*Jocson Well Family Midwife Clinic - Barangka Drive, Barangka*Health Delivery Systems, Inc. (UNILAB DOTS Center) - Shaw Boulevard*Mandaluyong City Medical Center - Boni Avenue*National Center for Mental Health - Nueve de Pebrero Street*Nephro Systems Philippines, Inc. - Eastgate Center, EDSA*Perez-Mendoza Birthplace Lying-in Clinic - Blue Mansion Building, Boni Avenue*Unciano General Hospital (Mandaluyong Branch) - Boni Avenue, Mandaluyong City*Victor R. Potenciano Medical Center(VRPMC.com) - EDSA*Divine Mercy The Home That Cares Inc. Psychiatric Custodial Hospital - 453 Boni Avenue Brgy New Zaniga Manila  	*Amisola Maternity Hospital - Hermosa Street, Manuguit, Tondo	*Canossa Health and Social Center Foundation, Inc. - E. Jacinto Street, Magsaysay Village, Tondo	*Chinese General Hospital and Medical Center - Blumentritt Street, Santa Cruz*Clinica Arellano General Hospital - Doroteo Jose Street, Santa Cruz*De Ocampo Memorial Medical Center - Nagtahan Street, Santa Mesa	*Jose Fabella Memorial Hospital - Lope de Vega Street, Santa Cruz*Dr. Mirando Unciano, Sr. Medical Center - V. Mapa Street, Santa Mesa*Esperanza Health Center - Santa Mesa	*F. Lanuza Health Center and Lying-in Clinic - Alvarez Street, Santa Cruz	*GAT Andres Bonifacio Memorial Medical Center - Delpan Street, Tondo*Hospital of the Infant Jesus - Laong Laan Street, Sampaloc	*Jose R. Reyes Memorial Medical Center - San Lazaro Compound, Rizal Avenue, Santa Cruz*Manila Doctors Hospital - United Nations Avenue, Ermita	*Maria Clara Health Center and Lying-in Clinic - Maria Clara corner Prudencio Streets, Sampaloc*Mary Chiles General Hospital - Dalupan Street, Sampaloc	*Mary Johnston Hospital - Juan Nolasco Street, Tondo*Medical Center Manila(Medicalcentermanila.com.ph) - General Luna Street, Ermita*Medical Center - Masangkay Street, Tondo	*Nephrology Center of Manila - San Andres Street corner Leon Guinto Street, Malate*ng Maynila Medical Center - Quirino Avenue corner Roxas Boulevard, Malate	*Ospital ng Sampaloc - Geronimo Street, Sampaloc*Ospital ng Tondo - Jose Abad Santos Avenue, Tondo *Our Lady of Lourdes Hospital - P. Sanchez Street, Santa Mesa	*Pedro Gil Health Center and Lying-in Clinic - A. Francisco Street corner Perlita Street, San Andres	*Perpetual Help Hospital - Laong Laan Street, Sampaloc	*Perpetual Succor Hospital - Cayco Street, Sampaloc*General Hospital - Taft Avenue, Ermita*Presidential Security Group Station Hospital - Malacaang Park*Saint Jude Hospital and Medical Center - Don Quijote corner Dimasalang Streets, Sampaloc*San Lazaro Hospital - Quiricada Street, Santa Cruz*Seamens Hospital - Cabildocorner San Jose Streets, Intramuros*The Family Clinic, Inc. - Maria Clara Street, Sampaloc*Tondo Foreshore Health Center - Pacheco Street corner Santa Fe Street, Tondo*Tondo Health Center - Gagalangin, Tondo*Medical Center - Kalakal Street, Balut, Tondo*Trinity Woman and Child Center The Birthplace - New Panaderos Street, Santa Ana*United Doctors Medical Center - near Mabuhay Rotunda	*of Santo Tomas Hospital - Arsenio Lacson Avenue, Sampaloc City *Amang Rodriguez Medical Center - Sumulong Highway*Garcia General Hospital - Bayan-Bayanan Avenue, Marikina Heights*Jesus Immaculate Concepcion Hospital - Katipunan Street*Marikina Valley Medical Center(Marikinamedical.com) - Sto Nio*P. Gonzales Memorial Hospital, Inc. - J. P. Rizal Street, Lamuan*San Ramon Hospital - Gen. Ordoez Street, Rancho 4*SDS Medical Center, Inc. - Katipunan Road cor. Pio del Pilar Street, Concepcion Dos*St. John the Baptist Hospital of Marikina - Sta. Ana Extension cor. Betelnut Street, A. Tuazon, San Roque*St. Victoria Hospital - J. P. Rizal Street*St. Vincent Hospital - Bayan-Bayanan Avenue, Concepcion*Sta. Monica Hospital - A. Bonifacio Street, Taong City *Alabang Medical Center(Alabanmedicalcenter.ph) - Alabang-Zapote Road*Alabang Medical Clinic-Muntinlupa Branch - National Highway, Putatan*Hospital and Medical Center - Civic Drive, Filinvest Corporate City, Alabang*Babaran-Echavez Medical and Psychiatric Clinic - Amparo Street, Poblacion*Beato Cauilan Hospital - Villa Carolina, National Highway*Clinic Systems, Inc. - Montillano Street, Alabang*League of Government Information Practitioners of the Philippines, Inc. - Alabang*Medical Center Muntinlupa - National Road, Putatan*New Bilibid Prisons Hospital - Bureau of Corrections*Ospital ng Muntinlupa - Filinvest Civic Drive, Filinvest Corporate City, Alabang*Institute for Tropical Medicine - Filinvest Corporate City, Alabang*San Roque Medical Clinic - Montillano Street, Alabang City *Bagong Lipunan Health Center - Los Martires Street, San Jose*Bagumbayan North Health Center - Bagumbayan North*Bangkulasi Health Center - Alpha Street, Bangkulasi*Kaunlaran Village Health Center - Bagus, North Bay Boulevard*Linchangco/North Bay Health Center - North Bay Boulevard*Navotas Emergency and Lying-in Clinic - M. Naval Street, San Jose*Saint Joseph Maternity and Medical Clinic - M. Naval Street, San Jose*San Roque Health Center - Gov. Pascual Street*Tangos Health Center - Tangos*Tanza Health Center - Rodriguez Street, Tanza City *Medical Center Paranaque(Medicalcenterparanaqueinc.com) - Dr. A. Santos Avenue, Sucat Road*Olivarez General Hospital(Olivarezgeneralhospital.comyr.com) - Dr. A. Santos Avenue, Sucat Road*Our Lady of Peace Hospital - Coastal Road, San Dionisio*Paraaque Community Hospital - Quirino Avenue, La Huerta*Protacio Medical Services - Quirino Avenue, Tambo*South Superhighway Medical Center - West Service Road, South Superhighway*Sta. Rita de Baclaran Hospital - G. Cruz Street, Baclaran*Sto. Nio de Cebu Maternity Hospital - Sucat Road*UHBI - Paraaque Doctors Hospital - Doa Soledad Avenue, Better Living Subdivision City *Manila Adventist Medical Center and Colleges, Inc.(Adventisthospital.multiply.com) - Donada Street*Pasay City General Hospital - P. Burgos Street*Philippine Air Force General Hospital - Villamor Airbase*Juan De Dios Hospital - Roxas Boulevard City *Alfonso Specialist Hospital - P. Sixto Antonio Avenue*Glen Eagles Healthcare - San Miguel Avenue, Ortigas Center*Health Solutions Corporation - San Miguel Avenue, Ortigas Center*Javillonar Clinic and Hospital - Dr. Pilapil Street, Sagad*John F. Cotton Hospital - Ortigas Avenue*Mary Immaculate Hospital - E. Rodriguez Avenue, Bagong Ilog*Medicomm Pacific, Inc. - Emerald Avenue, Ortigas Center*Metro Psych Facility - P. Sixto Antonio Avenue*Mission Hospital - Ortigas Avenue, Rosario*Mother Regina Hospital - Madona Street, Doa Juana Subdivision, Rosario*Pasig City General Hospital - F. Legazpi Street, Maybunga www.pasigcitygen.org*Pasig Doctors Medical Center(Pasigdoctors.com) - 254 A. Rodriguez Avenue, Manggahan*Pasig Medical and Maternity Hospital Foundation - London Street, Pasig Green Park, Manggahan*Rizal Medical Center - Pasig Boulevard *Sabater General Hospital - Caruncho Avenue*Salve Regina General Hospital - Marcos Highway, De la Paz*Saint Threse Hospital - C. Raymundo Avenue, Maybunga*Medical City - Ortigas Avenue*Wellness Pro, Inc. - San Miguel Avenue corner Lourdes Street City *Ann Francis Maternity Hospital - Quirino Highway, Novaliches*Armed Forces of the Philippines Medical Center - Victoriano Luna Street*Bernardino General Hospital - Quirino Highway, San Bartolome, Novaliches*Bernardino General Hospital II - Kaligayahan, Novaliches*Camp General Emilio Aguinaldo Station Hospital - Camp General Emilio Aguinaldo*Capitol Medical Center - Quezon Avenue corner Scout Magbanua Street*Casaul General Hospital - Tandang Sora Avenue, Sangandaan, Novaliches*Commonwealth Hospital and Medical Center - Commonwealth Avenue, Quezon City*Cruz-Dalida Maternity Hospital - Jordan Plain, Novaliches*Delos Santos-STI Medical Center - E. Rodriguez Boulevard*Dihmesco General Hospital - General Luna Street*Dr. Fe del Mundo Medical Center Foundation Philippines - Banawe Street*Dr. Jesus C. Delgado Memorial Medical Center - Kamuning Road*Dr. Montano Ramos General Hospital - Bukidnon Street, Bagong Bantay *East Avenue Medical Center - East Avenue, Diliman*Fairview General Hospital - Fairview Avenue corner Mercury Street, Fairview*Eastern University - Nicanor Reyes Medical Foundation(FEU-nrmf.ph) - Regalado Avenue, West Fairview*General Miguel Malvar Medical Foundation Hospital - Commonwealth Avenue*J. P. Sioson General Hospital and Colleges, Inc. - Bukidnon Street, Bagong Bantay*Center of the Philippines - East Avenue*National Childrens Hospital - E. Rodriguez Boulevard*National Kidney and Transplant Institute - East Avenue*Neopolitan General Hospital - Quirino Highway, Lagro*New Era General Hospital - Commonwealth Avenue, New Era*Nodado General Hospital - Zabarte Subdivision, Kaligayahan, Novaliches*Novaliches District Hospital - Quirino Highway, San Bartolome, Novaliches*Novaliches General Hospital - Quirino Highway, Gulod, Novaliches*OCW General Hospital - Tandang Sora Avenue, Culiat*PNP General Hospital - Camp Crame, EDSA*PNP General Hospital Annex - Camp Panopio B. Tuazon*Pascual General Hospital - Baesa*Philippine Childrens Medical Center - Quezon Avenue*Heart Center - East Avenue, Diliman*Orthopedic Center - Maria Clara corner Banawe Streets, Santa Mesa Heights*Quezon City General Hospital - Seminary Road*Queensberry Hospital - Ramirez Street, Novaliches*Quezon Institute - E. Rodriguez Boulevard*Quirino Memorial Medical Center - Project 4, Katipunan*Saint Lukes Medical Center - E. Rodriguez Boulevard*San Lorenzo General Hospital - Pasong Putik, Novaliches*Santa Teresita General Hospital - D. Tuazon Street*United Doctors Medical Center - Espaa corner Ramirez Streets*University of the East Ramon Magsaysay Medical Hospital - Aurora Boulevard*University of the Philippines Medical Services - Diliman*Valdez-Padron Hospital - Galod, Novaliches*Veterans Memorial Medical Center - North Avenue, Diliman*Villarosa Hospital - Project 4*World Citi Medical Center - Aurora Boulevard*Winnie Bowlbee General Hospital - General Luis Street, Novaliches Juan City *Cardinal Santos Medical Center - Wilson Street, Greenhills West*Saint Martin de Porres Charity Hospital - N. Domingo Street*San Juan Medical Center - A. Bonifacio Street City *Cruz-Rabe General Hospital - Gen. Luna Street, Tuktukan*Dr. Sabili General Hospital and Health Services - Gen. Santos Avenue, Lower Bicutan*Holy Mary Family Hospital - M. L. Quezon Street, Bagumbayan*Jovince Medical Hospital - East Service Road, Western Bicutan*Manila Naval Hospital - Bonifacio Naval Station, Fort Bonifacio*Taguig Doctors Hospital - Bagumbayan*Taguig-Pateros District Hospital - East Service Road, Western Bicutan*Saint Lukes Medical Center - Bonifacio Global City City *Angelus Medical and Maternity Clinic - Que Grande Street, Ugong*Calalang General Hospital - R. Valenzuela Street*Carlos Clinic - Palasan Street*Medical Center - McArthur Highway*F and P Hernandez Maternity and Lying-in Clinic - McArthur Highway, Marulas*Pasolo Maternity and Medical Clinic - Pasolo Street*Saint Johns Hospital - Malinta*Sanctissimo Rosario General Hospital - Espiritu Street, Marulas*Valenzuela City Emergency Hospital - Poblacion, Polo*Valenzuela General Hospital - Padrigal Street, Karuhatan*Vian Family Hospital - Que Grande Street, Ugong Province *Barlig District Hospital - Barlig*Besao District Hospital - Kin-iway, Besao*Bontoc General Hospital - Bontoc*Luis Hora Memorial Regional Hospital - Abatan, Bauko*Natonin Community Hospital - Poblacion, Natonin*Paracelis District Hospital - Paracelis*Saint Theodores Hospital - Sagada  Ecija *Bongabon District Hospital - Bongabon*Cabiao General Hospital, Inc. - San Fernando Sur, Cabiao*Carranglan Medicare Community Hospital - Carranglan*Central Luzon State University - City of Muoz*Dr. Apollo Duque Memorial Hospital - Cabiao*Dr. Gloria D. Lacson General Hospital - Castellano, San Leonardo*Dr. Paulino J. Garcia Memorial Research and Medical Center - Mabini Street, City*Dr. PJGMRMC Talavera Extension Hospital - Maestrang Kilay, Talavera*Eduardo L. Joson Memorial Hospital - Daan Sarile, City*Fort Magsaysay Army Station Hospital - Fort Ramon Magsaysay, City*Gabaldon Medicare Community Hospital - Gabaldon*Gapan City Hospital -Poblacion, San Vicente, City*Gapan District Hospital - Bayanihan, City*General Tinio Medicare Community Hospital - General Tinio*Gonzales General Hospital, Inc. - San Leonardo*Guimba District Hospital - Pacac, Guimba*Guimba General Hospital - Santa Veronica, Guimba*Heart of Jesus Hospital - Rafael Rueda, San Jose City*Immaculate Concepcion Medical Center of Central Luzon, Inc. - San Juan ACCFA, City*M. V. Gallego Cabanatuan City General Hospital - Maharlika Highway, City*Nueva Ecija Good Samaritan General Hospital, Inc. - Burgos Avenue, City or Bucana,   City*Nueva Ecija Doctors Hospital, Inc. - Maharlika Highway, City*Palayan City Emmergency Hospital - Caimito, City*Premiere Medical Center - Daan Sarile, City*San Antonio District Hospital - San Antonio*San Jose City General Hospital - Malasin, San Jose City*Santo Domingo District Hospital - Pulong Buli, Santo Domingo*St. John Medical and Maternity Hospital - San Juan North, Cabiao*Wesleyan University - Philippines Cardiovascular and Medical Center - City Vizcaya *Dupax District Hospital - Malasin, Dupax del Norte*Kasibu Municipal Hospital - Pudi, Kasibu*Lt. Tidang Memorial Hospital - Kayapa*Medical Mission Group Hospital and Health Services Coop. Nueva Vizcaya Chapter - Quezon, Solano*Nueva Vizcaya Provincial Hospital - Bambang*PLT College, Inc. - Luis A. Tiam Memorial Hospital - Bascasan, Solano*Veterans Regional Hospital - Bayombong Mindoro *Abra de Ilog Municipal Hospital - Abra de Ilog*Lubang District Hospital - Lubang*Occidental Mindoro Provincial Hospital - Tayaman, Mamburao*Paluan Medicare Community Hospital - Paluan*Rizal Community Hospital - Sto. Nio, Rizal*Saint Magdalene Hospital - Bonifacio Street, San Jose*Saint Martins Mission Hospital - San Roque, Poblacion, Sablayan*San Jose District Hospital - Murtha, San Jose*San Sebastian District Hospital - Buenavista, Sablayan*Santa Cruz Community Hospital - Poblacion II, Santa Cruz*Westmin United Doctors Hospital, Co. - Gomez Street, Barangay I, San Jose*Zapanta Maternity and General Hospital - 4689 Manalo Street, Pag-asa, San Jose  Mindoro *Bongabong Community Hospital - Aplaya 3, Bongabong*Bulalacao Community Hospital - Bulalacao*Childrens Medical Clinic - Bonbon, City*Grace Mission Hospital - Katiningan, Socorro*Gloria Medicare Hospital - Velasco Street, Gloria*Hospital of the Holy Cross - V. R. Medrano, Sr. Street corner T. M. Kalaw Street, Ilaya, City*Ma. Estrella General Hospital - Tawiran, City*Mansalay Medicare Hospital - Mansalay*Medical Mission Group Hospital and Health Services Coop. of Oriental Mindoro - Tawiran, City*Mina de Oro General Hospital - Poblacion IV, Victoria*Naujan Municipal Hospital - Santiago, Naujan*Oriental Mindoro Medical Center - Sta. Isabel, City*Pinamalayan Community Hospital - Papandayan, Pinamalayan*Pinamalayan Doctors Hospital - Francisco Street, Marfrisco, Pinamalayan*Roxas District Hospital - Odiong, Roxas*Saint Joseph Clinic - Bongabong*Saint Lawrence Hospital - Poblacion III, Victoria*Saint Paul General Hospital - Quezon Street, Pinamalayan*Santa Maria Village Clinic - Santa Maria, City*Seor Tesoro Medical Clinic - Poblacion II, Victoria Palawan *Aborlan Medicare Hospital - Aborlan*Alfonso Birthing Home - Princesa City*Berachah Medical Clinic - National Highway, Poblacion, Brookes Point*Brookes Point District Hospital - Pangobilian, Brookes Point*Camp General Artemio Ricarte Station Hospital - Western AFP, Princesa City*Coron District Hospital - Coron*Culion Sanitarium and General Hospital - Culion*Cuyo District Hospital - Cuyo*Dumaran Municipal Hospital - Dumaran*Leoncio General Hospital - Pangobilian, Brookes Point*Manipol Hospital - Brookes Point*Medical Mission Group and Health Services Coop. Puerto Princesa Chap. - Taft Street, Princesa City*Narra Municipal Hospital - Narra*Ospital ng Palawan - Malvar Street, Princesa City*Palawan Adventist Hospital - San Pedro, Princesa City*Palwan Baptist Hospital - Roxas*Quezon Medicare Hospital - Alfonso XIII, Quezon*RTN Foundation, Inc. Hospital - Rio Tuba, Bataraza*Roxas Medical Hospital - Roxas*Sagrado Medical-Childrens Clinic - Moreno Subdivision, Brookes Point*Sacred Heart Clinic - Panacan, Narra*Taytay District Hospital - Taytay Pampanga *Angeles Medical Center, Inc. - Rizal Street, City*Angeles University Foundation Medical Center - McArthur Highway, City*Apalit Doctors Hospital - San Juan, Apalit*ASCCOM-DLSUMC Frienship Hospital - San Juan, Apalit*Balitucan District Hospital - San Pablo, Magalang*Basa Air Base Station Hospital - Air Base, Floridablanca*Clark Air Base Station Hospital - Air Base, City*Clinica Henson - Virgen delos Remedios, City*D. H. Polintan Medical Clinic - Macabebe*Dee Hwa Liong Foundation Medical Center - Duquit, Mabalacat or City*Diosdado P. Macapagal Memorial Hospital - San Matias, Guagua*Divine Shepherd Medical Center - Plaridel 1, City*Dr. Amando L. Garcia Medical Center, Inc. - Rizal Street, City*E. D. Lim Maternity and General Hospital - San Vicente, Apalit*Escolastica Romero District Hospital - San Nicolas 1st, Lubao*Jimenez Child Clinic - City of San Fernando*Jose B. Lingad Memorial Hospital - Dolores, City of San Fernando*Mabalacat District Hospital - Dau, Mabalacat*Macabebe District Hospital - Batasan, Macabebe*Manabat Maternity and General Hospital - San Matias, Santo Tomas*Mercedes Medical Center - Santo Cristo, City*Mercy Clinic and Hospital - Santo Nio, Guagua*Mly General Hospital - Santo Entierro Street, City*Morales Medical Clinic - San Isidro, Guagua*Mother of Perpetual Help Hospital - City*Mother Teresa of Calcutta Medical Center - Maimpis, City of San Fernando*Muoz Clinic - San Nicolas, City of San Fernando*Our Lady of Mount Carmel Medical Center - Saguin, City of San Fernando*Our Lady of Rosary Hospital, Inc. - Poblacion, Macabebe*Pamana Medical Center - Santo Cristo, City *Pampanga EENT and General Hospital - San Nicolas, City of San Fernando*Pampanga Medical Specialist Hospital - San Antonio, Guagua*Pampanga Orthopedic and Maternity Hospital - Sto. Nio, San Simon*Philippine International Hospital - City *Porac District Hospital - Babo Sacan, Porac*Rafael Lazatin Memorial Medical Center - Pampang, City*Ricardo P. Rodriguez District Hospital - Bulaon, City of San Fernando*Romana Pangan District Hospital - San Jose, Floridablanca*Rosario Memorial Hospital - San Roque, Guagua*R. S. Clinic and Hospital - Rizal Street, City*Sacred Heart Medical Center - Angeles City, City*Salangad Maternity and General Hospital - P. Burgos Street, City*San Fernandino Hospital - Dolores, City of San Fernando*San Luis District Hospital - San Luis*Santa Cruz Provincial Hospital - Magalang*St. Catherine of Alexandria Foundation and Medical Center - City*St. Raphael Foundation and Medical Center - Dau, Mabalacat*Tiglaos General Hospital - San Joaquin, Mabalacat*V. L. Makabali Memorial Hospital, Inc. - B. Mendoza Street, City of San Fernando*West Pampanga Doctors Hospital - Remedios, Lubao*Wilfredo G. Cortez Medical Clinic - Plazang Luma, Arayat*Yabut-Pangan Medical Clinic - Guagua Pangasinan *Alaminos Doctors Hospital - Bolaney, City*Baez Hospital - 162 McArthur Highway, Carmen West, Rosales*Bayambang District Hospital - Bical Norte, Bayambang*Blessed Family Doctors General Hospital - Ilang, San Carlos City*Bolinao Medicare Community Hospital - Bolinao*Bugallon General Hospital - Poblacion, Romulo Highway, Bugallon*Colonel Domingo A. Valdez Memorial Hospital - Bobonot, Dasol*Cuison Hospital, Inc. - Burgos Street, City*C and H Medical and Surgical Clinic - Sadsaran, Poblacion, City*Dagupan Doctors Villaflor Memorial Hospital, Inc. - Mayombo District, City*Dagupan Orthopedic Center - McArthur Highway, Tapuac District, City*Decena Medical Clinic - Bonuan Gueset, City*Del Carmen Medical Clinic and Hospital - Carmen West, Rosales*Divine Mercy Foundation of Urdaneta Hospital - 25 Highschool Drive, San Vicente West, City*Don Amadeo J. Perez, Sr. Memorial General Hospital - Paurido Street, City*Don Mariano C. Versoza Memorial Hospital - V. Solis Street, Lingayen*Dr. Marcelo Chan Memorial Hospital - Carmen, Rosales*Eastern Pangasinan District Hospital - New Magallanes, Tayug*Elguira General Hospital - 259 Rizal Avenue, San Carlos City*Espinoza Rosario Hospital - Gomez, Malasiqui*Fabro Medical Clinic and Primary Hospital - Tumana East, Rosales*Francisco General Hospital - Nancayasan, City*Globalsafe Diagnostic Clinic - Alexander Street, Maramba Compound, City*Holy Child General Hospital - Ambrosio Street, Poblacion, City*J. V. F. Memorial Clinic and Lying-in Hospital - Rivera Street cor. Zamora Street, City*Jesus Nazarene General Hospital - Solis Street, Lingayen*Labrador Community Hospital - Labrador*Lingayen Sacred Heart Clinic - Lingayen*Little Home Clinic - Perfecto Abad Street, Poblacion, Bugallon*Lopez Family Clinic and Hospital - 10 General Luna Street cor. Jocson Street, Mangatarem*Luzon Medical Center - Tapuac District, City*Malasiqui Municipal Hospital - Cabatling, Malasiqui*Manaoag Municipal Hospital - Baritao, Manaoag*Mapandan Community Hospital - Poblacion, Mapandan*Mangatarem District Hospital - Casilagan, Mangatarem*Medical Centrum Dagupan - A. B. Fernandez East, City*Medicare Community Hospital Asingan - Asingan*Nazareth General Hospital - 203 Perez Street, City*Nuestro Seor Santo Nio Hospital,Inc. - J. Luna Street, Poblacion Sur, Bayambang*Ordoez Medical Hospital - Poblacion, Villasis*Ordoez Adult and Childrens Clinic - Pugaro, Balungao*Our Lady of Purification Doctors Hospital - Poblacion, Binmaley*Pangasinan Center for Family Medicine, Inc. - Tapuac District, City*Pangasinan Doctors Hospital - Rizal Avenue, San Carlos City*Pangasinan Medical Center, Inc. - Nable Street, City*Pangasinan Provincial Hospital - Bolingit, San Carlos City*Perpetual Help Hospital - Magsaysay Street, Malasiqui*Pozorrubio Municipal Hospital - Talogtog, Pozorrubio*Prudencio Medical Clinic - 9 McKinley Street, Binalonan*Punzal-Maron Lying-in Hospital - Mangatarem*Ramos Nursery and Childrens Clinic - 357 Perez Boulevard, City*Region I Medical Center - Arellano Street, City*Rillera Medical Hospital - Bolinao*Rosario Trinio Medical Clinic - Labrador*Saballa Rosario Hospital - Delos Reyes Street, Poblacion, Binalonan*San Antonio de Padua General Hospital - San Antonio Street, Rosales*San Juan Bautista Hospital - Nandacan, Bautista*Specialists Group Hospital and Trauma Center - Tapuac District, City*St. Lucys Cataract and Lacer Eye Center - Naguilayan, Binmaley*St. Thomas Aquinas Hospital - Santa Fe Subdivision, Binalonan*Sto. Nio de Casipit Hospital - Lingayen*Stella Maris Hospital - Binmaley*Tayug Family Hospital - Magsaysay Street, Poblacion, Tayug*Umingan Medicare Community Hospital - Umingan*Urdaneta Sacred Heart Hospital - McArthur Highway, San Vicente, City*Urduja General Hospital - Governor Sison Street, Lingayen*Velasquez Medical Clinic and Hospital - Mabini Street, Mangatarem*Villasis Polymedic Hospital and Trauma Center - Maharlika Highway, Poblacion, Villasis*Virgen Milagrosa Medical Center - San Carlos City*Western Pangasinan District Hospital - Poblacion, City*Zarata-Jimenez Clinic - Poblacion, Aguilar Quezon *Alabat Island District Hospital - Barangay 4, Alabat*Bondoc Peninsula District Hospital - Barangay 8, Catanauan*Camp Nakar Station Hospital - Camp Guillermo Nakar, City*Candelaria Municipal Hospital - Masin Norte, Candelaria*Candelaria United Doctors Hospital - Candelaria*Catanauan District Hospital  - Catanauan*Catanauan United Doctors Hospital - Catanauan*Claro M. Recto Memorial District Hospital - Rizal Street, Infanta*Del Carmen Medical Clinic - Pica Street, Calauag *Doa Marta Memorial District Hospital - G. Orda Street, Zone II, Poblacion, Atimonan*Dr. Erlinda P. Tolentino Medical Clinic and Hospital - Ibabang Kalilayan, Unisan*Emil-Joanna General Hospital - Quezon Street, Atimonan*Greg Hospital - Gen. Luna Street, Sariaya*Guinayangan Medicare Community Hospital - Calimpac, Guinayangan*Gumaca District Hospital - Rosario, Gumaca*Holy Rosary Hospital - San Isidro Street, Lopez*Hospital de la Sagrada Familia - San Fernando Street corner C. M. Recto Street, City*Hospital de Soledad - Doa Tating Street, Tiaong*Jane County Hospital - Castillo, Pagbilao*Liwag Medical Clinic, Inc. - Mayo Street, Tiaong*Lopez Saint Judes General Hospital - Real Street, Lopez*Lucban MMG Hospital - Katipunan Street, Lucban*Lucena MMG General Hospital - Ibabang Dupay, Red-V, City*Lucena United Doctors Hospital - Isabang, City*Magsaysay Memorial District Hospital - Magsaysay, Lopez*Maria L. Eleazar Memorial District Hospital - Munting Parang, Tagkawayan*Mauban District Hospital - Polo, Mauban*Mount Carmel Diocesan General Hospital - Allarey Extension, City*Peter Paul Philippine Corp. Hospital - Regidor Street cor. del Valle Street, Candelaria*Polillo Medicare Hospital - Polillo*Quezon Medical Center - City*Saint Anne General Hospital, Inc. - Gomez Extension, Red-V, City*Saint Cecilia Hospital - M. Castillo Street, Tiaong*Saint Marys Hospital - City*Saint Peter General Hospital - Quezon Street, Barangay II, Calauag*Sampaloc Medicare Community Hospital - Magsaysay Street, Sampaloc*San Diego de Alcala General Hospital - Aguinaldo Street corner Taada Street, San Diego, Gumaca*San Fernando General Hospital - San Fernando Street corner Claro M. Recto Street, City*San Francisco Community Hospital - Cawayan I, San Francisco*San Narciso Municipal Hospital - Bayanihan, San Narciso*Soler General Hospital - Mabini Street, Sariaya*Southern Quezon Doctors Hospital - Madulao, Catanauan*Tayabas Community Hospital, Inc. - Wakas, City*Tiaong District Hospital - Tiaong*Unisan Medicare Community Hospital - Ibabang Kalilayan, Unisan Quirino *Aglipay District Hospital - Progreso, Aglipay*Diffun District Hospitlal - Andres Bonifacio, Diffun*Maddela Municipal Hospital - Didduyon, Maddela*Quirino Provincial Hospital - San Marcos, Cabarroguis Rizal *Angono General Hospital - A. Ibaez Street, San Isidro, Angono*Angono Medics Hospital - Quezon Avenue, Rainbow Village, Angono*Antipolo City Medical Hospital - Sumulong Highway, Mayamot, City*Antipolo District Hospital - Bagong Nayon 2, Dela Paz, City*Antipolo Doctors Hospital - M. L. Quezon Avenue Extension, City*Army Station Hospital - Camp M. Capinpin, Tanay*Arnaiz Hospital - F. P. Felix Avenue, San Isidro, Cainta*Binangonan Medical Center - Batingan, Binangonan*Binangonan Municipal Hospital - Libis, Binangonan*Blessed Trinity Maternity and Medical Hospital - Avatec Road, Mayamot, City*Carlos Medical and Maternity Clinic - Manila East Road, Looc, Cardona*H Vill Hospital - J. P. Rizal Street, Manggahan, Rodriguez*Manila East Medical Center - Manila East Road, Dolores, Taytay*Meek Academy Hospital - National Road, Pantok, Binangonan*Metro Rizal Doctors Hospital - A. Rodriguez Avenue, Cainta*Morong Doctors Hospital - Gov. Martinez Street, Morong*Ospital ng Baras - Rizal Street, Baras*Pag-asa Hospital - National Road, Pag-asa, Binangonan*Pilar Medical and Maternity Clinic - Quezon Avenue, Angono*Pililla Medicare Hospital - Almadrigo Street, Pililla*Queen Mary Help of Christian Hospital - Calahan, Cardona*Rizal Provincial Hospital - Tomas Claudio Street, Morong*Ryann Anthony Hospital - A. Bonifacio Avenue, Cainta*San Geronimo Medical and Orthopedic Hospital - Taghangin, Morong*San Isidro Hospital - San Isidro, Angono*Soriano Leyble Medical and Maternity Hospital - San Jose Street, San Isidro, City*Saint Mark Hospital - J.P . Rizal Street, Burgos, Rodriguez*Saint Matthews Medical Hospital - Gen. Luna Street, Banaba, San Mateo*Tanay Community Hospital - M. H. del Pilar Street, Tanay*Tanay General Hospital - F. T. Catapusan Street, Tanay*Taytay Emergency Hospital - J. Asilo Street corner Sumulong Highway, Taytay*Unciano Medical Center - Circumferential Road, City*Ynares Municipal Hospital - Sipsipin, Jalajala Romblon *Don Modesto Formilleza, Sr. Memorial Hospital - Punta, Looc*Romblon District Hospital - Romblon*Romblon Provincial Hospital - Liwanag, Odiongan*San Andres Municipal Hospital - San Andres*San Jose District Hospital - Poblacion, San Jose*Sibuyan District Hospital - Cajidiocan*Tablas Island District Hospital - Poblacion, San Agustin Sorsogon *Andres Bonifacio Memorial Hospital - Trece Martirez, Casiguran*Bulan Municipal Hospital - Pawa, Bulan*Bulusan Family Clinic - Bulusan*Donsol District Hospital - Tres Marias Drive, Donsol*Dr. Fernando B. Duran, Sr. Memorial Hospital - City*Gubat District Hospital - Bonifacio Street, Gubat*Guysakyo General Hospital - Sapangan, Bulusan*Irosin District Hospital - Maharlika Highway, San Pedro, Irosin*Matnog Medicare Community Hospital - Gadgaron, Matnog*Magallanes Medicare Community Hospital - Aguada Norte, Magallanes*Pantaleon G. Gotladera Memorial Hospital - Pawa, Bulan*Prieto Diaz Municipal Hospital - Rizal, Prieto Diaz*Sorsogon Medical Mission Group Hospital and Health Services Coop. - Pangpang, Bibincahan, City*St. Jude Medical Clinic - Luna Street, Bulan*St. Therese of The Child Jesus Hospital, Inc. - Jimenez Street, Bacon, City*Sts. Peter and Paul Hospital - Alegre Street, Balogo, City*Vicente L. Peralta Memorial Hospital - Cumadcad, Castilla Tarlac *Camiling District Hospital - Malacampa, Camiling*Camp Aquino Station Hospital - Camp Aquino, City*Capas Multi-Specialty Hospital - Santo Rosario, Capas*Central Luzon Doctors Hospital(CLDH.org) - Hospital Drive, San Vicente, City*Concepcion District Hospital - Alfonso, Concepcion*Concepcion Emergency Hospital - Concepcion*Corazon de Jesus Hospital - City*Gerona Hospital of the Sacred Heart - Abagon, Gerona*Holy Trinity Hospital - Quezon Street, City*Immaculate Concepcion Polyclinic and Hospital - Green Village, Concepcion*Jecsons Medical Center - San Nicolas, City*Jowell General Hospital - Coral Street, Paniqui*La Paz Medicare Community Hospital - San Roque, La Paz*M. Napeas Multi-Specialty Hospital - Santa Rita, Concepcion*Miguel Clinic - Paniqui*Modomo General Hospital - Santa Ignacia*Ospital ning Capas - Capas*Ramos General Hospital - P. Hilario Street, City*Rayos-Valentin Hospital - Poblacion Norte, Paniqui*Seor Sto. Nio Hospital - P. Burgos Street, Camiling*St. Martin de Porres Hospital - City*St. Rose Hospital - Samput, Paniqui*Sta. Rita Hospital - Timbol Street, Concepcion*Talon General Hospital - F. Tanedo Street, City*Tarlac Provincial Hospital - City Zambales *Afable Medical Center - Afable Street, City*Alferos Hospital - Bajac-Bajac, City*Candelaria District Hospital - Candelaria*Clinica Antipolo - San Antonio*Pundaquit Medical Center- San Antonio*Divine Spirit General Hospital - Sta. Rita Road, City*George Dewey Medical and Wellness CenterGeorgedeweymedicalandwellnesscenter.com) - City*James L. Gordon Memorial Hospital - Asinan, City*Mother and Child Hospital - Kessing Street, City*Ospital ng Santa Cruz - Santa Cruz*Perpetual Help Hospital - 18th Street, City*President Ramon Magsaysay Memorial Hospital - Palanginan, Iba*San Marcelino District Hospital - Linusungan, San Marcelino*St. Jude Family Hospital - City*Subic Bay Medical Center - Bay Freeport Zone, City*Total Life Care Medical Center - Lower Kalaklan, City*TotalMED Multispecialty Center(Totalmedsubic.com) - Subic Visayas  Aklan *Aklan Baptist Hospital - Caticlan, Malay*Aklan Cooperative Mission Hospital - Roxas Avenue Extension, Kalibo*Aklan Medical Center - Osmea Avenue, Kalibo*Altavas District Hospital - Poblacion, Altavas*Boracay Island Municipal Hospital - Balabag, Boracay, Malay*Buruanga Municipal Hospital - Poblacion, Buruanga*Don Leovigildo N. Diapo, Sr. Municipal Hospital - Poblacion, Madalag*Dr. Rafael S. Tumbokon Memorial Provincial Hospital - Mabini Street, Kalibo*Ibajay District Hospital - Agbago, Ibajay*Libacao Municipal Hospital - De Mayo Street, Libacao*Makato Municipal Hospital - Poblacion, Makato*Malay Municipal Hospital - Motag, Malay*Saint Gabriel Medical Center - G. Pastrana Street, Kalibo*Saint Judes Hospital - F. Quimpo Street, Kalibo Antique *Angel Salazar Memorial General Hospital - Atabay, San Jose*Bugasong Medicare Community Hospital - Rizal Street, Ilaya, Bugasong*Culasi District Hospital - Culasi*Gov. Leandro L. Fullon District Hospital - Bagumbayan, Pandan*Pedro L. Gindap Municipal Hospital - Barbaza*President Diosdado Macapagal District Hospital - Abaca, Tobias Fornier*Ramon Maza, Sr. Memorial District Hospital - Sibalom*Sebaste Community Hospital - Poblacion, Sebaste*Semirara Coal Mines Corporation Hospital - Semirara Island, Caluya*Tugon Medical Clinic - Baybay, Pandan*Valderrama Municipal Hospital - Legaspi Street, Ubos, Valderrama Biliran *Biliran Provincial Hospital - Castin Street, Naval Bohol *Antequera Community Hospital - Poblacion, Antequera*Bohol Medical Care Institute - J. A. Clarin Street, Dao District, City*Bohol Saint Joseph Clinic - Poblacion, Tubigon*Borja Family Hospital - Gallares Street, City*Candijay Community Hospital - Poblacion, Candijay*Captain Ruperto B. Luzon Memorial Hospital - Langkis, Duero*Catigbian District Hospital - Poblacion Weste, Catigbian*Clarin Community Hospital - Poblacion Norte, Clarin*Congressman Natalino P. Castillo, Sr. Memorial Hospital - Basac, Loon*Congressman Simeon G. Toribio Memorial Hospital - Poblacion Sur, Carmen*Dr. Lims Clinic and Hospital - Poblacion Occidental, Valencia*Englewood Hospital - V. P. Inting Avenue, Bool District, City*Francisco Dagohoy Municipal Hospital - Cagayan, Inabanga*Garcia Memorial Provincial Hospital - San Jose, Talibon*Governor Celestino Gallares Memorial Regional Hospital - Miguel Parras Street, City*Holy Name University Medical Center - Janssen Heights, Dampas District, City*L. G. Cutamora Community Hospital - Fatima, Ubay*Leona O. Lim Memorial Hospital - Canmanico, Valencia*Liaos Clinic and Hospital - Poblacion, Guindulman*Lim Community Hospital - Canjulao, Jagna*Maribojoc Community Hospital - Bayacabac, Maribojoc*MMG Bohol Cooperative Community Hospital - Airport Road, City*Paulina Lim Memorial Hospital - Trinidad, Guindulman*President Carlos P. Garcia Memorial Hospital - Poblacion, Pres. Carlos P. Garcia*Ramiro Community Hospital - Gallares Street, City*Saint Jude General Hospital - Calceta Street corner CPG North Avenue, City*San Miguel Municipal Infirmary Hospital - Poblacion, San Miguel*Tagbilaran Community Hospital - M. Parras Street, City*Tagbilaran Maternity and Childrens Hospital - J. A. Clarin Street, City*Teodoro B. Galagar District Hospital - Poblacion, Jagna*Tubigon Community Hospital - Potohan, Tubigon Capiz *Bailan District Hospital - Bailan, Pontevedra*Camp Peralta Station Hospital - Camp General Macario Peralta, Jamindan*Capiz Doctors Hospital - Fuentes Drive, City*Capiz Emmanuel Hospital - Roxas Avenue, City*Dumarao Medicare Hospital - Dumarao*Mambusao District Hospital - Palje, Mambusao*Roxas Memorial Provincial Hospital - Arnaldo Boulevard, City*Saint Anthony College Hospital - San Roque Extension, City*Sen. Gerardo M. Roxas Memorial Hospital - Dao*Tapaz District Hospital - Salong, Tapaz Cebu *Badian District Hospital - Poblacion, Badian*Baking Medical Center - Lipata, Minglanilla*Balamban District Hospital - Baliwagan, Balamban*Bantayan District Hospital - Ticad, Bantayan*Barili District Hospital - Poblacion, Barili*Bogo - Medellin Medical Center - Luy-a, Medellin*Camotes - Laoc Medical Clinic - Sibonga*Camp Lapu-Lapu Army Station Hospital - Camp Lapu-Lapu, Apas, City*Cebu City Medical Center - N. Bacalso Avenue, City*Doctors University Hospital - Osmea Boulevard, City(CDC-CDH.edu)*Cebu Family Clinic - F. Ramos-Junquera Street, City*Cebu (Velez) General Hospital - F. Ramos Street, City*Cebu North General Hospital - Kauswagan Road, Talamban, City*Cebu Puericulture and Maternity House, Inc. - #2-B Rodriguez Street, City*Cebu South General Hospital - National Road, Tuyan, Naga*Cebu T.B. Pavilion - B. Rodriguez Street, City*Chong Hua Hospital(Chonghua.com.ph) - Llorante Street, Fuente Osmea, City*Cortes General Hospital - A. Del Rosario Street, City*Danao District Hospital - National Road, City*Deiparines Medical Clinic - Poblacion, Sibonga*Dr. Ignacio M. Cortez General Hospital, Inc. - S. B. Cabahug, City*Dr. Ildefonso Alcantara Memorial Hospital - Poblacion, Dalaguete*Dr, Jose Ma. V. Borromeo Memorial Hospital - Pandacan, Pinamungahan*Dumdum Medical Clinic - Baliwagan, Balamban*Eversley Childs Sanitarium - ECS Jagobiao, City*H. W. Miller Memorial Sanitarium and Hospital - Tres de Abril Street, San Nicolas, City*Isidro C. Kintanar Memorial Hospital - Poblacion, Argao*Jesus M. Paras Memorial Hospital - Baraca, City*Juan B. Dosado Memorial Hospital - Damolog, Sogod*Julio Cardinal Rosales Memorial Hospital - Poblacion, Dalaguete*Lapu-Lapu City District Hospital - A. Tumulak Street, Guin-ob, City*Mactan Benito Ebuen Air Base Hospital - Mactan Benito Ebuen Air Base, City*Mactan Doctors Hospital - Basak, City*Mandaue City Hospital - Don Andres Soriano Avenue, City*Mariano Jesus Cuenco Memorial Hospital - Poblacion, Malabuyoc*Minglanilla District Hospital - Sangi, Minglanilla*Oslob District Hospital - Lagunde, Oslob*Our Lady of The Rulem Maternity and General Hospital - Humay-Humay Road, Pajo, City*Pantinople Medical Clinic - Poblacion, Argao*Perpetual Succour Hospital(PSHcebut.com) - Gorordo Avenue, City*PNP Hospital - Gorordo Avenue, City*Reinhard Wirtgen Memorial Hospital - Poblacion, Alegria*Ricardo Maningo Memorial Hospital - San Francisco*Sacred Heart Hospital - Villa Aznar Road, Urgello Street, City*Saint Anthonys Mother and Child Hospital - Basak, San Nicolas, City*Saint Vincent General Hospital - D. Jones Avenue, City*Seamens Hospital - Camino Vicinal Street, Umapad, City*Severo Verallo Memorial District Hospital - Taytayan, City*Sta. Rosa Community Hospital - Talima, Island Group, City*Talisay District Hospital - San Isidro, City*Tojong Inc. Maternity and General Hospital - P. Rodriguez Street, Looc, City*Toledo City General Hospital - Magsaysay Hills, City*Tuburan District Hospital - Barangay 7, Tuburan*Vicente Gullas Memorial Hospital(UV.edu.ph) - Banilad, City*Sotto Memorial Medical Center - B. Rodriguez Street, Sambag II, City*Visayas Community Medical Center - Osmea Boulevard, City Samar *Agpalo Hospital - San Francisco Street, Guiuan*Albino M. Duran Memorial Hospital - Barangay 07, Balangiga*Arteche District Hospital - Barangay Garden, Arteche*Baconawa Hospital - Rizal Street, Llorente*Borongan Doctors Hospital - Songco, City*Can-avid Municipal Hospital - National Road, Can-avid*Dolores Municipal Hospital - Real Street, Dolores*Domingo N. Casano Hospital - 143 Real Street, Dolores*Eastern Samar Provincial Hospital - Songco, City*Felipe Abrigo Memorial Hospital - Hillsview, Guiuan*General MacArthur Municipal Hospital - General MacArthur*Homonhon Island Community Hospital - Casugoran, Homonhon, Guiuan*Immaculate Concepcion Clinic and Hospital - Lugay Street, Guiuan*Jimlyn Hospital - Tiguib, Oras*Llorente Municipal Hospital - Rizal Street, Llorente*Oras District Hospital - Oras*Our Lady of Guadalupe Hospital - 33 Mabini Street, General MacArthur*Quinapondan Community Hospital - Quinapondan*Taft District Hospital - Taft Guimaras *Guimaras General Hospital - San Miguel, Jordan*Nueva Valencia District Hospital - Lanipe, Nueva Valencia Iloilo *Aleosan District Hospital - Bancal, Alimodian*Barotac Viejo Municipal Hospital - San Lucas, Barotac Viejo*Don Jose S. Monfort Medical Center Extension Hospital - Tabucan, Barotac Nuevo*Don Valerio Palmares Sr. Memorial District Hospital - Alfelor Street, City*Dr. Ricardo S. Provido Sr. Memorial District Hospital - Dalid, Calinog*Dr. Ricardo Y. Ladrido Memorial Hospital - Ladrido Street, Lambunao*Dumangas District Hospital - Ilaya 1st, Dumangas*Federico Roman Tirador Sr. Memorial District Hospital - Jibolo, Janiuay*Great Savior International Hospital, Inc. - Solis Street, Tap-oc, Molo, City *Iloilo Doctors Hospital, Inc. - West Avenue, Molo, City*Iloilo Mental Health Unit - Pototan*Mission Hospital - Mission Road, Jaro, City*Iloilo Provincial Hospital - Rumbang, Pototan*Jesus M. Colmenares District Hospital - Tingui-an, Balasan*President Diosdado Macapagal Memorial Hospital (formerly Western Visayas Sanitarium) - Inangayan, Santa Barbara*Ramon Tabiana Memorial District Hospital - Pungtod, Cabatuan*Rep. Pedro G. Trono Memorial Hospital - Guimbal*Saint Pauls Hospital - General Luna Street, City*Saint Therese-MTC Hospital - San Agustin, City*Sara District Hospital - Anoring, Sara*Seamens Hospital - Onate Street, Mandurriao, City*West Visayas State University Medical Center - E. Lopez Street, Jaro, City*Western Visayas Medical Center - Q. Abeto Street, Mandurriao, City Leyte *Abuyog General Hospital - Bunga, Abuyog*Bethany Hospital - Real Street, City*Burauen District Hospital - Sitio Lupa, Camansi, District I, Burauen*Carigara District Hospital - Barugohay Norte, Carigara*Clinica Gatchalian and Hospital - J. T. Kanleon Street, City*Divine Word Hospital - Avenida Veteranos Street, City*Dr. Manuel Veloso Memorial Hospital - Mabini Street, Palompon*Eastern Visayas Regional Medical Center - Magsaysay Boulevard, City*Hilongos District Hospital - C. V. Alcuino Street, Hilongos*Leyte Baptist Hospital, Inc. - R. V. Fulache Street, Hilongos*Leyte Provincial Hospital - Candahug, Palo*Lide-Pasar Hospital - Pasar, Isabel*Matalom Community Hospital - Matalom*Northwestern Leyte District Hospital - Cristina, Calubian*Ormoc District Hospital - Cogon, City*Ormoc Maternity and Childrens Hospital - Kataag Street, City*OSPA Farmers Medical Center - Can-adieng, City*PNOC-EDC Tongonan Medical Clinic and Infirmary - Housing Village, Aguiting, Kananga*RN Lucero Medical Clinic - Osmea Street, Sto. Nio, Isabel*Remedios Trinidad Romualdez Hospital - Calanipawan, City*Schistoaomiasis Control and Research Hospital - Naga-Naga, Palo*Tabango Community Hospital - Tabango*Tacloban City Hospital - Marasbaras, City*Villaflors Clinic - R. V. Fulache Street, Hilongos*Villaba Community Hospital - Suba, Villaba*Visca Infirmary - City*Western Leyte Provincial Hospital - G. H. Del Pilar Street cor. J P. Laurel Street, City Occidental *Alfredo E. Maraon, Sr. Memorial District Hospital - Bato, City*Bacolod Adventist Medical Center - C. V. Ramos Avenue, Taculing, City*Bacolod Our Lady of Mercy Specialty Hospital - Erocero, Mandalagan, City*Bago City Hospital - Rafael Salas Drive, City*Binalbagan Infirmary - Rizal, Binalbagan*Cadiz District Hospital - Hortencia, City*Calatrava District Hospital - Calatrava*Cauayan Municipal Hospital - Isio, Cauayan*Corazon Locsin Montelibano Memorial Regional Hospital - Lacson Street, City*Don Salvador Benedicto Memorial Hospital - Carlota City*Dr. Gumersindo Garcia, Sr. Memorial Hospital - Guanzon Street, City*Dr. Pablo O. Torre, Sr. Memorial Hospital - Benigno Aquino Drive, City*E. R. Elumba Clinic - Rizal Street, La Castellana*Eleuterio T. Decena Memorial Hospital - Bacuyangan, Hinoba-an*Gov. Valeriano M. Gatuslao Memorial Hospital - Barangay IV, Himamaylan*Ignacio L. Arroyo, Sr. Memorial District Hospital - Burgos Street, Isabela*Immaculate Concepcion Health Center - Bandung Village, City*Kabankalan City Hospital - Tabugon, City*Kabankalan District Hospital - Santo Mojon, Binicuil, City*Lopez District Farmers Hospital, Inc. - City*Negros Occidental Medical Village Hospital - Benigno Aquino Drive, City*San Carlos City Hospital - Ylagan Street, San Carlos City*San Carlos Doctors Hospital - National Highway, San Carlos City*Southern Negros Doctors Hospital - Don Emilio Village, City*Teresita L. Jalandoni Provincial Hospital - Lantad, City*The Doctors Hospital, Inc. - Benigno Aquino Drive, City*Valladolid District Hospital - Valladolid*Vicente Gustilo District Hospital - Lopez Drive, City Oriental University Medical Center Foundation Inc. (SUMCFI)*Amio Community Primary Hospital - Amio, Santa Catalina*Bais District Hospital - City*Bayawan District Hospital - City*Bindoy District Hospital - Bindoy*Canlaon District Hospital - Lucap, City*Congressman Lamberto L. Macias Memorial Hospital - Siaton*DML Hospital - City*Dumaguete City Hospital - City*Governor William Billy Villegas Memorial Hospital - City*Guihulngan District Hospital - City*Holy Child Hospital - City*Inapoy Community Primary Hospital - Inapoy, Mabinay*Kalumboyan Community Primary Hospital - Kalumboyan, City*Luz-Sikatuna Community Primary Hospital - Luz, City*Mabinay Medicare Community Hospital - Mabinay*Marina Clinic-Hospital (SUMCFI Extension) - Dauin*Nabilog Community Primary Hospital - Tambalan, Negros Oriental*Negros Oriental Provincial Hospital - Piapi, City*Pacuan Community Primary Hospital - Pacuan, La Libertad*Siaton District Hospital - Siaton*Sibulan District Hospital - Sibulan*Silliman University Medical Center (SUMCFI) - Aldecoa Road, Laguna, City*Tanjay City Hospital - City Samar *Allen District Hospital - Allen*Biri District Hospital - Biri*Capul District Hopital - Capul*Catarman Community Clinic - Catarman*Catubig District Hospital - Catubig*Dr. Gregorio B. Tan Memorial Hospital - Kahundil Street, SMH, Laoang*Gamay District Hospital - Gamay*Leoncio Uy Memorial Hospital - Catarman*Northern Samar Provincial Hospital - Catarman*San Antonio District Hospital - San Antonio*St. Jude Clinic - Catarman Samar *Basey District Hospital - Basey*Calbayog District Hospital - Burgos Street, City*Calbayog Sanitarium and Hospital - National Highway, City*Camp Lukban Station Hospital - Camp Lukban, Maulong, City*Gandara District Hospital - Gandara*Our Lady of Porziuncola Hospital, Inc. - Magsaysay Boulevard, East Awang, City*Saint Camillus Hospital(Stcamilluscalbayog.com) - Airport Road, Trinidad, City*Samar Provincial Hospital - City*Tarangnan Municipal Hospital - Tarangnan Siquijor *Lazi Medicare Community Hospital - Lazi*Siquijor Provincial Hospital - Pangi, Siquijor Leyte *Anahawan District Hospital - Poblacion, Anahawan*Consuelo K. Tan Memorial Medical Center, Inc. - Sogod*Hinunangan Community Hospital - Hinunangan*Liloan Community Hospital - Liloan*Padre Burgos Community Hospital - Padre Burgos*Pintuyan District Hospital - Pintuyan*Salvacion Oppus-Yiguez Memorial Provincial Hospital - Mantahan, City*Sogod District Hospital - Sogod*Specialty Clinic Corrompido Hospital - Sogod*White Cross Clinic and Hospital - Malitbog*Zenon T. Lagumbay Memorial Hospital - Labrador, Hinunangan Mindanao  del Norte *Agusan del Norte Provincial Hospital - Libertad, City*Butuan Doctors Hospital, Inc. - J. C. Aquino Avenue, City*Butuan Medical Center - Baan, City*Butuan Puericulture Center No. 394, Inc. - San Jose Street, City*Cabadbaran District Hospital - Tolosa, City*Catamina Clinic and Hospital - Nasipit*Clinica Jesus Nazareno - Magallanes*Elisa R. Ochoa Memorial Maternity and General Hospital - San Jose Street, City*Jabonga Municipal Hospital - Mayogda, Purok I, Jabonga*Kitcharao District Hospital - Kitcharao*Las Nieves Municipal Hospital - Poblacion, Las Nieves*Manuel J. Santos Hospital, Inc. - Montilla Boulevard, City*Nasipit District Hospital - Kinabjangan, Nasipit*Saint Anne Clinic - Funcion Street, City*Saint Joseph Medical Clinic - Buhang, Magallanes del Sur *Bayugan Community Hospital - City*Bayugan J. M. Yap Sto. Nio Hospital - Rotunda, City*Bunawan District Hospital - San Teodoro, Bunawan*D. O. Plaza Memorial Hospital - Patin-ay, Prosperidad*Esperanza Medicare Community Hospital - Esperanza*Franco Clinic and Hospital - Trento*La Paz Municipal Hospital - La Paz*Loreto Municipal Hospital - Loreto*New Bayugan Medical Hospital - City*Rico Medical Clinic and Hospital - Poblacion, Trento*United Doctors Medical Clinic - Bunawan Basilan *Basilan Community Hospital - Rizal Avenue, City*Basilan General Hospital - Binuangan, City*Dr. Jose Ma. Torres Memorial Hospital - Dr. Jose Torres Street, City*Infante Hospital - C. P. Garcia Street, City*Juan S. Alano Memorial Hospital - Rizal Avenue, City*Lamitan District Hospital - Limo-ok, City Bukidnon *Abella Midway Hospital - P. Valero Street, Poblacion, Valencia City*Abrena Medical Clinic - Sayre Highway, Don Carlos*Aznar Medical Clinic - Maramag*Bethel Baptist Hospital - Fortich Street, Sumpong, City*Bongcas Holy Child Hospital - Poblacion, Maramag*Bukidnon Doctors Hospital - Sayre Highway, Bagontaas, Valencia City*Bukidnon Medical Center - Barangay 9, City*Bukidnon Medical Center (Malitbog Branch) - Malitbog*Bukidnon Medical Center (Maramag Branch) - Maramag*Bukidnon Medical Center (San Fernando Branch) - San Fernando*Central Mindanao University Hospital - Musuan, Maramag*Deticio Community Hospital - Bangued, City*Dr. Alberto M. Pastor Hospital - Salawagan, Quezon*Ermavi Clinic - Kibawe*Esther Hospital - Sayre Highway, Purok 2, Valencia City*German Doctors Hospital - Valencia City*Kalilangan Municipal Hospital - West Poblacion, Kalilangan*Kibawe Municipal Hospital - Recto Street, Kibawe*Kisolon Emergency Hospital - Kisolon, Sumilao*La Via General Hospital - M. L. Quezon Street, Poblacion, Valencia City*Malaybalay Medical Center - Fortich Street, City*Malaybalay Polymedic General Hospital - Fortich Street, City*Maraat Medical Hospital - Poblacion, Quezon*Maramag Mediclinic Hospital and Laboratory - South Poblacion, Maramag*Medidas Medical Clinic - Roxas Street, Valencia*Pahihan Family Clinic - E. Aguinaldo Street, Don Carlos*Palangan Family and Childrens Clinic - Poblacion, Kalilangan*Peralta Clinic Medical - Sayre Highway, Do Carlos*Philipps Memorial Hospital - Camp Philipps, Manolo Fortich*Saint Ann Medical Hospital - Poblacion, Quezon*Saint Clare Hospital - Poblacion, Quezon*Saint Joseph Southern Bukidnon Hospital - Maramag*Saint Martin Clinic - Kalilangan*Santiago Medical Clinic - Poblacion, Don Carlos*Sibulan Santo Nio Hospital - Don Carlos*Tabanera Medical Hospital - Poblacion, Quezon*Talakag Medicare Community Hospital - Talakag*Valencia Medical Hospital - Sayre Highway, Valencia City*Valencia Sanitarium and Hospital - Facoma Subdivision, Valencia City Camiguin *Camiguin General Hospital - Lacas Street, Mambajao*Catarman District Hospital - Catarman Valley *Alaba Medical Clinic and Hospital - Maco*Andres Medical Clinic - Montevista*Basaes Medical Clinic - Cervantes Street, Poblacion, Monkayo*Compostela Valley Hospital - Compostela*Dr. Julio M. Layug, Jr. Medical Clinic and Hospital - Compostela Valley*Flordeliz Medical Clinic and Pharmacy - Mawab*Laak Municipal Hospital - Laak*Layug Medical Clinic - Quirino Avenue, Nabunturan*Maragusan Municipal Hospital - Talisay Street, Poblacion, Maragusan*Mawab Medical Clinic and Hospital - Rizal Street, Poblacion, Mawab*Nabunturan Doctors Hospital - Nabunturan*Pantukan District Hospital - Townsite, Pantukan*Saint James Hospital and Medical Clinic - Compostela Cotabato *Alamada Provincial Community Hospital - Kitacubong, Alamada*Aleosan District Hospital - Aleosan*Anulao Saint Michael Medical Clinic and Hospital - Rizal Street, Kabacan*Antipas Medical Specialist Hospital Inc. - Poblacion, Antipas *Arakan Valley District Hospital - Magsaysay, Antipas*Babol General Hospital - Magsaysay Street, Matalam*Cadulao Medical Clinic - Manuel L. Quezon Street, Pikit*Clinica Catotal - F. Cajelo Street, Antipas*Cotabato Provincial Hospital - Amas, City*Cruzado Medical Clinic Hospital and Pharmacy - Fidel Flores Street, Pikit*Dizon Medical Clinic and Hospital - Jose P. Laurel Street, City*Dr. Amado B. Diaz Provincial Foundation Hospital - Roosevelt Street, Poblacion IV, Midsayap*Dr. Luis P. Malaluan Hospital - Perez Street, City*Dr. Ricardo P. Dela Cruz Memorial Hospital - Poblacion VIII, Midsayap*Estillore Medical Surgical Clinic and Hospital - Kitada, Matalam*Fr. Tulio Favali Municipal Hospital - Poblacion, Tulunan*Jalandoni Medical Clinic - Quezon Avenue, Midsayap*Kabacan Medical Specialist Hospital - National Highway, Osias, Kabacan*Kabacan Polymedic Cooperative Hospital - National Highway, Osias, Kabacan*Kidapawan Doctors Hospital - Quezon Boulevard, City*Kidapawan Medical Specialists Center - Sudapin, City*Mlang District Hospital - Rizal Street, Mlang*Mlang Doctors Hospital - M. H. del Pilar Street, Mlang*Madonna General Hospital - Quezon Boulevard, City*Makilala Medical Specialist Hospital - Poblacion, Makilala*Manuel Hospital - Lanao, City*Midsayap Community Doctors Hospital - Poblacion VIII, Midsayap*Midsayap Diagnostic Center and Hospital - Poblacion VIII, Midsayap*Midway Hospital - Mlang*Mount of Blessing Hospital - Libungan*Naquitquitan Medical Clinic and Hospital - Carmen*New Cebu Provincial Hospital-Annex - New Cebu, President Roxas*Notre Dame Clinic - Bagontapay, Mlang*Roldan Medical Clinic - M. H. del Pilar Street, Mlang*Sara Medical Clinic - Jaycee Avenue, Poblacion II, Midsayap*Sorilla Medical and Maternity Clinic and Hospital - National Highway, Tulunan*United Doctors Hospital - Quezon Boulevard, City*University of Southern Mindanao Hospital - USM Compound, Kabacan City *Cotabato Medical Specialist Hospital - Quezon Avenue*Cotabato Regional Hospital and Medical Center - Sinsual Avenue, Rosary Heights*Cotabato Sanitarium - P. O. Box 187*Dr. P. Ocampo Hospital - De Mazenod Avenue*Notre Dame Hospital and School of Midwifery - Rosary Heights del Norte *Alegre Medical Clinic - Maniki, Kapalong *Bioser Medical Clinic - Santo Tomas*Bungabong-Sanico Medical Clinic and Maternity House - Crossing, Kinamayan, Santo Tomas*Corpuz Medical Clinic - Kapalong*Espiritu Medical Clinic and Hospital - FDR Road 2, Santo Tomas*Estela Medical Clinic and Pharmacy - Santo Tomas*Kapalong District Hospital - Quezon Street, Maniki, Kapalong*Matutes Medical Clinic and Hospital - R. Magsaysay Avenue, Santo Tomas*Salomon-Mangilet Maternity and Medical Hospital - J. Rizal Street cor. C. Arellano Street, Maniki, Kapalong del Sur *Alfeche Medical Clinic - Kiblawan*Asilo Hospital - Moscardo Street, Padada*Bansalan Medical Clinic - Rosal Street, Bansalan*Bendijo Hospital - Liling, Hagonoy*Clinica Centeo - Bansalan*Clinica Pineda - Malalag*Clinica Rudinas and Hospital - Poblacion, Hagonoy*Clinica Santa Teresa - Malalag*Diones Hospital - Sulop*Estacion Medical Clinic and Hospital - Malita*Fanlo Medical Clinic - M. Peralta Street, Poblacion, Malita*Golingay General Hospital - Poblacion, Malalag*Gregorio M. Matas District Hospital - Kiblawan*J-Hagonoy Medical Clinic - Hagonoy*Malita District Hospital - Malita*Magtabog General Hospital - Santa Maria*Matanao Medicare Community Hospital - Poblacion, Matanao*Padada General Hospital - Padada*Pazzu Medical Clinic - Aldi Street, Bansalan*Pimentel Medical Clinic - Bansalan*Rodolfo Morales Medical Clinic - Santa Maria*Salud Medical Clinic - Malita*Santa Maria Medical Clinic and Hospital - Poblacion, Santa Maria*Santo Rosario Hospital - Malalag*Sinawilan Clinic and Hospital - Sinawilan, Matanao*Sulop Medical Clinic - Sulop*Tamondong Delos Cientos Medical Clinic - Quezon Street, Padada*Tomas Lachica District Hospital - Jose Abad Santos*Viacrusis Medical Clinic and Hospital - Osmea Street, Bansalan*Zarsona Medical Clinic - Bansalan Oriental *Cateel District Hospital - Hospital Road, Poblacion, Cateel*Clinica Suela - Pindasan, National Highway, Lupon*Davao Oriental Provincial Hospital - City*Governor Generoso Municipal Hospital - Governor Generoso*Lupon District Hospital - Townsite, Lupon*Manay District Hospital - Bato, Santa Maria, Manay*San Isidro Medical Clinic and Hospital - Poblacion, San Isidro*Saint Camillus Hospital of Mati - City*Velasco General Clinic and Hospital - Purok 5, Tibanban, Governor Generoso Santos City *Auguis Clinic and Hospital - North Osmea Avenue*General Santos City Doctors Hospital - National Highway*General Santos City Hospital - Lagao*Labella Hospital - First Road, Calumpang*Mindanao Medical Center - Mabuhay Road, City Heights*Nikki Louise Hospital - Lagao*R. O. Diagan Cooperative Hospital - President Quezon Avenue*SOCSARGEN County Hospital - Bula-Lagao Road, Arradaza Street*Saint Elizabeth Hospital - National Highway corner Santiago Boulevard del Norte *Andot Medical Clinic - Purok I, Bacolod*Bontilaos Hospital - Maranding, Lala*Delbert Jons Polyclinic - Poblacion, Kapatagan*Dr. Gatchalian Clinic - Kapatagan*Dr. Uy Hospital - Roxas Avenue, City*E and R Hospital and Pharmacy - Benito Labao Extension, City*Gozo Community Hospital - Maranding, Lala*Gregorio T. Lluch Memorial Hospital - Quezon Avenue, Pala-o, City*Kapatagan District Hospital - Kapatagan*Kauswagan Municipal Hospital - Kauswagan*Kolambugan District Hospital - Kolambugan*Iligan Medical Center - San Miguel Village, Pala-o, City*Lanao del Norte Provincial Hospital - Baroy, Tubod*Maranding Community Hospital - Maranding, Lala*Mercy Community Hospital - Kamague, City*Mindanao Sanitarium and Hospital - Tibanga, City*Saint Marys Hospital - Quezon Avenue, City *Sultan Naga Dimaporo District Hospital - Sultan Naga Dimaporo*Tubod Community Hospital - Tubod del Sur *Al-Jaserah Hospital - Tuca-Poona Marantao, City*Amai Pakpak Medical Center - Datu Saber, City*Balindong District Hospital - Salipongan, Balindong*Dr. Separio M. Montaner, Jr. Al-Haj Memorial Hospital - Mable, Malabang*Filipino Libyan Friendship Hospital - City*MSU Medical Services and Hospital - City*Mapandi Memorial Hospital - Buanda Boulevard, Saduc, City*SMD General Hospital - Pangarungan Village, City*Tamparan General Hospital - Tamparan*Wao District Hospital - Wao Maguindanao *Buluan District Hospital - Buluan*Camp Siongco Station Hospital - Datu Odin Sinsuat*Datu Blah Sinsuat District Hospital - Upi*Magria Clinic and Hospital - Buluan*Maguindanao Provincial Hospital - Shariff Aguak*Manangan Clinic and Hospital - Buluan*Parang Puericulture Center and Hospital - Parang Davao *Acosta Clinic - Toril, City*Alexian Wellness Center - McArthur Highway, Matina, City*Alterado Medical School and Hospital - Villanueva Street, Agdao, City*Antonio O. Florendo Hospital - Tadeco, City*Babak Community Hospital - Villarica, Babak, Garden City of Samal*Baguio District Hospital - Baguio, City*Bishop Joseph Regan Memorial Hospital - Christ the King Road, City*Brokenshire Integrated Health Ministries - Brokenshire Heigts, Madapo Hills, City*Bullecer Medical Clinic - Rasay Street, Toril, City*Cainglet Medical Clinic - Salvacion, City*Camp Panacan Station Hospital - Camp Panacan, City*Carmen District Hospital - Carmen*Carmen Medical Clinic and Hospital - Santo Nio, Carmen*Cereville Medical Clinic - Brioso Extension, Poblacion, Santa Cruz*Clinica Feliciano II - Magsaysay Avenue, Calinan, City*Clinica Isaguirre - Magsaysay Avenue, Calinan, City*Clinica Rivera Medical Center - San Francisco, City*Community Health and Cooperative Hospital - Magallanes Street, City*Davao Adventist Hospital - McArthur Highway, Bangkal, City*Davao del Norte Provincial Hospital - City*Davao del Sur Provincial Hospital - Lapu-Lapu Street, City*Davao Doctors Hospital - Elpidio Quirino Avenue, City*Davao Medical Center - Jose P. Laurel Avenue, Bajada, City*Davao Medical School Foundation Hospital - Davao Medical Drive, Bajada, City*Davao Mediquest Hospital - Saavedra Street, Toril, City*Davao Regional Hospital - Apokon, City*Dela Cerna Hospital - Mandug, City*Digos Doctors Hospital - McArthur Highway, City*Dominican Hospital - Quezon Avenue, City*Dr. Lorenzo B. Principe Clinic - Calinan, City*Fabie General Hospital - Pelayo corner Rizal Streets, City*Gig Oca Robles Seamens Hospital - R. Castillo Street, City*Gonzales Maranan Clinic and Hospital - Quezon Avenue, City*Guadalupe Medical Clinic and Hospital - Jamin Street, City*Holy Spirit of Mintal Clinic - Mintal, City*Isaac T. Robillo Memorial Hospital - Calinan, City*Llanos Hospital - Roxas Street, City*Malate Medical Clinic - Toril, City*Malta Medical Center - Toril, City*Masongsong Clinic - General del Pilar Street, City*Medical Center of Digos Cooperative - National Highway, Tres de Mayo, City*Medical Clinic of Saint Luke - Calinan, City*Medical Mission Group Hospital - Leon Garcia Street, Santa Ana, City*Medical Mission Group Hospital and Health Services Cooperation of Tagum - Visayan Village, City*Mercado Medical Clinic - Kapatagan, City*Mindanao Heart Center - Jose P. Laurel Avenue, City*Navares Medical Clinic and Pharmacy - San Francisco, City*North Davao Mining Corporation Hospital - Maco, City*Panabo Polyclinic Hospital - Quezon Street, Gredu, City*Paquibato District Hospital - Paquibato, City*Paulino Hospital - Rizal Avenue, City*Ralota-Lagrada Medical Clinic - Poblacion, Santa Cruz*Ricardo Limso Medical Center - Ilustre Street, City*Saint Felix Medical Hospital - Talomo, City*Saint John Hospital - Rasay Street, Toril, City*Saint Marys General Hospital - Toril, City*Samal District Hospital - Garden City of Samal*San Pedro Hospital - C. De Guzman Street, City*Somoso General Hospital - City*Sunga Hospital - City*Tagum Doctors Hospital - Highway 54, City*Tecarro Polyclinic and Hospital - Magallanes Street, City*United Doctors Hospital of Tagum - Rizal Sobrecarey Street, City*Zafra Medical Clinic - City Cagayan de Oro thumb|200px|right|Capitol University Medical City*Cagayan de Oro Maternity and Childrens Hospital and Puericulture Center - de Oro City*Cagayan de Oro Medical Center - Tiano corner Nacalaban Streets, de Oro City*Cagayan de Oro Polymedic General Hospital - Don Apolinar Velez Street, de Oro City*Camp Evangelista Station Hospital - Patag, de Oro City*Capitol University Medical City - Gusa, de Oro City*Del Monte Bugo Clinic - de Oro City*German Doctors Hospital - University - Ateneo de Cagayan Dr. Jose P. Rizal School of Medicine, J. Mortola Street, de Oro City*Gingoog Sanitarium and Hospital - C. Bagaipo Street, City*J. R. Memorial City Hospital - J. V. Serina Street, Carmen, de Oro City*Jasaan Municipal Hospital - Jasaan*Lipunan Hospital - National Highway, City*Madonna and Child Hospital - J. V. Serina Street, Carmen, de Oro City*Maria Reyna Hospital - Camaman-an, de Oro City*Misamis Oriental Provincial Hospital (Balingasag Branch) - Balingasag*Misamis Oriental Provincial Hospital (Claveria Branch) - Claveria*Misamis Oriental Provincial Hospital (Gingoog City Branch) - City *Misamis Oriental Provincial Hospital (Initao Branch) - Initao*Misamis Oriental Provincial Hospital (Magsaysay Branch) - Magsaysay*Misamis Oriental Provincial Hospital (Manticao Branch) - Poblacion, Manticao*Misamis Oriental Provincial Hospital (Talisayan Branch) - Talisayan*Northern Mindanao Medical Center - Capitol Compound, de Oro City*Polymedic Medical Plaza - Kauswagan Highway, de Oro City*Puerto Community Hospital - Puerto, de Oro City*Roa Medical Clinic I - Cogon, Balingasag*Sabal Doctors Hospital - Don Apolinar Velez Street, de Oro City*Tagoloan Polymedic General Hospital - Santa Cruz, Tagoloan Occidental *Aruelo General Hospital - City*Bonifacio Medical Clinic - Bonifacio*Calamba District Hospital - Calamba*Clinica Ozaraga - Bonifacio*Dignum Foundation Hospital - Langcangan, City*Doa Maria D. Tan Memorial Hospital - Baybay Mantic, City*Drazen Medical Clinic - Sinacaban*Faith Hospital - Las Aguadas, City*Family Maternity and General Hospital - City*Immaculate Concepcion Hospital of Plaridel - Rillas Street, South Poblacion, Plaridel*Jimenez Medicare Community Hospital - Gomez Street, Nacional, Jimenez*Lopez Jaena Community Clinic - Lopez Jaena*Luis Villa Memorial Hospital - Poblacion III, Clarin*Mayor Hilarion A. Ramiro, Sr. Regional Training and Teaching Hospital - Maningcol, City*Medina General Hospital - Jose Abad Santos Street, City*Misamis Occidental Provincial Hospital - City*Misamis University Medical Center - Bagacay, City*Oroquieta Community Hospital - J. P. Quijano Street, City*Ozamiz City Community Hospital - Green Valley, Tinaga, City*R & L Medical Clinic - Aloran*Revelo Medical Clinic - Clarin*S. M. Lao Ozamiz City Emergency Hospital - Manabay, City*Saint Marys General Hospital - Washington Street, City*Saint Therese Hospital - City*Saint Vincent Hospital - South 2nd Street, City*Tamola-Tan Medical Hospital - Rizal Street, City*Tanho Memorial Clinic - Plaridel*Tudela Municipal Hospital - Tudela*Uy Medical Clinic - Santa Cruz, Jimenez Sarangani *Glan Medicare Community Hospital - Santo Nio, Glan*Kiamba District Hospital - Kiamba*Maasim Municipal Hospital - Maasim*Maitum Municipal Hospital - Maitum*Malungon Municipal Hospital - Malungon*Tiburcio B. Aquino Memorial Hospital - Kiamba Cotabato *Allah Valley Medical Specialist Hospital - National Highway, City*Bontuyan Medical Clinic - B. Bayan Street, Polomolok*Clinica Luntao - Albert Morrow Street, Poblacion, Norala*Dr. Ervin B. Luntao Family Clinic - Santo Nio*Emmanuel Exalt Medical Complex - National Highway (beside The Doctors Clinic and Hospital, Inc.), City*Garcia Clinic and Hospital - National Highway, Poblacion, Tupi*Heramils Maternity and Childrens Clinic - Polomolok*Howard Hubbard Memorial Hospital - Cannery Site, Polomolok*Isaar Rama Memorial Hospital - Arellano Street, City*Januaria Marcial Memorial Hospital - Yangco, Banga*Juadiong Clinic - Surallah*Lake Sebu Municipal Hospital - Lake Sebu*Landero Clinic and Hospital - Surallah*Lariosa Clinic and Hospital - Surallah*Norala Emergency Hospital - Norala*Our Lady of Fatima Hospital - Arellano Street, City*Polomolok District Hospital - Pagalungan, Polomolok*Ruel I. Senador Municipal Hospital - Tupi*Saint Jude Clinic and Hospital - Poblacion, Santo Nio*Saint Lukes Medical Hospital - Upper Lopez Jaena Street, City*South Cotabato Provincial Hospital - Aguinaldo Street, City*Surallah Community Hospital - Surallah*The Doctors Clinic and Hospital, Inc. - General Santos Drive, City*Tboli Evangelical Clinic and Hospital - Edwards, Tboli*ZMK Doctors Clinic and Hospital - Poblacion, Santo Nio Kudarat *Amoil Clinic and Hospital - Don Enrique, City*Codilla Ramos Clinic - Esperanza*Evangelista Medical Clinic and Hospital - Poblacion, Lambayong*Galinato Family Clinic and Hospital - Isulan*Holy Nazarene Clinic and Hospital - Valdez Street, Kalawag II, Isulan*Isulan Doctors Specialist Hospital - National Highway, Isulan*Jacalan Hospital - Abadilla Subdivision, Poblacion, City*Lebak Doctors Hospital - Rizal Avenue, Lebak*Llanos Tamondong Medical Clinic - Esperanza*Lu Clinic and Hospital - City*Matias Clinic and Hospital - Isulan*Medical Mission Group Hospital and Health Services Cooperation of Sultan Kudarat - Roxas Avenue corner Alunan Avenue, City*Medicare Community Hospital of Lebak - Lebak*Omambing Family Clinic and Hospital - Gapok, Sen. Ninoy Aquino*Our Lady of Hope Medical Clinic and Hospital - Esperanza*Quijano Medical Clinic and Hospital - National Highway, City*Romualdez-Katiku Community Hospital - Katiku, President Quirino*Sacred Heart Medical Clinic - Columbio*Saint Louis Medical Clinic and Hospital - City*Sandig Medical Clinic and Hospital - Ledesma Street, City*Senator Ninoy Aquino Community Hospital - Poblacion, Sen. Ninoy Aquino*Sultan Kudarat Doctors Hospital - National Highway, City*Sultan Kudarat Medical Specialist Hospital - Alunan Avenue, City*Sultan Kudarat Provincial Hospital - Isulan*Sultan sa Barongis District Hospital - Lambayong*Tamondong Memorial Clinic and Hospital - Ala, Esperanza*Valdez Mother and Child Clinic and Hospital - National Highway, City Sulu *Jolo U.S. Trauma Hospital - Camp General Bautista, Jolo*Luuk District Hospital - Tubig Putih Banua Buclao, Luuk*Pangutaran District Hospital - Pangutaran*Parang District Hospital - Parang*Siasi District Hospital - Siasi*Southern Mindanao Command General Hospital - Asturias, Jolo*Sulu Medical Specialist Hospital - Jolo*Sulu Provincial Hospital - Jolo*Sulu Sanitarium  Hospital - Jolo del Norte *Albor District Hospital - Libjo*Amarile-Dominos Hospital - Talisay, City*CARAGA Regional Hospital - Rizal Street, City*Del Carmen District Hospital - Del Carmen*Dinagat District Hospital - Dinagat*Gigaquit Municipal Hospital - San Isidro, Gigaquit*Grace Christian Clinic and Hospital - Capitol Road, City*Loreto District Hospital - Loreto*Mainit Medocare Community Hospital - Mainit*Malimono District Hospital - Malimono*Miranda Family Hospital - City*Pilar District Hospital - Pilar*Placer District Hospital - Placer*Santa Monica Municipal Hospital - Santa Monica*Siargao District Hospital - Dapa*Socorro District Hospital - Socorro*Surigao Medical Center, Inc. - City del Sur *Adella Serra Ty Memorial Medical Center - City*Andres Soriano Memorial Hospital, Coop. - Tabon, City*Bislig District Hospital - National Highway, City*Cortes Municipal Hospital - Cortes*Cuartero General Hospital - Navales Street, City*Diatagon Medical Clinic - Diatagon, Lianga*Family Medical Clinic - Mangangoy, City*Hinatuan District Hospital - Hinatuan*Isidro M. Olan, Sr. Memorial Clinic and Hospital - Pagantayan, Cantilan*Lianga District Hospital - Lianga*Lingig Medicare Community Hospital - Lingig*Madrid District Hospital - Madrid*Marihatag District Hospital - Pagbahanan, Marihatag*Saint Jude Clinic - Tabon, City*Saint Vincent de Paul College General and Maternity Hospital - Mangangoy, City*San Miguel Community Hospital - Sitio Tina, San Miguel Tawi-Tawi *Cagayan de Tawi-Tawi District Hospital - Mapun*Datu Halun Sakilan Memorial Hospital - Bongao*Holy Family Hospital - Bongao*Languyan Municipal Hospital - Languyan*Tuan Ligaddung Lipae District Hospital - Sapa-SapaCity*Arturio Eustaquio Community Medical Center - San Jose Road*Brent Hospital and College, Inc. - R. T. Lim Boulevard*Camp Navarro General Hospital - Western Mindanao Command, Calarian*Ciudad Medical Center - Nuez Extension, Canelar*Cristino Palagas Memorial Hospital - MCLL, Quinipot*Dr. Salvador A. Cabato Memorial Hospital - Maria Clara Lobregat Highway, Tetuan*Edwin Andrews Air Base General Hospital - Edwin Andrews Air Base, Santa Maria*Labuan Public Hospital - Labuan*Mindanao Central Sanitarium - Pasabolong*Western Mindanao Medical Center - Veterans Extension, Tetuan*Zamboanga Childrens and Maternity Hospital - Pilar Street*Zamboanga City Medical Center - Governor Lim Avenue*Zamboanga Doctors Hospital - Veterans Avenue*Zamboanga Puericulture Center and Maternity Lying-in Hospital - Pura Brillantes Street*Victoria Revilla Medical Center - San Ramon del Norte *Dipolog City Hospital - City*Dipolog Medical Center - Santa Filomena, City*Dr. Jose Rizal Memorial Hospital - City*Labason District Hospital - La Union, Labason*Liloy Integrated Health District Hospital - Liloy*Mayor Joaquin C. Macias Memorial Hospital - Sindangan*Medicare Community Hospital of Manukan - Manukan*Ospital ng Kabataan ng Dipolog - Padre Ramon Street, City*Pian District Hospital - Poblacion North, Pian*Santa Isabel General Hospital - Santa Isabel, City*Sergio Osmea, Sr. Municipal Hospital - Biayon, Sergio Osmea, Sr.*Sibutad Municipal Hospital - Sibutad*Sindangan District Hospital - Sindangan*Siocon District Hospital - Siocon*Zamboanga del Norte Cooperative Hospital - Turno, City*del Norte Medical Center - Sicayab, City del Sur *Blancia Hospital - Blancia, Molave*Borbon General Hospital, Inc. - J. Rizal Street, Balangasan, City*Cabahug General Hospital - San Pedro, City*Igano Community Hospital - Burgos Street, Molave*Lakewood Municipal Hospital - Poblacion, Lakewood*Mahayag District Hospital - Mahayag*Margosatubig Regional Hospital - Margosatubig*Metro Pagadian Hospital, Inc. - Lumbia, City*Pagadian City Doctors Hospital - City*Pagadian City Medical Center Main - City*Pagadian City Medical Hospital - Cabrera Street, City Sibugay *Alicia District Hospital - Poblacion, Alicia*Amoroso Medical Clinic - Poblacion, Imelda*Danao Sale Medical Clinic - Santa Clara, Naga*Dr. Henry M. De Villa Memorial Hospital - Ipil*Gemarino Hospital - Kauswagan, Siplahan*Kabasalan General Hospital - Santa Cruz, Kabasalan*Lancera Memorial Hospital - Imelda*M. Simon Hospital - Ipil*Olutanga Municipal Hospital - Bateria, Olutanga*Payao Municipal Hospital - Payao*Pathfinder Estate Hospital - Good Year, Kabasalan*Redoble Medical Clinic - Buug*Romeo B. Sibud County Hospital - Poblacion, Titay*Saint John General Hospital - Buug*Zambonga Sibugay Provincial Hospital - Sanito, Ipil*Western Zamboanga Polymedic Hospital - Malangas References (External links*University of the Visayas*List of Certified Plastic Surgeons, Philippines, cosmeticsurgeryphilippines.org
713194
Amazonas_Region
Amazonas is a department of northern Peru bordered by Ecuador on the north and west, Department on the west, Libertad Department on the south, and Department and Martn Department on the east. Its capital is the city of Chachapoyas.Geographythumb|left|250px|Valle del Maran (Maran Valley) between Chachapoyas and Celendin, PeruThe Amazonas department consists of regions covered by rainforests and ranges. The rainforest zone predominates (72.93%) and it extends to the north over its oriental slope, up to the border with Ecuador in the summits of the del Cndor. The mountain range zone is located in the southern provinces of the Amazonas department and it only includes 27.07% of its whole territorial surface.One of the factors that help to give big importance to its geography is not only that the big valleys and plains of its rainforest zone are the closest to the Ocean, but also its connections with the routes of the coast are the lowest. This is because they use the de Porculla (the mountain pass of Porculla) that is located at 2,144 m. This is the lowest pass of the whole Peruvian Andes to arrive to the Pan-American road system.The vast and deep del Maran (Maraons valley), which constitutes one of the most important morphologic features of the department. The valle del Maran crosses a big part of its territory and expands itself from south to north. It reaches its greatest width in the province of Bagua. It narrows when it crosses the Cordillera Oriental (the Oriental range) in its most violent route towards the east, towards the lowest part of the Amazon. It crosses those wonderful canyons and natural porches called pongos, Quechua word that means doors.The del Utcubamba (Utcubambas valley), which is the real axis of the Amazonas department, is located between 5 and 6 of south latitude and 78 and 79 of west longitude. It is longitudinally developed up to the Maraon river, in which it flowed at 400 m.thumb|left|250px|Valle del Utcubamba, Amazonas, PeruThis zone is the principal center of production and human groups location. It is developed in four very pronounced sectors: * Vertiente del Maraon (Maraons spring), that has important quebradas (Seca, Bocana, Copalln Nuevo and Choloque).* Valle Medio (the middle valley) that has eleven quebradas in its both borders.* Valle Alto (the high valley) that has seven quebradas. The most important one is Magunchal.* Planicie de Bagua (the Baguas plain), wavy and picturesque, that is located at 550 m. In some places, it mounts up to 900 m., for example in the inhabited point called La Peca.The principal tributaries of the Utcubamba are the Chiriaco, the Nieva, the Santiago (that is born in Ecuador) and the Cenepa, that is born in the north zone of the del Cndor. The Cenepa River receives in its trip numerous tributaries like the Comaina. It flowed in the Maraon river, located near Orellana (province of Condorcanqui).Olmos-Maraon RouteRoute to Huallaga Central: The plain of Baguathumb|right|250px|Hot springs in the Rupa-Rupa RegionThe Utcubamba valley, that is born in the high jalcas of Chachapoyas and that runs from southeast to northwest to mix with the waters of the Maran river, forms the immense of Bagua. This plain has a warm climate, which temperature can reach a maximum of 40 C, being the minimum one 21 C.Like in the whole high jungle region of Peru head of mountain-, its water regimen is irregular and sometimes without rains.Some of the important places inside this route are:* Touristic corridor of the Utcubamba* lagoonThe AguarunasThe real origin of the Aguaruna people is still a mystery. In accordance with the racial characteristics of the majority, some anthropologists suppose that they came down the Andes centuries ago and adapted themselves to the geographical conditions of the region. Others believe that they are emigrants of America who came either by the coast or through rivers. They established themselves in a zone much wider than the one they occupy now. Apparently this zone also included the actual Jan. It is also said that they were influenced by cultural groups that were immigrants from the islands of Melanesia.They have always had the reputation of being brave warriors, standing out for their skills in war. Physically there are differences between the aguarunas and the other inhabitants of the Peruvian rainforest. Their average height is taller  especially between men  and their physical constitution denotes strength.The Aguarunas have a traditional, ideological and material culture, and they communicate with each other in their own language. For this reason, there is a book called the aguaruna del Amazonas (Aguarunas Vocabulary of the Amazon) written by Mildred L. Larson and published by International in 1966. The Aguarunas are located in the geographical area of the Maran river, that is to say on the banks of the Maran river and of its tributaries, the rivers Santiago, Nieva, Cenepa, Numpatakay and Chiriaco.The Aguarunas families, either monogamous or polygamous, occur in a dispersed form, grouped in extensive families or forming major magnitude towns.Examples of the last case constitute the towns of Yutupiza on the Santiago River and Japaime on the Nieva.In the cases in which there exists a pattern of nucleate population, these towns, called in their native language yakat, do not have streets, footpaths, or squares, are formed by houses of traditional construction. These houses are distributed in a kind of asymmetric form and the tendency is usually to be placed in a linear form along the river.Another typical aspect of the Aguarunas consists in the fact that they have traditionally worked as a seminomadic population, due to the poverty of the agricultural soil and the extremely elementary, traditional agrarian technology, which brings as a consequence the depletion of the soil in a short period of two or three years.Inside their major hunting activities, the natives hunt members of sajino, huangana, Tapir (sachavaca), Red Brocket, ocelot and otorongo (jaguar). In their minor hunting activities, they hunt majaz, ronsoco, achuni, auje, carachupa, otter, diverse classes of monkeys and other animals. They also hunt birds.thumb|250px|left|pijuayo fruitsTraditionally they used a spear made from pijuayo (palm tree of very hard wood) and the blowpipe for hunting. At present the spear has been almost completely displaced by the shotgun with pellets but they still use the blowpipe.From the animals taken in hunting, they use the meat, the leather, the skins, the feathers, the teeth and the bones. These animal products serve a double purpose: a nutritive purpose and a handmade, medicinal and/or a witchcraft purpose.They gather wild fruits of some palm trees, like the uvilla and some shrubs. Also they gather buds of trees, stems, bark, and resins. They extract the leche caspi and gather edible worms (suris) and coleopterous and the honey of wild bees. Finally, they gather medicinal plants and lianas. They use everything gathered to provide food, to make crafts, to make medicine, to use in witchcraft and to use as fuel, inside an ancestral pattern of self-sufficiency.For agricultural instruments, they use the traditional tacarpo (a stick with sharp top, made of wood from the palm tree called pijuayo); together with the axe, the machete and the shovel.The principal crafts of masculine activities are ropemaking, basketry, the construction of canoes, the making of textiles. The principal crafts of feminine activities are ceramics and the making of necklaces made of seeds, the small wings of insects and beads. The men make crowns of exquisite feathers as well as cotton ribbons in whose ends they places feathers and human hair. These adornments are kept in containers made of bamboo.Between the Aguarunas, there is the traditional institution of mutual help known in their language as ipmu, which works principally in the construction of young couples housing, in the cleanliness of the small farms and, with less frequency, in sowing the yuca and peanut.HistoryThe archaeological centers lost in the rain forest emerge as a testimony of presence of humans in the area since remote times. Most of the Pre-Hispanic cultures that became prosperous in the area are still a mystery due to the lack of research. The Kulaps Fortress is the most representative monument of this age. It is a huge construction of military architecture which shows the high level of civilization achieved by the people of this region. The culture developed during the Inca age and represented a strong opposition to the Incan conquest by repelling the first Inca attempts to incorporate the region to their empire.The regions capital, Chachapoyas, was founded in 1538 by Alonso de Alvarado. During the same year, its first church was built and later, the Santa Ana, San Lzaro and Seor de Burgos churches were built. In April 1821, the citys inhabitants expelled the Spaniards and ignored their authority, following the steps taken by the San Martn liberating army.The area of the Amazonas Region was strongly linked to the independence thoughts and actions. The cleric Rodrguez de Mendoza was its most outstanding representative, encouraging the patriots of this era and signing the National Act of Independence.The Cordillera del Condor, located in this region, was the scenery of the war between Peru and Ecuador in 1981.The ConquestThe natives of the region received in a jubilant and cordial way to the first Spanish who came into Amazonas. They knew about their arrival in Peru by the news that they had received from Cajamarca.In this city it had been said to Pizarro that Chachapoyas was an excellent agricultural region which settlers possessed a lot of gold and silver. The big conqueror did not lose time and formed immediately an expedition of 20 men, putting the distinguished captain de Alvarado in charge of it, with an express indication: founding a Christian city.The chroniclers say that, when the Spanish arrived to the region, the Chachapoyas people gave big parties in their honor and gave them many rich gifts willingly, also numerous examples of appreciation, including showing some interest to become Christians.Pizarro decided to send a second expedition, this time with instructions to take possession of the zone, delivering Alvarado a provision so he would be able to found the city of Juan de la Frontera de los Chachapoyas.But this time Pizarros envoy met the bellicose resistance of a curaca called Huamn, whom they had to defeat before coming to their destination, where they founded the mentioned city on September 5, 1538.Alvarado had chosen a place called Jalca, which apparently did not have the demanded conditions. This was the reason why the location of the flaming city was changed several times.According to the papers of the epoch, the last time that a change was made was in 1544, but it is unknown when the city was established in its current place.The same day of Chachapoyas foundation, the members of the first cabildo were elected, turning out to be designated the councillors de Alvarado, de Chvez, de Trujillo, de Guzmn, Valera (father of the chronicler Valera), Pedro Romero, de Anaya and de Fuentes.According to the Spanish custom, the layout of the city was made by means of rectilinear design streets.The Colonythumb|250px|right|St. Turibius de MongrovejoA few years after its foundation, the prosperity of the region began to demonstrate itself in magnificent constructions in the city of Chachapoyas, with big courts, wide lounges and architectural characteristics adapted to the zone.The colonial aspect of Chachapoyas stays almost intact until now, and it is one of the most attractive characteristics of this old city.A refined religious feeling was one of the characteristics that distinguished the settlers of this department during the colony. In the same year of the foundation of Chachapoyas, the first church was built. Its first priest was Gutirrez Palacios. Later the churches of Santa Ana, San Lzaro and Seor de Burgos were built.Three religious convents were also established: San Francisco, La Merced and that of the betlehemitas. The majority of the persons who settled in Chachapoyas from the time of its foundation were people with nobility, but poor. They were living in a modest and worthily way and they devoted themselves to agriculture and mining. Many settlers achieved a loose economic position, keeping, nevertheless, the austerity of the customs that was one of the highlight points of Chachapoyas social life.With time the settlers were spreading to other zones of the region, such as Luya, city that was established in 1569 by the governor Garca de Castro, ratified later in its administrative organization by the viceroy de Toledo.There it bloomed an agriculture of varied production and the upbringing of dairy, sheep and equine cattle.In one of his pastoral visits, Saint Toribio de Mogrovejo visited the principal populations of this department in this epoch.IndependenceIn an active and enthusiastic way, the inhabitants of Chachapoyas incorporated themselves to the cause of freedom. In April 1821, helping the action of San Martins liberating army, they ignored the Spanish authorities, exiling the subdelegate Baquedano and the bishop of Maynas Snchez, who were fighting openly against the independence.Between the patriots that were born in Amazonas, history remembers:* Aguilar* Manuel Rodrguez* Zagaceta* Villacorta* Reina* Fabin Rodrguez* HernndezFacing this act of rebellion, the military chief of Moyobamba, colonel Matos, organized an army of 600 men, who met the patriots on June 6, 1821 in Urco pampa.The organization and discipline of the Spanish could not do anything in front of the heroism of the patriots who without training, military knowledge or discipline, faced the realistas determined to give their lives in defense of the proclaimed freedom.A woman from Amazonas is represented in this battle by Rimachi that has gone on to posterity as the heroine of Higos Urco.Between the important men that Amazonas gave to Peru in this decisive epoch for nationality, figures Rodrguez de Mendoza, the professor, politician, philosopher and jurist who formed a generation of patriots.Rodrguez of Mendoza signed the record of national independence in Lima. He was the rector of the de San Carlos, member of the Sociedad Amantes del Pas (Lovers of the Country Society), founder and collaborator of the newspaper Peruano, deputy of the Spanish Parliament and congressman of the first Constituent Congress, in which the majority of its members were his disciples.The RepublicThe department of Amazonas was created by a law issued by the government of the marshal Gamarra, promulgated on November 21, 1832. The initiative belonged to two illustrious children of Chachapoyas: Modesto de la Vega and Braulio de Camporredondo. Camporredondo was in charge of the presidency of the republic, in absence of the marshall Gamarra.The same law contained a series of norms to promote the economic development of the new hindu network including exonerations of rights in its commerce with Ecuador or Brazil. In accordance with this law, the regions of Pataz, Chachapoyas and Maynas will stay inside the limits of the Amazonas Region.thumb|left|250px|President Don Manuel PradoSalaverry tried futilely to annul the creation of this department that, later, according to diverse demarcating dispositions was diminishing in its area. Most of its territory was dismembered in 1866, when the department of Loreto was created.The creation of its current provinces was realized in the following dates: * On February 12, 1821, Chachapoyas.* On February 5, 1861, Luya.* On December 26, 1870, Bongar.* On October 31, 1932, Rodrguez de Mendoza.* On September 1, 1941, Bagua.* On May 18, 1984, Condorcanqui.* On May 30, 1984, Utcubamba.The colonial splendour of Chachapoyas, almost a complete city, was disappearing during the Republic because it had been imposed in the country new means of transport that were turning it in a cloistered and outlying city from the rest of the country.Chachapoyas remained this way during more than one century in the Republic. Without highways of access, the route had to be done on horse, in long and painful caravans from the coast, or by the rivers from the region of the east. Such situation continue until 1960, date in which the highway arrived to Chachapoyas, although it had been already preceded by air transport.Later, during the last government of the doctor Manuel Prado, there was constructed and inaugurated the highway that joins Chachapoyas with the big route of penetration Olmos-Maraon. With this, Amazonas was put in direct communication with Lima and the rest of the Republic.Political divisionThe region is divided into 7 provinces (provincias, singular: provincia), which are composed of 83 districts (distritos, singular: distrito). Its capital is the Province of Chachapoyas.ProvincesThe provinces and their capitals are:The Amazonas AncestorsThe department of Amazonas possesses a great past that is still precariously evaluated and spread. On its borders, there are fabulous archaeological testimonies like Culap, the most extensive monument of the Peruvian ancestral past. Culap was the main city of the Chachapoyas in the times of their cultural climax.The ChachapoyasWhen the Spanish arrived in Peru in the 16th century, the Chachapoyas were one of the many nations that were part of the Empire. Their incorporation to the Inca Empire had not been easy, due to the sprouts of resistance that the chachapoyas offered repeatedly to the Incas troops.The chronicler Cieza de Len offers some picturesque notes about the chachapoyas:  Cieza adds that, after their annexation to the Inca Empire, they adopted the customs imposed by the people from the department of Cuzco.The meaning of the word chachapoyas is unknown. If it is a Quechua voice, perhaps it might come from sacha-p-collas, that could be the equivalent of colla people who live in the woods (sacha  wild p  of the colla  nation in which aimara is spoken).The Chachapoyas territory was very extensive. It included the triangular space that is shaped by the confluence of the Maran River and Utcubamba River in the zone of Bagua, up to the basin of the river. In this place are the chachapoyas ruins of Pajatn. This territory included even more to the south, up to the river. In this way it exceeded, in a southern direction, the limits of the current department of Amazonas. But the center of the Chachapoyas culture was the basin of the Utcubamba river.Not only the defined architectural style known as chachapoyas testify the above mentioned, but also the historical news. For this reason, Garcilazo de la Vega records that the chachapoyas territory was so extensive that,(The league was a measurement that covered about 5 kilometers.)The area of the Chachapoyas corresponds to a region that, being part of a mountain range because of its land, was characterized for being covered by dense tropical woods. Talking in general terms, it was named as Andes, in replacement of the old and vague word mountain region.As fast as the population was growing, the forests of the Amazonian Andes were felled in order to extend the agrarian border. This act caused that the tropical scenery was diminishing and instead, a place marked by its dryness was outcropping, due to the soil erosion that supervenes when these soils remain unprotected from its ancient green mantle. Nowadays, the Amazonian Andes resemble the barren scenery of the Andean moorlands.The Amazonian Andes are constituted by the oriental flank of the Andes, covered originally by a dense Amazon vegetation. It spread from the cordillera spurs until reaching surprising altitudes where the forests have not been felled, in certain cases exceeding the 3 500 m.Culturally focused, the Amazonian Andes only included between 2 and 3 thousand meters of altitude. This means that they are limited to the altitude occupied by the Chachapoyas. This is certified by the location of their numerous architectural remains.Times previous to the Inca EmpireThe Amazonas Region has a millennial history. There are some testimonies exhibited on rocky walls dated from the most remote times. Such is the case of the rock paintings of Chiua-Yamn and Limones-Calpn in the province of Utcubamba. A part of these haughty pictorial samples was made by people that had a hunting economy. These people perhaps left their trace 6 or 7 thousand years ago. At the times in which the formation of Peruvian civilization was consolidated, it appeared a type of ceramics mainly identified in Bagua.From the Chachapoyas culture, there are innumerable architectural remains, such as Culap, Congn (place that was re-baptized by the name of Vilaya), Oln, Purunllacta (place that was re-baptized by the name of Monte Peruvia), Pajatn, etc. All these expressions of architecture show a model that allows to identify them like if they are related to each other. What has not been established yet is the age of these architectural remains, neither which one would be the most ancient and which one the last in the cultural development of the chachapoyas.Main cultural testimoniesSome of the archaeological testimonies that talk about the cultural splendour reached by the Chachapoyas in pre-Inca times are fantastic. These principally refer to two forms of grave and one wall painting.These are some of the most important cultural testimonies that are found in the Amazonas Region:**of Caraja**mausoleums**of San Antonio**CuelapFolkloreThe folklore of Amazonas is not as varied as in other departments of Peru.The profusion of dances, songs and clothing is not seen in here, like in Puno or Cuzco. Its folklore is nourished from legends and stories in which mystery and inexplicable things are always present. Towns, lagoons, hills, religious images, always have an origin that violates in an invariable way the rules of logic or biology.For example, if you ask people about the of Cochaconga, they will say that it is enchanted. They say it has the form of a neck and that with the smallest noise provoked by an animal or the scream of a person, there will be a tremendous thunderstorm in which an enormous monster will appear in the shape of cow. This monster will become mad with the strangers. Thats why, whoever passes by this remote place, does it with maximum precautions for not altering the local silence.To give accommodation to travelers is an elementary norm of good behaviour with people. To deny it can provoke the most tremendous evil on the selfish person. An irrefutable evidence is the of Mono Muerto (Dead Monkeys marsh), in the district of Huambo (Rodrguez de Mendoza). A dramatic story that people tell, with more or less details, but with the same respect.A very rich man was living in his house. The marsh was a part of his estate, in which he was happy and lacking of nothing, until the day a traveler asked him for home and he denied it to him. A witch doctor of the surroundings, who found out about the attitude of the wealthy neighbor, entrusted that all the curses fell on him. All his goods disappeared and his grounds became a stinking marsh.Mysterious power are also assumed to the four lagoons of Puquio, in which there are monsters that influence the crops, as well as to the of Santa Barbara, which disappears before the view of the walkers and it is destined to initiate the end of the world with the overflow of its waters.Next to the city of Chachapoyas there is a hill called Piscohuauna, in the way towards the forest. This name means where birds die, because the mountain kills all the birds that approach it.People attribute pernicious influences to certain animals like the mochuelo that freezes the soul, or  quien-quien, that makes fun of the travelers in the roads; or the cricket, which singing in certain circumstances, like when it has sound of bells, presages big evil.People have big respect to the antique remains. They firmly believe that there will be terrifying punishments for those who violate the graves of the agelos (mummies).Most of the population of the department of Amazonas is indigenous and mestizo, being notable the people quantity, in some cases entire communities, in which the Spanish type predominates. Since the time of the Incas, there are legends about the existence of white people in these places. There are also versions gathered by chroniclers in which they assure that women were chosen here for the Inca, precisely because they were white.DancesSome of the dances most representative of the Department of Amazonas are:* The Chumaichada* (dance)* The Danzantes de Levanto (Levantos Dancers)* en Amazonas (Carnival in Amazonas)Religious festivitiesReligiousness is an outstanding note in the most of these towns and they demonstrate it through the enthusiasm and withdrawal that they put into these celebrations. But, faithful to their tradition, their religious beliefs are mixed with fantastic apparitions and there is almost always a cave in them.There are three Virgins who are famous:*de Beln (Virgin of Bethlehem) in Chachapoyas.*de Sonche (Virgin of Sonche)*de Levanto (Virgin of Levanto)Well, there is no one who does not believe the story that said that the three Virgins were found in a cave to which a young shepherd was mysteriously attracted. And when the Virgin of Levanto goes to Chachapoyas her sisters go to the outer parts of the town for receiving her.The venerated image of Santa Luca (Lucy) was also found by a girl in a cave. de Bagazn (Christ of Bagazn), who is venerated in Rioja, was also found by a stockbreeder who was looking for a lost ox. Near Almirante, he heard a voice that was calling him by his name from the interior of a cave, in which he found a Christ image that told him: take me.In days of long drought, de la Contradiccin (the Christ of Contradiction) disappears from the chapel of the cemetery of Chachapoyas and he is discovered when it begins to rain, beginning then big celebrations up to the time of taking him to his place again.Corpus Christi, Week, the Assumption, Dia de los Difuntos (Day of the death), and Christmas  are classic dates in the calendar of this department. In Christmas Days there are groups of little shepherds that walk around the streets singing and dancing in front of the cribs. With the same splendour, the patronal feasts are celebrated in all the towns.One of the most well-known and traditional celebrations is known as:*pastorcillos de Navidad (Christmass little shepherds)Typical dishesSome of the most well-known and delicious typical dishes of this region are the following:*Tamalitos*Cazuela*arrollada (rolled beef)*Purtumute*de choclo (sweet tamale made of corn)*Chipasmute*rellenos (stuffed bananas)Economyleft|250|thumb|right|250px|Rice is the most important cultivation in this region.This department includes inter-Andean and forest regions. It has a strong forestal and hydro energetics potential. The province of Bagua, because of geographical factors, has an incipient development based on cultivations like rice, coffee, bean, trees and livestock.The department of Amazonas presents three well-defined geographical fields: * The district of El Cenepa (province of Condorcanqui) that has a climate of humid tropical forest* The province of Bagua, which has a climate of dry tropical forest; and* The other provinces with a typical formation of very humid low mountainous forest, humid subtropical forest and dry low mountainous forest.The provinces of Bongar, Luya and Chachapoyas present a very hilly geographical configuration, that gives them range characteristics.Amazonas has an eminently agrarian economy. In its extensive territory, it concentrates valuable resources: agricultural, mining and energy.The department has excellent and favorable conditions in both: climate and pastures availability for the agricultural-livestock development.The information about structure of the agricultural surface, size of the agricultural units, main cultivations and cattle population is taken from what was recorded in the III National Agricultural Census 1994 (III CENAGRO), made by the Nacional de Estadstica e Informtica (INEI) (National Institute of Statistics and Informatics).The department of Amazonas has 48,173 agricultural units (UA) with 9,811.75 km2. 99.9% of the UA have lands and 0.1% do not have them. This 0.1% are exclusively dedicated to the breeding of animals.Structure of the agricultural area* It only considers the area of the agricultural units that have worked lands.From the total of agricultural lands (9750.34 km2), only 16,4% includes the agricultural area and 83,6% includes the non-agricultural area.Size of the agricultural units and principal cultivations* It only considers the area of the agricultural units that have worked lands.Agricultural units with 0.5 km2 and more only represent 4.4% of the whole department, but concentrate 61.8% of the agricultural surface.Rice is the main transitory cultivation of the department. It brings together 18.5% of the agricultural surface with transitory cultivations (129.42 km2). Dry yellow maize with 125.08 km2 (17.9%) is the second important one.Coffee concentrates 66.4% of the agricultural area with permanent cultivations (198.19 km2), followed by cacao (cocoa bean) with 31.21 km2 (10,5%).Livestock population by speciesCattle is the most important one in the department. It is raised in 21,857 AU (Agricultural units) with a population of 139,267 head of cattle. Pigs are the second one with 34,421 head, distributed in 14,573 AU.Climate, rates and distance informationCultureInstitutions that are linked with the Amazon RegionThere are several institutions that are linked with the Amazon region in Peru and that help with the development of it. Between the principal institutions, we have:* Intertnica de Desarrollo de la Selva (AIDESEP) - Interethnic Association for the Rainforest Development* Amaznico de Antropologa y Aplicacin Prctica (CAAAP) - Amazon Center of Anthropology and Practical Application* Instituto Lingstico de Verano - Linguistic Summer InstituteImportant figuresThe department of Amazonas has been the cradle of important figures, whose life and works have reverberated in the National history of Peru. Some of these famous people are:* Valera* Rodrguez de Mendoza* Antonio Mesones Muro* Jos del Carmen Marn Places of interest * de Coln Reserved Zone* muja - Cordillera del Condor National Park* Reserved ZoneSee also* tourist information and assistance* before the Inca Empire* of the ChachapoyasExternal links*Amazonas region official website*Peru Info: Amazonas Region*Chachapoyas mapbe-x-old:(, )de lAmazones(region i Peru)(Region)piirkondde Amazonas (Per)(Prou)PerAmazonasdi Amazonas()(regio Peruviana)departamentas (Peru)Amazonas(Peru)()(Peru)i Perupnb:Amazonas(Peru)suyu()Regionalue(region)th:(rehiyon)zh:
716290
Roy_Welensky
Sir Raphael Roy Welensky, KCMG (20 January 1907  5 December 1991) was a Rhodesian politician and the second and last minister of the of Rhodesia and Nyasaland. Born in Salisbury, Rhodesia (now Harare, Zimbabwe) to parents of Jewish and Afrikaner ancestry, he moved to Northern Rhodesia, became involved with the trade unions, and entered the colonial legislative council in 1938. There, he campaigned for the amalgamation of Northern and Southern Rhodesia (the latter under white self-government, the former under the colonial office). Although unsuccessful, he succeeded in the formation of the Federation of Rhodesia and Nyasaland, a state within the Empire that sought to retain predominant power for the white minority while moving in a progressive political direction, in contrast to apartheid South Africa.Becoming Prime Minister of the Federation in 1957, Welensky opposed British moves towards native African rule, and used force to suppress politically motivated violence in the territories. After the advent of African rule in two of the Federations three territories (Northern Rhodesia and Nyasaland, now Zambia and Malawi respectively), it collapsed in 1963. Welensky retired to Salisbury, where he re-entered politics and attempted to stop Rhodesia (formerly Southern Rhodesia) from unilaterally declaring itself independent. With the end of white rule in 1979, and the independence of Rhodesia as Zimbabwe under Mugabe in 1980, Welensky moved to England, where he died in 1991.A fervent admirer of Britain and the Empire, Welensky described himself as half Jewish, half Afrikaner and 100% British.(Lowry, Donal (May 2003). The crown, empire loyalism and the assimilation of non-British white subjects in the British world: An argument against ethnic determinism. Journal of Imperial and Commonwealth History 312.)YouthWelensky was born in Salisbury, Southern Rhodesia. His father was of Lithuanian Jewish origin, hailing from a village near Wilno in then Russian-ruled Lithuania, who settled in Southern Rhodesia after first emigrating to the United States and then South Africa, while his mother was a ninth-generation Afrikaner who was of Dutch ethnicity.(Roy Welensky, Sir. Encyclopedia of World Biography, 2nd ed. 17 Vols. Gale Research, 1998.) Welenskys mother died when he was 11, being treated by Godfrey Huggins, a doctor who was later to become the Prime Minister of Southern Rhodesia.(Connell, John in Welensky (1964), p. 1314)Although not of British ancestry, Welensky was intensely pro-British, a distinctive sentiment among Rhodesians. John Connell, in his foreword to Welenskys book 4000 Days, states, Welensky, who had not a drop of British blood in his veins, shared this pride and loyalty Britain to the full.(Connell, John in Welensky (1964), p. 15)After leaving school at the age of 14, Welensky found employment with Railways as a fireman, while putting his physical strength to work as a boxer. He rose through the ranks of Rhodesia Railways to become a engineer(Nyarota, Geoff. Serious politics, educated elite and related matters, Zimbabwe Situation. Accessed 2007-03-07) and became involved in the union movement, becoming leader of the powerful European Railway Workers Union.(While working on the railways, he became the professional heavyweight boxing champion of Rhodesia at 19 and held the position until he was 21. During this time, Welensky met his first wife, Elizabeth Henderson, who was working at a cafe in Bulawayo, Southern Rhodesia at the time. They married after a two-year courtship.(Royboy (1962-04-27), TIME. Accessed 2007-05-21)Colonial politicsWelensky settled in Broken Hill, Northern Rhodesia and was elected to the Northern Rhodesian Legislative Council in 1938. The Governor prevented Welensky from enlisting in the armed forces in War II and appointed him Director of Manpower. In 1941 he formed his own party, the Rhodesian Labour Party, with the aim of amalgamating the colony with Southern Rhodesia under a new constitution.(Welensky (1964), p. 15) The party won all five seats it contested in its first election. After the leader of the unofficial members in the Legislative Council, Gore-Browne, resigned in 1945 and stated that Africans had lost confidence in the white settlers (due to the wish for amalgamation), Welensky was elected leader.(Welensky (1964), p. 1617)Amalgamation and federationFrom the beginning, Welensky was involved in the creation of the of Rhodesia and Nyasaland. He had earlier wanted an amalgamation of Northern and Southern Rhodesia with a constitution similar to that of Southern Rhodesia (that had granted responsible government to the settlers). After the British Government rejected this idea, he set about the creation of a federation, and against his judgement, the small colony of Nyasaland was included. His main wish for amalgamation, and later federation, was primarily so the complimentary economic strengths of the Rhodesias could be put to best use. He felt that the colonies were missing out on the post-war economic boom.(Welensky (1964), p. 21)Image:Victoriaflle.jpg|240px|left|thumb|The Falls. Talks between the territorial governments to explore the idea of federation were held at the nearby Victoria Falls Hotel.To this end, Welensky organised a conference in February 1949 to investigate the idea of a federation. Held at the Falls Hotel (a common venue for Rhodesian political conferences), representatives from the Northern and Southern Rhodesian Governments were present, but native Africans and the British Government were not. It was agreed that continued pushes for amalgamation would fail, with both the British and native Africans opposed. Welensky suggested that the of Australia be used as a basis for the proposed federal constitution, and pushed the idea of partnership between blacks and whites.(Welensky (1964), p. 29) However, he insisted that for as long as I can see, in that partnership whites will be senior partners.(Blake (1977), p. 248)Apart from organising the federation, Welensky won a significant political battle in Northern Rhodesia against the South Africa Company (BSAC), which controlled mineral rights and the associated royalties throughout the territory. The company, and not the British crown, had signed the treaties with African kings that surrendered mining rights, but the BSAC had stopped administering Northern Rhodesia in 1924. Welensky argued that the territory had a right to the royalties, and petitioned the governor to take action. After many talks, the BSAC relented and agreed to surrender mineral rights in 1986, and to pay 20% of its profits from these rights to the government until then.(Welensky (1964), p. 3233)In March 1952, the colonial and the British governments met in London to discuss federation. There, the idea for a federation was finalised and settled, although the colonial governments had, again, insisted on amalgamation. They were rebuffed by the left-leaning public servant (later Sir) Andrew Cohen, who, after much deliberation, brought the parties to an agreement. It was acknowledged by those at the meeting that all too often the racial policies of the Rhodesias were confused with the emerging apartheid of Africa, and Welensky himself claimed to refute these ideas when being interviewed by a South African newspaper. He was paternalistic towards native Africans, but believed in the dictum of equal rights for all civilised men and gradual advancement.(Welensky (1964), p. 38)Behind the scenes, Welensky and the Rhodesians had been courting the Conservatives, while the native Africans had been doing the same with Labour. A British general election was held in 1951 and the Conservatives gained power.(Blake (1977), p. 259) Labour, mindful of the overwhelming opposition of Africans from both Northern Rhodesia and Nyasaland and of the Colonial Office mandate to oversee native interests, had been lukewarm at best to the idea of federation, and had been wholly opposed to amalgamation. After the election, the bipartisan approach to federation broke down and the British laws for its creation passed only with the support of the Conservatives, with both Liberal and Labour Parties now opposed.(Blake (1977), p. 261)Federation establishedWelensky stood for the federal legislature in 1953 for the Federal Party (UFP), created by himself and Southern Rhodesian Prime Minister Sir Godfrey Huggins. The party was successful in its first election, with twice the votes of the opposition Confederate Party. Welensky himself gained more than 80% of the vote in the federal constituency of Broken Hill and was immediately promoted to Minister for Transport.(Blake (1977), p. 285286)Image:Flag of the Federation of Rhodesia and Nyasaland.svg|280px|thumb|right|The of the Federation of Rhodesia and Nyasaland. On the shield, the rising sun represents Nyasaland, the lion Southern Rhodesia, and the black and white wavy lines Northern Rhodesia.The first few years of the federation were characterised by a relatively peaceful political atmosphere and a booming economy. The governments coffers were kept full through revenue from Northern Rhodesias copper mines, and overseas investment saw the rapid expansion of the cities of Salisbury, Bulawayo and Lusaka. High-standard tar roads replaced dirt tracks and the railway system was expanded.(Blake (1977), p. 289) Welensky credited the high rate of development to the astute management of the federal Minister of Finance, Macintyre.(Welensky (1964), p. 67)The Southern Rhodesian Government, under the leadership of Todd, began removing restrictions imposed on native Africans. The civil service opened more positions to Africans, the title for male Africans was changed from AM (African male) to Mr., and diners and restaurants were allowed to be multiracial; Welensky, as Transport Minister, allowed for railway dining cars to be multiracial. However, when it came to liberalising alcohol restrictions on Africans, Welensky argued against doing so, stating that such an action would cause the UFP to lose the next election.(Blake (1977), p. 290)After repeated failed attempts to secure Dominion status for the federation, Prime Minister Huggins opted not to stand again for his partys leadership at their September 1956 conference. In October he resigned and Welensky, the second most senior figure in the federal arena, was chosen to replace him. Welensky took office on 1 November.(Blake (1977), p. 294295)Prime ministerOn taking office, Welensky was forced to take sides in the Crisis. The government of the United Kingdom received heavy international criticism for its actions, but Welenskys government, with those of Australia and New Zealand, nonetheless stood behind Britain. It was Welenskys first experience in politics.(Welensky (1964), p. 6768) In the aftermouth of the Suez debacle British colonial policy changed significantly, which would have adverse effects for the federation. It marked the decline of a gradual approach to decolonisation, and a rapid speeding up of the process. Politically, only three years after its founding, the federation began to decline.(Blake (1977), p. 321322)International attitudes to the federation were critical, particularly from the Afro-Asian bloc in the United Nations. At a time when most colonial powers were rushing their colonies towards independence, the federation seemed to its opponents to be an unwelcome obstacle. In Britain, Labour grew more critical, and African nationalists in the federation itself became more vocal, unsatisfied with the liberalisation that was taking place, and demanding faster moves towards African advancement. The Governor of Northern Rhodesia, Sir Arthur Benson, wrote a secret letter to his superiors in Britain, highly critical of Welensky and the federation; this letter remained undiscovered until 1958, when Huggins revealed it to Welensky.(Welensky (1964), p. 6970)Nyasaland unrestThe Colonial Secretary Alan Lennox-Boyd visited the federation in January 1957, while Welensky prepared to outline the difficulties regarding African advancement. Seeking to bring Africans into the established political processes, and hoping they would shun the recently formed National Congress (ANC) parties, Welensky hit out at what he saw as the poor Colonial Office practice of making the situation consist of two opposed policies, black rule and white rule. They naturally prefer to aim for black rule and hope they will experience this, which they regard as the apotheosis of Colonial Office policy.(Welensky (1964), p. 73)The Nyasaland African Congress (NAC) was particularly vocal about increased African representation in the Nyasaland Legislative Council, demanding in September 1957 an African majority in the council. Nyasalands inclusion in the federation was never a goal of its proponents, it was there primarily because it was not economically viable by itself. Welensky did not understand or appreciate the partys goal of increased African representation or secession when it relied on the federation for its well being.(Welensky (1964), p. 9697) In this, he failed to take account of the reputation of Rhodesia among Nyasaland Africans as a racist state with a history of appropriating African landa highly sensitive issue.Image:Federation rhodesia nyasaland.png|280px|left|thumb|Map of the Federation. Rhodesia became Rhodesia and then Zimbabwe; Rhodesia became Zambia; and Nyasaland became Malawi. Bechuanaland is now Botswana; and Tanganyika is now part of Tanzania.Dr Banda, the leader of the Nyasaland nationalist cause, returned to the territory in 1958 and began organising opposition to the federation. Having lived outside the territory for more than 25 years and unable to speak his native African language, he required the assistance of interpreters to communicate with the population, whom he stirred into a frenzy with his speeches. After the Governor and the federal government refused to give Africans a majority in the Legislative Council, he embarked on a speaking tour of the territory. In January 1959, he stated in a speech that he put Salisbury capital on fire ... I got Salisbury rocking, rocking, and got it awake out of its political sleep ...,(Welensky (1964), p. 114) after which his followers stoned passing cars and police officers.(The federal government met with the territorial governments to plan for a response should the violence get out of hand. Welensky did not rule out deploying federal troops if the situation deteriorated.(Welensky (1964), p. 100) Speaking to the defence chiefs in Salisbury, he said that during the next three months we can expect some fairly serious trouble in Nyasaland ... It is my concern to ensure that this government is in a position to exercise its responsibilities if trouble comes.(Welensky (1964), p. 115)A NAC meeting was held outside Blantyre on 25 January. It was alleged that the meeting discussed in detail a plan for the overthrow of the territorial government and the massacre of the territorys whites and any blacks who collaborated with them.(Welensky (1964), p. 11819) (although a subsequent Royal Commission found there was insufficient evidence to make such a claim). Welensky obtained the meetings proceedings in early February and decided to act, calling a meeting of the federal and territorial governments. Federal troops were deployed to Nyasaland on 21 February, the Governor proclaimed a state of emergency on 3 March and the nationalist leaders were arrested and flown to jails in Southern Rhodesia. In the subsequent fortnight, riots broke out and troops used force to end the violence. Almost 50 people died in the unrest.(Blake (1977), p. 324325)The main militant African nationalist parties in each territory were banned by the federal and territorial governments, but all reorganised under new names only months later. The Southern Rhodesian ANC became the National Democratic Party (later ZAPU),(Blake (1977), p. 341) the Northern Rhodesian ANC became the African National Congress,(Blake (1977) p. 324) and the Nyasaland ANC became the Congress Party.(Wood (2004), p. 17)(Wood (2004), p. 24)The medias use of the term state to describe the response to the violence outraged the Liberals, the of Scotland, and leftist Conservatives, and particularly the Labour Party, in Britain. Stonehouse, a Labour MP, had been deported prior to the declaration of the state of emergency, adding to the tension. A Commission was announced to investigate the violence. Welensky was indignant when asked to contribute to the Royal Commission, and the Labour Party boycotted it.(Blake (1977), p. 326)Commissions and MacmillanIn addition to the Royal Commission that investigated the Nyasaland violence (now known as the Devlin Report), the British Government organised a second one, known as the Monckton Report, to advise on the future of the federation. Released in October 1960, the report advocated sweeping changes to be made to the federal structure, including African majorities in the Nyasaland and Northern Rhodesian legislatures. Welensky was outraged when the report was published, calling it the death knell of federation and rejecting it out of hand.(Collapsing Bastion (1960-10-24), TIME. Accessed 2007-05-21) African nationalist opinion was just as opposed, but on different grounds. All of the nationalists wanted an end to federation, and the independence of the territories as black-majority-ruled states. Welensky was opposed to any talk of secession, and the Monckton Report suggested it in writing when it stated that the territories should have the option after five years under a new federal constitution.(Blake (1977), p. 331)Early 1960 saw British Prime Minister Macmillan journey to the federation for the first and last time. There he held talks in person with Welensky and the territorial governments, and took the opportunity to gauge African opinion towards the federation. He also wished to talk to the jailed African leaders, but was met with a rebuff from Welensky. Dr Banda discussed the probability of his release from prison with the British Government through Labour MP Foot. Welensky had Bandas cell wired for sound and was frustrated with what he saw as the British governments betrayal, duplicity, appeasement, cowardice and loss of nerve(Blake (1977), p. 32728) when dealing with the African nationalists and the federation.Macmillan travelled on to Africa, where he made his Wind of Change speech to the South African Parliament, raising the attention of South African Prime Minister, Dr Hendrik Verwoerd. Welensky was informed that Banda would be released so he could join in discussions with the British Government over the future of the federation.(Welensky (1964), p. 17980) Losing patience with the British, Welensky took a harder line against them: Ive tried all along to behave in a reasonable and responsible manner. Now Im seriously wondering whether restraint has been the right policy.(Welensky (1964), p. 181)New constitutionsAfter Banda was released from prison against the wishes of Welensky, he travelled to the United Kingdom, where he took part in the Nyasaland constitutional talks. The outcome was a constitution which, through a voting system that was as complex as that of the federation itself, amounted to black majority rule for the territory. Bitter and angry at what he saw as British ignorance to the situation, Welensky did not comprehend how the British were willing to deal with Banda. In Welenskys words, since his release from prison, Banda was careful to appeal for calm and to condemn violence,(Welensky (1964), p. 19091) but Welensky was averse to Bandas demands for black majority rule and believed that granting it to the territory would mean the end of the federation.(Welensky (1964), p. 291292)In Northern and Southern Rhodesia new constitutions were also enacted. The Southern Rhodesian constitution was very cautious and prolonged white rule. It had 50 A-roll seats with high voting qualifications (essentially for whites), and 15 B-roll seats with lower qualifications (for blacks). A system of cross voting meant that results in A-roll seats would be affected by the B-roll vote, and vice versa. All constitutions were signed by the UFP and the African nationalist party in each territory. However, there were immediate repercussions; Smith, chief whip for the UFP in the federal assembly, resigned in protest at the new Southern Rhodesian constitution, calling it racialist, whilst the African nationalist party, the National Democratic Party, withdrew support for the constitution having earlier signed it.(Blake (1977), p. 335)Eventually, Welensky was comfortable with an African majority in Nyasaland and for the province to secede, seeking to preserve only a union of the two Rhodesias. But, as a Northern Rhodesian, he did not accept black majority rule for the territory and a battle was had with the British Government over its new constitution throughout 196162. Discussing Northern Rhodesia under African rule with Smith: I am not prepared to hand power to the blacks. Personally I could not live in a country where they were in control.(Smith (2001), p. 42)Welensky considered a federal declaration of independence when the new Northern Rhodesian constitution appeared likely to grant an African majority in its parliament.( Determined at one point to prevent changes, Welensky was convinced that if he refused, the British would use military force to remove his government. Believing that preparations were being made for an invasion from Kenya, he discussed the federations ability to repel an attack with his defence chiefs and plans were set in motion.(Welensky (1964), p. 297) In the end, the idea of a British invasion was one of many options considered, and did not make it past cabinet discussion.Congo, Katanga and TshombeAfter the Congo gained independence in 1960, it collapsed into a state of anarchy within a fortnight. The large Belgian population of the Congo fled from the violence into neighbouring states, including the federation. Welensky dispatched the Rhodesian Air Force (RRAF) to assist in their evacuation, but was prevented by the British government from entering the Congo itself. Refugees fled by foot to Ndola in Northern Rhodesia, where RRAF planes picked them up and flew them to camps in Salisbury. More than 6,000 people were evacuated by the RRAF.(Welensky (1964), p. 20910)The president of Congos Province, Tshombe, requested British and Rhodesian forces to enter the country to restore order. Welensky was sympathetic to the situation but unable to act; the British government, which had ultimate jurisdiction over the federation, disallowed him from mobilising the armed forces. Tshombe declared Katanga unilaterally independent on 11 July, one day after requesting British and Rhodesian assistance.(Welensky (1964), p. 211)Full of hatred for the United Nations and mindful of the inability of the new Congolese government to maintain order in the Congo, Welensky repeatedly pleaded with Macmillan for the recognition of the Katanga state and the deployment of Rhodesian forces. Macmillan rebuffed Welensky each time, telling him that their hope was pinned on the UN restoring order and hoping for a wholly neutral or anti-communist Congo.(Blake (1977), p. 330.)The United Nations Secretary General, Hammarskjld, hoping to negotiate a solution to Katangas secession, agreed to meet Tshombe at Ndola. His plane crashed on landing, and Welensky was subsequently blamed for the accident throughout the communist and Afro-Asian world, becoming a hated figure and a lingering symbol of colonialism. The attitude of Welensky towards Katanga and the Congo would strain relations between the federation and the British until its dissolution.(Territorial and federal electionsWith new constitutions in place for the territories, elections were held throughout 196162, with Welenskys UFP being beaten in each one. In Nyasaland, the African nationalist Congress Party won a huge majority and Banda set about lobbying the British Government for the breakup of the federation and the independence of Nyasaland as Malawi. In Northern Rhodesia, neither the UFP nor the two African nationalist parties held a majority, but the African nationalists united to push for independence.(Blake (1977), p. 337)Welensky hoped to get a display of confidence in federation, so he dissolved parliament in mid-1962 and held elections. While his party won a huge victory, it did so because it was completely unopposed. Neither the recently formed Front (RF) nor the African nationalist parties bothered to contest it.(Blake (1977), p. 345)In Southern Rhodesia, the UFP lost the hold that it and its successor parties had for decades in the October election. Ian Smith, a former federal member of the UFP, had united with Field of the Party to form the Rhodesian Front, a conservative party that was opposed to a fast rate of African political advancement and the 1961 constitution, and in support of Southern Rhodesian independence. The RF won 55% of the vote and 35 A-roll seats, while the UFP won 44% of the vote, 15 A-roll seats and 14 B-roll seats.(Smith (2001), p. 47) Welensky now had parties in power in all three territorial legislatures that were opposed to the federation and advocating independence for their respective territories.DissolutionWith Nyasaland and Northern Rhodesia now promised independence by Britain under man, one vote constitutions, the federation was essentially dead. Southern Rhodesia, still governed by its white minority, was subject to attacks in the United Nations general assembly which regarded its constitution as unsatisfactory. It demanded one man, one vote elections, stating that this was the only realistic answer to the powerful and irresistible urge of the indigenous people for freedom and equality.(Welensky (1964), p. 341) Accepting the end of the federation, Welensky set about ensuring that the assets of the federal government were transferred to Southern Rhodesia, making this a condition of him attending dissolution talks at Victoria Falls.(Blake (1977), p. 351) Welensky refused to dine with the British delegates, on the grounds of not choking on his food, but ensured that the talks went smoothly.( The federation was legally dissolved on 31 December 1963.Rhodesian UDI and retirementWith the collapse of the federation, Welensky moved to Salisbury, Rhodesia (renamed from Southern Rhodesia after Northern Rhodesia gained independence as Zambia). After a short break, he was invited to lead the UFP in Rhodesia, which had recently renamed itself the Rhodesia Party. With the Rhodesian Front pushing for independence for the territory and a new constitution, the Rhodesia Party advocated the same, but with a focus on stemming white emigration and rebuilding the economy (all three territories had slipped into recession with the end of the federation).(Wood (2004), p. 226) With the resignation of the RF member for the Salisbury constituency of Arundel, Welensky was given a chance to re-enter the political arena. Dupont, Deputy Prime Minister, resigned his constituency in Charter to oppose Welensky.Welensky knew that if the RF won the byelections it would seem to be a mandate for unilateral independence (UDI); the campaign, for only two seats, was intense. At public meetings, Welensky was heckled by opponents to ironic cries of Communist, traitor, and coward.(Blake (1977), p. 366) Sharing a television platform with Smith on 3 September, Welensky talked of the economic and political dangers of a UDI, but nonetheless wished Smith luck when he departed for independence talks in London.(Wood (2004), p. 230) Welensky had much more antipathy for the British Government than his RF opponents, and was disgusted at their treatment of the Rhodesians during constitutional talks:On 1 October Welensky was soundly defeated by his RF opponent, with 633 votes to Duponts 1079.(Wood (2004), p. 239) In December he resigned the leadership of his party. When the RF declared unilateral independence on 11 November 1965,(Blake (1977), p. 381) Welensky was upset at the constitutional break with Britain.(Blake (1977), p. 388) He believed that Rhodesia was entitled to her independence, and disagreed with the British governments demand for no independence before majority rule, but was opposed to illegal action.((Wood (2004), p. 249)Welensky continued living in Rhodesia until Mugabe gained power and the country became Zimbabwe. While in London in 1971, and by then a widower, Welensky met his second wife, Valerie Scott, an organiser for the London and Westminster Conservative Association, who was thirty years younger.(Rhodes, Michael. Lady Welensky, 64, widow of Sir Roy Welensky (1907-91) (2005-05-26), myreader. Accessed 2007-05-21.) They left in 1981 for Forum, Dorset, England, where he died on 5 December 1991.(Sir Roy Welensky, Times, 6 December 1991.)NotesReferences****WelenskyWelenskyja:WelenskyWelenskyzh:
718833
Chute_(gravity)
File:Chutes-Coulonge 1024x584.JPG|thumb|right|250px|Natural chute (falls) on the left and man-made logging chute on the right on the River in Quebec, Canada.A chute is a vertical or plane, channel, or passage through which objects are moved by means of gravity.LandformA chute, also known as a race, flume, or river canyon, is a steep-sided passage through which water flows rapidly.Akin to these, man-made chutes, such as the slide and flume, were used in the logging industry to facilitate the downstream transportation of timber along rivers. These are no longer in common use. Man-made chutes may also be a feature of spillways on some dams.  Some types of water supply and irrigation systems are gravity fed, hence chutes.  These include aqueducts and acequias.Building chuteChutes are in common use in tall buildings to allow the rapid transport of items from the upper floors to a central location on one of the lower floors or basement. Chutes may be round, square or rectangular at the top and/or the bottom.* Laundry chutes in hotels are placed on each floor to allow the expedient transfer and collection of dirty laundry to the hotels laundry facility without having to use elevators or stairs. In culture stories, laundry chutes are commonly used as means for the protagonist to quickly escape, the laundry at the chutes base often serving to cushion the heros fall.: Home laundry chutes are placed on each floor of multistory homes allow the collection of all household members dirty laundry to one location, conveniently next to the laundry facilities, without the constant transport of laundry bins from story-to-story or room-to-room or up and down stairs. Home laundry chutes may be less common than previously due to building codes or concern regarding fireblocking, the prevention of fire from spreading from floor-to-floor,(Dru Sefton, Sunday, January 23, 2005. .) as well as child safety.(Laundry Chutes - a Convenient Way to a  Disaster, Check This House, Inc..)(January 21, 2009. Laundry Chutes: Pros & Cons, One Project Closer.) However, construction including cabinets, doors, lids, and locks may make both risks significantly less than with simple stairwells.* Garbage chutes are common in high-rise buildings and are used to collect all the buildings garbage in the one place. Often the bottom end of the chute is placed directly above a large receptacle. This makes garbage collection more efficient and hygienic.* chutes are used in some buildings to collect the occupants mail.  A notable example is the Insurance Building.* Escape chutes are used and proposed for use in evacuation of mining equipment and high-rise buildings.()()* Construction chutes are used to remove rubble and similar demolition materials safely from taller buildings.  These temporary structures typically consist of a chain of cylindrical or conical plastic tubes, each fitted into the top of the one below and tied together, usually with chains.  Together they form a long flexible tube, which is hung down the side of the building.  The lower end of this tube is placed over a skip or other receptacle, and waste materials are dropped into the top.An elevator is not a chute since it does not operate by means of gravity.File:Musoroprovod in the stairwell on the eighth floor of multistory homes.jpg |Garbage chuteFile:U.S. Mail Chute.jpg |Mail chuteFile:Schtte fcm.jpg |Construction chute Chutes in transportation Goust, a hamlet in southwestern France, is notable for its mountainside chute that is used to transport coffins.Chutes are also found in:* cars* bargesReferencesca:Tremujada:Skakt(Maschinenbau)es:Tolva(technika)pt:Tremonha
723408
Acid_mine_drainage
thumb|right|Yellow boy in a stream receiving acid drainage from surface coal mining.Acid mine drainage (AMD), or acid rock drainage (ARD), refers to the outflow of acidic water from (usually abandoned) metal mines or mines. However, other areas where the earth has been disturbed (e.g. construction sites, subdivisions, transportation corridors, etc.) may also contribute acid rock drainage to the environment. In many localities the liquid that drains from coal stocks, coal handling facilities, coal washeries, and even coal waste tips can be highly acidic, and in such cases it is treated as acid rock drainage. Acid rock drainage occurs naturally within some environments as part of the rock weathering process but is exacerbated by large-scale earth disturbances characteristic of mining and other large construction activities, usually within rocks containing an abundance of minerals.Occurrencemining often progresses below the table, so water must be constantly pumped out of the mine in order to prevent flooding. When a mine is abandoned, the pumping ceases, and water floods the mine. This introduction of water is the initial step in most acid rock drainage situations. Tailings piles or ponds may also be a source of acid rock drainage.After being exposed to air and water, oxidation of metal sulfides (often pyrite, which is iron-sulfide) within the surrounding rock and overburden generates acidity.  Colonies of bacteria and archaea greatly accelerate the decomposition of metal ions, although the reactions also occur in an abiotic environment. These microbes, called extremophiles for their ability to survive in harsh conditions, occur naturally in the rock, but limited water and oxygen supplies usually keep their numbers low. Special extremophiles known as acidophiles especially favor the low pH levels of abandoned mines. In particular, Acidithiobacillus ferrooxidans is a key contributor to pyrite oxidation.()Metal mines may generate highly acidic discharges where the ore is a sulfide mineral or is associated with pyrite. In these cases the predominant metal ion may not be iron but rather zinc, copper, or nickel. The most commonly mined ore of copper, chalcopyrite, is itself a copper-iron-sulfide and occurs with a range of other sulfides. Thus, copper mines are often major culprits of acid mine drainage.ChemistryFor further information, see in acid mine drainageThe chemistry of oxidation of pyrites, the production of ferrous ions and subsequently ferric ions, is very complex, and this complexity has considerably inhibited the design of effective treatment options.()Although a host of chemical processes contribute to acid mine drainage, pyrite oxidation is by far the greatest contributor. A general equation for this process is::2FeS2(s) + 7O2(g) + 2H2O(l)  2Fe2+(aq) + 4SO42-(aq) + 4H+(aq)The oxidation of the sulfide to sulfate solubilizes the ferrous iron (iron(II)), which is subsequently oxidized to ferric iron (iron(III))::4Fe2+(aq) + O2(g) + 4H+(aq)  4Fe3+(aq) + 2H2O(l)Either of these reactions can occur spontaneously or can be catalyzed by microorganisms that derive energy from the oxidation reaction.  The ferric irons produced can also oxidize additional pyrite and oxidize into ferrous ions::FeS2(s) + 14Fe3+(aq) + 8H2O(l)  15Fe2+(aq) + 2SO42-(aq) + 16H+(aq)The net effect of these reactions is to release H+, which lowers the pH and maintains the solubility of the ferric ion.Traditionally, the character of acid mine drainage is determined by its acidity (mg/L), which is measured by titrating AMD with sodium hydroxide solution from the AMD initial pH till pH 8.3. Then calculate the moles of NaOH that consumed by one liter of AMD, and transfer the mole number into the weight of CaCO3.  It is the value of acidity (mg/L) of AMD.  Hence, the direct meaning of acidity is: weight of CaCO3 needed to neutralize the pH of 1 liter AMD.However, acidity can not best represent AMDs characters. Some AMDs have same acidity values, even same pH value, but of different properties. Because the AMD acidity includes two components: hydrogen ions and dissolved metal ions. This can be seen clearly from the AMD acidity titration curves.The AMD acidity titration curve is shaped like a staircase.  Vertical part shows the process OH- ions neutralizing H+ ions, which increases the pH of water.  Horizontal part indicates OH- ions precipitate metal ions into metal hydroxides, which will act as a buffer, using hydroxide from the titrant, keeping the pH constant for a brief time until a specific metal has completely precipitated.     Most metal hydroxides (except Na and K) are insoluble in water and have specific solubility products.  When pH reaches certain level the metal ions will precipitate and be eliminated from the water.  This forms the stair steps of the titration curve.In different AMD the metal concentration may range from 500mg/L to 0.1mg/L.  If assuming the highest concentration allowed for each metal is 0.1mmole/L, use metals precipitation products, we can calculate the criteria pH for each metal in water.  Higher than the pH criteria the metal concentration is lower than 0.1mmole/L. The following table shows the experimental and theoretical pH criteria of metals in AMDpH1 values are experiment datapH2 values are calculated from metal hydroxide solubility products, assuming metal concentration is 0.1mmole/LIn real situation the following factors can affect the metal precipitation process, therefore in the experiment pH of precipitation spans around 1-1.5:#There are microbial and organic in the natural AMDs, which affect metal ion activities greatly. #During the titration process Fe+2 ions are quickly oxidized into Fe+3 in the air and precipitate as more insoluble Fe(OH)3. This lowers Fe+2 ions precipitation pH. (usually AMD titrations are not conducted under N2 flow).#For Cu+2, Ni+2 and Zn+2, there are competitions between precipitates of hydroxide and carbonate. #In low pH AMDs Mn+2 ions are stable, as pH increases during the titration, Mn+2 is oxidized and precipitated as MnO2, This also lowers Mn precipitation pH.#When iron and manganese occur together (which is relatively common), manganese will not be removed from solution until all the ferrous iron is removed. This is because ferrous iron reduces - and redissolves - insoluble manganese oxides. Once iron is removed, manganese can be precipitated, either by raising water pH above 9.5 (rapid reaction) or by promoting microbial oxidation at neutral-alkaline pH (slower reaction). As indicated above, manganese oxide precipitates tend to promote manganese precipitation at lower pH (ca. 7.5-8.5), but this reaction is somewhat slower than direct precipitation at elevated pH.  The major advantage of titration curve method is: It is simple, convenient and low cost.  It can show water problem quickly and clearly. It helps to explain the AMD forming procedure and helps to find the treat method.EffectsEffects on pHtinto river CarolStoker NASA Ames Research Center.jpg|thumb|320px|Rio Tinto in Spain.In some acid mine drainage systems temperatures reach 117 degrees Fahrenheit (47 C), and the pH can be as low as -3.6.()Acid mine drainage causing organisms can thrive in waters with pH very close to zero. Negative pH occurs when water evaporates from already acidic pools thereby increasing the concentration of hydrogen ions.About half of the mine discharges in Pennsylvania have pH under 5 standard units (source needed). However, a significant portion of mine drainage in both the bituminous and anthracite regions of Pennsylvania is alkaline, because limestone in the overburden neutralizes acid before the drainage emanates.Acid mine drainage has recently been a hindrance to the completion of the construction of 99 near College, Pennsylvania, but this acid rock drainage didnt come from a mine: pyritic rock was unearthed during a road cut and then used as filler material in the I-99 construction. A similar situation developed at the Halifax airport in Canada. It is from these and similar experiences that the term acid rock drainage has emerged as being preferable to acid mine drainage, thereby emphasizing the general nature of the problem.Yellow boyWhen the pH of acid mine drainage is raised past 3, either through contact with fresh water or neutralizing minerals, previously soluble Iron(III) ions precipitate as hydroxide, a yellow-orange solid colloquially known as yellow boy. Other types of iron precipitates are possible, including iron oxides and oxyhydroxides. All these precipitates can discolor water and smother plant and animal life on the streambed, disrupting stream ecosystems (a specific offense under the Fisheries Act in Canada). The process also produces additional hydrogen ions, which can further decrease pH.  In some cases, the concentrations of iron hydroxides in yellow boy are so high, the precipitate can be recovered for commercial use in pigments(Robert S Hedin,  RECOVERY OF MARKETABLE IRON OXIDE FROM MINE DRAINAGE, 2002 National Meeting of the American Society of Mining and Reclamation, Lexington KY, June 913, 2002. Published by ASMR, 3134 Montavesta Rd., Lexington, KY 40502)Trace metal and semi-metal contaminationMany acid rock discharges also contain elevated levels of potentially toxic metals, especially nickel and copper with lower levels of a range of trace and semi-metal ions such as lead, arsenic, aluminium, and manganese. In the coal belt around the south Wales valleys in the UK highly acidic nickel-rich discharges from coal stocking sites have proved to be particularly troublesome.TreatmentOversightIn the Kingdom, many discharges from abandoned mines are exempt from regulatory control. In such cases the Agency working with partners such as the Authority have provided some innovative solutions, including wetland solutions such as on the Pelenna in the valley of the Afan near Talbot and the constructed wetland next to the River Neath at Ynysarwed.Although abandoned underground mines produce most of the acid mine drainage, some recently mined and reclaimed surface mines have produced ARD and have degraded local ground-water and surface-water resources. Acidic water produced at active mines must be neutralized to achieve pH 6-9 before discharge from a mine site to a stream is permitted.In Canada, work to reduce the effects of acid mine drainage is concentrated under the Mine Environment Neutral Drainage (MEND) program. Total liability from acid rock drainage is estimated to be between $2 billion and $5 billion CAD.(http://www.nrcan.gc.ca/mms/canmet-mtb/mmsl-lmsm/enviro/effluents/effspecserv-e.htm)  Over a period of eight years, MEND claims to have reduced ARD liability by up to $400 million CAD, from an investment of $17.5 million CAD.(http://www.nrcan.gc.ca/mms/canmet-mtb/mmsl-lmsm/mend/default_e.htm)MethodsLime neutralizationBy far, the most commonly used commercial process for treating acid mine drainage is lime precipitation in a high-density sludge (HDS) process. In this application, a slurry of lime is dispersed into a tank containing acid mine drainage and recycled sludge to increase water pH about ~9. At this pH, most toxic metals become insoluble and precipitate, aided by the presence of recycled sludge. Optionally, air may be introduced in this tank to oxidize iron and manganese and assist in their precipitation. The resulting slurry is directed to a sludge-settling vessel, such as a clarifier. In that vessel, clean water will overflow for release, whereas settled metal precipitates (sludge) will be recycled to the acid mine drainage treatment tank, with a sludge-wasting side stream. A number of variations of this process exist, as dictated by the chemistry of ARD, its volume, and other factors.(Zinck, J.M. and Griffith, W.F. 2000. An assessment of HDS-type lime treatment processes  efficiency and environmental impact. In: ICARD 2000. Proceedings from the Fifth International Conference on Acid Rock Drainage. Society for Mining, Metallurgy, and Exploration, Inc. Vol II, 1027-1034) Generally, the products of the HDS process also contain gypsum and unreacted lime, which enhance both its settleability and resistance to re-acidification and metal mobilization.Less complex variants of this process, such as simple lime neutralization, may involve no more than a lime silo, mixing tank and settling pond. These systems are far less costly to build, but are also less efficient (i.e., longer reaction times are required, and they produce a discharge with higher trace metal concentrations, if present). They would be suitable for relatively small flows or less complex acid mine drainage.(Overview of Acid Mine Drainage Treatment with Chemicals)Calcium silicate neutralizationA calcium silicate feedstock, made from processed steel slag, can also be used to neutralize active acidity in AMD systems by removing free hydrogen ions from the bulk solution, thereby increasing pH. As the silicate anion captures H+ ions (raising the pH), it forms monosilicic acid (H4SiO4), a neutral solute. Monosilicic acid remains in the bulk solution to play many roles in correcting the adverse effects of acidic conditions. In the bulk solution, the silicate anion is very active in neutralizing H+ cations in the soil solution.() While its mode-of-action is quite different from limestone, the ability of calcium silicate to neutralize acid solutions is equivalent to limestone as evidenced by its CCE value of 90-100% and its relative neutralizing value of 98%.(Calcium Silicon-Based Mineral CSA. Harsco Minerals.)In the presence of heavy metals, calcium silicate reacts in a different manner than limestone. As limestone raises the pH of the bulk solution and heavy metals are present, precipitation of the metal hydroxides (with extremely low solubilities) is normally accelerated and the potential of armoring of limestone particles increases significantly.() In the calcium silicate aggregate, as silicic acid species are absorbed onto the metal surface, the development of silica layers (mono- and bi-layers) lead to the formation of colloidal complexes with neutral or negative surface charges. These negatively charged colloids create an electrostatic repulsion with each other (as well as with the negatively charged calcium silicate granules) and the sequestered metal colloids are stabilized and remain in a dispersed state - effectively interrupting metal precipitation and reducing vulnerability of the material to armoring.(Carbonate neutralizationGenerally, limestone or other calcareous strata that could neutralize acid are lacking or deficient at sites that produce acidic rock drainage. Limestone chips may be introduced into sites to create a neutralizing effect. Where limestone has been used, such as at Rheidol in mid Wales, the positive impact has been much less than anticipated because of the creation of an insoluble sulfate layer on the limestone chips, binding the material and preventing further neutralization.Ion exchangeCation exchange processes have previously been investigated as a potential treatment for acid mine drainage. The principle is that an ion exchange resin can remove potentially toxic metals (anionic resins), or chlorides and sulfates (cationic resins) from mine water. Once the contaminants are adsorbed, the exchange sites on resins must be regenerated, which typically requires expensive reagents and generates a brine that is difficult to dispose. A South African company claims to have developed a patented ion-exchange process that treats mine effluents (and AMD) economically, but such claims remain unsubstantiated at present.Constructed wetlandswetlands systems have been proposed during the 1980s to treat acid mine drainage generated by the abandoned coal mines in Eastern Appalachia.()  Generally, the wetlands receive near-neutral water, after it has been neutralized by (typically) a limestone-based treatment process.(Overview of Passive Systems for Treating Acid Mine Drainage) Metal precipitation occurs from their oxidation at near-neutral pH, complexation with organic matter, precipitation as carbonates or sulfides. The latter results from sediment-borne anaerobic bacteria capable of reverting sulfate ions into sulfide ions. These sulfide ions can then bind with heavy metal ions, precipitating heavy metals out of solution and effectively reversing the entire process.The attractiveness of a constructed wetlands solution lies in its relative low cost. They are limited by the metal loads they can deal with (either from high flows or metal concentrations), though current practitioners have succeeded in developing constructed wetlands that treat high volumes (see description of Campbell Mine wetland) and/or highly acidic water (with adequate pre-treatment). Typically, the effluent from constructed wetland receiving near-neutral water will be well-buffered at between 6.5-7.0 and can readily be discharged. Some of metal precipitates retained in sediments are unstable when exposed to oxygen (e.g., copper sulfide or elemental selenium), and it is very important that the wetland sediments remain largely or permanently submerged. An example of an effective constructed wetland is on the Pelena in the Afan valley above Talbot where highly ferruginous discharges from the mine have been successfully treated.Precipitation of metal sulfidesMost base metals in acidic solution precipitate in contact with free sulfide, e.g. from H2S or NaHS. Solid-liquid separation after reaction would produce a base metal-free effluent that can be discharged or further treated to reduce sulfate, and a metal sulfide concentrate with possible economic value.As an alternative, several researchers have investigated the precipitation of metals using biogenic sulfide. In this process, bacteria oxidize organic matter using sulfate, instead of oxygen. Their metabolic products include bicarbonate, which can neutralize water acidity, and sulfide, which forms highly insoluble precipitates with many toxic metals. Although promising, this process has been slow in being adopted for a variety of technical reasons.(abstract Operational Lessons Learned During Bioreactor Demonstrations for Acid Rock Drainage Treatment) Metagenomic study of acid mine drainage With the advance of Large-scale sequencing strategies, genomes of microorganisms in the acid mine drainage community are directly sequenced from the environment. The nearly full genomic constructs allows new understanding of the community and able to reconstruct their metabolic pathways.() Our knowledge of in acid mine drainage remains rudimentary: we know of many more species associated with ARD than we can establish roles and functions.List of selected acid mine drainage sites worldwideThis list includes both mines producing acid mine drainage and river systems significantly affected by such drainage. It is by no means complete, as worldwide, several thousands of such sites exist.North America*Tunnel, Springs, Colorado, USA*Pit superfund site, covering the Fork River and 50,000 acres (200 km) in and around Montana, USA*Beach, British Columbia, Canada*Clinch-Powell River system, Virginia and Tennessee, USA*Mountain Mine, County, California, USA*Creek, Ohio, USA*The Irwin Syncline in Southwestern Pennsylvania*Pronto mine tailings site, Lake area, Ontario, Canada*North Fork of Kentucky River, Kentucky, USA*Cheat River Watershed, Virginia, USA*Copperas Brook Watershed, from the Mine in S. Vermont, impacting the River*Davis Pyrite Mine in NW Massachusetts*bore hole, PennsylvaniaEurope*Avoca, Wicklow, Ireland*mine on the River, Spain*Jane, Cornwall, England*River, SpainAfrica*West Rand, Witwatersrand, AfricaOceania*Queen River, Tasmania, Australia*King River, Tasmania, AustraliaSee also*issues with mining*Agency*Bioleaching*Mine Water AssociationReferencesExternal links*AMRClearinghouse.org*OrangeWaterNetwork.org (EPCAMRs Website)*Assessment of treatment methods (PDF)*Coal-Mine-Drainage Projects in Pennsylvania*Environmental Mining Council of British Columbia*IMWA  International Mine Water Association*INAP  International Network of Acid Prevention*INAP  Global Acid Rock Drainage Guide*Information source on Acid Mine Drainage from TechnoMine*Overview of chemical processes involved*PADRE  Partnership for Acid Drainage Remediation in Europe*The Science of Acid Mine Drainage and Passive Treatment *USGS Mine Drainage*Worlds Most Acidic Waters are Found Near Redding, California (pH -3.6)*Acid Mine Drainage Blog*SWEMP report on South African AMD (PDF)*MiWER - Mine Water and Environment Research Centre (based in Australia)*Overview of acid mine drainage impacts in the West Rand Goldfield*Gold, Scorched Earth and Water: The Hydropolitics of Johannesburg (PDF) Mine Drainageminier acide
723482
Occupational_safety_and_health
Occupational health and safety is a cross-disciplinary area concerned with protecting the safety, health and welfare of people engaged in work or employment. The goal of all occupational health and safety programs is to foster a safe work environment.(Oak Ridge National Lab Safety Document http://www.ornl.gov) As a secondary effect, it may also protect co-workers, family members, employers, customers, suppliers, nearby communities, and other members of the public who are impacted by the workplace environment.  It may involve interactions among many subject areas, including medicine, occupational (or industrial) hygiene, health, engineering, chemistry, physics.DefinitionSince 1950, the Labour Organization (ILO) and the Health Organization (WHO) have shared a common definition of occupational health. It was adopted by the Joint ILO/WHO Committee on Occupational Health at its first session in 1950 and revised at its twelfth session in 1995. The definition reads: Occupational health should aim at: the promotion and maintenance of the highest degree of physical, mental and social well-being of workers in all occupations; the prevention amongst workers of departures from health caused by their working conditions; the protection of workers in their employment from risks resulting from factors adverse to health; the placing and maintenance of the worker in an occupational environment adapted to his physiological and psychological capabilities; and, to summarize, the adaptation of work to man and of each man to his job. This standard is based on the methodology known as Plan-Do-Check-Act (PDCA)Relationship to occupational health psychologyOccupational health psychology (OHP), a related discipline, is a relatively new field that combines elements of occupational health and safety,  industrial/organizational psychology, and psychology.(Everly, G. S., Jr. (1986). An introduction to occupational health psychology. P. A. Keller & L. G. Ritt (Eds.),  Innovations in clinical practice: A source book, Vol. 5 (pp.  331-338).  Sarasota, FL:  Professional Resource Exchange.)  The field is concerned with identifying work-related psychosocial factors that adversely affect the health of people who work. OHP is also concerned with developing ways to effect change in workplaces for the purpose of improving the health of people who work. For more detail on OHP, see the section on health psychology....Reasons for Occupational health and safetyThe event of an incident at work (such as legal fees, fines, compensatory damages, investigation time, lost production, lost goodwill from the workforce, from customers and from the wider community).*Legal - Occupational  requirements may be reinforced in civil law and/or law; it is accepted that without the extra encouragement of potential regulatory action or litigation, many organizations would not act upon their implied moral obligations.They recognize hazards and measure health and safety risks, set suitable safety controls in place, and give recommendations on avoiding accidents to management and employees in an organisation.  This paper looks at the main tasks undertaken by OHS practitioners in Europe, Australia and the USA, and the main knowledge and skills that are required of them.  Like it or not, organisations have a duty to provide health and safety training. But it could involve much more than you think.  (Damon, Nadia.  2008.  Reducing The Risks, Training and Coaching Today, United Kingdom, pg.14)An effective training program can reduce the number of injuries and deaths, property damage, legal liability, illnesses, workers compensation claims, and missed time from work. A safety training program can also help a trainer keep the required OSHA-mandated safety training courses organized and up-to-date.Safety training classes help establish a safety culture in which employees themselves help promote proper safety procedures while on the job. It is important that new employees be properly trained and embrace the importance of workplace safety as it is easy for seasoned workers to negatively influence the new hires. That negative influence however, can be purged with the establishment of new, hands-on, innovative effective safety training which will ultimately lead to an effective safety culture. A 1998 NIOSH study concluded that the role of training in developing and maintaining effective hazard control activities is a proven and successful method of intervention.(OSHA Outreach Resources)Safety Professionals in EuropeIn Norway, the main required tasks of an Occupational Health and Safety Practitioner include:	Systematic evaluations of the working environment	Endorsing preventative measures which eliminate reasons for illnesses in the work place	Giving information in the subject of employees health	Giving information on occupational hygiene, ergonomics and also environmental and safety risks in the work place  (Hale A, Ytehus I, 2004, Changing requirements for the safety profession:  roles and tasks, Journal of Occupational Health & Safety  Australia and New Zealand)In the Netherlands, required tasks for health and safety staff are only summarily defined, and include:	Voluntary medical examinations	A consulting room on the work environment for the workers	Health check assessments (if needed for the job concerned) (Hale, A et alia.  2004)The main influence on the Dutch law on the job of the safety professional is through the requirement on each employer to use the services of a certified working conditions service to advise them on health and safety (Hale, A et alia.  2004).  A certified service must employ sufficient numbers of four types of certified experts to cover the risks in the organisations which use the service:	A safety professional	An occupational hygienist	An occupational physician	A work and organisation specialist.  (Hale, A et alia.  2004)It shows in Table 1 (based on the European Network of Safety and Health Practitioner Organisations ENHSPO survey to) that in Norway, 37 % of Health and Safety practitioners had a MSc education level, and 14% in the Netherlands; 44% were BSc graduates and 63% in the Netherlands; and 19% were of a Technician level and 23% in the Netherlands (Hale, A et alia.  2004).Safety Professionals in the USAThe main tasks undertaken by the OHS practitioner in the USA include:	Develop processes, procedures, criteria, requirements, and methods to attain the best possible management of the hazards and exposures that can cause injury to people, and damage property, or the environment;	Apply good business practices and economic principles for efficient use of resources to add to the importance of the safety processes;	Promote other members of the company to contribute by exchanging ideas and other different approaches to make sure that every one in the corporation possess OHS knowledge and have functional roles in the development and execution of safety procedures;	Assess services, outcomes, methods, equipment, workstations, and procedures by using qualitative and quantitative methods to recognise the hazards and measure the related risks;	Examine all possibilities, effectiveness, reliability, and expenditure to attain the best results for the company concerned (Board of Certified Safety Professionals, 2006, Examination Guide  accessed 20 April at http://www.bcsp.org/bcsp/media/exam_guide.pdf)Knowledge required by the OHS professional in USA include:	Constitutional and case law controlling safety, health, and the environment	Operational procedures to plan/ develop safe work practices	Safety, health and environmental sciences	Design of hazard control systems (i.e.  fall protection, scaffoldings)	Design of recordkeeping systems that take collection into account, as well as storage, interpretation, and dissemination	Mathematics and statistics	Processes and systems for attaining safety through design (Board of Certified Safety Professionals, 2006)Some skills required by the OHS professional in the USA include (but are not limited to):	Understanding and relating to systems, policies and rules	Holding checks and having control methods for possible hazardous exposures	Mathematical and statistical analysis	Examining manufacturing hazards	Planning safe work practices for systems, facilities, and equipment	Understanding and using safety, health, and environmental science information for the improvement of procedures	Interpersonal communication skills(Board of Certified Safety Professionals, 2006)The differences in each locationSimilar to the findings of the ENHSPO survey conducted in Australia, the Institute of Occupational Medicine found that in the UK, there is a need to put a greater emphasis on work-related illness (Anonymous.  2008.  Occupational Health, Health and Safety News:  In Brief, Vol 60, Iss. 3;  UK.  pg. 6).  Its been shown that in Australia and the USA that a major responsibility of the OHS professional is to keep company directors and managers aware of the issues that they face in regards to Occupational Health and Safety principles and legislation.  However, in Europe, it has been shown that this is where they are lacking.  Nearly half of senior managers and company directors do not have an up-to-date understanding of their health and safety-related duties and responsibilities.  (Paton, Nic.  2008.  Senior Managers Fail to Show Competence in Health and Safety Occupational Health, Vol. 60, Iss. 3; pg. 6)National implementing legislationDifferent states take different approaches to legislation, regulation, and enforcement.In the Union, states have enforcing authorities to ensure that the basic legal requirements relating to occupational health and safety are met. In many EU countries, there is strong cooperation between employer and worker organisations (e.g. Unions) to ensure good OSH performance as it is recognized this has benefits for both the worker (through maintenance of health) and the enterprise (through improved productivity and quality). In 1996 the Agency for Safety and Health at Work was founded.Member states of the Union have all transposed into their national legislation a series of directives that establish minimum standards on occupational health and safety. These directives (of which there are about 20 on a variety of topics) follow a similar structure requiring the employer to assess the workplace risks and put in place preventive measures based on a hierarchy of control. This hierarchy starts with elimination of the hazard and ends with protective equipment.In the UK, health and safety legislation is drawn up and enforced by the and Safety Executive and local authorities (the local council) under the and Safety at Work etc. Act 1974. Increasingly in the UK the regulatory trend is away from prescriptive rules, and towards risk assessment. Recent major changes to the laws governing asbestos and fire safety management embrace the concept of risk assessment.In the States, the Safety and Health Act of 1970 created both the Institute for Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH) and the Safety and Health Administration (OSHA).(Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970. Occupational Safety and Health Administration.) OSHA, in the U.S. Department of Labor, is responsible for developing and enforcing workplace safety and health regulations. NIOSH, in the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, is focused on research, information, education, and training in occupational safety and health.(About NIOSH. National Institute of Occupational Safety and Health.)OSHA have been regulating occupational safety and health since 1971. Occupational safety and health regulation of a limited number of specifically defined industries was in place for several decades before that, and broad regulations by some individual states was in place for many years prior to the establishment of OSHA.In Canada, workers are covered by provincial or federal labour codes depending on the sector in which they work. Workers covered by federal legislation (including those in mining, transportation, and federal employment) are covered by the Canada Labour Code; all other workers are covered by the health and safety legislation of the province they work in. The Centre for Occupational Health and Safety (CCOHS), an agency of the Government of Canada, was created in 1978 by an Act of Parliament. The act was based on the belief that all Canadians had ...a fundamental right to a healthy and safe working environment. CCOHS is mandated to promote safe and healthy workplaces to help prevent work-related injuries and illnesses.In Malaysia, the Department of Occupational Safety and Health (DOSH) under the Ministry of Human Resource is responsible to ensure that the safety, health and welfare of workers in both the public and private sector is upheld. DOSH is responsible to enforce the Factory and Machinery Act 1969 and the Safety and Health Act 1994.In the Republic of China, the Ministry of Health is responsible for occupational disease prevention and the State Administration of Work Safety for safety issues at work. On the provincial and municipal level, there are Health Supervisions for occupational health and local bureaus of Work Safety for safety. The Occupational Disease Control Act of PRC came into force on May 1, 2002.(Occupational Disease Control Act of the Peoples Republic of China  http://www.gov.cn/banshi/2005-08/01/content_19003.htm) and Work safety Act of PRC on November 1, 2002.(The Work Safety Act of the Peoples Republic of China  http://www.gov.cn/ztzl/2006-05/27/content_292725.htm) The Occupational Disease Control Act is under revising. The prevention of occupational disease is still in its initial stage compared with industried countries such as the US or UK. Identifying Safety and Health HazardsHazards, risks, outcomesThe terminology used in OSH varies between states, but generally speaking:*A hazard is something that can cause harm if not controlled.*The outcome is the harm that results from an uncontrolled hazard.*A risk is a combination of the probability that a particular outcome will occur and the severity of the harm involved.Hazard, risk, and outcome are used in other fields to describe e.g. environmental damage, or damage to equipment. However, in the context of OSH, harm generally describes the direct or indirect degradation, temporary or permanent, of the physical, mental, or social well-being of workers. For example, repetitively carrying out handling of heavy objects is a hazard. The outcome could be a musculoskeletal disorder (MSD) or an acute back or joint injury.  The risk can be expressed numerically (e.g. a 0.5 or 50/50 chance of the outcome occurring during a year), in relative terms (e.g. high/medium/low), or with a multi-dimensional classification scheme (e.g. situation-specific risks).Hazard AssessmentHazard analysis or hazard assessment is a process in which individual hazards of the workplace are identified, assessed and controlled/eliminated as close to source (location of the hazard) as reasonable and possible. As technology, resources, social expectation or regulatory requirements change, hazard analysis focuses controls more closely toward the source of the hazard. Thus hazard control is a dynamic program of prevention. Hazard-based programs also have the advantage of not assigning or implying there are acceptable risks in the workplace. A hazard-based program may not be able to eliminate all risks, but neither does it accept satisfactory -- but still riskyoutcomes. And as those who calculate and manage the risk are usually managers while those exposed to the risks are a different group, workers, a hazard-based approach can by-pass conflict inherent in a risk-based approach.Risk assessmentModern occupational safety and health legislation usually demands that a assessment be carried out prior to making an intervention. It should be kept in mind that risk management requires risk to be managed to a level which is as low as is reasonably practical.This assessment should:*Identify the hazards*Identify all affected by the hazard and how*Evaluate the risk*Identify and prioritize appropriate control measuresThe calculation of risk is based on the likelihood or probability of the harm being realized and the severity of the consequences. This can be expressed mathematically as a quantitative assessment (by assigning low, medium and high likelihood and severity with integers and multiplying them to obtain a factor), or qualitatively as a description of the circumstances by which the harm could arise.The assessment should be recorded and reviewed periodically and whenever there is a significant change to work practices. The assessment should include practical recommendations to control the risk. Once recommended controls are implemented, the risk should be re-calculated to determine of it has been lowered to an acceptable level. Generally speaking, newly introduced controls should lower risk by one level, i.e., from high to medium or from medium to low.Common workplace hazard groups*Mechanical hazards include::By type of agent:**force***Collisions***Falls from height**by objects**space**Slips and trips**on a pointed object**air/pressure fluids (such as fluid)**Entanglement**Equipment-related injury:By type of damage:**Crushing**Cutting**Friction and abrasion**Shearing**Stabbing and puncture*Other physical hazards:**Noise**Vibration**Lighting**Barotrauma (hypobaric/hyperbaric pressure)**radiation**Electricity**Asphyxiation**Cold stress (hypothermia)**Heat stress (hyperthermia)***Dehydration (due to sweating)*hazards include:**Bacteria**Virus**Fungi***Mold**pathogens**TuberculosisImage:Lewis Wickes Hines - Harry McShane 1908.jpg|right|thumb|Harry McShane, age 16, 1908. Pulled into machinery in a factory in Cincinnati.  His arm was ripped off at the shoulder and his leg broken. No compensation paid.  Photograph by Hine.*Chemical hazards include:**Acids**Bases**Heavy metals***Lead**Solvents***Petroleum**Particulates***Asbestos and other fine dust/fibrous materials***Silica**Fumes (noxious gases/vapors)**Highly-reactive chemicals**Fire, conflagration and explosion hazards:***Explosion***Deflagration***Detonation***Conflagration*Psychosocial issues include:**Work-related stress, whose causal factors include excessive working time and overwork**Violence from outside the organisation**Bullying, which may include emotional and abuse**harassment**Mobbing**Burnout**Exposure to unhealthy elements during meetings with business associates, e.g. tobacco, uncontrolled alcohol*disorders, avoided by the employment of good ergonomic designFire prevention (protection/safety) often comes within the remit of health and safety professionals as well.Canadian ClassificationIn Canada, Hazards are typically categorized into one of six groups:1. Safety (moving machinery, working at heights, slippery surfaces, mobile equipment, etc.)2. Ergonomic (material handling, environment, work organization, etc.)3. Chemical Agents4. Biological Agents5. Physical Agents(noise, lighting, radiation, etc.)6. Psychosocial(stress, violence, etc.)Future developmentsOccupational health and safety has come a long way from its beginnings in the heavy industry sector. It now has an impact on every worker, in every work place, and those charged with managing health and safety are having more and more tasks added to their portfolio. The most significant responsibility is environmental protection. The skills required to manage occupational health and safety are compatible with environmental protection, which is why these responsibilities are so often bolted onto the workplace health and safety professional.See also General * Z10* Health and Safety - EHS, HSE, SHE or HES* safety data sheet - MSDS* & Plains ERC - A NIOSH-Funded Education and Research Center in Colorado* Health and Safety Management Systems - OHSMS* Medicine Specialists of Canada* 18001* safetyGovernment organizations* Centre for Occupational Health and Safety (Canada)* Office of Compliance (US)* Agency for Safety and Health at Work (EU)* Government & Educational OHS Resources (Australia)* and Safety Executive (UK)* Health for Work Adviceline for small businesses (UK)* Information Center of Occupational Safety and Health (Israel)* Institute of Occupational Safety_and_Health http://www.labourdept.gov.lk* Labour Organisation (United Nations)* Occupational Safety and Health Agency (South Korea)* Institute for Occupational Safety and Health (US)* National Institute of Occupational Health (India)* Institute of Occupational Health (Norway)* National Institute of Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH Malaysia) (Malaysia)* NIOSH Certification Sdn Bhd (NIOSH Malaysia Subsidiary)* National Institute of Occupational Safety and Health (Sri Lanka)* Safety and Health Administration (US)* Safe Work Australia (Australia)* Safe BC formerly Workers Compensation Board of BC (WCB) (British Columbia, Canada)* Safety & Health Council (Singapore)* Safety & Insurance Board (Ontario, Canada)* Victoria, Australia* Safety & Health Council, SingaporeLaws*and Safety at Work Act (UK)*Act No.1/1970 about Occupational Safety at Work 1970 (Indonesia)*Safety and Health Act (US)*Health and Safety Act 1991 (Australia)*Safety and Health Act 1994 (Malaysia)*of major U.S. environmental and occupational health regulation*Safety and Health Act (Singapore)Lawsuits*v. Case Farms of OhioRelated fields*safety*Health*Epidemiology*Ergonomics, Ergonomics*analysis*prevention*Hazop*hygiene* control*safety*health psychology*Safety Management*Psychology*health*Toxicology Workplace environmental standards * ISO 8518* ISO 8672* ISO 8760 - ISO 8762* ISO 9486 - ISO 9487* ISO 11041* ISO 11174* ISO 14001* ISO 15202* ISO 15767* ISO 16107* ISO 16200* ISO 16702* ISO 16740* ISO 17733 - ISO 17734* ISO 17737* ISO 20552* MS 1722 (Malaysia  Standard)Other* Agenda is a free and open source project to reduce workplace risk.* for Injured Workers (AIW)* - Compensation and Liability Disputes* Management* Examinetics - mobile occupational health screening* Hazards a UK-based, independent, union-friendly health and safety magazine* of Occupational Medicine* Mateo Foundation for Disabled Farmworkers* Power Tools Database* hygiene* illness* rehabilitation* risk assessment* therapy* through design* Award Excellence in Hearing Loss Prevention Award* (magazine) (in New Zealand)* Journal of Work, Environment & Health* Declaration on Safety and Health at Work* compensationReferencesFurther reading* ***OHSAS 18000 series: (derived from a British Standard, OHSAS is intended to be compatible with ISO 9000 and 14000 series standards, but is not itself an ISO standard)External links*CDC page on Workplace Safety & Health*European Academy of Occupational Health Psychology*ILO International Occupational Safety and Health Information Centre*Society for Occupational Health Psychology*UK Health & Safety Executive - Getting started for Small Business* IOSH Occupational Health Toolkitde treballa ochrana zdrav pi prcide:Arbeitsschutz de trabajoeo:Laborprotektoet scurit au travailko:na radusul lavoro nl:Arbeidsomstandighedenja:milj og sikkerhetmilj og tryggleiki higiena pracye sade ocupacionaisSafety and Health ()fi:Tysuojelusv:Arbetsmiljzh:
728080
Atchison,_Topeka_and_Santa_Fe_Railway
The Atchison, Topeka and Santa Fe Railway , often abbreviated as Santa Fe, was one of the larger railroads in the United States. The company was first chartered in February 1859. Although the railway was named in part for the capital of Mexico, its main line never reached there as the terrain made it too difficult to lay the necessary tracks (Santa Fe was ultimately served by a line from New Mexico). The Santa Fes first tracks reached the Kansas/Colorado state line in 1873, and connected to Colorado in 1876. In order to help fuel the railroads profitability, the Santa Fe set up estate offices and sold farm land from the land grants that the railroad was awarded by Congress; these new farms would create a demand for transportation (both freight and passenger service) that was offered by the Santa Fe.Ever the innovator, Santa Fe was one of the pioneers in intermodal freight service, an enterprise that (at one time or another) included a tugboat fleet and an airline (the short-lived Santa Fe Skyway). A bus line allowed the company to extend passenger transportation service to areas not accessible by rail, and ferry boats on the San Francisco Bay allowed travelers to complete their westward journeys all the way to the Pacific Ocean. The Atchison, Topeka and Santa Fe Railway officially ceased operations on December 31, 1996, when it merged with the Northern Railroad to form the Northern and Santa Fe Railway.HistoryFile:Cyrus K Holliday.jpg|thumb|150px|right|K. Holliday, the first president of the railroad.Startup and initial growthThe railroads charter, written single-handedly by K. Holliday in January 1859, was approved by the Kansas territorial governor on February 11 of that year as the Atchison and Topeka Railroad Company for the purpose of building a rail line from Kansas, to Fe, New Mexico, and then on to the of Mexico; the original eastern terminus was Kansas, slightly northeast of Topeka: hence, the name. On May 3, 1863, two years after Kansas gained statehood, the railroad changed names to more closely match the aspirations of its founder to the Atchison, Topeka and Santa Fe Railroad. The railroad broke ground in Topeka on October 30, 1868 and started building westward, where one of the first construction tasks was to cross the River. The first section of track opened on April 26, 1869 (less than a month prior to completion of the Transcontinental Railroad) with special trains between Topeka and Pauline. The distance was only 6 miles (10 km), but the Creek Picnic Special train took passengers over the route for celebration in Pauline.Fe Route.jpg|thumb|250px|left|The Santa Fe trademark in the late 19th century incorporated the British lion out of respect for the countrys financial assistance in building the railroad to California.Crews continued working westward, reaching Dodge City on September 5, 1872. With this connection, the Santa Fe was able to compete for cattle transportation with the Pacific Railway. Construction continued, and the Santa Fe opened the last section of track between Topeka and the Colorado/Kansas border on December 23, 1873. The Santa Fes tracks reached Colorado on March 1, 1876. Serving Pueblo opened a number of new freight opportunities for the railroad, as it now could haul coal from Colorado eastward.(Early history)()Image:ATSF Rail car in Hereford, TX IMG 4861.JPG|200px|right|thumb|ATSF caboose on display at the Smith County Historical Museum in Hereford, TexasBuilding across Kansas and eastern Colorado may have been technologically simple, as there werent many large natural obstacles in the way (certainly not as many as the railroad was about to encounter further west), but the Santa Fe found it almost economically impossible because of the sparse population in the area. To combat this problem, the Santa Fe set up estate offices in the area and vigorously promoted settlement across Kansas on the land that was granted to the railroad by the Congress in 1863. The Santa Fe offered discounted passenger fares to anyone who traveled west on the railroad to inspect the land; if the land was subsequently purchased by the traveler, the railroad applied the passengers ticket price toward the sale of the land. Now that the railroad had built across the plains and had a customer base providing income for the firm, it was time to turn its attention toward the difficult terrain of the Mountains.Crossing the RockiesLeadville was the most productive of all of the Colorado mining regions. Mining in the area began in 1859, first for gold and then (two decades later) for silver. Several of the Santa Fes board of directors (along with President Strong) sought to capitalize on the need to supply the mining towns of Colorado and northern New Mexico with food, equipment and other supplies. To that end, Santa Fe sought to extend its route westward from Pueblo along the River, and through the Gorge in 1877. The Royal Gorge was a bottleneck along the Arkansas too narrow for both the Santa Fe and the and Rio Grande Western Railroad to pass through, and there was no other reasonable access to the South Park area; thus, a race ensued to build trackage through the Gorge. Physical confrontations led to two years of armed conflict, essentially low-level guerrilla warfare between the two companies that came to be known as the Gorge Railroad War. Federal intervention prompted an out-of-court settlement on February 2, 1880, in the form of the so-called Treaty of Boston, wherein the DRGW was allowed to complete its line and lease it for use by the Santa Fe. The DRGW paid an estimated $1.4 million to Santa Fe for its work within the Gorge and agreed not to extend its line to Santa Fe, while the ATSF agreed to forego its planned routes to Denver and Leadville.Also looking to the south, an initial outlay of $20,000 was authorized on February 26, 1878 for the construction of a rail line south from Trinidad in order to ..seize and hold Pass. The location of the route was nearly as crucial to the ventures success as was the actual track construction. W. R. Ray Morley, a former civil engineer for the (D&RG) hired by the ATSF in 1877, was given his first assignment: to secretly plot a route through the pass (it was feared that any activity in the area would lead the D&RG to construct a narrow gauge line over the Pass). Additionally, Strong learned that the Pacific Railroad (SP) had introduced legislation to block the Santa Fes entry into New Mexico. Undaunted, Strong obtained a charter for the Mexico and Southern Pacific Railroad Company and immediately sent A. A. Robinson to Raton Pass. From February to December, 1878, work crews struggled to build the line between La Junta and Raton, and the first Santa Fe train entered New Mexico on December 7.Fe Trail and Railroad map, 1922.jpg|thumb|340px|right|A comparison map prepared by the Santa Fe Railroad in 1921, showing the The Old Santa F Trail (top) and the Atchison, Topeka and Santa Fe Railroad and its connections (bottom).Facing the competitionFile:ATSF 1890s passenger train.jpg|325px|thumb|An AT&SF train in operation, circa 1895.While construction over the Rockies was slow and difficult due to the logistics involved, in some instances armed conflicts with competitors arose (such as with the D&RG in Colorado and Mexico, and  after capturing the Raton Pass  the SP in Arizona and California, as exemplified in the war between SP and Santa Fe subsidiary Southern Railroad at California in September, 1883). The troubles for the railroad went far beyond skirmishes with rival railroads, however. In the late 1880s, C. Magoun, who had worked his way to become Chairman of the Board of Directors for the railroad, was progressively losing his own health. In 1889, the railroads stock price, which was closely linked in the publics eye with the successes of the railroads Chairman, fell from nearly $140 per share to around $20 per share. Magouns health continued to deteriorate along with the stock price, and he died on December 20, 1893. The Santa Fe entered receivership three days later, on December 23, 1893, with J. W. Reinhart, John J. McCook and Joseph C. Wilson appointed as receivers. Pacific was another rival, but not much of one: Union Pacific, or UP, was also in the western expansion and also had a route just north of the Mountains.Expansion through mergersHaving completed a line to the West Coast, by 1886 William B. Strong started looking around for other expansion opportunities. The Financially-troubled Gulf, Colorado & Santa Fe Railway Company, a Texas line with nearly  of track in service, provided just such an opportunity. The GC&SF was required, as part of a merger agreement, to construct a  line from Fort Worth to Purcell, in the Indian Territory, where AT&SF had a railhead. The connection was completed, and the merger became official on April 27, 1887. GC&SF continued to operate as a wholly owned subsidiary until finally merged directly into ATSF in 1965, by which time it had about  of track in service.File:Santa Fe - Along Your Way cover, 1945.jpg|thumb|250px|Santa Fe No. 2A, an E1 is shown pulling the Super Chief on the cover of the railroads 1945 promotional publication, Along Your Way.A brief look at some key figures comparing the railroads extent between 1870 and 1945 shows just how much the railroad had grown::Source: Santa Fe Railroad (1945), Along Your Way, Rand McNally, Chicago, Illinois.Predecessors, subsidiary railroads, and leased lines* Colorado and Santa Fe Railway (18871965)  an operating subsidiary of ATSF* Arizona and Santa Fe Railway (19111963)  a non-operating subsidiary of the ATSF** Fe, Prescott and Phoenix Railway (18921911)*** and California Railway (19031905)*** Mountain Railroad (19021912)  a non-operating subsidiary*** and Eastern Railroad (18971911)*** and Eastern Railroad (18951908)* Southern Railroad (18801906)  a subsidiary railroad chartered to build a rail connection between what has become the city of Barstow and San Diego, California* Canyon Railway (19011942)  became an operating subsidiary of the ATSF in 1902 and a non-operating subsidiary in 1924** Fe and Grand Canyon Railroad (18971901)* Southern Railway Company (19131992?)  a subsidiary created to build the Porterville-Orosi District (Minkler to Ducor, California)* Mexico and Arizona Railroad (18821897)  ATSF subsidiary; (18971934) non-operating SP subsidiary* Mexico and Southern Pacific Railroad Company (1878?)  a subsidiary created to lay track across the Raton Pass into New Mexico* San Francisco and San Joaquin Valley Railway* Fe Pacific Railroad (18971902)** and Pacific Railroad (18801897)* Railway  became an operating subsidiary of the ATSF in 1879* Valley Railway (19131942)  an ATSF paper railroad at Clarkdale, Arizona* Arizona Railway (19061933)  an ATSF subsidiary (Kingman  Chloride)** and Utah Railway (18991933) ()SPSF MergerFile:Under a container car, Walong, California.jpg|thumb|300px|Santa Fe and Southern Pacific Railroad trains meet at Walong siding on the Loop in the late 1980s.The Southern Pacific Santa Fe Railroad (SPSF) was a proposed merger between the parent companies of the Southern Pacific and Santa Fe Railroad announced on December 23, 1983. As part of the joining of the two firms, all of the rail and non-rail assets owned by Fe Industries and the Southern Pacific Transportation Company were placed under the control of a holding company: the Santa FeSouthern Pacific Corporation. The merger was subsequently denied by the Commerce Commission (ICC) on the basis that it would create too many duplicate routes.The companies were so confident that the merger would be approved they began repainting locomotives and non-revenue rolling stock in a new unified paint scheme. After the ICCs denial, railfans joked that SPSF really stood for Shouldnt Paint So Fast. While the Southern Pacific was sold off, all of the California real estate holdings were consolidated in a new company, Development Corporation, making it the states largest private landowner. Some time later, Catellus would purchase the Pacific Railroads interest in the Angeles Union Passenger Terminal (LAUPT).The paint scheme that would never be completed is called Kodachrome. Few locomotives were painted in this scheme, it is highly sought after by many model railroaders. Several model companies, including Atlas and Kato, have produced locomotives and rolling stock in this livery.Merger into BNSFOn September 21, 1995, the ATSF merged with the Northern Railroad to form the Northern and Santa Fe Railway. Some of the challenges resulting from the joining of the two companies included the establishment of a common dispatching system, the unionization of Santa Fes non-union dispatchers, and incorporating the Santa Fes train identification codes throughout. Therefore, the two lines maintained separate operations until December 31, 1996.The merged railroads are now known as BNSF. There are multiple paint schemes bearing the BNSF logo. The most modern is the BNSF Swoosh scheme. This features an orange body with black letters and numbers. The logo has BNSF above a big triangle, or swoosh.Company officersPresidents of the Atchison, Topeka and Santa Fe Railway:()* K. Holliday: 18601863* C. Pomeroy: 18631868* F. Nast: September 1868* C. Lord: 18681869* Keyes: 18691870* Twichell: 18701873* Henry Strong: 18731874* Thomas Nickerson: 18741880* Jefferson Coolidge: 18801881* Barstow Strong: 18811889* Manvel: 18891893* Reinhart: 18931894* F. Walker: 18941895* Payson Ripley: 18961920* Benson Storey: 19201933* T. Bledsoe: 19331939* Edward J. Engel: 19391944* G. Gurley: 19441958* S. Marsh: 19581967* Shedd Reed: 19671986()* John Swartz: 19861988* Haverty: 19891991* Krebs: 19911995Passenger train serviceFe passenger timetable cover, Nov 29 1942.jpg|thumb|300px| The cover of the railroads November 29, 1942, passenger timetable. Vignettes of the American Southwest and Native American people were common in Santa Fe advertising.The Santa Fe was widely known for its train service in the first half of the 20th century. The Santa Fe introduced many innovations in passenger rail travel, among these the Pleasure Domes of the Chief (billed as the ...only dome cars between Chicago and Los Angeles when they were introduced in 1951) and the Big Dome Lounge cars and double-decker Hi-Level cars of the El Capitan, which entered revenue service in 1954. The Santa Fe was among the first railroads to add dining cars to its passenger train consists, in 1891, following the examples of the Northern Pacific and Union Pacific. Dining along the Santa Fe was often a memorable experience, whether it be on-board in a car or at one of the many House restaurants that were strategically located throughout the system.In general, the same train name was used for both directions of a particular train. The exceptions to this rule included the Chicagoan and Kansas Cityan trains (both names referred to the same service, but the Chicagoan was the eastbound version, while the Kansas Cityan was the westbound version), and the Eastern Express and West Texas Express. All of the Santa Fes trains that terminated in Chicago did so at Dearborn Station. Trains terminating in Los Angeles arrived at Santa Fes Grande Station until May, 1939, when the Los Angeles Union Passenger Terminal (LAUPT) was opened.To reach smaller communities, the railroad often operated Rail Diesel Cars (RDCs) for communities on the railroad, and bus connections were provided throughout the system via Santa Fe Trailways buses to other locations. These smaller trains generally were not named; only the train numbers were used to differentiate services.The ubiquitous passenger service inspired the title of the 1946 Academy-Award-winning Mercer tune the Atchison, Topeka and the Santa Fe. The song was written in 1945 for the film Harvey Girls, a story about the waitresses of the Harvey Companys restaurants. It was sung in the film by Garland and recorded by many other singers, including Crosby. In the 1970s, the ATSF used Crosbys version in a commercial.Regular revenue trainsThe Santa Fe operated the following named trains on regular schedules:* The Angel: San Francisco, California  Los Angeles, California  San Diego, California (this was the southbound version of the Saint)* Angeleno: Angelo, Texas  Worth, Texas (on the GC&SF)* The Antelope: City, Oklahoma  City, Missouri* Atlantic Express: Angeles, California  Kansas City, Missouri (this was the eastbound version of the Los Angeles Express).* Express: Illinois  Kansas City, Missouri  Los Angeles, California* Fast Mail: Chicago, Illinois  Los Angeles, California  San Francisco, California* Limited: Chicago, Illinois  Los Angeles, California* Special: Los Angeles, California  Texas* Cavern: Clovis, New Mexico  New Mexico (connected with the Scout).* Centennial State: Colorado  Chicago, Illinois* Texas Express: Texas  Texas* Chicagoan: Kansas City, Missouri  Chicago, Illinois (this was the eastbound version of the Kansas Cityan passenger train).* Chicago Express: Kansas  Chicago, Illinois* Fast Mail: San Francisco, California  Los Angeles, California  Chicago, Illinois* City Flyer: Chicago, Illinois  Kansas City, Missouri* The Chief: Chicago, Illinois  Los Angeles, California* Eastern Express: Lubbock, Texas  Texas (this was the eastbound version of the West Texas Express).File:ATSF Boxcar El Capitan 1943.jpg|thumb|300px|An advertisement for the El Capitan on the side of a Santa Fe boxcar seen in Bernardino, California, in March 1943.* El Capitan: Chicago, Illinois  Los Angeles, California* Pasoan: Paso, Texas  New Mexico* El Tovar: Los Angeles, California  Chicago, Illinois (via Belen)* Fast Mail/Express: New Mexico  Texas  Kansas City, Missouri  Chicago, Illinois* Fifteen: Newton, Kansas  Texas* Mail Express: Francisco, California (via Los Angeles)  Chicago, Illinois* Golden Gate: California  California with coordinated connecting bus service to Los Angeles and San Francisco* Canyon Limited: Chicago, Illinois  Los Angeles, California* The Hopi: Los Angeles, California  Chicago, Illinois* Cityan: Chicago, Illinois  Kansas City, Missouri (this was the westbound version of the Chicagoan passenger train).* City Chief: Kansas City, Missouri  Chicago, Illinois* Los Angeles Express: Chicago, Illinois  Los Angeles, California (this was the westbound version of the Atlantic Express).* The Missionary: San Francisco, California  Belen, New Mexico  Amarillo, Texas  Kansas City, Missouri  Chicago, Illinois* Navajo: Chicago, Illinois  San Francisco, California (via Los Angeles)File:Z-5284.jpg|thumb|300px|right|All special trains were placed on public display on the Pacific Electric tracks adjacent to Los Angeles Exposition Park. Santa Fe #51L, an PA unit, makes its delivery to the railroad in 1946 with Bergen, ventriloquist and radio personality, and his dummy, Snerd, riding in the cab.* Flyer: Kansas City, Missouri  Tulsa, Oklahoma with through sleepers to Chicago via other trains* Limited: Chicago, Illinois  Los Angeles, California* Express: Los Angeles, California  Arizona* The Ranger: Kansas City, Missouri  Chicago, Illinois* The Saint: San Diego, California  Los Angeles, California  San Francisco, California (this was the northbound version of the Angel)* Diegan: Los Angeles, California  Diego, California* Francisco Chief: San Francisco, California  Chicago, Illinois* Francisco Express: Chicago, Illinois  San Francisco, California (via Los Angeles)* Fe de Luxe: Chicago, Illinois  Los Angeles, California  San Francisco, California* Fe Eight: Belen, New Mexico  Amarillo, Texas  Kansas City, Missouri  Chicago, Illinois* The Scout: Chicago, Illinois  San Francisco, California (via Los Angeles)* Plains Express: Sweetwater, Texas  Lubbock, Texas* Chief: Chicago, Illinois  Los Angeles, California* The Texan: Texas  Orleans, Louisiana (on the GC&SF between Houston and Galveston, then via the Pacific Railroad between Galveston and New Orleans).* Texas Chief: Galveston, Texas (on the GC&SF)  Chicago, Illinois* Flyer: Chicago, Illinois  San Francisco, California (via Los Angeles)* The Tulsan: Oklahoma  Kansas City, Mo. with through coaches to Chicago, Illinois via other trains (initially the Chicagoan/Kansas Cityan)* Flyer: California  California* Texas Express: Amarillo, Texas  Lubbock, Texas (this was the westbound version of the Eastern Express).One-time and special trainsOccasionally, a special train was chartered to make a high-profile run over the Santa Fes track. These specials were not included in the railroads regular revenue service lineup, but were intended as one-time (and usually one-way) traversals of the railroad. Some of the more notable specials include:* Special: California  Chicago, Illinois (a one-time train that ran in 1895 on behalf of B.P. Cheney, a director of the Santa Fe).* Special: Arizona  Chicago, Illinois (a one-time train that ran in 1904 on behalf of Charles W. Clarke, the son of then-Arizona senator William Andrew Clarke).* B. Jones Special: Los Angeles, California  Chicago, Illinois and on to Forest, Illinois (a one-time, record-breaking train that ran between May 5 to 8, 1923, on behalf of the president of the Point Zinc Company).* Special: Kansas  Chicago, Illinois (a one-time train that ran in 1899 on behalf of P. Huntington).* Lowe Special: Chicago, Illinois  Los Angeles, California (a one-time, record-breaking train that ran in 1903 on behalf of the president of the Company of America).* Nellie Bly Special: San Francisco, California  Chicago, Illinois (a one-time, record-breaking train that ran in 1890 on behalf of Bly, a reporter for the York World newspaper).* Special: Los Angeles, California  Chicago, Illinois (a one-time train that ran in 1900 on behalf of Peacock, vice-president of the Carnegie Steel and Iron Company).* Special: Los Angeles, California  Chicago, Illinois (the most well-known of Santa Fes specials, also known as the Coyote Special, the Death Valley Coyote, and the Death Valley Scotty Special: a one-time, record-breaking train that ran in 1905, essentially as a publicity stunt).* Creek Picnic Special: Kansas  Kansas (a one-time train that took picnickers on a 30-minute trip, at a speed of 14 miles-per-hour, to celebrate the official opening of the line on April 26, 1869).Paint schemes and markingsSteam locomotivesFile:ATSF engine no. 1129.jpg|ATSF #1129, a 2-6-2, made by the Locomotive Works in 1902. It resides in Las Vegas, Mexico and has been there since April 25, 1956.The Santa Fe operated a large and varying fleet of locomotives, most notable of which was the 2-10-2 Santa Fe, originally built for the railroad by Locomotive Works in 1903. The AT&SF would ultimately end-up with the largest fleet of them, at over 300. Aside from the 2-10-2, the Santa Fe rostered virtually every type of locomotive imaginable, including 4-4-2 Atlantics, 2-6-0 Moguls, 2-8-0 Consolidations, 2-8-2 Mikados (or Mikes), 2-10-0 Decapods, 2-6-2 Prairies, 4-8-4 Northerns, 4-6-4 Hudsons, 4-6-2 Pacifics, 4-8-2 Mountains, 2-8-4 Berkshires, and 2-10-4 Santa Fes. The railroad also operatd a fleet of heavy articulated steam locomotives including 2-6-6-2s, 2-8-8-0s, 2-10-10-2s, 2-8-8-2s, and the rare 4-4-6-2 Mallet type.The BNSF operates occasional steam-powered passenger excursion specials for corporate promotional purposes, using Santa Fe 4-8-4 Northern-type locomotive #3751, delivered by Baldwin in 1927 and based near San Bernardino, California. More-modern Santa Fe 4-8-4 #2926, delivered by Baldwin in 1944 and based in Albuquerque, New Mexico, is being restored by the New Mexico Steam Locomotive and Rail Historical Society of Albuquerque, which has expended 55,000 man-hours and $700,000 in donated funds on her restoration since 2000. It is hoped that this locomotive will haul regular steam-powered excursion trains over the 243-mile former AT&SF main line between Albuquerque and Raton, New Mexico, owned by the State of New Mexico since 2007-8, once restoration is complete.Diesel locomotives, passengerFile:ATSF 1.jpg|thumb|300px|right|AT&SF twin-unit diesel-electric locomotive No. 1 stops in Angeles, California wearing its special Golden Olive paint scheme in May 1936.Santa Fes first set of diesel-electric passenger locomotives was placed in service on the Chief in 1936, and consisted of a pair of blunt-nosed units (1800 hp B-B) designated as Nos. 1 and 1A. The upper portion of the sides and ends of the units were painted gold, while the lower section was a dark olive green color; an olive stripe also ran along the sides and widened as it crossed the front of the locomotive.Riveted to the sides of the units were metal plaques bearing a large Indian Head logo, which owed its origin to the 1926 Chief drumhead logo. Super Chief was emblazoned on a plaque located on the front. The rooftop was light slate gray, rimmed by a red pinstripe. This unique combination of colors was referred to as the Golden Olive paint scheme.()() Before entering service, McDonalds General Motors Styling Department augmented the look with the addition of red and blue striping along both the sides and ends of the units in order to enhance their appearance.In a little over a year, the EMC E1 (a new and improved streamlined locomotive) would be pulling the Super Chief and other passenger consists, resplendent in the now-famous Warbonnet paint scheme devised by Knickerbocker of the GM Art and Color Section. Its design is protected under , granted on November 9, 1937. It is reminiscent of a Native American ceremonial headdress. The scheme consisted of a red bonnet which wrapped around the front of the unit and was bordered by a yellow stripe and black pinstripe. The extent of the bonnet varied according to the locomotive model, and was largely determined by the shape and length of the carbody. The remainder of the unit was either painted silver or was composed of stainless-steel panels.All units wore a nose emblem consisting of an elongated yellow Circle and Cross emblem with integral tabs on the nose and the sides, outlined and accented with black pinstripes, with variances according to the locomotive model. SANTA FE was displayed on the horizontal limb of the cross in black, Deco-style lettering. This emblem has come to be known as the band due to its uncanny resemblance to the same. On all but the Erie-built units (which were essentially run as a demonstrator set), U28CGs, U30CGs, and FP45s, a three-part yellow and black stripe ran up the nose behind the band.A Circle and Cross motif (consisting of a yellow field, with red quadrants, outlined in black) was painted around the side windows on as-delivered E1 units. Similar designs were added to E3s, E6s, the DL109/110 locomotive set, and ATSF 1A after it was rebuilt and repainted. The sides of the units typically bore the words SANTA FE in black, 5 or 9high extra extended Railroad Roman letters, as well as the Indian Head logo,()() with a few notable exceptions.Railway identity on diesel locomotives in passenger service:Source: Pelouze, Richard W. (1997). Trademarks of the Santa Fe Railway. The Santa Fe Railway Historical and Modeling Society, Inc., Highlands Ranch, Colorado pp. 4750.In later years, Santa Fe adapted the scheme to its gas-electric doodlebug units.() The standard for all of Santa Fes passenger locomotives, the Warbonnet is considered by many to be the most recognized corporate logo in the railroad industry. Early in the Amtrak Era, Santa Fe embarked on a program to paint over the red bonnet on its F units that were still engaged in hauling passenger consists with yellow (also called Yellowbonnets) or dark blue (nicknamed Bluebonnets), as it no longer wanted to project the image of a passenger carrier.File:ATSF 358 GE U28CG San Diego CA 1968.jpg|A U28CG displays a variation in the standard Warbonnet passenger scheme. Note that the Santa Fe logotype is displayed in large, red billboard-style letters and the lack of yellow and black striping.|Santa Fe #95, an FP45 decked out in Warbonnet colors, including the traditional cigar band nose emblem. Its as-delivered paint job had SANTA FE in black, 9-high Railroad Roman letters along each side.Diesel locomotives, freightlocomotives used as switchers between 1935 and 1960 were painted black, with just a thin white or silver horizontal accent stripe (the sills were painted similarly). The letters A.T.& S.F. were applied in a small font centered on the sides of the unit, as was the standard blue and white Santa Fe box logo. After War II, diagonal white or silver stripes were added to the ends and cab sides to increase the visibility at grade crossings (typically referred to as the Zebra Stripe scheme). A.T.& S.F. was now placed along the sides of the unit just above the accent stripe, with the blue and white Santa Fe box logo below.Due to the lack of abundant water sources in the American desert, the Santa Fe was among the first railroads to receive large numbers of streamlined diesel locomotives for use in freight service, in the form of the FT. For the first group of FTs, delivered between December, 1940 and March, 1943 (#100#119) the railroad selected a color scheme consisting of dark blue accented by a pale yellow stripe up the nose, and pale yellow highlights around the cab and along the mesh and framing of openings in the sides of the engine compartment; a thin, red stripe separated the blue areas from the yellow.Because of a labor dispute with the Brotherhood of Locomotive Engineers, who insisted that every cab in a diesel-electric locomotive consist must be manned, FT sets #101-#105 were delivered in A-B-B-B sets, instead of the A-B-B-A sets used by the rest of the Santa Fes FTs. The Santa Fe quickly prevailed in this labor dispute, and FT sets from #106-on were delivered as A-B-B-A sets.The words SANTA FE were applied in yellow in a 5high extended font, and centered on the nose was the Santa Fe box logo (initially consisting of a blue cross, circle, and square painted on a solid bronze sheet, but subsequently changed to baked steel sheets painted bronze with the blue identifying elements applied on top). Three thin, pale yellow stripes (known as Cat Whiskers) extended from the nose logo around the cab sides. In January, 1951, Santa Fe revised the scheme to consist of three yellow stripes running up the nose, with the addition of a blue and yellow Cigar Band (similar in size and shape to that applied to passenger units); the blue background and elongated yellow SANTA FE lettering were retained.The years 1960 to 1972 saw non-streamlined freight locomotives sporting the Billboard color scheme (sometimes referred to as the Bookends, or Pinstripe scheme), wherein the units were predominantly dark blue with yellow ends and trim, with a single yellow accent pinstripe. The words Santa Fe were applied in yellow in a large serif Black font (logotype) to the sides of the locomotive below the accent stripe (save for yard switchers which displayed the SANTA FE in small yellow letters above the accent stripe, somewhat akin to the Zebra Stripe arrangement).File:Santa_Fe_loco.jpg |A museum restoration of Copper Corporation #103 (an Alco model RS-2) now bears the #2098 and the ATSF Zebra Stripe paint scheme.File:ATSF DL in Kansas.jpg|Santa Fe #103, and FT unit decorated in the Cat Whiskers scheme, receives service during War II.From 1972 to 1996, and even on into the BNSF era, the company adopted a new paint scheme often known among railfans as the Yellowbonnet, which placed more yellow on the locomotives (reminiscent of the companys retired Warbonnet scheme); the goal again was to ensure higher visibility at grade crossings. The truck assemblies, previously colored black, now received silver paint.In June, 1989, Santa Fe resurrected the Warbonnet and applied the scheme in a modified fashion to two FP45 units, #5992 and #5998 (this time, displaying Santa Fe in large, billboard-style red letters across the side). The units were re-designated as #101 and #102 and reentered service on July 4, 1989 as part of the new Super Fleet (the first Santa Fe units to be so decorated for freight service). The six remaining FP45 units were thereafter similarly repainted and renumbered. From that point forward, all new locomotives wore red and silver, and many retained this scheme after the Burlington Northern Santa Fe merger: some with BNSF displayed across their sides.For the initial deliveries of factory-new Super Fleet equipment, the Santa Fe took delivery of the GP60M, GP60B and General Electric B40-8W, which made the Santa Fe the only US I railroad to operate new 4-axle (B-B) freight locomotives equipped with the American Safety Cab. These units were intended for high-speed intermodal service, but, toward the final days of the Santa Fe, could be found working local trains and branchline assignments.File:ATSF 681.jpg|Santa Fe #681 in Sealy Texas, June 2001Several experimental and commemorative paint schemes emerged during the Santa Fes diesel era. One combination was developed and partially implemented in anticipation of a merger between the parent companies of the Santa Fe and Southern Pacific (SP) railroads in 1984. The red, yellow, and black paint scheme (with large red block letters SF on the sides and ends of the units) of the proposed Pacific Santa Fe Railroad (SPSF) has come to be somewhat derisively known among railfans as the Kodachrome livery, due to the similarity in colors to the boxes containing slide film sold by the Kodak Company under the same name (Kodachrome film was one of the preferred brands in use by railfans). A common joke among railfans is that SPSF really stands for Shouldnt Paint So Fast. Though the merger application was subsequently denied by the ICC, locomotives bearing this color scheme can still be found occasionally in lease service.Ferry serviceThe Santa Fe maintained and operated a fleet of three passenger ferry boats (the San Pablo, the San Pedro, and the Ocean Wave) that connected Richmond, California with San Francisco by water. The ships traveled the eight miles between the San Francisco Ferry Terminal and the railroads Point Richmond terminal across San Francisco Bay. The service was originally established as a continuation of the companys named passenger train runs such as the Angel and the Saint. The larger two ships (the San Pablo and the San Pedro) carried Harvey Company dining facilities.The rival Pacific Railroad owned the worlds largest ferry fleet (which was subsidized by other railroad activities), at its peak carrying 40 million passengers and 60 million vehicles annually aboard 43 vessels. Santa Fe discontinued ferry service in 1933 due to the effects of the Depression and routed their trains to Southern Pacifics ferry terminal in Oakland. The Francisco  Oakland Bay Bridge opened in 1936, initiated a slow decline in demand for SPs ferry service, which was eventually discontinued circa 1958; starting in 1938, Santa Fe passenger trains terminated near San Pablo Avenue in Oakland/Emeryville, with passengers for San Francisco boarding buses that used the new bridge. See also of San Francisco Bay.Inspiration for Ayn Rands Atlas ShruggedIn 1946 the writer Rand met with Lee Lyles, assistant to the president of the Santa Fe, as part of her research for the novel Shrugged whose plot takes place in a big railway company.The of Ayn Rand, published in 1997 on the basis of notes left after her death, preserve a list of detailed questions which Rand put to Lyles about the companys administrative structure and its practices in various situations and conditions. Later notes in the same journals show that Rand assigned to various characters in her book administrative titles in the books fictional railway company modeled on those in the Santa Fe, and adjusted the actions which they are depicted as taking in various situations on the basis of what Lyles told her would be plausible acts for railway executives in similar situations.(of Ayn Rand, Entries for August 2628, 1946)See also* (SWBLW)* and the railroads* CF7* Corwith Yards, Chicago* L. Gunn* Fe 2926* Fe 3415  A restored Pacific type steam locomotive currently operating on the and Smoky Valley Railroad* Fe 3751  A restored 4-8-4 locomotive* Santa Fe & Disneyland Railroad* County Historical Museum in Borger, Texas* Fe Refrigerator Despatch* SD26* Pacific Santa Fe Railroad* Super C* Railway  The merged company that replaced ATSF Railway.References* Baker Library Historical Collections, Atchison, Topeka and Santa Fe Railroad Records, 18791896. Retrieved May 10, 2005.* * * The Cosmopolitan (February 1893), The Atchison Topeka and Santa Fe. Retrieved May 10, 2005.* * * * * * * * * * * * Pratt School of Engineering, Duke University (2004), Alumni Profiles: W. John Swartz. Retrieved May 11, 2005.* Santa Fe Railroad (1945), Along Your Way, Rand McNally, Chicago, Illinois.* Santa Fe Railroad (November 29, 1942), Atchison, Topeka and Santa Fe Railway System Time Tables, Rand McNally and Company, Chicago, Illinois.* * External links* Along Your Way, 1946 edition* Russell Crumps Santa Fe Archives  a very extensive set of resources for Santa Fe history.* Santa Fe All-Time Steam Roster* Santa Fe Preserved Locomotives* Santa Fe Preserved Passenger Cars* Santa Fe Railway Historical and Modeling Society official website* Diesel Locomotives article from the May 18, 1947 issue of Magazine featuring the Santa Fe fleet.* James William Steele. Rand, McNally & Co.s new overland guide to the Pacific Coast. Chicago: Rand, McNally & Co., 1888. Illustrated guide to the Santa Fe trip circa 1888.* Encyclopedia of Oklahoma History and Culture  Atchison, Topeka, and Santa Fe RailwayTopeka and Santa Fe RailwayAtchison, Topeka y Santa FeTopeka and Santa Fe RailwayTopeka and Santa Fe RailwayTopeka and Santa Fe RailwayTopeka and Santa Fe Railwayja:Topeka and Santa Fe RailwayTopeka and Santa Fe RailwayTopeka and Santa Fe RailwayTopeka and Santa Fe Railway
730669
OHiggins_Region
 iso_code                 CL-LIThe VI OHiggins Region () is one of Chiles 15 first order divisions. It is subdivided into three provinces. It is named in honour of Bernardo OHiggins Riquelme, one of Chiles fathers.The OHiggins Region is bordered to the west by the Ocean, to the east by the of Argentina, to the north by the Valparaso and Santiago Metropolitan Regions, and to the south by the Region. It extends approximately between the parallels of 3351 and 3501 south latitude, and between the meridian of 7002 west longitude and the Pacific Ocean.The capital and largest city of the region is Rancagua. The second major town is San Fernando.GeographyIn pre-Quaternary times extensive Nothofagus forests covered much of OHiggins Region.(Thomas T. Veblen, Robert S. Hill and Jennifer Read (1996) The Ecology and Biogeography of Nothofagus Forests, Yale University Press, 403 pages  ISBN 0-300-06423-3)The OHiggins Region is part of the very restricted range of the endangered Wine Palm, chilensis; in prehistoric times this Chilean endemic tree had a significantly larger range.(C. Michael Hogan (2008) Chilean Wine Palm: Jubaea chilensis, GlobalTwitcher.com, ed. Nicklas Stromberg)HistoryFrom 9000 BCE to 300 BCE (the Archaic Period), the humans who inhabited the region moved between the coast and the valley as well as the Andes. At sites such as Pichilemu, Chuil and Bucalemu, they left trash deposits or shell middens bearing testimony to their raids . During the Period (300 BCE - 1470 CE), the inhabitants experienced changes in their way of life, the most important being the cultivation of vegetables and the manufacture of clay objects. From 600 CE onwards, they started cultivating beans, maize, squashes, pumpkins and Quinoa. All of these except Quinoa and some types of maize required irrigation, which prompted them to move to the banks of creeks and rivers. During this period, groups of people lived in Quincha houses with straw roofs, in the vicinity of irrigation channels and horticulture crops, a style of life attributable to the Promaucaes or Picunches and to the Chiquillanes. During the Colonial Period (1541 CE to 1811 CE), the region became dominated, like the rest of the country, by the Spanish, and a system of ranching became predominant .DemographyThe OHiggins region contains a large part of the rural population (surpassed only by the Region). Amongst the highly populated cities, Rancagua (206,971 inhabitants) stands out for having been transformed, in recent times, into an outskirt of Santiago. It is close being located 87 km south of Santiago. It is the capital of the Province as well the OHiggins Region. According to the census of 2002,(Chile: Proyecciones y Estimaciones de Poblacin. Total Pas 1950-2050 Instituto National de Estadsticas (INE)) other densely populated cities are: San Fernando (49,519 inhabitants); Rengo (30,891); Machal (23,920); Graneros (21,616); Vicente de Tagua Tagua (18,914); Santa Cruz (18,603); Chimbarongo (13,795); Francisco de Mostazal (12,037); and Pichilemu (9,027) a well-known beach resort city founded by Ross Edwards in the late 19th century.EconomyThe main industrial and export activity takes place at CODELCOs Teniente mine, which contributes 7.7% of Chiles copper production. The ore is processed at the Sewell and Coln concentrator plants, smelted and refined at Caletones, and shipped from the port of San Antonio, in the Valparaso Region. Byproducts include molybdenum and silver.Agriculture contributes 30.1% of the regions GDP. One out of every four hectares of fruit orchards in Chile is in the OHiggins Region. The main crops are apples and pears, followed by table grapes, plums, kiwis, and nectarines.Manufacturing activity in the region is mostly related to mining, agribusiness, and food and beverages. One particular growth area is the production of fruit juices and pulp, and dehydrated fruit.Over the past few years, there has been significant development in the forestry sector, especially plantations of eucalyptus and radiata pine.Law and GovernmentThe region is governed by an intendant, whois appointed by the president. Moises Saravia is the current intendant (2011).The administration of the region rests with the regional government, which is headed by the intendant and the regional council (Consejo Regional de Chile). The latter comprises sixteen regional administrators, who are elected indirectly (ten from Cachapoal, four from Colchagua, and two from Cardenal Caro).Administrative divisionsFor purposes of interior administration, the OHiggins region is divided into three provinces:* Province, capital: Rancagua,* Province, capital: San Fernando,* Caro Province, capital: Pichilemu.The provinces are subdivided into 33 communes.{| cellpadding4 cellspacing0 stylealign:center; margin: 0.5em 1em 0.5em 0; background: #f9f9f9; border: 1px #aaa solid; border-collapse: collapse; font-size: 95%; width70% aligncenter|-!colspan2|Politico-administrative divisions of the OHiggins Region|-|width75%||width25% aligncenter||}CultureThis area is known as the huaso province after the name of the Chilean cowboy, the huaso. Sashes and mantas  traditional items of the huaso costume  are woven in Doihue on heavy vertical looms. Designs imitate vine leaves, bunches of grapes, pines and copihues. Other designs of colored stripes are woven on horizontal looms.The population is a mixture of both European (including Argentinan immigrants) and Indigenous races and cultures, thus the region has a homogeneous culture known as Chileanidad is present and a mestizo imprint is evident.The OHiggins region had Spanish (most notably are Andalusian, Basque, Aragonese and Navarrese) settlers and other European immigrants in its history. The French and Italian families established agriculture with the key wine industry from their vineyards. Breweries can be found as well to produce beer is the legacy of German and Swiss immigration. Livestock herding was co-founded by some British, Greek and Yugoslavian settlers.The Wine Route is one of the main tourist attractions of the valley and has resulted in an important economic revival.In the late 19th century, a small number of Cherokee and Oklahoman settlers of American Indian descent from Territory, USA came to the OHiggins region by the Chilean government. The Cherokee were displaced by white Anglo settlement in Oklahoma at the time, so they accept an offer to settle in Chile, then founded a cooperative farm (1880s) Ovasso an language word for the end or edge. The farm settlement was abandoned from lack of successful farm production.  There is quite a small colony of Aartis or Artas, East Indians descended from hired rail workers came from then India in the early 20th century. The Artas are from a Hindi language word for shining cloth that was wore over their bodies during Hindu religious rites, but they rather call themselves desis.  Due to a relatively close distance to Santiago, a more urban influence has been present in the local culture. The largest city, Rancagua is fast-becoming a suburb of Santiagos upper-class professional workforce. Regional FestivalsAnniversariesDateEnglish NameSpanish NameNotes12 OctoberDisaster of RancaguaDesastre de RancaguaIn memory of the Battleof Rancagua which occurred in 1814ReferencesExternal links*The Libertador Bernardo OHiggins Region at the Chilean government website * Regional government of the OHiggins Region *VI.cl: Portal de la Sexta Regin (Portal for the Sixth Region) *Pichilemus official website OHiggins()dOHigginsOHigginsda:OHiggins-regionendel Libertador General Bernardo OHigginsdel Libertador General Bernardo OHigginsGeneral Bernardo OHigginseskualdeadu Libertador General Bernardo OHigginsde OHigginsdi OHigginsdel Libertador General Bernardo OHiggins()Libertatoris Ducis Bernardi OHigginiiGenerolo Bernardo OHiginso regionasGeneral Bernardo OHigginsja:no:OHigginspl:Libertadorde OHigginsdel Libertador General Bernardo OHigginssuyu()of OHigginsde OHigginsblgesi Rehiyon han Libertador General Bernardo OHigginszh:
733200
Abitibi-Tmiscamingue
thumb|250px|Map of Quebec showing Abitibi-TmiscamingueAbitibi-Tmiscamingue is a region located in western Quebec, Canada, along the border with Ontario. It became part of the province in 1898. It has a land area of 57,674.26 km2 (22,268.16 sq mi). As of the 2006 census, the population of the region was 143,872 inhabitants.HistoryThe land was first occupied about 8,000 years ago by the Algonquins. The first land expeditions were made in 1670 by Radisson as part of the development of the trade industry across the Bay region and through most of the France colony. Tmiscamingue, located on the east banks of Timiskaming and erected by a French merchant on Anicinabeg lands in 1720, was an important crossroads of the fur trade along the Hudson Bay trading route. Until 1868, Abitibi was owned by the Bay Company; it was then purchased by Canada and became part of the North-West Territories. After negotiations with the federal government of Sir Laurier, Abitibi was annexed to the province of Quebec on June 13, 1898 by a federal decree. For its part, Tmiscamingue had been part of Canada and so was already part of Quebec at Confederation.The region started to develop during the late 19th and early 20th century, with the development of agriculture and forest industries. This began in the southern areas, leading to the foundation of Ville-Marie in 1886 and Tmiscaming in 1918. However, the greatest wave of colonization occurred between War I and War II when a large population came from urban centres due to the effects of the Depression. In the 30s, federal and provincial plans such as the Plan Vautrin and the Plan Gordon incited jobless residents to move to undeveloped regions of the province, igniting the beginning of the second colonization flow.The first migration flow brought people to the northern part of the region along the Transcontinental Railway, leading to the establishment of towns such as La Sarre in 1917 and Amos in 1914, as well as other infrastructure as the internment camp at Spirit Lake for so-called enemy aliens arrested under the Measures Act during World War I. The mining industry, mainly extracting gold and copper, also contributed to the growth of the region when numerous mines were opened. New cities were created, such as Rouyn-Noranda in 1926 and Val-dOr in 1934, and mining is still the backbone of the regions economy nowadays, along with forestry and agriculture.GeographyThe Abitibi-Tmiscamingue region is the fourth largest region of the province after the Nord-du-Qubec, Cte-Nord and Saguenay-Lac-Saint-Jean regions. It has a total area of 65,000 km2. Its largest cities are Rouyn-Noranda and Val-dOr.The regions landscape features forest to the south across the Tmiscamingue area while forest covers the northern section.The region, like more southerly regions, has a humid climate, but has much higher temperature variations due to its latitude and its proximity to Bay and the Arctic.National parkNational Park, the only national park of the region, is located in the centre of the Abitibian region and intents to protect natural heritage.EconomyThe regions workforce has one of the highest percentages in the primary sector of any region of Quebec, with near one out of six employees working in that sector. The mining sector is the most important economic activity of the region. Despite recent declines in workforce, the agriculture and forest industries still contribute significantly to the regions economy.Economic activities are mainly dedicated to exportation products, and are even closely linked to the Middle North region in its development through hydroelectrical and mining projects, and through exchanges with First Nation northern communities.Sportive tourism, including winter sports, fishing, hunting and cycling competition, is also a significant economic sector even if negligible by comparison with industrial sector.Colleges and universitiesUniversityThe region is home to one university: UQAT - the du Qubec en Abitibi-Tmiscamingue, which is part of the Quebec public university network. UQAT has its main campus at Rouyn-Noranda, a campus dedicated to the first nations at Val-dOr and several branches in different cities of the region.CollegeThe only college in the region is the Cgep de lAbitibi-Tmiscamingue, which has campuses in Amos, Rouyn-Noranda and Val-dOr, and centres for continuing education in Ville-Marie and La Sarre.Architecture and urban planningBecause of its history and its development, the regional urban planning and the architectural landscape is quite rich in contrasts, showing two main typologies of development.Rural and agricultural settlementThe agricultural development of northern Abitibi and the northern part of Tmiscamingue by a relatively homogeneous population of French Canadian Catholic settlers has introduced a mainly rural land development. There, small towns, gravitating around a low density node generally composed of a wooden Roman Catholic church, an elementary school and few houses spread over the territory, according to an orthogonal division on the land, with rectangular parcels. Those small towns are gravitating themselves around a larger city, as La Sarre, Amos, Macamic and Ville-Marie, where major institutional equipments are established. If small towns might seem more or less vernacular, major cities are often more planned and influenced by Anglo-Saxon urban planning, with sometime an orthogonal grid with lane network.Because of their central location, main architectural elements are also on those cities. For instance, the Cathedral of Sainte-Thrse dAvila in Amos is one of the most outstanding architectural element of the region by its size and its Romano-Byzantine style, standing on the upper part of the city, and being at a symbolic central location of the region. However, if the cityscapes are often more various, the rural landscape features more local particularities. The wooden farms and barns built according to many vernacular forms, the fieldstone churches and the wooden houses with locally so-called Canadian Roof (steep roof ending with long curved overhang covering a front balcony) are widespread.thumb|300px|right|Ukrainian church in Val-dOrBoomtowns and industrial citiesThe cities of Southern Abitibi and the city of Tmiscaming were established later and for industrial concerns, and follow a quite different organization. As they grew up often very quickly, the urban planning of these industrial cities is often eclectic. The initial boroughs of Val-dOr and Rouyn-Noranda, for instance, are both built according to two different schemes; an industrial and planned borough built and planned by the mine, and a boomtown borough built suddenly with minimal planning for the thousands of people who arrived attracted by the effervescence of the gold rush. Bourlamaque mining village is a remarkable example of a borough planned by the mine still visible today in Val-dOr, with its log houses for workers orderly settled between the mine and the commercial streets, this, at a glace from the foremens houses and the hospital.Noranda was also built according to that scheme, however, the other great example of an industrial town is Tmiscaming. The Tmiscaming Garden City plan, designed by Scottish architect Thomas Adams (18711940) is a rare example in Quebec of a mono-industrial city where a company planned and endeavoured to grant comfort of its workers. There, the dwellings, and even the plan, which follows the shape of the hill, was not alone to grant this comfort, elements as Italian renaissance fountain, landscaping were also included into the cityscape.Those cities, and many other industrial cities of that part of the region, contrast with the rest of the region, and even generally with the other country regions of Quebec. As the mining industry was mainly led by owners coming from the anglosphere in the early 20th century, industrial towns even show more similarities with Ontarian industrial cities than other cities in Quebec. Added to North American modernity concerns of the 30s and 40s, streets are broader and often have numbered names, blocks are orthogonally organized with lanes where boomtown buildings with their peculiar facades are aligned along the main streets while residential buildings take place nearby. Many mining cities disappeared or have decreased since, but their industrial core often keep being seenable today. Duparquet and Cadillac, for example, have kept their boomtown appearance, through their street organization, even if the industrial and population exodus gave them a look of oversized village.Moreover, the multi-cultural settlement of those towns brought many singular architectural elements. The Russian Orthodox and Catholic Ukrainian churches in Val-dOr and Rouyn add to the omnipresent architectural eclecticism. Nowadays, confronted with urban sprawl, those cities tend to develop in a very low density and functionalistic way, as other Quebec and North American cities. Some great buildings dominate the architectural landscape, as the Rouyn-Noranda campus of the Universit du Qubec, which could be seen by many aspects as the greatest element of contemporary architecture of the region.SportsThe region hosts the yearly Tour de lAbitibi, which first took place in 1969, and which is still the only North American stopover point of the Cycling Union Junior World Cup. Abitibi-Tmiscamingue also hosts a long segment of the Verte, the most extensive bicycle and multiuse recreational trail in America.(http://www.routeverte.com/rv/ang/index.lasso)No professional league sports teams are based in Abitibi. It is home to two Major Junior Hockey League teams: the Foreurs and the Huskies. Subdivisions  Regional county municipalities * Abitibi* Abitibi-Ouest* La Valle-de-lOr* Tmiscamingue Independent city * Rouyn-Noranda Indian reserves * Kebaowek* Lac-Simon* Pikogan* TimiskamingMajor communities*Amos*La Sarre*Macamic*Malartic*Rouyn-Noranda*Senneterre*Tmiscaming*Val-dOr*Ville-MarieSee also* City of gold gold mine museum* American Palladium References (External links*Portail de lAbitibi-Tmiscamingue Official website* Profile of the regionca:Abitibi-Tmiscaminguede:Abitibi-Tmiscaminguees:Abitibi-Tmiscamingueeo:Abitibio-Temiskamingioeu:Abitibi-Tmiscaminguefr:Abitibi-Tmiscamingueit:Abitibi-Tmiscaminguela:Abitibi-Tmiscamingueja:no:Abitibi-Tmiscaminguepl:Abitibi-Tmiscaminguept:Abitibi-Tmiscamingue sv:Abitibi-Tmiscamingueuk:-
735637
Preov
File:Nabrezie Torysy Presov.jpg|thumb|right|Torysa riverbank in PreovPreov ( is a city in eastern Slovakia. It is the seat of the administrative Region (). With a population of approximately 100,000, it is the third-largest city in the country.Historically, the city has been known in German as Eperies (between 1938 and 1945 also Preschau),  Eperjes in Hungarian, Fragopolis in Latin, Preszw in Polish, Peryeshis in Romany,  (Pryashev)  in Russian and  (Priashiv) in Rusyn and Ukrainian.CharacteristicsThe city is a showcase of Baroque, Rococo and architecture. In the historical center, the main street is lined with churches and other buildings built in these styles.  In the suburbs, however, the Soviet influence is clearly evident through the massive concrete apartment buildings (the panelky) of the Sdlisk (housing estates) and the Sekov district. More Soviet-style architecture is seen in the government buildings near the city center.Significant industries in the city include mechanical and electrical engineering companies and the clothing industry. Solivary, the only salt mining and processing company in Slovakia, also operates in the city. The city is a seat of a Greek Catholic metropolitan see.Many concerts, operas, operettas and stage plays are performed at the new building of the Jon Zborsk Theatre (Divadlo Jona Zborskho), as well as at the older theatre premises.The city and the region were contenders for Capital of Culture 2013.(See Presov 2013 website)HistoryHabitation in the area around Preov dates as far back as the Paleolithic period. The oldest discovered tools and mammoth bones are 28,000 years old. Continuous settlement dates back to the 8th century.The first record of a school dates from 1429. In 1572, salt mining began in Solivar (at that time a nearby town, now part of Presov). Preovs increased importance meant that in 1647 it became the seat of the (ari) county.Vrani, a Croatian() prelate, writer, diplomat and of Esztergom, died in Preov in 1573.In 1667 the important Evangelic Lutheran College of Eperjes was established by Lutherans in the town. In 1687 twenty-four prominent citizens and noblemen were executed for supporting the uprising of Thkly.At the beginning of the 18th century, the population was decimated by the plague and fires and was reduced to a mere 2,000 inhabitants. By the second half of the century, however, the town had recovered; crafts and trade improved, and new factories were built. In 1752 the salt mine in Solivar was flooded. Since then salt has been extracted from salt brine through boiling.In 1870 the first railway was built. This was a line connecting the town to Koice. At the end of the 19th century, the town introduced electricity, telephone, telegraph and a sewage systems. In 1887 fire destroyed a large part of the town. In 1920, after the of Trianon, Eperjes became part of the newly created Czechoslovakia as Preov. During War II, the nearby town of Koice again became part of Hungary as a result of the Vienna Award. As a result, many institutions moved from Koice to Preov, thus increasing the towns importance. In 1944, a professional Slovak Theatre was established in Preov.After 1948, during the Communist era in Czechoslovakia, Preov became an industrial center. The population increased rapidly from 28,000 in 1950 to 52,000 in 1970 and 91,000 in 1990.GeographyPreov lies at an altitude of  above sea level and covers an area of .() It is located in the north-eastern Slovakia, at the northern reaches of the Basin, at the confluence of the Torysa River with its tributary Sekov.  Mountain ranges nearby include vrchy (south-east), vrchovina (south-west), Bachure (west) and ergov (north). The neighbouring city of Koice is  to the south. Preov is about  south of the Polish border,  north of the Hungarian border and is some  northeast of Bratislava (by road).ClimatePreov lies in the north temperate zone and has a climate with four distinct seasons. It is characterized by a significant variation between hot summers and cold, snowy winters.dateAugust 2010Demographicsdm.jpg|thumb|right|Concathedral in Preov Presov 0858.jpg|thumb|right|Neptunes fountain on the Hlavn ulica (Main Street) in PreovIn 1910 Preov had a population of 16,323, of which 7976 were Hungarians, 6494 Slovaks and 1404 Germans. In addition there were 170 Roma, 47 Rusyns, 4 Croatians, 2 Serbs and 226 others.Preov had a population of 91,621 in 2005. According to the 2001 census, 93.7% of the inhabitants were Slovaks, 1.4% Roma, 1.2% Rusyns, 1.1% Ukrainians, 0.8% Czechs, and 0.2% Hungarians. The religious make-up was 66.8% Catholics, 13.6% people with no religious affiliation, 8.9% Greek Catholics, 4.8% Lutherans and 1.68% Orthodox.(Before War II Preov also had a large Jewish population and housed a major Jewish museum. Plaques in the town hall and a memorial in the surviving synagogue record that 6,400 Jews were deported from the town under the Tiso government of the Slovak Republic to the camps run by the Nazi regime of Germany.EducationInstitutions of tertiary education in the city are the of Preov with 12,549 students, including 867 doctoral students,() and the private Business College ISM Slovakia in Preov, with 455 students.() In addition, the Faculty of Manufacturing Technologies of the University of Koice is based in the city.There are 15 public schools, six private primary schools and two religious primary schools.() Overall, they enroll 9,079 pupils.( The citys system of education consists of 10 gymnasia with 3,675 students,() 4 specialized schools with 5,251 students() and 11 schools with 5,028 students.()()Hiking trails* walking route E8** Preov - Mihov - Kurimka - Dukla - Iwonicz-Zdrj  Rymanw-Zdrj - Puawy  Tokarnia (778 m)  Kamie (717 m)  Komacza - Cisna - Grne - Tarnica - Woosate.See also* of people from Preov* ari Brewery* Court of PreovInternational relationsTwin towns  Sister citiesPreov is twinned with:References* Official History of Preov* Preov town hall (July 2002), Preov - city profile.  Retrieved in June 2004 from http://www.pis.sk/jpis/obsah/html/presov_profile.htm.Bibliography*NotesExternal links* Webpage of the town* DPMP - Public Transport Official Site* Preov information from Slovakia.org* Video about Preovar:be-x-old:bg:cs:Preovda:Preovde:Preovet:Preovel:es:Preoveo:Preovfr:Preovhr:Preovid:Preovit:Preovhe:ka:la:Epurieslv:Preovalt:Preovasli:Preov(Szlovkia)mk:nl:Preovja:frr:Preovno:Preovnn:Preovpnb:pl:Preszwpt:Preovro:Preovrue:ru:simple:Preovsk:Preovsr:fi:Preovsv:Preovuk:vi:Preovvo:Preovwar:Preovzh:
737651
Yarrambat,_Victoria
Diamond CreekYarrambat is  a locality within Melbourne beyond the Melbourne metropolitan area Urban Growth Boundary ( Urban Growth Boundary map ) 32.5 km north-east from Melbournes central business district. Its Local Government Area is the of Nillumbik. At the 2006 Census, Yarrambat had a population of 1496.HistoryProminent as a gold mining area in the late 1800s, much of the land was surveyed and cleared for farming once the mining boom subsided. The Post Office opened on 1 March 1910 as Tancks Corner and was renamed Yarrambat around 1928. ()TodayRecently land has been allowed to be subdivided into 1 hectare allotments by the of Nillumbik and large prestige homes dot the landscape. Yarrambat has become one of Melbournes affluent north eastern suburbs due to many of its properties being constructed on large allotments within relatively close proximity to the city. It contains a post office, veterinarian clinic, child minding centre, recreation reserve, war memorial, a primary school called Yarrambat Primary School, a private school, general store and CFA fire station, as well as a railway museum. Golfers play at the Yarrambat Park Golf Course on Yan Yean Road.() In 1978, Yarrambat celebrated its centenary including a festival at the primary school, which at that time was adjacent to the main T-intersection (which has been referred to as Tancks Corner). The school was relocated to new buildings in the 1980s. Further upgrades (in excess of $3 million (AUD)) to the school have occurred during 2007, the most prominent feature being 5 open plan classrooms, office redevelopment and a gymnasium (3/4 size basketball court). The school has spent significant time and effort into developing Inquiry Based Learning.The Yarrambat-Plenty Little Athletics Club Competes as part of the Diamond Valley Little Athletics Centre.ReferencesExternal links
738736
Uruguayan_Air_Force_Flight_571
 Survivors  16Uruguayan Air Force Flight 571, also known as the Andes flight disaster, and in South America as Miracle in the Andes (El Milagro de los Andes) was a chartered flight carrying 45 people, including a rugby team, their friends, family and associates that crashed in the Andes on October 13, 1972. More than a quarter of the passengers died in the crash, and several more quickly succumbed to cold and injury. Of the 29 who were alive a few days after the accident, another eight were killed by an avalanche that swept over their shelter in the wreckage. The last 16 survivors were rescued on December 23, 1972, more than two months after the crash.The survivors had little food and no source of heat in the harsh conditions at over  altitude. Faced with starvation and radio news reports that the search for them had been abandoned, the survivors fed on the dead passengers who had been preserved in the snow. Rescuers did not learn of the survivors until 72 days after the crash when passengers Parrado and Canessa, after a 10-day trek across the Andes, found a Chilean huaso, who gave them food and then alerted authorities about the existence of the other survivors.The crash On the 13th of October, 1972, a Uruguayan Air Force twin turboprop FH-227D was flying over the Andes carrying Christians Club union team from Montevideo, Uruguay, to play a match in Santiago, Chile.  The trip had begun the day before, when the Fairchild departed from International Airport, but inclement mountain weather forced an overnight stop in Mendoza. At the Fairchilds ceiling of , the plane could not fly directly from Mendoza, over the Andes, to Santiago, in large part because of the weather. Instead, the pilots had to fly south from Mendoza parallel to the Andes, then turn west towards the mountains, fly through a low pass (Planchon), cross the mountains and emerge on the Chilean side of the Andes south of Curico before finally turning north and initiating descent to Santiago after passing Curico.  After resuming the flight on the afternoon of October 13, the plane was soon flying through the pass in the mountains. The pilot then notified air controllers in Santiago that he was over Curic, Chile, and was cleared to descend. That proved to be a fatal error. Since the pass was covered by the clouds, the pilots had to rely on the usual time required to cross the pass (reckoning). However, they failed to take into account strong headwinds that ultimately slowed the plane and increased the time required to complete the crossing. They were not as far west as they thought they were and, as a result, the turn and descent were initiated too soon, before the plane had passed through the mountains, leading to a flight into terrain.Dipping into the cloud cover while still over the mountains, the Fairchild soon crashed on an unnamed peak (later called Cerro Seler, also known as Glaciar de las Lgrimas or Glacier of Tears), located between Cerro Sosneado and Volcn Tinguiririca, straddling the remote mountainous border between Chile and Argentina. The plane clipped the peak at , neatly severing the right wing, which was thrown back with such force that it cut off the stabilizer, leaving a gaping hole in the rear of the fuselage. The plane then clipped a second peak which severed the left wing and left the plane as just a fuselage flying through the air. One of the propellers sliced through the fuselage as the wing it was attached to was severed. The fuselage hit the ground and slid down a steep mountain slope before finally coming to rest in a snow bank. The location of the crash site is , in the Argentine municipality of Malarge (Department, Province).Early daysthumb|right|250px|Survivors amongst the wreckageOf the 45 people on the plane, 12 died in the crash or shortly thereafter; another five had died by the next morning, and one more succumbed to injuries on the eighth day. The remaining 27 faced severe difficulties in surviving high in the freezing mountains. Many had suffered injuries from the crash, including broken legs from the aircrafts seats piling together. The survivors lacked equipment such as cold-weather clothing and footwear suitable for the area, mountaineering goggles to prevent blindness (although one of the eventual survivors, 24-year-old Adolfo Fito Strauch, devised a couple of sunglasses by using the sun visors in the pilots cabin which helped protect their eyes from the sun). They lacked any kind of medical supplies, and the death of Dr. Francisco Nicola left a first and a second year medical students  who had survived the crash in charge to improvise splints and braces with salvaged parts of what remained of the aircraft.The searchSearch parties from three countries looked for the missing plane. However, since the plane was white, it blended in with the snow, making it virtually invisible from the sky. The initial search was cancelled after eight days. The survivors of the crash had found a small transistor radio on the plane and Roy Harley first heard the news that the search was cancelled on their 11th day on the mountain. Paul Read in The Story of the Andes Survivors (a text based upon interviews with the survivors) described the moments after this discoveryAnthropophagyThe survivors had a small amount of food: a few chocolate bars, assorted snacks and several bottles of wine. During the days following the crash they divided out this food in very small amounts so as not to exhaust their meager supply. Fito also devised a way to melt snow into water by using metal from the seats and placing snow on it. The snow then melted in the sun and dripped into empty wine bottles.Even with this strict rationing, their food stock dwindled quickly. Furthermore, there was no natural vegetation or animals on the snow-covered mountain. The group thus survived by collectively making a decision to eat flesh from the bodies of their dead comrades, beginning with the pilot. This decision was not taken lightly, as most were classmates or close friends. In his 2006 book, in the Andes: 72 Days on the Mountain and My Long Trek Home, Parrado comments on this decision:All of the passengers were Catholic. According to Read, some equated the act of cannibalism to the ritual of Holy Communion. Others initially had reservations, though after realizing that it was their only means of staying alive, changed their minds a few days later.AvalancheEight of the initial survivors subsequently died on the morning of October 29 when an avalanche cascaded down on them as they slept in the fuselage. For three days they survived in an appallingly confined space since the plane was buried under several feet of snow. Nando Parrado was able to poke a hole in the roof of the fuselage with a metal pole, providing ventilation.Hard decisionsBefore the avalanche, a few of the survivors became insistent that their only means of survival would be to climb over the mountains themselves and search for help. Because of the co-pilots assertion that the plane had passed Curico, the group assumed that the Chilean countryside was just a few miles away to the west. In actuality, the plane had crashed inside Argentina, and unknown to the survivors, just 18 miles west of an abandoned hotel named the Hotel Termas Sosneado. Several brief expeditions were made in the immediate vicinity of the plane in the first few weeks after the crash, but the expeditionaries found that a combination of altitude sickness, dehydration, snow blindness, malnourishment and the extreme cold of the nights made climbing any significant distance an impossible task. Therefore it was decided that a group of expeditionaries would be chosen, and then allocated the most rations of food and the warmest of clothes, and spared the daily manual labor around the crash site that was essential for the groups survival, so that they might build their strength. Although several survivors were determined to be on the expedition team no matter what, including Nando Parrado and Canessa, one of the two medical students, others were less willing or unsure of their ability to withstand such a physically exhausting ordeal. From the rest of the passengers, Numa Turcatti and Antonio Vizintin were chosen to accompany Canessa and Parrado. At Canessas urging, the expeditionaries waited nearly seven weeks, to allow for the arrival of spring, and with it higher temperatures. Although the expeditionaries were hoping to get to Chile, a large mountain lay due west of the crash site, blocking any effort made to walk in that direction. Therefore the expeditionaries initially headed east, hoping that at some point the valley that they were in would do a U-turn and allow them to start walking west. After several hours of walking east, the trio unexpectedly found the tail section of the plane, which was still largely intact. Within and surrounding the tail were numerous suitcases that had belonged to the passengers, containing cigarettes, candy, clean clothing and even some comic books. The group decided to camp there that night inside the tail section, and continue east the next morning. However, on the second night of the expedition, which was their first night sleeping outside exposed to the elements, the group nearly froze to death. After some debate the next morning, they decided that it would be wiser to return to the tail, remove the planes batteries and bring them back to the fuselage so that they might power up the radio and make an SOS call to Santiago for help.RadioUpon returning to the tail, the trio found that the batteries were too heavy to take back to the fuselage, which lay uphill from the tail section, and they decided instead that the most appropriate course of action would be to return to the fuselage and disconnect the radio system from the planes electrical mainframe, take it back to the tail, connect it to the batteries, and call for help from there. One of the other team members, Roy Harley, was an amateur electronics enthusiast, and they recruited his help in the endeavor. Unknown to any of the team members, was the fact that the planes electrical system used AC, while the batteries in the tail naturally produced DC, making the plan futile from the beginning. After several days of trying to make the radio work back at the tail, the expeditionaries finally gave up, returning to the fuselage with the knowledge that they would in fact have to climb out of the mountains if they were to stand any hope of being rescued.The sleeping bagIt was now apparent that the only way out was to climb over the mountains to the west. However, they also realized that unless they found a way to survive the freezing temperature of the nights, a trek was impossible. It was at this point that the idea for a sleeping bag was raised.In his book, Miracle in the Andes: 72 Days on the Mountain and My Long Trek Home, Nando Parrado would comment 34 years later upon the making of the sleeping bag: After the sleeping bag was completed and another survivor, Numa Turcatti, died from his injuries, the hesitant Canessa was finally persuaded to set out, and the three expeditionaries took to the mountain on December 12.December 12On 12 December 1972, some two months after the crash, Parrado, Canessa and Vizintn began their trek up the mountain. Parrado took the lead, and often had to be called to slow down, though the thin oxygen made it difficult for all of them. It was still bitterly cold but the sleeping bag allowed them to live through the nights. In the film Stranded Canessa called the first night during the ascension, where they had difficulty finding a place to use the sleeping bag, the worst night of his life.  On the third day of the trek, Parrado reached the top of the mountain before the other two expeditionaries. Stretched before him as far as the eye could see were more mountains. In fact, he had just climbed one of the mountains (as high as ) which forms the border between Argentina and Chile, meaning that they were still tens of kilometers from the red valley of Chile. However, after spying a small Y in the distance, he gauged that a way out of the mountains must lie beyond, and refused to give up hope. Knowing that the hike would take more energy than theyd originally planned for, Parrado and Canessa sent Vizintn back to the crash site, as they were rapidly running out of rations. Since the return was entirely downhill, it only took him one hour to get back to the fuselage using a makeshift sled.Finding helpParrado and Canessa hiked for several more days. First, they were able to actually reach the narrow valley that Parrado had seen on the top of the mountain, where they found the bed of Rio Azufre. They followed the river and finally reached the end of the snowline.  Gradually, there appeared more and more signs of human presence, first some signs of camping, and finally on the ninth day, some cows. When they rested that evening, they were very tired and Canessa seemed unable to proceed further. As Parrado was gathering wood to build a fire, Canessa noticed what looked like a man on a horse at the other side of the river, and yelled at the near-sighted Parrado to run down to the banks. At first it seemed that Canessa had been imagining the man on the horse, but eventually they saw three men on horseback. Divided by a river, Nando and Canessa tried to convey their situation, but the noise of the river made communication difficult.  One of the horsemen, a Chilean Huaso named Sergio Catalan, shouted tomorrow. They knew at this point they would be saved and settled to sleep by the river. During the evening dinner, Sergio Catalan discussed what he had seen with the other huasos who were staying in a little summer ranch called Los Maitenes. Someone mentioned that several weeks before, the father of Carlos Paez, who was desperately searching for any possible news about the plane, had asked them about the Andes crash. However, the huasos could not imagine that someone could still be alive. The next day Catalan took some loaves of bread and went back to the river bank.  There he found the two men still on the other side of the river, on their knees and asking for help. Catalan threw them the bread loaves, which they immediately ate, and a pen and paper tied to a rock.  Parrado wrote a note telling about the plane crash and asking for help.  Then he tied the paper to a rock and threw it back to Catalan, who read it and gave the boys a sign that he understood. Catalan rode on horseback for many hours westwards to bring help. During the trip he saw another huaso on the south side of Rio Azufre and asked him to reach the boys and to bring them to Los Maitenes. Instead, he followed the river till the cross with Rio Tinguiririca, where after passing a bridge he was able to reach the narrow route that linked the village of Puente Negro to the holiday resort of Termas del Flaco. Here he was able to stop a truck and reach the police station at Puente Negro, where the news was finally dispatched to the Army command in San Fernando and then to Santiago. Meanwhile, Parrado and Canessa were rescued and they reached Los Maitenes, where they were fed and allowed to rest.The following morning the rescue expedition left Santiago, and after a stop in San Fernando, moved eastwards. Two helicopters had to fly in the fog, but reached a place near Los Maitenes just when Parrado and Canessa were passing on horseback while going to Puente Negro. Nando Parrado was recruited to fly back to the mountain in order to guide the helicopters to the remaining survivors. The news that people had survived the October 13 crash of Uruguayan Air Force Flight 571 had also leaked to the international press and a flood of reporters began to appear along the narrow route from Puente Negro to Termas del Flaco. The reporters hoped to be able to see and interview Parrado and Canessa about the crash and the following ordeal.Image:Viven5.jpg|thumb|right|Nando Parrado and Roberto Canessa (sitting) with Chilean Huaso Sergio CatalanThe mountain rescueIn the morning of the day when the rescue started, those remaining at the crash site heard on their radio that Parrado and Canessa had been successful in finding help and that afternoon, 22 December 1972, two helicopters carrying search and rescue climbers  arrived. However, the expedition (with Parrado onboard) was not able to reach the crash site until the afternoon, when it is very difficult to fly in the Andes. In fact the weather was very bad and the two helicopters were able to take only half of the survivors.  They departed, leaving the rescue team and remaining survivors at the crash site to once again sleep in the fuselage, until a second expedition with helicopters could arrive the following morning. The second expedition arrived at daybreak on 23 December and all 16 survivors were rescued. All of the survivors were taken to hospitals in Santiago and treated for sickness, dehydration, frostbite, broken bones, scurvy and malnutrition. Timeline October 1972;October 12 (Thu):Crew 5, Passengers 40. ;October 13 (Fri):7 people missing (Martinez, Ramirez, Costemalle, Houni, Magri, Shaw, Valeta), 5 people dead (Ferradas, F. Nicola, E. Nicola, E. Parrado, Vazquez). Alive: 33;October 14 (Sat):Five people died (Lagurara, Abal, Mariani, Maquirriain, Martinez-Lamas) Dead: 10, missing: 7, alive: 28 ;October 21 (Sat):Susana Susy Parrado died. Dead: 11, missing: 7, alive: 27 ;October 24 (Tue):missing 6 people found dead (Carlos Valeta not found). Dead: 17, missing: 1, alive: 27;October 29 (Sun):8 people died in an avalanche (Perez, Platero, L. Methol, Nicolich, Maspons, Menendez, Storm, Roque). Dead: 26, alive: 19November 1972;November 15 (Wed):Arturo Nogueira died. (dead: 27, alive: 18);November 18 (Sat):Rafael Echavarren died. (dead: 28, alive: 17)December 1972;December 12 (Mon):Numa Turcatti died. (dead: 29, alive: 16);December 20 (Wed):Parrado and Canessa encounter Sergio Catalan.;December 21 (Thu):Parrado and Canessa rescued.;December 22 (Fri):6 people rescued.;December 23 (Sat):8 people rescued. 16 people alive.;December 26 (Tue):Front page of the Santiago newspaper El Mercurio reports that all survivors resorted to cannibalism.Passenger listSurvivors are indicated in bold.Crew* Colonel Julio Ferrdas, Pilot* Lieutenant Colonel Dante Lagurara, Co-Pilot* Lieutenant Ramn Martnez, Navigator* Sergeant Carlos Roque, Mechanic* Sergeant Ovidio Joaqun Ramrez, Flight attendantPassengers* Francisco Abal* Jos Pedro Algorta* Canessa* Gastn Costemalle* Alfredo Delgado* Rafael Echavarren* Daniel Fernndez* Roberto Francois* Roy Harley* Alexis Houni* Jos Luis Inciarte* Guido Magri* lvaro Mangino* Felipe Maquirriain* Graciela Augusto Gumila de Mariani* Julio Martnez-Lamas* Daniel Maspons* Juan Carlos Menndez* Javier Methol* Liliana Navarro Petraglia de Methol* Dr. Francisco Nicola* Esther Horta Prez de Nicola* Gustavo Nicolich* Arturo Nogueira* Carlos Pez Rodrguez* Eugenia Dolgay Diedug de Parrado* Fernando Parrado* Susana Parrado* Marcelo Prez, Captain of rugby team* Enrique Platero* Ramn Sabella* Daniel Shaw* Adolfo Strauch* Eduardo Strauch* Diego Storm* Numa Turcatti* Carlos Valeta* Fernndo Vzquez* Antonio Vizintn* Gustavo ZerbinoAftermathright|thumb|280px|View of the Crash Site Memorial - taken looking West on February 2006.When first rescued, the survivors initially explained that they had eaten some cheese they had carried with them, planning to discuss the details in private with their families. However, they were pushed into the public eye when photos were leaked to the press and sensational, unauthorized articles were published. The survivors held a press conference on December 28 at Stella Maris College, where they recounted the events of the past 72 days(http://www.viven.com.uy/571/eng/historia.asp) (over the years, they would also participate in the publication of two books, two films and an official website about the event).The rescuers and a Chilean priest later returned to the crash site and buried the bodies of the deceased, 80 meters from the plane. Close to the grave a stone pile where an iron cross was built. The remains of the fuselage were incinerated.()Official websiteIn 2002, on the occasion of the 30th anniversary of the event,(http://www.viven.com.uy/571/eng/Aniversario.asp) an official website was created for the survivors. The website, entitled Viven! El Accidente de Los Andes is available in both Spanish and English.(http://www.viven.com.uy/571/default.asp)2010 Chilean mine disasterIn 2010 four survivors of the crash publicly expressed their support for the 33 miners trapped in a mine in northern Chile, following the Copiap mining accident, who survived underground for 69 days. The survivors brought messages of support from children in Uruguay.()Popular cultureBooksAlive: The Story of the Andes Survivors (1974)The first book, The Story of the Andes Survivors, (published two years after their rescue) was written by Paul Read who interviewed the survivors and their families. It was a critical success and remains a highly popular work of non-fiction. In the opening of the book, the survivors explain why they wanted it to be written:A reprint was published in 2005 by Harper. It was re-titled: Alive: Sixteen Men, Seventy-two Days, and Insurmountable OddsThe Classic Adventure of Survival in the Andes and includes a revised introduction as well as interviews with Piers Paul Read, Coche Inciarte, and Mangino.Miracle in the Andes (2006)34 years after the rescue, Parrado published the book in the Andes: 72 Days on the Mountain and My Long Trek Home (with Vince Rause), which has received positive reviews. In this text, Parrado also touches upon public reaction to this event:Film and televisionSupervivientes de los Andes (1976) This feature film, also known as Alive! (1976), was a Mexican production directed by Cardona, Jr. (http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0075290/) It was based on the 1973 book, Survive by Charles Blair, Jr.Alive: The Miracle of the Andes (1993)Alive is a 1993 feature film directed by Frank Marshall and based on the book The Story of the Andes Survivors by Paul Read. It stars Hawke and is narrated by Malkovich. Nando Parrado served as a technical adviser to the film. Pez and Ramon Moncho Sabella visited the fuselage set during the production to aid with the historical accuracy of the set and to advise the actors on how events unfolded. The film received mixed to postive reviews.Alive: 20 Years Later (1993)20 Years Later is a film produced, directed and written by Jill Fullerton-Smith and narrated by Sheen. It explores the lives of the survivors twenty years after the crash and discusses their participation in the production of Alive: The Miracle of the Andes.Stranded: I Have Come from a Plane That Crashed on the Mountains (2007)Stranded: I Have Come from a Plane That Crashed on the Mountains, written and directed by Gonzalo Arijn, is a documentary film interlaced with dramatised scenes. All the survivors are interviewed, along with some of their family members and people involved with the rescue operation. An expedition in which the survivors return to the crash site is documented. The film premiered at the 2007 Documentary Film Festival Amsterdam, Netherlands and received the Ivens Award.()(Stranded, The Official movie website)  This film appeared on PBS Independent Lens as STRANDED: The Andes Plane Crash Survivors in May 2009.(http://www.pbs.org/independentlens/stranded/)Trapped: Alive in the Andes (2007)Trapped: Alive in the Andes is an episode from Geographic Channel documentary television series Trapped. The series examines incidents which left survivors trapped in their situation for a period of time. The episode aired 7 November 2007 as part of the series first season.I Am Alive: Surviving the Andes Plane Crash (2010)Am Alive: Surviving the Andes Plane Crash is a documentary film directed by Brad Osborne that first aired on the Channel on 20 October 2010. The film mixed reenactments with  interviews with the survivors and members of the original search teams. Also interviewed were Paul Read, renowned mountain climber Viesturs, Andes Survivors expert and alpinist Ricardo Pea, historians, expert pilots, and high-altitude medical experts.See also*Dust (aircraft)*radiobeaconReferencesFurther readingBooks*2006: Parrado, Nando (with Vince Rause). in the Andes: 72 Days on the Mountain and My Long Trek Home. *2005: Read, Piers Paul. Alive: Sixteen Men, Seventy-two Days, and Insurmountable Odds -- The Classic Adventure of Survival in the Andes (reprint edition)*1974: Read, Piers Paul. The Story of the Andes Survivors (first edition)*1973: Enrique Hank Lopez. They Lived on Human Flesh ISBN 0671784145Articles*Dowling, Claudia Glenn. Still Alive. Magazine (February 1993): 4859.External links* Viven! El Accidente de Los Andes (Official website)* Doctor Roberto Canessa, who went for help, recalls the incident on the Late Late Show in March 2008* Interviews* Conferences* PBSs Independent Lens: STRANDED: The Andes Plane Crash Survivors, by Gonzalo Arijon and Marc Silvera* National Geographic Adventure Expedition December, 2005* Outside The Lines: Still Alive ESPN Video* * Back to the Andes Expedition 2006 with one of the survivors - Eduardo Strauchaeri dels Andes571571 de la Fuerza Area UruguayaAireko Armadaren 571 hegaldia571 Fuerza Area Uruguaya  571 aereo delle Ande571    nl:Andesvliegrampja:571i Andes-fjellene 13. oktober 1972lotu Fuerza Area Uruguaya 571Fora Area Uruguaia 571  13  1972 lento-onnettomuus 1972Air Force Flight 571Hava Kuvvetlerinin 571 sefer sayl uuubay s 571 ca Khng qun Uruguayzh:571
741126
Cherepanovs
Image:First locomotive Russia.jpg|thumb|right|1834 replica of first locomotive of Russia. Monument in TagilCherepanov, Yefim Alekseyevich (17741842) and Miron Yefimovich (18031849), Russian inventors and industrial engineers, father and son. They were serfs of the Demidovs  a famous family of factory owners.  In 1810s, Yefim built a progressive machine-building plant, equipped with a full range of innovative metal-cutting lathes (such as screw-cutters, gear-cutting serrating machines and others).  From 1822 until his death, Yefim had been chief mechanic of all the factories in the town of Tagil.  His son Miron was his apprentice and in 1819 was appointed his deputy and eventually replaced his father after his death. Cherepanovs significally improved the machinery that had been used in blast-furnace and gold-mining industries, iron and copper works, sawmills and flourmills.  However, the most interesting aspect of the Cherepanovs work were engines which they stubbornly tried to introduce into industrial production. Since 1820, the Cherepanovs had built about 20 steam engines (ranging from 2 to 60 h.p.). In 1833-34 they built the first Russian locomotive, and then in 1835  the second one, more powerful. They also built a cast-iron railroad from one of their factories to the copper mine.  Despite the successful performance and operation of their locomotives, Cherepanovs invention found no support outside of the factory and, subsequently, their locomotives were replaced with horse traction.See also*Rocket und Miron Tscherepanowro:Cerepanovru:
743067
Scrip
File:Capitol Hill Babysitting Coop scrip.jpg|thumb|Scrip issued by the Hill Baby-Sitting Co-op, worth  hour of babysitting time.Scrip is an American term for any substitute for currency which is not tender and is often a form of credit. Scrips were created as company payment of employees and also as a means of payment in times where regular money is unavailable, such as remote coal towns, military bases, ships on long voyages, or occupied countries in war time.  Other forms of scrip include subway tokens, arcade tokens and tickets, and points on some websites.Scrips have gained historical importance and become a subject of study in numismatics and exonumia due to their wide variety and recurring use. Scrip behaves similarly to a currency, and as such can be used to study economics, as in the Hill Babysitting Co-op.Historyscrip was a credit against the accrued wages of employees. In the States, where everything in a mining or logging camp was run, created and owned by a company, scrip provided the worker with credit when their wages had been depleted. These remote locations were cash poor. Workers had very little choice but to purchase meals and goods at a store. In this way, the company could place enormous markups on goods in a company store, making workers completely dependent on the company, thus enforcing their loyalty to the company. While scrip was a de facto form of currency, employees were rarely paid in scrip. Additionally, while employees could exchange scrip for cash, it was rarely done so at face value. Scrip in this context was valid only within that area or town where it was issued. While store owners in neighboring communities could accept the scrip as currency, they rarely provided a 1 for 1 exchange. This was to avoid the risk of having coins/currency that were worthless anywhere else.When U.S. President Jackson issued his Circular of 1836 due to credit shortages, Virginia Scrip was accepted as payments for federal lands.In 19th-century Western Canada, the federal government devised a system of grants called scrip. Notes in the form of money scrip (valued at $160 or $240) or land scrip, valued at  or  were offered to the Mtis people in exchange for their Aboriginal rights.(Free Land! in Moving Here, Staying Here: The Canadian Immigrant Experience at Library and Archives Canada)During the Depression, many local governments were forced to pay employees in scrip at the height of the crisis.(Chatters, Charles H. Is Municipal Scrip a Panacea? Public Management, March 1933)Scrip as a de facto form of currency within the setting of the mining or logging industry was discontinued around 1952.Scrip is also related to the market where companies pay dividends in the form of scrip rather than paying actual currency.  It is also a written document that acknowledges debt.After War I and the War II, scrip was used in Germany and Austria; detailed accounts are in Notgeld.During the War, as well as earlier during the War, U.S. soldiers were sent on leave with a scrip marked with expiration dates which could be spent at establishments cooperating in the program.  This was done in part to encourage U.S. soldiers to seek their entertainment confined to these areas, but moreover was intended to deny Viet Cong tax collectors a prime source of revenue.  The expiration dates on these scrips frequently led to a rush by soldiers on leave to spend currency, as well as for soldiers who had not spent their scrip on leave to exhange their scrip with other soldiers heading out to leave for fresher scrip or hard cash, often at an exchange rate that rather favored the outgoing soldiers.Thought should also be given to chips. Commonly used as currency with which to gamble, the use of chips as company currency in the early 19th century in Devon, England in Wheal Friendship(Crying-fox.com) copper mine gave its name to a local village: Chipshop.Modern usageScrip survives in modern times in various forms.Community-issued scripthumb|250px|left|Detroit Community Scrip, 3 Cheers.The use of locally-issued scrip accepted by multiple businesses within a community has increased  during the recession.  Community-wide scrip usage has begun or is on the rise in Ithaca, New York; Detroit; Berkshires; North Carolina; City, Michigan; Colorado; Calgary, Canada and Hagen, Germany.(Homegrown Stimulus)(Detroit cash keeps hometown humming Detroit News, Detnews.com)(In Hagen you can pay with local currency, WDR.de)(Overview of Hagens Notgeld, the Volmetaler, Volmetaler.org)Thailands township Kut Chum once issued its own local scrip called Bia Kut Chum: Bia is Thai for cowry shell, which was once used as small change, and still so used in metaphorical expressions. To side-step implications that the community intended their scrip as an unlawful substitute for currency, it now issues exchange coupons called Boon Kut Chum.(A Boon to Kut Chum archive)Company-issued customer scripSome companies still issue scrip notes and coin, good for use at company points of sale. Among these are the Tire money for the Tire stores and gasbars in Canada, and the dollars, used at Disney resorts.Gift certificatesScrip is now issued in the form of gift certificates (alternatively gift vouchers), or cards. The two are essentially the same except that the cards automate the checkout and accounting processes.  Cards usually have a barcode or strip, which can be processed through a standard electronic credit card machine.In the late 1980s, the term scrip evolved to include a fundraising method popular with non-profit organizations like schools, bands and athletic groups. With scrip fundraising, retailers offer the gift certificates and gift cards to non-profit organizations at a discount. The non-profit organizations sell the gift cards to member families at full face value. The families redeem the gift cards at full face value, and the discount or rebate is retained by the non-profit organization as revenue. Great Lakes Scrip Center, the nations largest broker of scrip gift cards, reported that more than 4 million US households and 15,000 non-profit organizations use scrip fundraising. Canadas largest scrip fundraising company, Fundscrip, demonstrated scrips popularity by boasting a 75% repeat purchase rate among groups seeking to easily support their respective causes.Gifts cards are increasingly being offered as consumer incentives at no cost or for a substantial discount. For example, reward points given for the use of credit cards can be exchanged for a variety of gift cards and some companies will offer high value gift cards at a discount. Gift cards are readily available at a discount using online trading services.There are websites where users can trade, donate, buy and sell gift cards. Sellers use these websites because the gift card is not to a store of their liking, and buyers because this provides opportunities to buy these cards for less than they are nominally worth at the business. There are other websites that sell a collection of third party gift cards; businesses offer credits to these websites for employee incentives, usually in return for a discount; however discounts for consumers are rarely offered.Digital currencyMany online games (MMORPGs) provide a type of virtual currency that can only be earned within the game and/or be purchased with real legal tender from outside the game. Typically this currency cannot be exchanged for real legal tender after it has been acquired, but there are exceptions. Some games are free, but sometimes players are required to pay for additional items or gaming options, which can be traded among the gaming community and used as currency or traded back for real money. The ability to exchange real money for virtual currency or scrip and then back into real money raises a great many new issues, some of which parallel traditional issues with scrip and some of which are new.While other online games may not provide scrip in the form of virtual currency or may not redeem it for real legal tender, an active market in trading virtual assets acquired in-game may still exist outside the game. In some cases, this may involve payments in real legal tender (e.g., trading of in-game assets on eBay). This, too, can be considered a modern form of scrip.Bitcoins are a virtual currency that exist independent of any central authority.The amount of trade in these forms of online scrip can be very substantial, although the very nature of scrip strongly constrains its influence to the environment in which it was issued.  Nevertheless, as the amount of trade grows and its value in real-world currency increases, many new and unexplored economic, legal, and policy questions arise.DisadvantagesUnless the gift card is obtained at a discount (paying less than the actual value of the card), some point out that trading real money for scrip is unproductive as it then ties up that money until it is used, and usually it may only be used at one store. Furthermore, not all gift cards issued are redeemed. In 2006, the value of unredeemed gift cards has been estimated at almost US$8 billion.(Gift cards popular, unused, Cincinnati Enquirer, December 2, 2007)VISA, MasterCard and Express gift cards() are initially funded by a credit card or bank account, after which the funding account and gift card are not connected to one another. Therefore, once the predetermined funds are consumed, the card number expires. Gift card holders are thus able to make riskier Internet purchases, without the fear of having to persuade a merchant to stop pulling funds from them. VISA and MasterCard also have re-loadable cards.One disadvantage of gift scrip is that some gift card providers charge maintenance fees on the cards, particularly if they are not used after a certain period of time, or the card will expire after a given period of time.(Gift cards may bear unwanted fees, Post-Gazette, February 11, 2007)  Some provinces and states in North America (e.g. California, Ontario, Massachusetts, Ohio, Washington) have enacted laws to eliminate non-use fees or expirations,(State Gift Card Consumer Protection Laws, Union, September 14, 2007) but because the laws often only apply to single-merchant cards(Keeping the change, December 29, 2007Democrat) buyers have to review the gift card conditions prior to purchase to determine exact restrictions and fees.(Card games: Read the fine print on gift cards, Republican-American, November 4, 2007) Additionally, if a retailer goes bankrupt, gift cards can suddenly become worthless. Even if stores do not close immediately, the company may stop accepting the cards.(But what happens when the store files for bankruptcy? Instead of a gift you may be stuck with a worthless piece of plastic. Earlier this year, when Sharper Image filed for 11, people holding its gift cards were told that they could not get their money back or use the card to make a purchase.Gift Cards: The gift that can stop giving, Defend Your Dollars, Union, September 12, 2008.) This became a significant issue during the financial crisis of 20082009, prompting the Union to call upon the Trade Commission to regulate the issue.(FTC: Protect Gift Card Holders When Companies Go Bankrupt, Consumerist, September 12, 2008)Military scripImage:O-cash.JPG|right|300px|thumb|Examples of occupation and military scrip used on the British Channel Island of Guernsey during the German Occupation (1940-45)Military personnel deployed abroad (protective or occupation) are generally paid in military scrip, which prevents legal tender from going into the market, plus it is an excellent way of keeping tabs on military payments and spending. For US Forces following WWII this was called MPC Payment Certificate.  This type of scrip can be exchanged through the military for legal tender upon return to the home nation.  Military powers have also been known to issue occupation scrip for local civilian use as a means of controlling the local economies.Similarly, amongst British troops occupying Germany immediately following the Second World War, plastic coins (longer lasting than paper notes) were issued as part of their wage. These were only tendable at the equivalent of the Post Exchange, to purchase replacement kit.Scrip bidIn Australia, the term scrip bid is used to describe a takeover offer where shares are offered partly or wholly in place of cash.  By receiving shares instead of cash the realisation of the capital asset can be delayed to take better advantage of capital loss offsets. Additionally, tax payers are only taxed on half the gains tax if they hold the asset for more than 12 months.See also*Community Scrip*Tire money*Hill Babysitting Co-op*Chiemgauer*dollar*money*voucher reseller*Hours*currency*Voucher*Points*currency*Amschel Rothschild*issue*of Edo period Japan*Spintria*(company)*system*PointReferencesExternal links*Journal of Economic Perspectives Article: The market for gift cards*Regional currencies in Germany - Local competition for the Euro?*Local Currencies: Catalysts for Sustainable Regional Economies*Sample of Coal Mining Scrip with history from Whitby, West Virginia*The Gift-Card Economy. NYT Magazine.* Stamp Scrip: Money People Paid to Use Bruce Champ 04.01.2008uk:
746527
Middleton_Junction_and_Oldham_Branch_Railway
The Middleton Junction and Oldham Branch Railway (MJOBR) was opened on 31 March 1842 by the and Leeds Railway, whose chief engineer was Stephenson. The  MJOBR left the Manchester to Littleborough railway line (opened on 4 July 1839), at Middleton Junction (then Oldham Junction) went through the expanding town of Chadderton to a station in the lower part of Oldham named Werneth. It was part of the original route to Oldham.  The Werneth Incline - 1 mile 1,383 yards (3 km) long - was the steepest passenger worked railway line in Britain, with a gradient of 1:27 for about a mile. The earliest trains to use this line required cable assistance to get to the top of the incline.The railway did not prosper in its first few years and plans were quickly made for the railway line to come nearer the town centre of Oldham. An extension was built to Mumps railway station, including an intermediate station at Central railway station. The line and stations opened on 1 November 1847. The railway prospered: Chadderton was a mining town and there were numerous collieries around the town; and Oldham had, in 1838, 213 textile mills, more than Manchester. The railway system around Oldham was completed when the line to Rochdale from Mumps opened on 12 August 1863, and the branch to Royton was completed on 21 March 1864. Soon the railway led to all of Oldhams five railway stations: Werneth, Central, Mumps, Clegg Street, and Glodwick Road, as well as linking stations at Lees, Derker and Royton.On 12 August 1914 a goods and coal depot was opened at Chadderton. This was at the end of a 1097 yards long line which branched off the MJOBR approximately 400 yards from Middleton Junction at Chadderton Junction.(http://www.britishrailways1960.co.uk/CLMVHB06.html)By the 1930s road transport was taking over, and the mills and collieries were closing. Broadway, the new arterial road (A663), was opened, and the significance of the line was lost.  The line to Manchester via Hollinwood, which had been opened on 17 May 1880, and which was much less steeply graded, took most of the traffic: from 1958 only one passenger service (an early morning train from Rochdale to Manchester) had been using the line.Following the Beeching Report in 1963, the line was set to close. It did so, to all traffic between Chadderton Junction and Oldham Werneth on 7 January 1963. Oldham Central Station closed later in the 1960s. Soon after, on 13 March 1964, saw the pulling up and scrapping of the rails and other railway goods on the Middleton Junction and Oldham Branch Railway. The Chadderton goods and coal depot remained open at this stage as a short freight only branch from Middleton Junction. Over the years the rest of the line which went to the Chadderton depot was closed and scrapped, and the countryside slowly took over. Over 40 years later the landscape has irreversibly changed back to other uses: apart from an area where the old line entered a cutting, and where the old Johnny Whitehead Bridge () can still be used as a crossing point for ramblers.  References
748965
Nipton,_California
thumb|right|Nipton at dawn in DecemberNipton is an unincorporated town in Bernardino County, California, on the northern edge of National Preserve, west of Searchlight, Nevada. It has a population of 20 people.Nipton was originally founded in 1900, as a place for gold miners to reside.  Nipton contains a five-room hotel, originally constructed in 1910, a park, a small general store, and a caf that is open on most days. The cafe advertises that they have the best burgers in Nipton, CA, even though there is only one hamburger restaurant there.For many years, Nipton had the most lottery ticket sales in the state for the State Lottery. When a new office opened nearby, immediately outside Primm, Nevada, Nipton lost its number one ranking, as Primm was easier and faster for Las Vegas residents and others to get to.In June 2010, Nipton unveiled a sun-powered generator that is expected to provide about 85 percent of the towns electricity over the course of a year. The 80-kilowatt project is part of the one-time mining camps plan to become an eco-tourism mecca. Nipton is on the northern edge of the Mojave National Preserve, home of the popular Kelso Dunes. Some intend to make Nipton the gateway to the National Preserve. Many park visitors favor environmentalism, and they often stay at campgrounds and hotels in Nipton. The town is betting that stepping up its environmental reputation will drive tourism growth.  Nipton in fiction Nipton is featured in the video game New Vegas where it is wiped out by the fictional slaving organization Caesars Legion. As a historical in-joke, the residents are forced to perform a lottery to see who would be spared. Also, the lottery in the video game alludes to Shirley Jacksons short story Lottery. References External links* Nipton, CA(Kalifornia)vo:Nipton
751875
Mejillones
 footnotes               Mejillones is a Chilean port city and commune in Province, Region. Its name is the plural form of the Spanish mejilln meaning mussel, referring to a particularly abundant species and preferred staple food of its indigenous inhabitants. It is situated in the northern side of the Mejillones Peninsula, 60 km north of the city of Antofagasta. To the west, in the northern part of peninsula, is Punta de Angamos, site of the naval combat of the same name, fought during the of the Pacific.Mejillones is surrounded by the waters of the Ocean to the west and by one of the most arid deserts in the world to the east, the Atacama. It also marks the countrys widest point along a parallel (362 km).HistoryThe settlement of Mejillones dates back to the first communities of people who inhabited the coastal area from 1825.Between 1838 and 1839, French businessmen known as Hermano Latrille (Brothers Latrille), contracted mining services  of the Copiapino Juan Lpez (miner known as Lopez, considered the founder of Antofagasta), to mine guano deposits located south of Mejillones. In this manner, Luan Lpez began ming around the vicinity of San Luciano hill in 1841. The concession for the mining of this material was obtained by Domingo Latrille at the hands of the Bolivian government, which would last until 1842. Between 1841 and 1842, they made the largest shipments of this product to Europe.In 1845, of Bolivia Isidoro Belzu had a small fort built on the south side of Mejillones, to become a minor port of Bolivia.The Bolivian government proposed, through the development of a project, to establish a major port city in the enormous jurisdiction of Mejillones.In 1866, Bolivia and Chile mutually agreed to finance the construction of the Oficinas de Administracin y Resguardo de Aduanas (Offices of Administration and Security of Customs) with officials of both countries as a way to protect the interests of Chilean workers and for the implementation of the Bolivian government of a tax rate on the export of minerals, primarily salt and guano. Subsequently, one of these buildings was transferred to the city of Antofagasta during the War of the Pacific. Currently, this building is still in force and designated as the Regional Museum in the city.On October 8, 1879, the of Angamos was fought here in front of the peninsula of Angamos between the Chilean and Peruvian navies, which ended in the Chilean capture of the monitor Huscar. Afterward, the increasingly prosperous nitrate industry showed a boom going through the port at Mejillones, where the mineral boarded on the Antofagasta railroad left for foreign ports abroad. During this time, strong waves wreaked havoc on the shipping facilities, which required the reestablishment of Mejillones, this time reborn under the flag.Also after the War of the Pacific, administrative organization began, which in the case of Mejillones wiould involve the preparation of urban planning in agreement with the existing type of port. This work was commissioned to naval engineer Emilio de Vitds. The plan, which was perhaps more realistic than those proposed before, was based on 63  city blocks and was completed with the Foundation Act (Acta de Fundacin), signed by president Riesco and dated February 7, 1906.In 1970, a majority vote approved the bill presented by Mayor Araya Cuadra to build a theater located across the rear of the Plaza Almirante Latorre. The work was carried out with the grant of a loan by the Ministry of Housing and Urban Development in the amount of $500,000. Such funding would not satisfy the completion of the project, and work stopped in 1972 pending the granting of a loan extension that failed to materialize by the time of the coup of the Armed Forces of September 11th of 1973.DemographicsAccording to data from the 2002 census by the National Institute of Statistics, the Mejillones commune has 10,042 inhabitants; of these, 7,888 (78.6%) live in areas and 530 (5.3%) in areas. At that time, there were 4,654 men and 3,764 women residing in the commune. In the ten years since the previous census of 1992 (pop. 6,315), the population grew 33.3% (2,103 persons).( It is expected to grow after the construction of Megapuerto de Mejillones, due to be Chiles biggest sea port, expected to be completed around 2030.AdministrationAs a commune, Mejillones is a third-level division of Chile administered by a council, headed by an alcalde who is directly elected every four years.Within the divisions of Chile, Mejillones is represented in the Chamber of Deputies by Mr. Pedro Araya (PRI) and Mr. Manuel Rojas  (UDI) as part of the 4th electoral district, (together with Antofagasta, Gorda and Taltal). The commune is represented in the Senate by Carlos Cantero Ojeda (Ind.) and Jos Antonio Gmez Urrutia (PRSD) as part of the 2nd senatorial constituency (Antofagasta Region).References(External links*  de:Mejilloneses:Mejillonesit:Mejillonesnl:Mejillonespt:Mejillonesru:tr:Mejillones
756029
J._Anthony_Lukas
Jay Anthony Lukas, aka J. Anthony Lucas  (April 25, 1933June 5, 1997), was a Prize-winning American journalist and author, probably best known for his 1985 book Common Ground: A Turbulent Decade in the Lives of Three American Families, a classic study of race relations and school busing in Boston, Massachusetts, as seen through the eyes of three families: one upper-middle-class white, one working-class white, and one African-American.() His birth, early years, and educationJ. Anthony Lukas  was born to Elizabeth and Edwin Lukas in Plains, New York, followed by a younger brother in 1935, Lukas.  His mother was an actress, and his uncle Lukas was an Awardwinning actor. Lukas at first wanted to be an actor.  After his mothers death by suicide  and  his fathers illness after her death, he was  at the age of eight enrolled  in the coeducational School  boarding  school in Vermont.   After he graduated he attended University where he worked at the Crimson. In 1955 Lukas  graduated magna cum laude from University. He  continued  his education  at  the University of Berlin as an Fellow. Lukas  then  served in the US Army in Japan where he wrote commentaries for VUNC (the Voice of the United Nations Command).(*Osen,Diane,Interview  of J. Anthony Lukas)His careerLukas began his professional journalism career at the Sun, then moved to New York Times. He stayed at the Times for nine years, working as a roving reporter, and serving at the Washington, New York, and  Nations bureaus, and overseas  in  Ceylon, India, Japan, Pakistan, South Africa, and Zaire, before the Congo. After working at the York Times Magazine for a short time in the 1970s, Lukas quit reporting to pursue a career in book and magazine writing, becoming known for writing intensely researched nonfiction works. He was a contributor to the Monthly, the Journalism Review, Esquire, Magazine, Nation, New Republic, and the Saturday Review, a co-founder and editor of MORE, a critical journal on the news media, which collapsed in 1978, and a contributing editor to the New Times, an alternative magazine that folded also in 1978.(Literary Journal: A Biographical Dictionary of Writers and Editors. Greenwood Press, Westport, Connecticut, 1996,  by Edd Applegate.)Selected publicationsHis major works include:*The Two Worlds of Linda Fitzpatrick, 1967,  a Pulitzer-winning New York Times article  on the life and death of a teenager in the hippie and drug  counterculture*The Barnyard Epithet and Other Obscenities: Notes on the Chicago Conspiracy Trial, 1970, a story on the Seven, aka the Eight*Dont Shoot, We  Are Your Children!,  1971,  included the  Pulitzer-winning story,  The Two Worlds of Linda Fitzgerald  and other stories of members of  the Sixties generation.  A section written by Erikson, a sociologist and an  Studies professor at University and the editor of Yale Review challenged the view that there was a generation gap between the 60s generation  and the generations before it, and that argued instead that the 60s generation expressed overtly what previous generations had expressed covertly.*Nightmare: The Underside of the Nixon Years, 1976, a book on Nixon and the scandal -- originating in two long, detailed issue-length articles on Watergate for New York Times Sunday Magazine, with the third begun but canceled because of Nixons resignation; Lukas then completed work on the third article and used it as the concluding third of a massive, careful work of journalistic history.*Common Ground: A Turbulent Decade in the Lives of Three American Families, 1985, a book on busing and  school desegregation in Boston and three families and  their histories.*Big Trouble, 1997, a posthumously published history of  a struggle between unions and  mining company officials and supporters in Idaho during the early twentieth century following the assassination by bomb of former Idaho governor Steunenberg.His deathIn 1997, while his last book, Big Trouble, was undergoing final revisions, Lukas committed suicide by hanging himself with a bathrobe sash. He had been diagnosed with depression about ten years earlier.()In an interview that followed the publication of Common Ground  he gave some hints about his impending suicide, linking it with his career as a writer. All writers ..., he said, are, to one extent or another, damaged people. Writing is our way of repairing ourselves. In my own case, I was filling a hole in my life which opened at the age of eight, when my mother killed herself, throwing our family into utter disarray. My father quickly developed tuberculosispsychosomatically triggered, the doctors thoughtforcing him to seek treatment in an Arizona sanatorium. We sold our house and my brother and I were shipped off to boarding school. Effectively, from the age of eight, I had no family, and certainly no community. Thats one reason the book worked: I wasnt just writing a book about busing. I was filling a hole in myself.( Osen, Diane, Interview of J. Anthony Lukas)PrizesLukas won his first Prize, the Prize for Investigative Reporting, in 1968  for his New York Times article The Two Worlds of Linda Fitzpatrick. This article documented the life and violent death of a teenager from a wealthy Greenwich, Connecticut family who became involved in drugs and the hippie movement.  Also in 1967 Lukas was awarded a Polk Award in Local Reporting (The George Polk Awards for Journalists.) A second Pulitzer, the Prize for General Nonfiction,was  awarded  to Lukas  for Common Ground.,() for which he also received the 1985 Book Award,(ABA (American Booksellers Association)) the National Book Critics Award,(ABA (American Booksellers Association)) the 1985-1986 Robert F. Kennedy Book Award(Robert F. Kennedy Memorial website) and the Political Book of the Year Award. Lukas is now the namesake of the Lukas Prize Project, co-administered by the Universitys Graduate School of Journalism and the Foundation at Harvard, to support the works of American nonfiction writers. The project gives conferences and presents three annual awards: the Anthony Lukas Book Prize, the Lynton History Prize, and the Anthony Lukas Work-in-Progress Award.()ReferencesExternal links*http://books.google.com/books?iddWQpXRudQPwC&dq%22literary+journalism%22&printsecfrontcover&sourceweb&ots2Dsa0AMGKf&signvN_OduIZNHdyXBkhWCtUgx6P4Q     Applegate, Edd, 1996 Journal: A Biographical Dictionary of Writers and Editors, Greenwood Press, Westport, Connecticut*Freedman,Samuel G, 1997. A Heart,A Brain, and A Good Pair Of Shoes, 1997 Salon,  June 12, 1997*http://64.233.169.104/search?qcache:vQJqzLUuWokJ:www.nytimes.com/books/98/12/06/specials/lukas-common.html+J,+Anthony+Lukas,+.+Boston+Don%27t+Shoot:+We+Are+Your+Children+(New+York:+Random+House,+1968)&hlen&ctclnk&cd2&glus&clientfirefox-a Mitgang, Herbert, 1985 York Times, September 15, 1985, Sunday, Late City Final Edition Section 7; Page 1, Column 1; Book Review Desk*Osen, Diane,Interview  of J. Anthony Lukas*http://64.233.169.104/search?qcache:SBah-2OiJ6wJ:www.aaronsw.com/2002/press/vivafranca+%22literary+Journalism%22,+J.+Anthony+Lucas&hlen&ctclnk&cd5&glusRosenbaum, Rosenbaum, Rob, 2006, When Intellectuals Had a Real Magazine: Viva Lingua Franca!, York News Observer, 4/24/2006*http://www.nieman.harvard.edu/reports/00-3NRfall/State-of-Narrative.html The State of Narrative Nonfiction Writing, Nieman Reports, The Foundation for Journalism at University, Vol. 54 No. 3 Fall 2000*Lukas, Christopher, 2008, Blue Genes: A Memoir of Loss and Survival, Doubleday. The autobiography of Lukas brother.*Blount, Roy Jr., The Inheritance of Loss, The New York Times Book Review, September 28, 2008.
758426
Phonsavan
footnotes                Phonsavan (Lao: ) (population 37,507)(Paek District Office, Statistics Department. Paek District has a population of 70,215. Xiengkhouang Province has ca. 250,000 people. The borders from town to district are not very clear, and Phonsavan administratively is a collection of villages.) is the new capital of Xieng Khouang Province, Laos. The name stands for hills of paradise. Phonsavan is the provincial capital of Xieng Khouang province. The countryside is soon dominated by green hills and pine forests. Villages consist of colourful wooden houses. Cattle raising is one of the main agricultural activities and Hmong cowboys with brown and violet cowboy hats are a common sight. During New Year there are even bullfights in the city. Phonsavan was built in the late 1970s and replaced the old Xieng Khoung (today: Muang Khoun) which had been destroyed during the Second Indochina War. Phonsavans most famous attraction is the nearby of Jars, which has been nominated for UNESCO World Heritage status.(http://www.theage.com.au/travel/its-a-mystery-plain-and-simple-20090730-e2mq.html) The main economic activity in Phonsavan is based on government administration, mining companies from China and Australia, tourism and the work of NGOs related to UXO clearance. Nature and scenery Xieng Khouang is widely known for the of Jars , but beyond its jars the natural beauty of the province is waiting to be discovered. The province has a pleasant climate all year around with warm or hot days and cold nights.  Xieng Khuangs scenery is characterized by the highest mountains in the country (Mount Bia), its pine forests, deciduous woodlands, rolling hills and grasslands. In the cold season the green hills of the Plain of Jars turn reddish brown giving it a touch of the Wild West with yellow sunflowers and Pointsetta in full bloom. Ngum, the largest river in the province originates from the mountains in District and is one of the major tributaries of the Mekong. Het and Phaxay District in particular offer stunning karst scenery with plenty of caves, cliffs, underground rivers and waterfalls. Visiting the area is very beautiful during peach and orchid tree blossom in February.History Iron Age- The Plain of Jars The of Jars is the main reason to come to Phonsavan. Refer to this article for the archeological evidence of the of Jars.  The enigmatic Plain of Jars in Xieng Khouang makes up one of the most important sites for studying the late prehistory of mainland Southeast Asia, although little is known about the people that constructed the megalith stone jars about 2.500 years ago.Today UNESCO, Helvetas, DED, the local government and villagers are working together to develop and protect the jar sites, while aiming to achieve UNESCO World Heritage status.Image:Phakeo-JarSite-b.JPG|Jars near Ban PhakeoImage:Jarssite3.jpg|Jar Site 3Image:WatPiawat.JPG| Ruin of Wat Pia Wat (16th century)Modern history  The Phuan Kingdom and Siamese Invasions While the origin of the Plain of Jars` people is unknown, the recorded history of Xieng Khouang is interlinked with the Phuan. The Tai Phuan or Phuan people are a Buddhist Tai-Lao ethnic group that migrated to Laos from southern China and by the 13th century had formed the independent principality Muang Phuan at the of Jars with Xieng Khouang (the contemporary Muang Khoun) as the capital. They prospered from the overland trade in metals and forest products. In the mid-14th century, Muang Phuan was incorporated into the Lane Xang Kingdom under King Fa Ngum.The Phuan population were able to retain a high degree of autonomy although they had to pay tax and tribute to Xang. During the 16th century expressive art and architecture flourished. The capital was dotted with temples in a distinct Xieng Khouang style, i.e. simple low roofs with a characteristic waist at the foundation. In 1930 Le Boulanger described it as a large and beautiful city protected by wide moats and forts occupying the surrounding hills and the opulence of the sixty-two pagodas and their stupas, of which the flanks concealed treasures, obtained the capital a fame that spread fear wide and far.After the Kingdom of Siam, contemporary Thailand, extended control to Lao territories east of the Mekong in the 1770s, Phuan became a Siamese vassal state and also maintained tributary relations with Dai Viet (Vietnam). To exert greater control of the lands and people of Phuan, the Siamese launched three separate campaigns (177779, 183436 and 1875/76) to resettle large parts of the Phuan population to the south in regions under firm Siamese control. Subsequent invasions by Haw marauders, splinter groups of ex-Taiping Revolution rebels from Southern China plundered Luang Prabang and Xieng Khuang in the 1870s, and desecrated and destroyed the temples of the Phuan region. The Franco-Siamese treaties of the 1890s placed Xieng Khouang under colonial rule as part of Indochina until briefly after World War II. The French used Xieng Khouang today called Muang Khoun as their provincial capital. A few ruinous colonial public buildings remain such as the governors residence, church and the French school.(Provincial Tourism Department Xieng Khouang, A Guide to Xieng Khouang)(Martin Stuart-Fox The Lao Kingdom of Lao Xang: Rise and Decline, White Lotus Press, 1998) Contemporary history  The Indochina WarsRefer to Province for more details. During the Second Indochina War Xiangkhoang was the scene of extensive ground battles and intense aerial bombardment due to its strategic importance. The provinces of Houaphan and Xiangkhoang had been the stronghold of Lao forces and their Vietnamese allies.  The heavy aerial carpet bombardments to neutralize those forces or to drop off unused ordnances after returning from missions in Vietnam turned the of Jars quite literally into the Plain of Scars and the most heavily bombarded areas per capita worldwide. In addition to bombs massive quantities of defoliants and herbicides were dropped. Ethnic groups Xieng Khouang is home to five different ethnic groups. The Dam, Daeng, Phuan, Khmu and Hmong have settled in the province. Their traditional houses, dresses, beliefs and rituals are part of the cultural heritage of Laos. There is also a minority of Chinese and Vietnamese as well as some international workers and missionaries from Korea and the USA.Image:Hmong_New_Year_Girls.JPG|Hmong GirlsImage:Phonsavan_Hmong New Year_Bullfight.jpg|Bullfight during Hmong New YearImage:Phuan_Girls.JPG|Phuan girls in traditional ClothesTai DamTai Dam,Tai Daeng and Tai Phuan belong to the Tai language family, by far the most significant family in Laos, comprising 60% of the national population. The Tai Dam migrated from northern Vietnam to Laos 80300 years ago. They are not Buddhists, instead they practice a form of ancestor and spirit worship. Tai Dam are well known producers of fine quality silk and cotton textiles and many women export directly to markets in Japan and the USA. Old Tai Dam women still wear the traditional blue indigo cotton shirt, skirt and a black turban woven with colored patterns. They produce rice alcohol, called lao lao, that is consumed socially and used for ritual purposes. Tai Dam settle in upland valleys near streams and irrigable and accessible plains scattered among Lao and Phuan villages. They built rectangular symmetric houses on piling, foot pounder and rice granary are under the house. The villages are composed of 1560 houses and are not fenced. The people mainly live on wet rice, vegetables, poultry,  weaving, sewing and hunting.The ancestors of the Tai Phuan once founded the kingdom of the same name.(http://www.infomekong.com/laophuan.htm)KhmuBeing part of the Mon-Khmer branch of the Austro-Asiatic lingusitic family, the Khmu present one of the largest ethnic groups in Laos. They settled in the area several thousand years ago. The Khmu did a rapid acculturation and there is now little in their clothing that distinguishes them from the surrounding Lao, although they speak a completely different language. Khmu houses are built on stilts; each village has a communal house where men gather for political discussions, or work together on basket making and other crafts. Like many ethnic groups in Lao the Khmu practice their own form of animism. The Khmu are well-known for their skill at making baskets, fish traps, and other objects from bamboo. Their material culture, their tools, utensils, baskets and netbags reflect their continued reliance on the forest. Growing rice, hunting, gathering forest products and producing handicrafts provide some cash income. Take a taste of their famous brew lao hai(jar alcohol) while visiting one of the many Khmu villages.HmongHmong people originate from the high steppes of Mongolia and Tibet. They migrated from China to Laos between 1810 and 1900. Having a strong desire for independence they rebelled against the Chinese attempts to control and settle them and they fled in successive waves southwards. During the Lao Civil war in the 1960s and 1970s Hmong were recruited by the CIAs secret army, commanded by Hmong General Vang Pao. Hmong villages were relocated in free-fire zones and many died during these evacuations or due to fighting. When the communists came to power in 1975 tens of thousands of Hmong fled to Thailand or emigrated to USA. Today the diaspora is a major economic factor in the province by sending high amounts of remittances fuelling a significant of construction activity.(personal communication with people in Phonsavan. The high density of Western Union and Moneygram outlets even in small villages is another indicator)The Hmong present 6-10% of the total population of Laos and remain most numerous and concentrated in the east of Xieng Khouang. In the province the White Hmong, the Striped Hmong and the Green Hmong can be distinguished. The easiest way to differentiate these groups is by looking at the womens dress. Hmong live in forested mountains between 800 to 1,500 meters of altitude and in Laos they are categorized as Lao Soung -the highland people, although today there are a more and more villages located in the low lands. Hmong live in villages ranging in size from 15 to over 60 houses. They are not fenced and organized by clan. The rectangular houses are beaten on soil, have one room without windows. The walls are made of vertical wood planks and bamboo and a thatch roof. Hmong are known for their knowledge of the forest, herbal medicines and expertise in raising animals. Their agricultural system is based on rain fed slope cultivation with slash and burn techniques. They live on ordinary rice, corn and vegetable production, swine and poultry, gathering, hunting, embroidery and basket work.Their religion is a form of shamanistic animism with cult of ancestors and spirits, and Their religion is a form of shamanistic animism with cult of ancestors and spirits, and belief in three souls. Certain spirits protect the people within the village boundaries while others maintain their influence over the plant and animal kingdom outside the village. Hmong women are renowned for their embroidery and weaving. Traditionally clothes are made from hemp and cotton. Batik, used only by Green Hmong for their distinctive skirts is a very long process. Before dying the cloth the pattern is been marked with wax. The wax is then removed to reveal the pattern. The wax is applied with a batik pen and the design is completed square by square. Many geometrical patterns exist and they are passed on from mother to daughter. The material is pleated by running a sharp edged stone along the pleat lines on alternate sides of the cloth, and sewing the poles into place at the waistband. The skirts with many other items of Hmong clothing are also embroided. Embroidery and applique is a social activity, a time for women to sit together and exchange views and news.The Hmong New Year celebrations in December, starting from the 15th day of the ascending moon, are accompanied by numerous activities including top-spinning competitions, dances, songs and bull fights. It is one of the main occasions used for finding a wife or a husband. The young men and women toss the makkono, a small fabric ball as part of a charming courting ritual. The throwing of the ball can go on for hours. During the festivities the Hmong women wear their traditional dresses which are adorned with intricate embroidery and silver jewelry. Local food With a cool climate and relatively high altitude, Xiengkhouang produces many food items and forest products that are either not available or in scarce supply in other parts of the country. Specialty fruits of the province (seasonally available dependant on species) are Chinese pear (mak jong), passion fruit (mak nawt), peach (mak kai), and plum (mak mun). While at the market look for the many different varieties of mushrooms found here, such as hed deep, a yellow, flower-like mushroom common to the area. Youll be lucky, however, to find the medicinal, and some say aphrodisiac-like, mushroom hed wai specific to the region, as this species is exported at high value (30-40USD/kg) to connoisseurs throughout the world. Another notable medicinal forest product unique to the province is ya hua, a root used to give strength and good appetite and for treating ailments experienced by women after giving birth. Xieng Khouangs local chili pastes are the jaeow bong, a sour version of the famous chili paste from Prabang, and jaeow pa khem, a paste made from salted fish. One of the unusual foods that Xiengkhouang is famous for, available only here, is sour swallow (nok ann toong). Every year, beginning in August/September, migratory swallows, traveling from Russia and other northern areas, visit Xiengkhouang to bathe on dust platforms located on hill tops. The swallows are caught and placed in a container to ferment. Later they are prepared by either frying or cooking in a stew. The birds are best eaten wholewithout the feathers of course. Activities in Phonsavan  Scenery and landscape Sunset Views. Climb up some of the UXO cleared hills around Phonsavan, such as the Old Cemetery or the War Memorials, Phou Padeng Resort (excellent French food and wine) or Phou Chan and enjoy sweeping views and splendid colors of the sunset.   There are several War Memorials in Phonsavan that were constructed to commemoreate the thousands of Lao soldiers who lost their lives during the Indochina Wars and to honour the Vietnamese soldiers who fought alongside them. Climb up the small hills and you will be rewarded with great views of the town and surrounding areas.Old Cemetery and Lake Jao Supanouvong. This large cemetery is located on a hill 1 km north of Phonsavan. What makes it unique is that Tai Dam animist tombs are mixed together with Catholic tombstones, Chinese graves and Lao Buddhist reliquary. The hill top offers sweeping views and is an ideal spot for watching the sun set of the green hills. The lake 3 km north of town is named in honor of Supanouvong the first president of the Lao PDR. Once the site of the provincial jail, it is now a place for a quick retreat. Handicraft and shopping Typical local products from Phonsavan and the surrounding area include natural dyes and textiles decorated with patterns unique to each ethnic group, mulberry paper umbrellas, spoons made from war scrap and Hmong embroidery.In the villages the basket making is still of great importance. Basket work is traditionally performed by men. The typical Hmong shoulder baskets, which are used to carry food and goods are made from bamboo, another material used is rattan. A special drink is Mastake Whiskey made from Hed Wai, a highly valued mushroom from the pine forests of Xieng Khouang. Image:Ban Mixay Umbrellas.jpg|Umbrellas from Ban MixayImage:Ban Napia Spoons.jpg |Spoons hand-made from UXO war scrap, Ban NapiaImage:Silk dying.JPG| Natural Silk Dying  The local fresh food market is an excellent place to sample the variety of unique food that Xieng Khouang has to offer. The cool climate and high altitude of the province produces many food items and forest products that are not available in other parts of Laos, e.g. mushrooms, peaches, plums and passion fruit. Some people also sell exotic meats, such as bamboo rats or pheasants. The Navang Craft Center is famous for woodcarving. This family business produces wood crafts made from scented Long Leng Wood (Fujian Cypress), a rare wood. You can watch the carvers work and buy souvenirs daily from 7:3020:00. In the city center there is a Hmong Craft Center offering Hmong handicraft. The souvenirshop is also home to a massage parlor run by a group of experienced Thais. The Mulberry Silk Farm of Lao Sericulture Co, a fair trade company, is dedicated to enabling Lao village silk producers in the Northern provinces to revive the art of high quality local silk production. Villagers are trained in sericulture, the process of raising silkworms, processing and improved weaving techniques and natural dyeing. Leaves, bark, vines, berries and seeds create colour choices to match virtually any taste. To learn about the whole process you are welcome to visit the farm. A self guided tour will lead you trough the center. Any purchase of souvenirs will help the local communities and enabling them to rise out of poverty. It is located in Ban Li (just west of Phonsavan on Route 7) and is open MonSat 8:0016:00.(www.mulberries.org) Social activities At the UXO-Visitor Information Centre in the center of Phonsavan (opposite Craters restaurant) the Mines Advisory Group (MAG)informs about the UXO problematic in the province. MAG began its Lao program in 1994 and started the first internationally supported UXO clearance operation in Xieng Khouang. MAG works to help people to rebuild their lives and alleviates suffering by responding to the needs of conflict affected communities. Local staff has been training to clear away the brush, to use a metal detector and recognize ordance. Their village assisted clearance approach allows communities to participate in the process. Open MonFri 8:0020:00 and SatSun 16:0020:00 (www.maginternational.org)(http://women.timesonline.co.uk/tol/life_and_style/women/article7036794.ece)Next door is the UXO Survivor Information Centre run by the World Education Consortium that is supported by various (http://maic.jmu.edu/journal/13.1/feature/Bruinooge/bruinooge.htm) American government organizations and foundations. There is a small exhibition about how people deal with an UXO accident afterward. World Education helps people to recreate their livelihood after they have been injured by a bomb accident. The centers staff are UXO survivors themselves and can be approached to explain about the life of UXO victims. Donations and shopping in the gift shop are highly welcome. The centre is associated with the ministry of health and rehabilitation. The SOS orphanage in Xieng Khouang was founded 1998 to take care of the many children who lost their parents in accidents related to UXO. Today 145 children live in 12 family houses. The associated kindergarten and primary school are open to local children. You are welcome to visit the centre during office hours MonFri from 8:0016:00, Check in at the administration building first.(A Guide to Xieng Khouang Mountain Province in Northern Laos, Provincial Tourism Department)Weddings, a central part of local life in Xieng Khouang start in November, with the peak season being January and March, ending around June (they are never held during the inauspicious months of July  October, which is Buddhist lent, and February, the month of the dog). For those interested in joining a wedding reception, one can enquire at the Mueang Phouan Hotel and the Xieng Khouang Mai Hotel, which hold receptions quite often during the wedding season. It is advised, however, that you bring a healthy appetite for family-style Lao food and a willingness to dance, sing and be merry. A small monetary gift to the newlyweds, placed in a white envelope, is also appreciated. Remember to dress politely: long pants/skirt and a clean shirt that covers both shoulders and chest. Badminton.For those in need of exercise or simply interested in taking part in one of Lao peoples favorite modern sports, the Xieng Khouang Mai Hotel also has badminton courts open to the public. Rackets are available for rent on the premises. Players are required to bring their own sporting attire. Activities around Phonsavan  Scenery and landscapeNong Tang LakeNong Tang is a large picturesque natural lake flanked by high limestone cliffs. Locals use it for fishing and it is a favorite picnic site. Enjoy the peaceful setting in the local restaurant. Around Nong Tang there are several temple ruins of Wat Pong, Wat Xiengna and Mang Stupa. All date from the Phuan Kingdom. The Tham Pa Buddha cave is also located nearby. Overnight stay is available in a guesthouse along the shore. Nongtang is located 48 km from Phonsavan on Route 7 going to Phou Khoun.Hot SpringsHot Springs can be visited in the vicinity of Muang Kham off Route 7. The big hot spring Baw Nyai is 67 km from Phonsavan, has been developed as a (simple) resort with bungalows and indoor bathing facilities. The hot springs themselves are very hot and not suitable for swimming. For swimming you would have to go to the resort or walk down to the river. There is also a scenic jar site just 2 km away overlooking the valley.Tad Ka Waterfall in Nong HetThis impressive waterfall is surrounded by spectacular limestone karst. The water runs down in cascading steps alternating with steep areas for more than 100 meters and flows all year round. To get to the falls follow Route 7 to Nong Het, at Khang Phaniane Village turn left into a graveled road (100 km from Phonsavan) and drive for about 3 km; take the trail to the left and walk about 30 minutes to get to the waterfall. Taking a guide is recommended. Best ask at the local tourist information, or if that is closed at the Nong Het guest house. Tad Ka Waterfall in TajokThe waterfall is located near Tajok village, 32 km north of Phonsavan. The water flows over several tiers. A spectacular jungle trail winds its way up the waterfall crossing it several times. Tad Kha is a popular picnic spot for locals, especially during the New Year holidays. To get there turn right at the end of Tajok village; follow the road until you see a building to the right. Walk along the ridge and take the right trail down. Local tour companies offer day tours including a picnic lunch and a hike up the waterfall.Tad Lang WaterfallTad Lang is located near Jar Site 3 just 700 meters off the road to Ban Nakang cascading down ca. 800 meters. To enjoy its whole beauty follow the trail down to the bottom of the valley. It is a good picnic spot, but because you must cross a river to reach it, access is difficult in the rainy season. ThathomTraveling to Thathom, located 130 km south of Phonsavan, is still an adventure. Driving mainly on dirt roads you pass thick deciduous forests, stands of bamboo, remote villages and cross rivers several times. Thathom offers a gorgeous karst landscape with plenty of rivers, caves and historical sites, but so far, tourist services are scarce. Song thaews (pick-up trucks) leave Phonsavan daily, but there are no regular trips in the rainy season. Boat services are available once you reach the Xan River going to Paksan in Bolikhamxay province. History Muang Khoun is the old capital of the Phuan Kingdom and was the provincial capital during French colonialism. This rural centre of faded glory was heavily bombed at the end of the 1960s and bears testimony to centuries of aggression. Once the town rivaled Luang Prabang in glory but today only few ruins remain, such as Wat Piawat. The Phuan village of Ban Nasi is nearby and a good opportunity to cross a suspension bridge with a splendid view of lush fields and creeks. The villagers do basketry and weaving. The Tham Pa Buddha Cave is located nearby Lake Nong Tang, about 3 km away from the highway. In its large network of caverns hundreds of Buddha statues were stashed away to protect them from Chinese Haw invaders in the second half of the 19th century (compare Rebellion). In the main entrance a large Buddha that is said to be over 1200 years old can be admired. During the last war the upper cave had been used by the Vietnamese army as a hospital. The cave has basic infrastructure, such as lights, toilets and steps and very knowledgeable Lao guide. Within walking distance are Water Cave and Stupa Cave, which contains the ruins of an old stupa.  Muang Si (contemporary Ban Nuang Tang) was once known for its vast Buddhist temples and quaint provincial architecture , but the destruction during the last war had been total. Muang Si was the headquarters of the Neutralist faction in the 1960s and served as a base for US war planes. After 1975 it briefly was the revolutionary capital of the Pathet Lao.   Ban Tajok village is a Hmong village along Route 7. It is an excellent example of how war remains are integrated into daily lives. Take a walk to the village and discover bomb fences and herbs growing in bomb casings. Every Sunday morning from 4 am to about 9 am (sic!) there is a popular Hmong morning market worth a visit. Indochina War sites Evidence of the intense fighting can be seen in the cratered landscape in in war relics such as bomb shells, tanks and military positions. The resourceful locals refashion war scrap into items for everyday use, e.g. spoons in Napia village, vegetable planters, fences, tools, pumps and barbecue fireplaces. The extent of the bombardment is in particular evident at Ban Khai, 36 km northeast of Phonsavan and of Jars sites 1 and 3; here the landscape is pockmarked with craters. Driving north along Route 7 plenty of creatively modified war scrap used in local architecture catches your eye. In Tajok, a Hmong village along Route 7 (30 km northeast of Phonsavan), you can discover lots of bomb casings reused as barn pillars, fences and for other uses. Craters at Ban Khai The landscape around Khai village is pockmarked with craters and shows the impact of the immense aerial bombardment during the Second Indochina War. The wreck of a  Russian Tank can be found off Route 7 on the way to Ban Mixay- The mulberry umbrella village.Caves  Refuges for thousands of peopleDuring the war thousands of local residents took shelter in caves and set up hospitals and schools; the army used the caves as well to store weapons and medical supplies. Two major caves are open to the public:Tham Piu Cave is located 6 km north of Muang Kham. It is one of the tragedies of the so-called Secret War. In 1969 a single rocket fired from an aircraft caused the death of an estimated 374 people who had taken refuge in the cave. Their bones are still buried in the rubble. Directions: Take Route 5 towards Nam Nguen and turn left 3 km from Muang Kham; the paved road ends at the cave.The Tham Xang Caves are located in a scenic karst area, the caves were used by the revolutionary fighters. Inside the cave complex they set up a hospital, an arsenal and a medicine depot. Evidence can still be seen. Besides its war history the illuminated residential cave is worth visiting to see its natural beauty. The Hmong community of Ban Ta takes care off the caves and offers a local tour guide service. Directions: The caves are 36 km northwest of Phonsavan. Take Route 7, pass Nong Pet, then in Nam Ka village turn left into a dirt road; follow the signs to Tham Xang until you reach Ban Ta.Image:UXO Architecture 1.JPG |Today bombs are re-used creativlyImage:RussianTank.jpg |The wreck of a russian tankEthnic groups An old tradition in Ban Mixay village, Phoukoud district, is the making of mulberry paper umbrellas, but only a few people still know how to make the Khan nyu. The umbrellas were originally made by monks or novices at Buddhist temples and served as gifts to those who came to visit them. Nowadays they are sold in many colors and sizes at the local markets. The spokes of the umbrella frame are made from mai hok and the struts from mai pong or mai louang bamboo, For the center piece, which is of particular importance, mai sombao is used. The paper is made from the mulberry tree, but not the type used for silk production. The outer pulp of the tree is pounded and mixed with water. Then the paste is poured into the frame and the fibers are separated until they are evenly distributed. The frame is set out to dry in the sun. The dried paper is cut and glued to the spokes. The glue is made from the fruit of the wild persimmon tree. The paper is dyed with natural dyes; sesame oil e.g. produces a white color and the roots of the mak bao plant are used for red umbrellas.   Ban Napia village. Since the late 1980s the people of this cultural village produce spoons made of aluminum scrap of the Indochina Wars. Visiting the village you can learn about the spoon making process and also gain insights into Phuan culture. The village also produces hand-woven textiles and a good lao-lao schnapps. Overnight stays with excellent food is available. You can book treks from Ban Napia to Ban Nam Kha at travel agents in Phonsavan. This is a project run by Helvetas of Switzerland to help improving the livelihoods of the villagers. A small souvenir shop has been built with help from Germanys ded. Ban Xieng Khio village Tai Dam villages can be found in the upland valley of Kham. The Tai Dam Cultural Centre showcases the cultural tradition and customs of this minority group. The centre is locally run; if the door is locked ask the villagers to open and visit the centre. Tai Dam are well known producers of fine quality silk and cotton fabrics which can be purchased directly by the manufacturers in the village or at Kham Handicraft Group Centre.  Xang village is located near a small hot spring. An ideal spot for a small break. Across the river Phuan women demonstrate their weaving.Ban Phakeo Trekking is becoming more and more popular (most travel agents in Phonsavan are offering tours now). Phakeo village is a remote Hmong village located on the upper slopes of the mountains and can only be reached by walking with a guide. The small farming community with 20 households has retained a high degree of traditional customs and living. The Provincial Tourism Department assisted the villagers with offering a community based overnight stay. Transportation Lao Airlines offers six flights a week in peak season and four flights in low season. Coming from Vinh or Hanoi in Vietnam visas are available on arrival at the Ka border, which is open daily from 6:00  18:00. The bus from Vinh leaves four days a week and takes 12 hours, form Hanoi there is one bus per week.If you are travelling from Vientiane you can either take VIP buses or local buses. The buses leave from the northern bus terminal and take about 1012 hours. Note: The roads are paved but there are plenty of serpentines. The bus trip from Vieng takes 78 hours. Buses run daily from Prabang via Route 13 and 7 and take 8 hours. You could also hire a minivan in either Luang Prabang or Vientiane. References For more information visit the Lao National Tourism Organisation homepage http://www.tourismlaos.org/or the Asian Development homepage about ecotourism in Laos http://www.ecotourismlaos.com/(cs:Phonsavande:Phonsavaneo:Phonsavanfr:Phonsavanlt:Ponsavanasnl:Phonsavanja:pl:Phonsavanru:vi:Phonsavanwar:Phonsavan
759312
Data_management
Data management comprises all the disciplines related to managing data as a valuable resource. Overview The official definition provided by DAMA International, the professional organization for those in the data management profession, is: Data Resource Management is the development and execution of architectures, policies, practices and procedures that properly manage the full data lifecycle needs of an enterprise. This definition is fairly broad and encompasses a number of professions which may not have direct technical contact with lower-level aspects of data management, such as database management.Alternatively, the definition provided in the DAMA Data Management Body of Knowledge (DAMA-DMBOK) is:Data management is the development, execution and supervision of plans, policies, programs and practices that control, protect, deliver and enhance the value of data and information assets.(http://www.dama.org/files/public/DI_DAMA_DMBOK_Guide_Presentation_2007.pdf DAMA-DMBOK Guide (Data Management Body of Knowledge) Introduction & Project Status)The concept of Data Management arose in the 1980s as technology moved from sequential processing (first cards, then tape) to random access processing.  Since it was now technically possible to store a single fact in a single place and access that using random access disk, those suggesting that Data Management was more important than Process Management used arguments such as a customers home address is stored in 75 (or some other large number) places in our computer systems.  During this period, random access processing was not competitivly fast, so those suggesting Process Management was more important than Data Management used batch processing time as their primary argument.  As applications moved more and more into real-time, interactive applications, it became obvious to most practitioners that both management processes were important.  If the data was not well defined, the data would be mis-used in applications.  If the process wasnt well defined, it was impossible to meet user needs.Corporate Data Quality Management is according to the European Foundation for Quality Management and the Competence Center Corporate Data Quality (CC CDQ, University of St. Gallen) the whole set of activities intended to improve corporate data quality (both reactive and preventive). Main premise of CDQM is the business relevance of high-quality corporate data. CDQM comprises with following activity areas(EFQM ; IWI-HSG: EFQM Framework for Corporate Data Quality Management. Brussels : EFQM Press, 2011. - Forthcoming.):* Strategy for Corporate Data Quality: As CDQM is affected by various business drivers and requires involvement of multiple divisions in an  organization; it must be considered a company-wide endeavor.* Corporate Data Quality Controlling: Effective CDQM requires compliance with standards, policies, and procedures. Compliance is monitored according to previously defined metrics and performance indicators and reported to stakeholders.* Corporate Data Quality Organization: CDQM requires clear roles and responsibilities for the use of corporate data. The CDQM organization defines tasks and privileges for decision making for CDQM.* Corporate Data Quality Processes and Methods: In order to handle corporate data properly and in a standardized way across the entire organization and to ensure corporate data quality, standard procedures and guidelines must be embedded in companys daily processes.* Data Architecture for Corporate Data Quality: The data architecture consists of the data object model - which comprises the unambiguous definition and the conceptual model of corporate data - and the data storage and distribution architecture.* Applications for Corporate Data Quality: Software applications support the activities of Corporate Data Quality Management. Their use must be planned, monitored, managed and continuously improved. Topics in Data Management Topics in Data Management, grouped by the DAMA DMBOK Framework,(http://www.dama.org/i4a/pages/index.cfm?pageid3364 DAMA-DMBOK Functional Framework) include:governanceassetgovernancestewardData Architecture, Analysis and DesignanalysisarchitecturemodelingDatabase Managementmaintenanceadministrationmanagement systemData Security ManagementaccesserasureprivacysecurityData Quality Managementcleansingintegrityenrichmentqualityquality assuranceReference and Master Data Managementintegrationdata managementdataData Warehousing and Business Intelligence Managementintelligencemartminingmovement (extract, transform and load)warehousingDocument, Record and Content Managementmanagement systemmanagementMeta Data ManagementmanagementMetadatadiscoverypublishingregistryContact Data Managementcontinuity planningoperationsdata integrationmanagementthefttheftsoftwaresoftware(geography)codeaddressnumberBody Of KnowledgeThe DAMA Guide to the Data Management Body of Knowledge (DAMA-DMBOK Guide), under the guidance of a new DAMA-DMBOK Editorial Board. This publication is available from April 5, 2009.UsageIn modern management usage, one can easily discern a trend away from the term data in composite expressions to the term information or even knowledge when talking in non-technical context. Thus there exists not only data management, but also management and management. This is a fairly detrimental tendency in that it obscures the fact that is usually always plain, traditional data that is managed or somehow processed on second looks. The extremely relevant distinction between data and derived values can be seen in the ladder. While data can exist as such, information and knowledge are always in the eye (or rather the brain) of the beholder and can only be measured in relative units.See also* architecture* architecture* design* system* Integration* vocabulary* Best practices in ecological and environmental data management from DataONENotes(4. ^ Pooja Hegde, A study pertaining to the Data Cleansing Strategies implemented by Unilog.External links* de:Datenmanagementde datosdes donnesdatade dadoszh:
760639
List_of_file_systems
The following lists identify, characterize and link to more thorough information on computer systems.Many older systems support only their one native file system, which does not bear any name apart from the name of the operating system itself.Disk file systemsDisk file systems are usually block-oriented. Files in a block-oriented file system are sequences of blocks, often featuring fully random-access read, write, and modify operations.*ADFS  Acorns Advanced Disc filing system, successor to DFS.*AdvFS - Advanced File System, designed by Equipment Corporation for their Digital UNIX (now UNIX) operating system.*AFS (Not to be confused with Andrew File System, below)  Acer Fast Filesystem, used on OpenServer*AthFS - AtheOS File System, a 64-bit  journaled filesystem now used by Syllable. Also called AFS*AFS - Ami File Safe, a commercial filesystem shipped on Amiga in the 1990s (AFS is structure compatible with PFS)*BFS  the Be File System used on BeOS, occasionally misnamed as BeFS. Open source implementation called OpenBFS is used by the Haiku operating system.*Btrfs - is a copy-on-write file system for Linux announced by Oracle in 2007 and published under the General Public License (GPL).*CBMFS  The filesystem used on most 64-compatible floppy drives including the venerable 1541.*CMDFS  A filesystem extension added to CBMFS by Micro Designs, for use in their 3.5 inch floppy drives, RAM disks, and hard drive controllers.*CP/M file system  Native filesystem used in the CP/M (Control Program for Microcomputers) operating system which was first released in the late 1970s.*DDFS  Data Domain File System, the deduplication file system that ships in the Data Domain Deduplication Storage Systems which are an alternative to tape for storing backups and archives.()*DTFS  Desktop File System, featuring file compression, used by OpenServer*DOS 3.x - Original floppy operating system and file system developed for the II*EAFS  Extended Acer Fast Filesystem, used on OpenServer*File System (EFS)  an older block filing system under IRIX.*ext  Extended file system, designed for Linux systems*ext2  Second extended file system, designed for Linux systems.*ext3  A journaled form of ext2.*ext4  A follow up for ext3 and also a journaled filesystem with support for extents.*ext3cow  A file system form of ext3.*FAT  File Allocation Table, used on DOS and Windows, 12-, 16- and 32-bit table depths.**VFAT  Version of Windows FAT system with extension to allow long (up to 255 character) filenames instead of only the filenames allowed in the original FAT.**FATX  A modified version of Windows FAT system that is used on the original Xbox console.*FFS (Amiga)  Fast File System, used on Amiga systems. This FS has evolved over time. Now counts FFS1, FFS Intl, FFS DCache, FFS2.*FFS  Fast File System, used on *BSD systems*Fossil  9 from Bell Labs snapshot archival file system.*Files-11  OpenVMS file system; also used on some PDP-11 systems; supports record-orientated files*HFS  Hierarchical File System, in use until HFS+ was introduced on Mac OS 8.1.   Also known as Mac OS Standard format.  Successor to Macintosh File System (MFS) & predecessor to HFS+; not to be confused with IBMs HFS provided with z/OS*HFS+  Updated version of Apples HFS, Hierarchical File System, supported on Mac OS 8.1 & above, including Mac OS X.  Supports file system journaling, enabling recovery of data after a system crash.  Also referred to as Mac OS Extended format or HFS Plus*HPFS  High Performance File System, used on OS/2*HTFS  High Throughput Filesystem, used on OpenServer*9660  Used on CD-ROM and DVD-ROM discs (Ridge and Joliet are extensions to this)*JFS  IBM file system, provided in Linux, OS/2, and AIX.  Supports extents.*JXFS used in AmigaOS 4.1.*LisaFS - Filesystem used by Lisas operating system. Unique in that it allowed two different files with exactly same name (foo and foo).*LFS  4.4BSD implementation of a file system*MFS  Macintosh File System, used on early OS systems. Succeeded by Hierarchical File System (HFS).* Next3  A form of ext3 with snapshots support.()*MFS  TiVos Media File System, a proprietary fault tolerant format used on Tivo hard drives for real time recording from live TV.*file system  Used on Minix systems*NILFS  Linux implementation of a file system*NTFS  (NT File System) Used on Microsofts NT-based operating systems*File System - The original NetWare 2.x - 5.x file system, used optionally by later versions.*NSS  Novell Storage Services.  This is a new 64-bit file system using a balanced tree algorithm.  Used in NetWare versions 5.0-up and recently ported to  Linux.*OneFS - One File System. This is a fully journaled, distributed file system used  by Isilon. OneFS uses FlexProtect and Reed-Solomon encodings to support up to four simultaneous disk failures.*OFS  Old File System, on Amiga. Good for floppies, but fairly useless on hard drives.*PFS  and PFS2, PFS3, etc. Technically interesting file system available for the Amiga, performs very well under a lot of circumstances. Very simple and elegant.*ProDOS - Operating system and file system successor to DOS 3.x, for use on Apples computers prior to the Macintosh & Lisa computers, the Apple series, including the IIgs*Qnx4fs - File system that is used in QNX version 4 and 6.*Qnx6fs - New copy-on-write file system presented in QNX 6.4.0 and used as default since 6.4.1.*ReiserFS  File system that uses journaling*Reiser4  File system that uses journaling, newest version of ReiserFS*Reliance  Datalights transactional file system for high reliability applications*Nitro  Tree-based transactional file system developed for high-performance embedded systems, from Datalight*S51K  AT&T UNIX System V 1KB Filesystem, used by OpenServer*SkyFS - Developed for SkyOS to replace BFS as the operating systems main file system. It is based on BFS, but contains many new features.*SFS  Smart File System, file system available for the Amiga platforms.*SpadFS - Linux - non-journaling, hashing lookup*STL (standard language file system) - a file system developed by IBM.(http://publib.boulder.ibm.com/infocenter/comphelp/v7v91/index.jsp?topic/com.ibm.aix.cbl.doc/rpfio50.htm)*TRFS - Experimental, design only*Tux3 - An experimental versioning file system intended as a replacement for ext3*UDF  Packet based file system for WORM/RW media such as CD-RW and DVD.*UFS  Unix File System, used on Solaris and older BSD systems*UFS2  Unix File System, used on newer BSD systems*VxFS   Veritas file system, first commercial file system; HP-UX, Solaris, Linux, AIX*VLIR (Variable Length Indexed Record)  a filesystem extension added by Berkeley Softworks to CBMFS, allowing full random access read and write operations, for computers running GEOS.*WAFL  Write Anywhere File Layout. High performance, log-structured like file system.  WAFL uses RAID-DP to protect against multiple disk failures, and NVRAM for transaction log replays.  Used on NetApp systems*XFS  Used on SGI IRIX and Linux systems*ZFS - Microsystems ZFS open source specification ported to IBM zSeries systems. File systems with built in fault-tolerance These file systems have built in checksumming and either mirroring or parity for extra redundancy on one or several block devices.*Btrfs - A filesystem based on B-Trees, created by Corporation.*HAMMER - DragonflyBSDs primary filesystem, created by Matt Dillon*Reliance  A transactional file system with CRCs, created by Datalight.*Nitro  A tree-based transactional file system with CRCs, developed for high performance and reliability in embedded systems, from Datalight.*ZFS  Created by Microsystems for use on Solaris 10 and OpenSolaris, ported to FreeBSD 7.0, NetBSD (as of 08/2009) and to FUSE (not to be confused with the two zFSes from IBM) File systems optimized for flash memory, solid state media Solid state media, like memory, are similar to disks in their interfaces, but have different problems. While practically eliminating seek times, they require special handling such as leveling and different detection and correction algorithms.*ETFS - Embedded Transactional File System.  Designed primarily for NAND devices by QNX Software Systems.*exFAT - Microsoft proprietary system intended for flash drives but often incorrectly called FAT64 (http://support.microsoft.com/?kbid955704)*ExtremeFFS - Internal file system for SSDs.*FFS2 (presumably preceded by FFS1), one of the earliest flash file systems.  Developed and patented by Microsoft in the early 1990s.(http://patft.uspto.gov/netacgi/nph-Parser?Sect1PTO2&Sect2HITOFF&p1&u%2Fnetahtml%2FPTO%2Fsearch-bool.html&r1&fG&l50&co1AND&dPTXT&s15392427.PN.&OSPN/5392427&RSPN/5392427)*JFFS  Original log structured Linux file system for NOR flash media*JFFS2  Successor of JFFS, for NAND and NOR flash*LogFS  Intended to replace JFFS2, better scalability. In early development.*File System -- the non-volatile file system for memory introduced by Inc..*OneFS - OneFS is a file system utilized by Isilon. It supports selective placement of meta-data directly onto flash SSD.*Microcontroller Systems emFile - File system for deeply embedded applications which supports both NAND and NOR flashes.  Wear leveling, fast read and write, and very low RAM usage.*TFAT  A transactional version of the FAT filesystem.*TrueFFS - Internal file system for SSDs, implementing error correction, bad block re-mapping and wear levelling.*UBIFS  Successor of JFFS2 optimized to utilize non-volatile DRAM*UFFS - Ultra low cost flash file system for embedded system (http://sites.google.com/site/gouffs/home)*Anywhere File Layout - WAFL is an internal file system utilized by NetApp within their DataONTAP OS, originally optimized to use non-volatile DRAM*XCFiles  an exFAT implementation from Datalight for Wind River VxWorks and other embedded operating systems*YAFFS  A Log structured file system designed for NAND flash, but also used with NOR flash.*ZFS - Allows placing write-ahead log (ZIL) on flash, and using flash as a second-level read cache (L2ARC) Record-oriented file systems In record-oriented file systems files are stored as a collection of records. They are typically associated with mainframe and minicomputer operating systems. Programs read and write whole records, rather than bytes or arbitrary byte ranges, and can seek to a record boundary but not within records. The more sophisticated record-oriented file systems have more in common with simple databases than with other file systems.*Files-11  early versions were record-oriented; support for streams was added later* Terminal System (MTS) -  provides line files where record lengths and line numbers are associated as metadata with each record in the file, lines can be added, replaced, updated with the same or different length records, and deleted anywhere in the file without the need to read and rewrite the entire file.()*OS4000 for GECs OS4000 operating system, on the 4000 series minicomputers*sequential access method (QSAM)  also for IBMs z/OS and z/VSE operating systems; see methods and set (IBM mainframe) for more examples*Operating System - A record-oriented filesystem and database that uses hash-coding to store data.* RSD (record sequential delimited) - A record-oriented file system from IBM (*File Server (SFS)  A record-oriented file system from IBM, originally part of the Encina (http://www.zois.co.uk/tpm/encina.html) system, now integrated into CICS Transaction Server.(http://www-306.ibm.com/software/htp/cics/txseries/)*storage access method (VSAM)  for IBMs z/OS and z/VSE operating systems Shared disk file systems Shared disk file systems (also called shared storage file systems, file system, file system or even cluster file systems) are primarily used in a area network where all nodes directly access the storage where the file system is located. This makes it possible for nodes to fail without affecting access to the file system from the other nodes. Shared disk file systems are normally used in a cluster together with storage on hardware RAID. Shared disk file systems normally do not scale over 64 or 128 nodes.Shared disk file systems may be symmetric where metadata is distributed among the nodes or asymmetric with centralized metadata servers.Parallel filesystem - file systems with support for parallel applications, all nodes may be accessing the same files at the same time, concurrently reading and writing. Data for a single file is striped across multiple storage nodes to provide scalable performance to individual files. Examples of this include: Panasas ActiveScale, Lustre, GPFS and Sistina. NFSv4.1 will feature an extension to the NFS standard that supports parallel IO. * CXFS (Clustered XFS) from Graphics (SGI). Available for AIX, IRIX, Linux, Solaris and Windows. Asymmetric.* SAN File System (SFS) from DataPlow. Available for IRIX, Linux, Solaris and Windows. Asymmetric.* Celerra HighRoad from EMC. Available for Linux, AIX, HP-UX, IRIX, Solaris and Windows. Asymmetric.* Files-11 on VMSclusters, released by DEC in 1983, now from HP. Symmetric.* File System (GFS) from Hat. Available for Linux under GPL. Symmetric (GDLM) or Asymmetric (GULM).* General Parallel File System (GPFS) Windows, Linux, AIX . Parallel* Cluster File System (CFS) (TruCluster) from HP. Available for UNIX.* Nasan File System from DataPlow. Available for Linux and Solaris. Asymmetric.* ACFS from Corporation. Available for Linux (Red Hat Enterprise Linux 5 and Enterprise Linux 5 only). Symmetric.* Oracle Cluster File System (OCFS and now OCFS2) from Corporation. Available for Linux under GPL. Symmetric.* file system (PSFS) from PolyServe http://www.polyserve.com/ is used in their Matrix Server (http://www.polyserve.com/matrix_server_windows.php) which focus on exporting to clients over CIFS or NFS as well as Microsoft SQL Server and Oracle 9i RAC and 10g. Available for Linux and Windows. Symmetric.* File System from Quantum. Asymmetric. Available for AIX, HP-UX, IRIX, Linux, OS, Solaris and Windows. Interoperable with Xsan. Formerly known as CVFS.* Whale Clustered file system (BWFS) from Zhongke Blue Whale. Asymmetric. Available for  Windows, Linux, and OS X.* QFS from Microsystems. Available for Linux (client only) and Solaris (metadata server and client). Asymmetric.* Storage Foundation from Symantec. Available for AIX, HP-UX, Linux and Solaris. Asymmetric.* Xsan from Inc.. Available for Mac OS. Asymmetric. Interoperable with File System.* VMFS from VMware/Corporation. Available for ESX Server. Symmetric.Distributed file systemsfile systems are also called network file systems. Many implementations have been made, they are location dependent  and they have control lists (ACLs), unless otherwise stated below.* 9P, the 9 from Bell Labs and Inferno distributed file system protocol. One implementation is v9fs. No ACLs.* S3* File System (AFS) is scalable and location independent, has a heavy client cache and uses Kerberos for authentication. Implementations include the original from IBM (earlier Transarc), Arla and OpenAFS.* Filing Protocol (AFP) from Inc..  AFP may use Kerberos authentication.* Distributed File System (DCE/DFS) from IBM (earlier Transarc) is similar to AFS and focus on full POSIX file system semantics and availability. Available for AIX and Solaris under a software license.* Access Listener (FAL) is an implementation of the Access Protocol (DAP) which is part of the DECnet suite of protocols created by Equipment Corporation.* Office Groove shared workspace, used for DoHyki* Core Protocol (NCP) from Novell is used in networks based on NetWare.* Network File System (NFS) originally from Microsystems is the standard in UNIX-based networks. NFS may use Kerberos authentication and a client cache.  (4.1 only)* OS4000 Linked-OS provides distributed filesystem across OS4000 systems.* File System (SFS) http://elbe.borg.umn.edu/* File System (SFS), a global network file system designed to securely allow access to file systems across separate administrative domains.* Message Block (SMB) originally from IBM (but the most common version is modified heavily by Microsoft) is the standard in Windows-based networks. SMB is also known as Common Internet File System (CIFS). SMB may use Kerberos authentication. Distributed fault-tolerant file systems Distributed fault-tolerant replication of data between nodes (between servers or servers/clients) for availability and offline (disconnected) operation.* Coda from Mellon University focuses on bandwidth-adaptive operation (including disconnected operation) using a client-side cache for mobile computing. It is a descendant of AFS-2. It is available for Linux under the GPL.* File System (Microsoft) (Dfs) from Microsoft focuses on location transparency and availability. Available for Windows under a software license.* InterMezzo from File Systems uses synchronization over HTTP. Available for Linux under GPL but no longer in development since the developers are working on Lustre.* File System (MooseFS) from SA is a networking, distributed file system. It spreads data over several physical locations (servers), which are visible to a user as one resource.  Works on Linux, FreeBSD, NetBSD, OpenSolaris and MAC OS X. Master server and chunkservers can also run on Solaris and Windows with Cygwin.* Tahoe-LAFS (http://allmydata.org/trac/tahoe) is an open source secure, decentralized, fault-tolerant filesystem utilizing encryption as the basis for a least-authority replicated design. Distributed parallel file systems Distributed parallel file systems stripe data over multiple servers for high performance. They are normally used in high-performance computing (HPC).Some of the distributed parallel file systems use storage device (OSD) (In Lustre called OST) for chunks of data together with centralized metadata servers.* Fraunhofer Parallel File System (FhGFS) from the Society Competence Center for High Performance Computing.  Available free of charge for Linux under a proprietary license. (High availability features are on the roadmap.)* Virtual File System (PVFS, PVFS2).  Developed to store virtual system images, with a focus on non shared writing optimizations. Available for Linux under GPL.* Starfish is a POSIX-compatible, N-way redundant file system created by Digital Bazaar Inc. and published under a pseudo open source license. Available for Linux and OS. Windows support is available via Samba. Distributed parallel fault-tolerant file systems Distributed file systems, which also are parallel and tolerant, stripe and replicate data over multiple servers for high performance and to maintain integrity. Even if a server fails no data is lost. The file systems are used in both high-performance computing (HPC) and clusters.All file systems listed here focus on availability, scalability and high performance unless otherwise stated below.* CloudStore from Kosmix is a File System workalike, available under Apache License 2.0.* Cosmos (Microsoft internal) focuses on tolerance, high throughput and scalability. Designed for terabyte and petabyte sized data sets and processing with Dryad.* dCache by Fermilab and DESY. A write once filesystem, accessible via various protocols (not mountable). Is available free of charge (although it is not Free/Open Source Software due to license restrictions on distribution of modified versions)* ExaFS distributed file system from Exanet. Runs as part of ExaStore, a Linux based NAS solution that runs on commodity Intel based hardware, serving NFS v2/v3, SMB/CIFS and AFP to Windows, OS, Linux and other UNIX clients. Available under a software license.* FS-Manager from CDNetworks focused on Delivery Network. Available for Linux under software license.* file system uses OpenLDAP or PostgreSQL for metadata and FUSE or LUFS for mounting. Available for Linux, FreeBSD, NetBSD and Solaris under License.* Parallel File System (GPFS) from IBM. Support replication between attached block storage. Available for AIX, Linux and Windows. Symmetric or asymmetric (configurable). (proprietary)* GlusterFS is a general purpose distributed file system for scalable storage. It aggregates various storage bricks over Infiniband RDMA or TCP/IP interconnect into one large parallel network file system. Released under GNU General Public License v3.* File System (GFS) from Google focus on tolerance, high throughput and scalability. Only available for use through App Engine.* Fusion from IBRIX. Available for Linux under a software license.* Lustre is a POSIX-compliant, high-performance filesystem originally developed by File Systems.  Lustre has availability via storage failover.  Freely available for Linux under GPL.* MogileFS from Interactive is not POSIX compliant, uses a flat namespace, application level, uses MySQL or Postgres for metadata and HTTP for transport. Available for Linux (but may be ported) under GPL.* distributed file system from Isilon. BSD based OS on dedicated Intel based hardware, serving NFS v3 and SMB/CIFS to Windows, OS, Linux and other UNIX clients under a software license.* ActiveScale File System (PanFS) from Panasas uses storage devices. Available for Linux under a software license.* PeerFS from Data Corporation focus on availability and high performance and uses peer-to-peer replication with multiple sources and targets. Available for Linux under a software license.* Cluster File System from Technologies Inc implements on demand coherency and uses industrial standard iSCSI and a modified version of the XFS file system. Available for Linux under a software license.* XtreemFS http://www.xtreemfs.com is a free and open-source (GPL) cross-platform file system for wide area networks. It replicates the data for fault tolerance and caches metadata and data to improve performance over high-latency links. SSL and X.509 certificates support makes XtreemFS usable over public networks. It supports also Striping for usage in a cluster.* FS (http://www.furquim.org/chironfs/) is a fuse-based, transparent replication file system, layering on an existing file system and implementing at the file system level what RAID 1 does at the device level. A notably convenient consequence is the possibility of picking single target directories, without the need of replicating entire partitions. (The project has no visible activity after 2008, a status request in Oct. 2009 in the chironfs-forum is unanswered)In development:* WebDFS An Open Source scalable, decentralized file store similar to MogileFS in function and purpose. Uses HTTP as the transport. Data is automatically and optimally re-arranged to accommodate the addition of new resources.  The lack of central meta data management greatly simplifies deployment and use.* Ceph from of California, Santa Cruz which utilized entire block devices. Available for Linux under the LGPL. Merged for Linux kernel 2.6.34.* zFS from IBM (not to be confused with ZFS from Microsystems or the zFS file system provided with IBMs z/OS operating system) focus on cache and transactions and uses storage devices. Under development and not freely available.* Hadoop Distributed File System - free GoogleFS clone produced by Apache. http://hadoop.apache.org/* HAMMER/ANVIL by Matt Dillon* OASIS from ETRI. Very similar to the Lustre or Panasas. Available  for Linux via. special technology transfer program provided by ETRI.* GLORY-FS also from ETRI. Very similar to the Google File System or Hadoop, but it is fully POSIX compliant. It is specially optimized for large scale web 2.0 content services. Version 2.5 is available for Linux via. special technology transfer program provided by ETRI. Windows version is under development.* parallax ()* PNFS (Parallel NFS) - Clients available for Linux and OpenSolaris and back-ends from Panasas, EMC Highroad and IBM GPFS ()* Coherent Remote File System (CRFS) - requires Btrfs* Parallel Optimized Host Message Exchange Layered File System (POHMELFS) and Distributed STorage (DST).  POSIX compliant, added to Linux kernel 2.6.30* Sector http://sector.sourceforge.net from Center for Data Mining. Sector is a high performance, scalable, and secure distributed file system. Available under Apache License 2.0* StarFS from CDNetworks. The StarFS is a global storage platform which supports virtualization of distributed file system and event-driven file synchronization with remote StarFS clusters.* Unilium http://unilium.com provides a decentralized, versioning file system stored in content addressable storage, whose data may be hosted across heterogeneous data storage nodes. Peer-to-peer file systems * CFS is a read-only file system based on the Chord DHT* Cleversafe uses Cauchy Reed-Solomon Dispersal Algorithms (IDAs) to separate data into unrecognizable slices and distribute them, via secure Internet connections, to multiple storage locations.* Infinit is a large-scale peer-to-peer file system developed in C++ which enables users to both reliably and securely store their files in a location-independent and replicated way; and to share files with a controlled set of users, friends etc.* Ivy (http://pdos.csail.mit.edu/ivy/osdi02.pdf) is a multi-user read/write peer-to-peer file system. Ivy has no centralized or dedicated components, and it provides useful integrity properties without requiring users to fully trust either the underlying peer-to-peer storage system or the other users of the file system.* Pastis file system is a French peer-to-peer file system developed in Java* ColonyFS emphasises anonymity, security and dependability, is written in Java and C#, and is released under the GPLSpecial purpose file systems*archfs (archive)*AUFS an enhanced version of UnionFS stackable unification file system*AXFS (small footprint compressed read-only, with XIP)*Barracuda WebDAV plug-in. Secure Network File Server for embedded devices.* File System was used on UnixWare to store files necessary to its boot process.*Cascade File System &ndash; provides file system access to Subversion and Perforce repositories and caches their contents locally*cdfs (reading and writing of CDs)*Disc File System (reading and writing of CDs; experimental)*cfs (caching)*cvsfs (presents the CVS contents as mountable file system).*Dokan LGPL FUSE for Windows analog*compFUSEd (overlay transparent read-write compression, FUSE based)*FuseCompress (overlay transparent read-write compression, FUSE based)*Cramfs (small footprint compressed read-only)*Cromfs is a user-space (FUSE based) read-only filesystem using an efficient LZMA compression algorithm.*Davfs2 (WebDAV)-*Freenet &ndash; Decentralized, censorship-resistant*FTPFS/CurlFtpFS (ftp access)*GmailFS (Google Mail File System)*lnfs (long names)*fo (The mini fanout overlay file system) &ndash; Redirects modifying operations to a writeable location called storage directory, and leaving the original data in the base directory untouched. When reading, the file system merges the modified and original data so that only the newest versions will appear.*MVFS  MultiVersion File System, proprietary, used by ClearCase.*nntpfs (netnews)*ParFiSys (Experimental parallel file system for parallel processing)*(Plan 9) (interprocess communication &ndash; pipes)*pramfs - Protected and Persistent RAM Filesystem*RAIF Redundant Array of Independent Filesystems -  stackable RAID-like file system*romfs*SODA: a Lease-based Consistent Distributed File System - (early 1990s)*SquashFS (compressed read-only)*SysmanFS (based on FUSE, a virtual file system for cluster system management)*tmpfs in-memory temporary file system (on Linux platforms).*UMSDOS - FAT file system extended to store permissions and metadata, used for Linux*UnionFS - stackable unification file system, which can appear to merge the contents of several directories (branches), while keeping their physical content separate*Venti - Plan 9 de-duplicated storage used by Fossil.*(Plan 9) (wiki wiki)*WDK.VFS - CMS Virtual File System introduced by Skitsanos*Reliance - transactional file system for 32-bit embedded systems from Datalight, Inc.*ERTFS ProPlus64 - it comes with integrated Failsafe operation, it contains a default journaling mode.*WBFS - Wii Backup FileSystem*whefs - WanderingHorse.net Embedded Filesystem is an open source C library implementing an embedded/embeddable filesystem. Pseudo- and virtual file systems *devfs*procfs &ndash; pseudo-file system, used to access kernel information about processes*specfs (Special File System for device files )*sysfs (Linux)*WinFS - Windows Future Storage, was planned as the successor to NTFS for Windows Vista.Encrypted file systems*eCryptfs - a stacked cryptographic file system in the Linux kernel since 2.6.19*Secure Shell File System (SSHFS) - locally mount a remote directory on a server using only a shell login.*EncFS, GPL Encrypted file system in user-space*Rubberhose filesystem*PhoneBookFS*Solid File System - (SolFS) cross-platform single-file virtual file system with encryption and compression*EFS &ndash; Encrypted file system for Windows systems and AIX. An extension of NTFS*FSFS - Fast Secure File System  Project Home page*ZFS Encryption Support Project Home pageFiles system interfacesThese are not really file systems; they allow access to file systems from an operating system standpoint.*FUSE (file system in userspace, like LUFS but better maintained)*LUFS (Linux userland file system - seems to be abandoned in favour of FUSE)* VFS Virtual Filesystem* Callback File System  SDK that lets developers create installable virtual file systems for Windows in user modeSee also*file access*of file systems*OSID*storageReferencesExternal links*File Systemssouborovch systmvon Dateisystemende sistemas de archivoslistja sborovch systmov 
762988
Swarm_intelligence
Swarm intelligence (SI) is the behaviour of decentralized, self-organized systems, natural or artificial. The concept is employed in work on intelligence. The expression was introduced by Beni and Jing Wang in 1989, in the context of cellular robotic systems.(Beni, G., Wang, J. Swarm Intelligence in Cellular Robotic Systems, Proceed. NATO Advanced Workshop on Robots and Biological Systems, Tuscany, Italy, June 2630 (1989))SI systems are typically made up of a population of simple agents or boids interacting locally with one another and with their environment. The inspiration often comes from nature, especially biological systems. The agents follow very simple rules, and although there is no centralized control structure dictating how individual agents should behave, local, and to a certain degree random, interactions between such agents lead to the emergence of intelligent global behavior, unknown to the individual agents.  Natural examples of SI include ant colonies, bird flocking, animal herding, bacterial growth, and fish schooling.The application of swarm principles to robots is called robotics, while swarm intelligence refers to the more general set of algorithms. Swarm prediction has been used in the context of forecasting problems.Example algorithmsAltruism algorithmResearchers in Switzerland have developed an algorithm based on rule of kin selection. The algorithm shows how altruism in a swarm of entities can, over time, evolve and result in more effective swarm behaviour.(Altruism helps swarming robots fly better genevalunch.com, 4 May 2011.)(Waibel M, Floreano1 D and Keller L (2011) A quantitative test of Hamiltons rule for the evolution of altruism PLoS Biology, 9(5): e1000615. )Ant colony optimizationcolony optimization (ACO) is a class of optimization algorithms modeled on the actions of an colony. ACO methods are useful in problems that need to find paths to goals. Artificial antssimulation agentslocate optimal solutions by moving through a space representing all possible solutions. Real ants lay down pheromones directing each other to resources while exploring their environment. The simulated ants similarly record their positions and the quality of their solutions, so that in later simulation iterations more ants locate better solutions.(Ant Colony Optimization by Marco Dorigo and Thomas Sttzle, MIT Press, 2004. ISBN 0-262-04219-3)One variation on this approach is the algorithm, which is more analogous to the foraging patterns of the bee.Artificial bee colony algorithmThe Artificial Bee Colony (ABC) algorithm is a swarm based meta-heuristic algorithm introduced by Karaboga in 2005.(Karaboga, Dervis (2010) Artificial bee colony algorithm Scholarpedia, 5(3): 6915. )Artificial immune systemsimmune systems (AIS) concerns the usage of abstract structure and function of the immune system to computational systems, and investigating the application of these systems towards solving computational problems from mathematics, engineering, and information technology. AIS is a sub-field of Biologically-inspired computing, and natural computation, with interests in Machine Learning and belonging to the broader field of Artificial Intelligence.Charged system searchCharged System Search (CSS) is a new optimization algorithm based on some principles from physics and mechanics.() CSS utilizes the governing laws of Coulomb and Gauss from electrostatics and the Newtonian laws of mechanics. CSS is a multi-agent approach in which each agent is a Charged Particle (CP). CPs can affect each other based on their fitness values and their separation distances. The quantity of the resultant force is determined by using the electrostatics laws and the quality of the movement is determined using Newtonian mechanics laws. CSS is applicable to all optimization fields; especially it is suitable for non-smooth or non-convex domains. This algorithm provides a good balance between the exploration and the exploitation paradigms of the algorithm which can considerably improve the efficiency of the algorithm and therefore the CSS also can be considered as a good global and local optimizer simultaneously.Cuckoo searchsearch (CS) mimics the brooding behaviour of some cuckoo species, which use hostbirds to hatch their eggs and raise their chicks. This cuckoo search algorithm( Yang X.-S. and Deb S. (December 2009). Cuckoo search via Lvy flights. World Congress on Nature & Biologically Inspired Computing (NaBIC 2009). IEEE Publications. pp. 210214. arXiv:1003.1594v1.) is enhanced with flightswith jump steps drawn from distribution.(http://www.sciencedaily.com/releases/2010/05/100527213816.htm)Recent studies suggested that CS can outperform other algorithmssuch as swarm optimization. For example, a comparison of the cuckoo search with PSO, DE and ABC suggest that CS and DE algorithms provide more robust results than PSO and ABC.(P. Civicioglu and E. Besdok, A conception comparison of the cuckoo search, particle swarm optimization, differential evolution and artificial bee colony algorithms, Artificial Intelligence Review, DOI 10.1007/s10462-011-92760, 6 July (2011).)Firefly Algorithmalgorithm (FA) is another swarm-based algorithm, which was inspired by theflashing behaviour of fireflies. Light intensity is associated with attractivenessof a firefly, and such attraction enable the fireflies with the abilityto subdivide into small groups and each subgroup swarm around the local modes.Therefore, firefly algorithm is specially suitable for multimodal optimization problems.(Yang X. S., (2008). Nature-Inspired Metaheuristic Algorithms. Frome: Luniver Press. ISBN 1905986106.)In fact, FA has been applied in continuous optimization, salesman problem,clustering, processing and feature selection.Gravitational search algorithmsearch algorithm (GSA) is constructed based on the of gravity and the notion of mass interactions. The GSA algorithm uses the theory of Newtonian physics and its searcher agents are the collection of masses. In GSA, we have an isolated system of masses. Using the gravitational force, every mass in the system can see the situation of other masses. The gravitational force is therefore a way of transferring information between different masses (Rashedi, Nezamabadi-pour and Saryazdi 2009).()In GSA, agents are considered as objects and their performance is measured by their masses. All these objects attract each other by a gravity force, and this force causes a movement of all objects globally towards the objects with heavier masses. The heavy masses correspond to good solutions of the problem. The position of the agent corresponds to a solution of the problem, and its mass is determined using a fitness function. By lapse of time, masses are attracted by the heaviest mass. We hope that this mass would present an optimum solution in the search space. The GSA could be considered as an isolated system of masses. It is like a small artificial world of masses obeying the Newtonian laws of gravitation and motion (Rashedi, Nezamabadi-pour and Saryazdi 2009). A multi-objective variant of GSA, called Non-dominated Sorting Gravitational Search Algorithm (NSGSA), was proposed by Nobahari and Nikusokhan in 2011.()Intelligent water dropsIntelligent Water Drops algorithm (IWD) is a swarm-based nature-inspired optimization algorithm, which has been inspired by natural rivers and how they find almost optimal paths to their destination. These near optimal or optimal paths follow from actions andreactions occurring among the water drops and the water drops with their riverbeds. In the IWD algorithm, several artificial water drops cooperate to change their environment in such a way that the optimal path is revealed as the one with the lowest soil on its links. The solutions are incrementally constructed by the IWD algorithm. Consequently, the IWD algorithm is generally a constructive population-based optimization algorithm.()Particle swarm optimizationswarm optimization (PSO) is a optimization algorithm for dealing with problems in which a best solution can be represented as a point or surface in an n-dimensional space.  Hypotheses are plotted in this space and seeded with an initial velocity, as well as a communication channel between the particles.()(Particle Swarm Optimization by Maurice Clerc, ISTE, ISBN 1-905209-04-5, 2006.)  Particles then move through the solution space, and are evaluated according to some fitness criterion after each timestep.  Over time, particles are accelerated towards those particles within their communication grouping which have better fitness values. The main advantage of such an approach over other global minimization strategies such as annealing is that the large number of members that make up the particle swarm make the technique impressively resilient to the problem of minima.River formation dynamicsformation dynamics (RFD)(Using River Formation Dynamics to Design Heuristic Algorithms by Pablo Rabanal, Ismael Rodrguez and Fernando Rubio, Springer, 2007. ISBN 978-3-540-73553-3) is an heuristic methodsimilar to ant colony optimization (ACO). In fact, RFD can be seen as a gradient version of ACO, based on copying how water forms rivers by eroding the ground and depositing sediments. As water transforms the environment, altitudes of places are dynamically modified, and decreasing gradients are constructed. The gradients are followed by subsequent drops to create new gradients, reinforcing the best ones. By doing so, good solutions are given in the form of decreasing altitudes. This method has been applied to solve different NP-complete problems (for example, the problems of finding a minimum distances tree and finding a minimum spanning tree in a variable-cost graph(Finding Minimum Spanning/Distances Trees by Using River Formation Dynamics by Pablo Rabanal, Ismael Rodrguez and Fernando Rubio, Springer, 2008. ISBN 978-3-540-87526-0)). The gradient orientation of RFD makes it specially suitable for solving these problems and provides a good tradeoff between finding good results and not spending much computational time. In fact, RFD fits particularly well for problems consisting in forming a kind of covering tree.(A Formal Approach to Heuristically Test Restorable Systems by Pablo Rabanal, Ismael Rodrguez and Fernando Rubio, Springer, 2009. ISBN 978-3-642-03465-7)Self-propelled particlesparticles (SPP), also referred to as the CouzinVicsek algorithm,(Degond, P.; & Motsch, S. (2007) Continuum limit of self-driven particles with orientation interaction SIAM J Appl Math, arXiv:0710.0293.)(Setekera, R. (2009) Numerical simulation of herding and flocking models Masters thesis, supervisor A Klar, Technische Universiteit Eindhoven.) was introduced in 1995 by Vicsek and Couzin et al.(Vicsek, T.; Czirok, A.; Ben-Jacob, E.; Cohen, I. & Shochet, O. (1995) Novel type of phase transition in a system of self-driven particles Physical review letters, 75:12261229. ) as a special case of the boids model introduced in 1986 by Reynolds.(Reynolds, C.W. (1987) Flocks, herds and schools: A distributed behavioral model Computer Graphics, 21(4), 2534. ) A swarm is modelled in SPP by a collection of particles that move with a constant speed but respond to a random perturbation by adopting at each time increment the average direction of motion of the other particles in their local neighbourhood.(Czirk, A. & Vicsek, T. (2006) Collective behavior of interacting self-propelled particles Physica A, 281: 1729. ) SPP models predict that swarming animals share certain properties at the group level, regardless of the type of animals in the swarm.(Buhl, J.; Sumpter, D.J.T.; Couzin, D.; Hale, J.J.; Despland, E.; Miller, E.R. & Simpson, S.J. (2006) From disorder to order in marching locusts Science, 312(5778): 14021406. ) Swarming systems give rise to behaviours which occur at many different scales, some of which are turning out to be both universal and robust. It has become a challenge in theoretical physics to find minimal statistical models that capture these behaviours.(Toner, J.; Tu, Y. & Ramaswamy, S. (2005) Hydrodynamics and phases of flocks Annals Of Physics, 318(170))(Bertin, E.; Droz, M. & Grgoire, G. (2009) Hydrodynamic equations for self-propelled particles: microscopic derivation and stability analysis J. Phys. A, 42(44): paper 445001. )(Li, Y.X.; Lukeman, R. & Edelstein-Keshet, L. (2007) Minimal mechanisms for school formation in self-propelled particles Physica D: Nonlinear Phenomena, 237(5): 699720. )Stochastic diffusion searchdiffusion search (SDS) is an agent-based probabilistic global search and optimization technique best suited to problems where the objective function can be decomposed into multiple independent partial-functions. Each agent maintains a hypothesis which is iteratively tested by evaluating a randomly selected partial objective function parameterised by the agents current hypothesis. In the standard version of SDS such partial function evaluations are binary, resulting in each agent becoming active or inactive. Information on hypotheses is diffused across the population via inter-agent communication. Unlike the stigmergic communication used in ACO, in SDS agents communicate hypotheses via a one-to-one communication strategy analogous to the tandem running procedure observed in some species of ant. A positive feedback mechanism ensures that, over time, a population of agents stabilise around the global-best solution. SDS is both an efficient and robust search and optimisation algorithm, which has been extensively mathematically described.ApplicationsSwarm Intelligence-based techniques can be used in a number of applications.  The U.S. military is investigating swarm techniques for controlling unmanned vehicles. The Space Agency is thinking about an orbital swarm for self assembly and interferometry. NASA is investigating the use of swarm technology for planetary mapping.  A 1992 paper by M. Anthony Lewis and A. Bekey discusses the possibility of using swarm intelligence to control nanobots within the body for the purpose of killing cancer tumors.() Swarm intelligence has also been applied for data mining.()Crowd simulationArtists are using swarm technology as a means of creating complex interactive systems or simulating crowds.and Stella in: Breaking the Ice was the first movie to make use of swarm technology for rendering, realistically depicting the movements of groups of fish and birds using the Boids system. Tim Burtons Returns also made use of swarm technology for showing the movements of a group of bats. The Lord of the Rings film trilogy made use of similar technology, known as Massive, during battle scenes. Swarm technology is particularly attractive because it is cheap, robust, and simple.Airlines have used swarm theory to simulate passengers boarding a plane. Southwest Airlines researcher A. Lawson used an ant-based computer simulation employing only six interaction rules to evaluate boarding times using various boarding methods.(Miller, 2010, xii-xviii).()Ant-based routingThe use of Swarm Intelligence in Telecommunication Networks has also been researched, in the form of Based Routing. This was pioneered separately by Dorigo et al. and Packard in the mid-1990s, with a number of variations since. Basically this uses a probabilistic routing table rewarding/reinforcing the route successfully traversed by each ant (a small control packet) which flood the network. Reinforcement of the route in the forwards, reverse direction and both simultaneously have been researched: backwards reinforcement requires a symmetric network and couples the two directions together; forwards reinforcement rewards a route before the outcome is known (but then you pay for the cinema before you know how good the film is). As the system behaves stochastically and is therefore lacking repeatability, there are large hurdles to commercial deployment. Mobile media and new technologies have the potential to change the threshold for collective action due to swarm intelligence (Rheingold: 2002, P175).Airlines have also used ant-based routing in assigning aircraft arrivals to airport gates.  At Southwest Airlines a software program uses swarm theory, or swarm intelligencethe idea that a colony of ants works better than one alone. Each pilot acts like an ant searching for the best airport gate. The pilot learns from his experience whats the best for him, and it turns out that thats the best solution for the airline, A. Lawson explains. As a result, the colony of pilots always go to gates they can arrive at and depart from quickly. The program can even alert a pilot of plane back-ups before they happen. We can anticipate that its going to happen, so well have a gate available, Lawson says.()References in popular cultureSwarm intelligence-related concepts and references can be found throughout popular culture, frequently as some form of intelligence or group mind involving far more agents than used in current applications.* The popular Soviet SF writer Gansovsky, in his short story The Master of the Bay (1962), described a sea monster consisting of microscopic particles which could self-organize into a single entity.* Talus by Ozan deals with an exotic life form powered by swarm intelligence emerging from the telepathic minds of kalonoro, Madagascars cryptic hominids.* The Borg in Trek* In Days Later, the Infected have some form of hive mind, in that they have some form of intelligence which enables them to hunt down and kill the survivors of the Rage Virus. This intelligence is shown mainly when the Infected attack in large packs, as they focus all their attention on the human survivors, and will not stop until the survivors are dead or Infected.* The Zerg of the Starcraft universe demonstrate such concepts when in groups and enhanced by the psychic control of taskmaster breeds; the Zergs original leader, the Overmind, was generally thought of not as an individual with a central intelligence to control others but instead as a being which embodies the hive mind of Zerg that are mentally linked* fiction writer Stapledon may have been the first to discuss swarm intelligences equal or superior to humanity. In and First Men (1931), a swarm intelligence from Mars consists of tiny individual cells that communicate with each other by waves; in Maker (1937) swarm intelligences founded numerous civilizations,  composed of flocks of birds or, as the universe cools, energy-efficient swarms of burrowing slugs; ultimately all intelligence in the universe swarms into a single entity barely capable of perceiving the Supreme Moment.* Decipher by Pavlou deal with the swarm intelligence of nanobots that guard against intruders in Atlantis.* Prey, by Crichton deals with the danger of nanobots escaping from human control and developing a swarm intelligence.* Wyrm, a novel by Mark Fabi deals with a virus developing emergent intelligence on the Internet* Swarm, a short story by Bruce Sterling about a mission undertaken by a faction of humans, to understand and exploit a space-faring swarm intelligence.* Hacker and the Ants, a book by Rucker on AI ants within a virtual environment* Ygramul, the Many - an intelligent being consisting of a swarm of many wasp-like insects, a character in the novel Neverending Story written by Ende. Ygramul is also mentioned in a scientific paper Flocks, Herds, and Schools written by Knut Hartmann (Computer Graphics and Interactive Systems Otto-von-Guericke-University of Magdeburg).* Allucination, a short story by Asimov about an alien insect-like swarm, capable of organization and provided with a sort of swarm intelligence.* Invincible fiction novel by Lem where a human spaceship finds an intelligent behavior in a flock of small particles that were able to defend themselves against what they found as a menace.* In The Matrix movies, the robotic sentinels exhibit signs of swarm intelligence. Additionally, in Matrix Revolutions, a machine called the Deus Ex Machina uses a swarm of thousands of insect-like robots to form a giant animated face.* In the anime, no Strain, unmanned robotic drones known as TUMORS display signs of swarm intelligence as they attack in groups.*In the dramatic novel and subsequent mini-series: Andromeda Strain by author Michael Crichton, A virus from the future communicates between individual cells and displays the ability to think and react individually and as a whole, and as such displays a semblance of swarm intelligence.*In the computer RPG Torment, the protagonist encounters monsters called cranium rats, which grow more intelligent in larger groups.  The game features encounters with individual rats, small groups, and a very large group that identifies itself as Many-as-One.* In the video game Effect, a galactic race known as the Quarians created a race of humanoid sentient machines known as the Geth.  Geth are said to possess limited artificial intelligence and problem solving skills when alone, but automatically network with each other when in groups.  This means that the machines ability to solve problems increases in correlation with the size of the group.* The television series SG-1 has entities known as replicators.  Individually they only existed for their own survival, consuming and avoiding danger.  However they also were able to link up all other replicators in the area.  This made it possible like the Geth in Effect to have vastly superior intelligence than would be expected from such a basic entity.  This allowed them to defeat opponents that individually dwarfed them by a large extent in terms of intellect and size due to cluster computing.* In the Saga by F. Hamilton, the Dyson Aliens exhibit elements of swarm intelligence with their linked immotile brains and motile ancillary units.* The novella Human Readable by Doctorow is set in a future where ant-based routing is widely used for traffic and communications, and explores their potential drawbacks.* The science fiction novel, The Swarm, by Schtzing, deals with underwater single celled creatures who act in unison to destroy humanity.Notable researchers* Beni* Bonabeau* Dorigo* Maria Gambardella* C. Eberhart* James Kennedy* A. Lawson* Craig Reynolds* Rinaldo* Karaboga* Lucas* YangSee also* immune systems* Boids - A flocking simulation produced by Craig Reynolds* automaton* intelligence* search* evolution* Emergence* computation* algorithm* swarm optimization* search* Hive mind* Water Drops* Metaheuristic* system* swarm optimization* theory* Stigmergy* Development Group* robotics* (military)* SwisTrack - A tracking tool for multi-unit biological and artificial systemsReferencesBibliography*Swarm Intelligence: From Natural to Artificial Systems by Eric Bonabeau, Marco Dorigo and Guy Theraulaz. (1999) ISBN 0-19-513159-2, complete bibliography*Turtles, Termites, and Traffic Jams: Explorations in Massively Parallel Microworlds by Mitchel Resnick. ISBN 0-262-18162-2*Swarm Intelligence by James Kennedy and Russell C. Eberhart. ISBN 1-55860-595-9*Fundamentals of Computational Swarm Intelligence by Andries Engelbrecht. Wiley & Sons. ISBN 0-470-09191-6*Nanocomputers and Swarm Intelligence by Jean-Baptiste Waldner, ISTE, ISBN 9781847040022, 2007.** E. Ridge, D. Kudenko, D. Kazakov, and E. Curry,Moving Nature-Inspired Algorithms to Parallel, Asynchronous and Decentralised Environments, in Self-Organization and Autonomic Informatics (I), 2005, vol. 135, pp. 35-49.*Metaheuristic Optimization by Xin-She Yang, Scholarpedia article,cholarpedia, 6(8):11472 (2011 *Swarms and Swarm Intelligence by Michael G. Hinchey, Roy Sterritt, and Chris Rouff,  Article at IEEE Computer Society*- From Ants to People: an Instinct to Swarm - NY Times, 11-13-07*Swarm Intelligence (Journal) Chief Editor: Marco Dorigo. Springer New York. ISSN 1935-3812 (Print) 1935-3820 (Online) http://www.springer.com/computer/artificial/journal/11721* Eva Horn, Lucas Marco Gisi (Ed.): Schwrme  Kollektive ohne Zentrum. Eine Wissensgeschichte zwischen Leben und Information, Bielefeld: transcript 2009. ISBN 978-3-8376-1133-5* L. Fisher, The Perfect Swarm : The Science of Complexity in Everyday Life, Basic Books, 2009.* E. Ridge and E. Curry, A roadmap of nature-inspired systems research and development, Multiagent and Grid Systems, vol. 3, no. 1, pp. 3-8, 2007.*  Swarm Intelligence for Analyzing Opinions in Online Communities by Carolin Kaiser, Johannes Krckel, Freimut Bodendorf (2010) Proceedings of the 43rd Hawaii International Conference on System Sciences, pp. 1-9hejnade enjambreintelligencenl:Zwermintelligentieja:roiintelligencefi:Parvilyth:zh:
765936
Outlive
mouseOutlive is a Brazilian strategy game developed and produced by Entertainment. It is a mission-based real-time strategy game where the player controls either the human military or robot forces and attempts to eliminate all opposing forces. It was initially released in (http://gamesbrasil.uol.com.br) in Brazil (2001 for the rest of the world), and was the second and most successful product of Continuum. The game was one of the few Brazilian games to be published by a mainstream AAA publisher. It was published in the States and Europe by Interactive.Plot summaryHuman CampaignThe increase of terrorist activity around the globe (the terrorist organizations had merged, creating large conglomerates whom the strongest and most feared was the Liberty Army) and the rapidly dwindling natural resources of the planet had forced the worlds most powerful nations to take decisive measures. April 17, 2035 saw the creation of the World Council. The Council saw humanitys survival in interplanetary supply of resources mined on other celestial bodies. They sent out a large group of probes to nearly every planet and moon of the Solar System. After a lengthly search, they had found that the richest object is Titan. The Council started the Outlive Project: constructing three starships which would carry the initial colonists there. However, there was a problem: Titans atmosphere was toxic to humans, and the climate was not so friendly either.Two groups had arisen to solve the problem. One of them, led by Dr. Joseph Taylor, had tried to create genetically modified creatures to do the initial work. The other group, led by Dr. Mary-Anne Harley and sponsored by Mechatronics Inc., would combine robotics with sophisticated AI, making them suitable to do anything without the need for human supervision. Due to the shortage of time, the World Council gave both teams one Earth year to create working prototypes of the respective projects.As the Outlive project neared completion, Dr. Taylor was ordered to relocate to a new research base after an unsuccessful attempt on his life. Prior to the transfer, all staff and equipment was stored in a military outpost. As LA forces held the sector, the newly created Special Counter-Terrorist Group and its leader, Brad Maxwell, had to clear a safe way for the convoy to the lab. Maxwell was a little angry at Taylor, as the impatient scientist had gone to the lab already when he reached the outpost. However, shortly after their arrival, a breakout of the unstable beings known as Abominables occurred. They had destroyed the base, scattering the staff. Taylor had been found and evacuated. Because of the accident, the World Council had terminated Taylors contract, much to his protest, declaring that the three Outlive ships will have a robotic crew. However, the Liberty Army had occupied Mechatronics.Maxwell had cleared them out, using some of the Mechatronics head, Carl Eberhardts prototype battle robots. Even though the LA has been pushed out, Maxwell became suspicious of Mechatronics motives, as materials used for weapons had been found in the facility. One of his subordinates, Lieutenant Peter Mackenzie, accompanied him to the Experimental City, where they believed Mechatronics trained their robots as soldiers. Although General Kaminski told them to dont care with this subject, they found hard proof in the Technology Center. Kaminski promised them a complete investigation after the Outlive mission was away.The three ships were finally completed, but the launch was halted by news of two AA-artilleries recently installed by Pablo Morales, leader of the Liberty Army, very close to the launching sites. As both of them had been destroyed by Maxwell, the mission was finally launched. However, there were a third artillery, hidden in an underground base. SCTG forces quickly destroyed it, but the damage has been done: the rocket hit Outlive-1. Upon reentry, the ship broke into 3 larger pieces. Outlive-2 had reported of a contact with something then connection was lost. Outlive-3 reported they had safely landed on Titan and started mining operations as per orders.The World Council received reports that Liberty Army forces were on their way to the crash site. As Maxwell and Mackenzie arrived in the sector, Kaminski told them that he was allied with Mechatronics, and ordered all of their units to execute them. But he had been interrupted by Mackenzie who told Maxwell that he is an operative to the Liberty Army; Morales had known of the World Councils corruption and their affiliation with Mechatronics; that was the reason why he attacked the corporations facility and tried to prevent the launch. Infuriated, Maxwell willingly joined the Army to make Kaminski pay for his betrayal. Both were rescued by Morales, who told them that the robots from the downed ship had started to establish a base and mine, as if they were really on Titan. To prevent the Council from utilizing them, the three destroyed the camp and their commander, Procyon.Utilizing information acquired by an agent, they have discovered that the Council had built ICBMs, missiles packed with nuclear warheads of a large yield. They plan to use it against the Liberty Armys encampments around the world. Mackenzie successfully disarmed all silos, however the last were booby-trapped: when Mackenzie went inside to work on that, the multi-megaton warhead exploded.After a long-lasting and bloody battle, the Liberty Army bested both the most elite forces of the World Council and the well-armed support troops of the Mechatronics. The Council had collapsed, and the Army had formed the Confederation.Robot CampaignWhen the Outlive-2 got out of contact, they had been secretly recalled to Earth to help the World Council against the Liberty Army. However, the war was already over when they had landed. Commander of the ship, Argus, had set his first objective of contacting Eberhardt. When he reached the base, it was in bad condition because of a surprise attack. Eberhardt fled, but was found. After destroying the nearby Confederate outpost, Eberhardt revealed his plans to Argus: he would have to construct and protect a portal to Titan, from which additional help in the form of Draco, leader of Outlive-3 and his minions will emerge. With this newfound help, they had recaptured Mechatronics.Some time after this, Eberhardt has been contacted by Kaminski. The Russian offered info for a meeting. As Eberhardt didnt trust him, Argus was sent. His instincts were right, as it was a trap. Kaminski said that Maxwell had granted him protection if he manages to capture a commander. Draco was enraged, and leveled the base, but Argus was already shipped to another. He was rescued this time, with Kaminski personally killed by Draco.Draco received intelligence of a secret base in a valley, where Dr. Harley is experimenting with robots. When the base was destroyed, the two commanders went through the valley in search for more enemies. They had been surprised by a large amount of troops and Dr. Harley, who congratulated Argus for a good job. It turns out that she altered Argus programming so that he would obey and sell Draco out. The latter obviously did not want to go through this and had gone berserk. However, the troops gained the upper hand and left him for dead. He was rescued by Eberhardt.The two had learned about Harleys experiments and that she needed a cache of microprocessors to power up her own robots. They had prevented the cargo from reaching the destination, and even destroyed the Confederate forces in a large-scale attack.Cooperation campaignMechatronics had taken control of the planet and the last remnants of the Confederacy is being hunted by robotic execution squads. Maxwell has been captured, Morales and Argus are on the run. The remaining forces of the Liberty Army and the Robots loyal to the Confederacy had formed the Resistance. Argus and Pablo had formed a base of both humans and Robots which had been attacked by two different Robotic bases, from both the North (Blue base) & from the South (Cyan base). Then the Campaign has a twist, if you destroy the Blue base, Argus and Pablo go to rescue Maxwell which is protected by a Robotic Stronghold and a strong Robotic army which was led by a Robotic Commander named Sentinel. But if you destroy the Cyan base, Argus & Pablo alone go to save Dr. Marry Anne Harley which was attacked by Robots.When Argus & Pablo go to save Maxwell, they first have to destroy Sentinel for he was the only Al in the army & if he was destroyed, the Robotic Army would shut down. When Sentinel was destroyed, Argus & Pablo had destroyed the Robotic Stronghold & rescued Maxwell. The Resistance had also took the remaining Robots and reprogram them to serve the Resistance.When Argus & Pablo alone went to rescue Dr. Mary Anne Harley, they had to destroy the AA-Artillery, which wasnt easy for they had to sneak pass the Robots which were well armed and had set up a large base. When Argus & Pablo destroyed the AA-Artillery, the Resistance Air-Force could come and destroy the Robots, thus rescuing Dr. Mary Anne.After these 2 missions, Argus and Pablo gather the Men and Robots of the Resistance and destroy the Mechatronics base in a large scale battle. The Resistance won, thus bringing the end to the harsh rule of Mechatronics. Carl had escaped, but the New Confederation had been formed, with Brad Maxwell as its leader, and an era of peace had begun.Little did they know, that Carl had escaped from Earth and hidden himself in a space station, somewhere not far from Earth. It was at that moment that it was discovered that Carl Eberheart was working for an alien race that wishes to bring Earth to ruin. Carl was executed by the Alien Leader for his failure. Then a massive fleet of Alien UFOs appear, heading towards Earth.Troops ListOutlive has 25 troops which are:Human Troops*Abominable - A genetic experiment that went wrong. Enemies see this as neutral and it wont auto-attack nearby enemies (except if they are attacked). Like neutral ones, they can suddenly attack without provocation. In this case, all nearby Abominables (even neutrals) will join the fray. This also work backwards: if a friend is attacked, the beast will retaliate, betraying its side.*Vampire - When researched, a Dominator can infest an Abomination so it turns into a Vampire after a short time. It leeches the targets health, and can also leave a highly corrosive acid cloud when killed.*Heavy Tank - The most powerful human ground unit, it can outrange defensive buildings. Has an area-of-effect attack (High Impact Cannon). When researched, it can turn completely invulnerable for a short time.*Fighter - A powerful air unit, it has guided air-to-air missiles. Can turn invisible.*Explorer - A weak but fast bike. Has Nitro, which greatly increases the speed and Time Bomb, which can destroy weak buildings.*Builder - The builder unit for the humans. It makes the buildings and lays mines.*Gatherer - Gathers ore and scraps.*Tank - The most versatile ground unit, its Independent Cannon can fire in any directions, even while moving.*Chopper - Anti-ground aerial unit. When researched, it receives anti-tank missiles against ground targets. Can also shoot an Incendiary Missile which sets everything in the blast radius on fire.*Rocket launcher - A powerful missile unit, it can also Rapid Fire for maximum effect.*Dominator - The basic combat unit. Has Domination, which causes the targeted enemy unit to obey its commands while the control device is intact. Can also use Incubation (see above).*Flamethrower - A short range flamethrowing unit, it can set enemies on fire with Napalm.*Transporter - A transporter unit, can also use Airstrike on ground targets to devastating effect.*Soldier - A single Human Soldier is the weakest Unit in the game. Their guns have almost no effect on the enemy & are easy to kill. They only appear in some Campaign Missions.Robotic TroopsUnlike Human units, Robots does not regain HP over time and must be sent to a Repair Facility to regain fighting strength. The facility can also dismantle units for credits. Another difference is that the Robots use energy transfer, meaning that buildings are always tied into the energy network no matter where they are on the map.*Chaos - It uses a massive projectile weapon which breaks up into smaller pieces. Good against massed weak units. It can also be armed with a Radioactive Projectile which damages all in its sight, it is good against stronger Units.*Avenger -  A laser cannon-wielding plane. Can also use Photon Torpedoes against ground enemies. Due to its strength against air units, it is ofter paired with Apocalypses in multiplayer matches to create the ultimate fighting force.*Raider - A weak walker that, when researched, can look and behave like an Abominable except when attacking.*Electro - A good air/ground attack unit that attacks with electricity. Its Nova ability creates an expanding ring of energy, damaging all enemies around it. Can also leech power from buildings to recharge Nova faster.*Thunder - A sonic wave bomber. Can use Amplifier for increased damage, but vulnerable to other air units. Can only attack Ground Units.*Apocalypse - The most powerful attack unit. It attacks with seeker missiles, but must manufacture them for itself, thus slowing the rate of fire when emptied. It can only attack Ground Units.*Morpher - The builder unit. It actually transforms itself into the building, but the process can be reversed. It can also transform permanently into Freezer Mines which paralyze nearby enemies for a while.*Marauder - The ore transporter. It fetches ore from Extranctors and scraps from destroyed units.*Twister - The transport unit, it can fly and even teleport when researched.*Incinerator - A powerful ground attack unit that attacks with lasers. Its range exceeds those of stationary turrets, making this unit an artillery of sorts.*Tempest - A surface-to-air attack unit, can also use Quad Damage for one-shot-kill against all air units in the game. Can also be equipped with a rapid-firing cannon which can target multiple enemies at once.Buildings in the gameHuman StrusturesNormal Structures*Headquarters - The heart of the whole Human base, which is capable of building Builders, Gatherers and Transporters; it has equipped with an ICBM against enemys stronghold. Can be built only single Headquarters.*Research Lab - This structure is suitable for research upgrades and technologies, and can be built only one.*Intelligence Center - It can reveal map, monitor enemies, acquiring emenys all troop quantity, and stealing enemys technologies they developed (Note: It can only steal enemy Human players developed technologies); can be built only one. But Humans Intelligence Center can disable enemys launched ICBM before dropping onto your base.*Market - A special productive facility can purchase certain units in much cheaper (but somewhat more expensive) price per one and half minute; it can also sell unwanted vehicles.*Aircraft Factory - Can build aerial units.*Vehicles Factory - Can build all ground units except for Aboninables.*Defense Tower - A turret can fire at aerial or ground enemies.Resource Structures*Wind Power Plant - Human factions basic electricity outputting facility.*Nuclear Power Plant - Human factions advanced eletricity outputting facility.*Ore Extractor - It must be built on iron or uranium mine field, can provide 4 gatherers to collect ore, then return to Refineries or Headquarters.*Ore Processor - It functions like automatically operated Ore Extractor, once built, it begins to earn money for player.*Refinery - This facility can offer 4 gatherers to unload ore then convert into money.*Transmission Substation - Due to Human factions structure must rely on grid in limited areas, players can build Transmission Substations to extend power grid to your faraway base.Robotic StructuresNormal Structures*Control Center - The heart of Robot factions whole base, can be built only one. It has Hologram and Clone ablilty to advance Robot stragetic advantages.*Tech Center - Functions as same as Humans Research Lab, can be built only one.*Information Center - Functions as same as Humans Intelligence Center, can be built only one. It produces viruses to activate its abilities; whats more, it can also redirect enemys launched ICBM onto certain location before ICBM dropping onto your base.*Recycle Facility - Much like Humans Market, but it can repair or recycle Robotic units, the refunded costs are depending on received damages.*Basic Factory - Can build Twisters, Morphers, Electros, Raiders, Marauders, Avengers and Tempests.*Advanced Factory - Can build Chaos, Apocalypses, Thunders and Incinerators.*Defense Cannon - Ground defense facility.*Anti-air Cannon - Air defense facility.Resource Structures*Solar Collector - Robot factions basic electricity outputting facility.*Radioactive Generator - Robot factions advanced electricity outputting facility.*Mining Facility - Functions as the same as Humans Ore Extractors.*Ore Assimilator - Functions as the same as Humans Ore Processors.*Purification Plant - Functions as the same as Humans Refineries.ReferencesExternal links* Continuum Official Website* Gamespy.com* Outlive Demo Download* (Take2)pt:Outlive
767659
River_Nile_(state)
footnotes               River Nile ( ) is one of the 15 wilayat or states of Sudan. It has an area of 122,123 km (47,152 mi) and an estimated population of 1,027,534 (2006). It consists of 6 localities (according to the latest political mapping) Ad-Damir is the capital city of the state. Slightly north of Ad-Damir is the important rail junction town of Atbarah; the other towns (localities) are Shendi, Al-Matamma, Berber and Hamed. It also embraces the largest electricity generating project in the country, Alex Tanfield which is situated north of Abu Hamed. External links* en.nahralnileinvest.gov.sd, Ministry of Investment, Industry, Tourism & Mining River Nile State ()an-Nilan-NilNilo (Sudn)(tat)Nil (negara bagian)(Sudan)Nile, Sudannl:Nahr-an-Nil (prowincja)Nilo (Sudo)Rul Nil()an-NilNehri EyaletiNilo (estado)zh:
771458
Susilo_Bambang_Yudhoyono
awards            Adhi Makayasa (1973)Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono, AC (pronounced ), (born 9 September 1949) is an Indonesian politician and retired Army officer who has been of Indonesia since 2004.Yudhoyono won the 2004 presidential election, defeating incumbent President Sukarnoputri. Widely known in Indonesia by his initials SBY, he was sworn into office on 20 October 2004, together with Kalla as Vice President. He ran for re-election in 2009 with Boediono as his running mate, and won with an outright majority of the votes in the first round of balloting; he was sworn in for a second term on 20 October 2009.Early lifeSusilo Bambang Yudhoyono was born in Tremas, a village in Arjosari, Regency, Java, to a lower-middle class family and is the son of Raden Soekotjo and Siti Habibah.()His name is Javanese, with Sanskrit roots.() Susilo comes from the words su-, meaning good( and -sila, meaning behaviour, conduct or moral.( Bambang is a traditional boy name in Javanese, meaning knight. Yudhoyono comes from the words yuddha -meaning battle, fight; and yana, meaning journey.( Thus his name roughly translates to `knight who is well-behaved in battle and journey`.Yudhoyono had wanted to join the army since he was a child.() In school, he developed a reputation as an academic achiever, excelling in writing poems, short stories, and play-acting. Yudhoyono was also talented in music and sport, reflected when he and his friends established a volleyball club called Klub Rajawali and a band called Gaya Teruna.()When he was in fifth grade, Yudhoyono visited the Indonesian Armed Forces Academy (AKABRI). After seeing the soldiers training there and perhaps inspired by his own fathers career, Yudhoyono became determined to join Armed Forces and become a soldier. Yudhoyono planned to enlist after graduating from high school in 1968; however, he missed the registration period.(Yudhoyono then became a student at the of November Institute of Technology before entering the Vocational Education Development Center in Malang, East Java. There, he was able to prepare everything for the next phase of his education at Akabri. Yudhoyono officially entered AKABRI in 1970 after passing the test in Bandung.(Military careerYudhoyono spent three years at Indonesian Armed Forces Academy (AKABRI) and became the Commander of the Cadet Corps Division there. He graduated from AKABRI as second lieutenant in 1973, and as the best graduate of the year, received the prestigious Adhi Makayasa medal from President Suharto.After graduating, Yudhoyono joined the Army Strategic Reserve (Kostrad) and became a platoon commander in the 330th Airborne Battalion. Aside from leading his troops, Yudhoyono was also tasked with giving the battalion soldiers lessons on general knowledge and English. Yudhoyonos proficiency in English was one of the reasons why he was sent to the States to undertake the Airborne and Ranger Courses at Benning in 1975.Yudhoyono returned to Indonesia in 1976 where he became a platoon commander in the 305th Battalion and assigned to Indonesian-occupied Timor. Yudhoyono had several tours of duty there and, like many other Indonesian officers involved in the occupation of East Timor, was accused of committing crimes. However, Yudhoyono has never been charged with any specific act. From East Timor, Yudhoyono became a mortar platoon commander in 1977, an operations officer for an airborne brigade from 1977 to 1978, and a battalion commander at Kostrad from 1979 to 1981. Yudhoyono then spent 1981 and 1982 working at the Army headquarters.While working at the Army headquarters, Yudhoyono was sent to the United States again, this time to participate in the Infantry Officer Advanced Course at Fort Benning and in training with the 82nd Airborne Division. Yudhoyono also spent time in Panama and went through the jungle warfare school. When Yudhoyono returned in 1983, he was made Commander of the Infantry Trainers School. It was not long before he was abroad again, this time to Belgium and Germany, to undertake the weapons Course. In 1985, Yudhoyono also took a Battalion Commando Course in Malaysia.From 1986 to 1988, Yudhoyono served with the Udayana Area Military Command, which covers  Bali and the Sunda Islands. Yudhoyono was a battalion commander from 1986 to 1988 and was part of the operational staff in 1988. In 1989, Yudhoyono became a lecturer at the Army Staff College (Seskoad) and delivered a presentation entitled ABRIs Professionalism at the Present and in the Future. Together with Wirahadikusumah, Yudhoyono published a book entitled The Challenges of Development.Whilst at Seskoad, Yudhoyono also took the opportunity to further his own military education. He went to the Army Command and General Staff College at Leavenworth, Kansas. While in the United States, he took the opportunity to obtain an MA degree in business management from University in 1991.In 1992, Yudhoyono was transferred to the Army Information Department and worked as a speech writer for General Edi Sudrajat, the Army Chief of Staff. In 1993, when Edi became Commander of the of Indonesia (ABRI), Yudhoyono joined Edis personal staff. Edi did not last long as ABRI Commander and Yudhoyono was then transferred back to Kostrad where he became a brigade commander. A year later, Yudhoyono was the Operations Assistant at Jaya (Jakarta) Military Area Command before taking command IV/Diponegoro Military Area Command in Java. Yudhoyono had one more stint overseas when he became Indonesias chief military observer of the United Nation Peacekeeping Force in Bosnia in 199596.()When Yudhoyono returned to Indonesia, he was made KODAM Jaya chief of staff before being appointed as KODAM II/Sriwijaya commander. In this position, Yudhoyono was responsible for military operations in southern Sumatra.() He served in this position until 1997, when he was appointed chief of staff for social-political affairs. At the same time, he was also appointed Chairman of the ABRI Faction in the Peoples Consultative Assembly General Session and participated in Suhartos election to a seventh term as President.During the days which would lead to Suhartos resignation in May 1998, Yudhoyono and pro-reform ABRI officers conducted meetings and discussions with Madjid, a secular pro-reform Muslim leader. From his discussions, Yudhoyono accepted the fact that Suharto should resign but like the ABRI officers who went to the meeting with him, was reluctant to withdraw their support of Suharto publicly, much less ask for Suhartos resignation.() Nevertheless the pressure would eventually become too much for Suharto, who resigned on 21 May 1998.As Indonesia entered the reform era, ABRIs popularity, because of its association with Suharto, was at an all time low. To de-emphasize ABRIs political role, Yudhoyonos Chief of Staff for social-political affairs was renamed chief of staff for territorial affairs and in 1999, ABRI was renamed TNI and the National Police (Polri) was split off. At this time, Yudhoyonos popularity began to increase as he offered ideas and concepts to reform the military and nation. He did this by combining the strong reformist sentiment of the time with TNIs concern for security and stability.( Yudhoyono then became known in the media as the thinking general.Political careerWahid PresidencyYudhoyono was appointed Mining and Energy Minister in the cabinet of President Wahid in 1999. According to General Wiranto, who assisted Wahid in the formation of the Cabinet, he had recommended to the President that Yudhoyono would do better as Army Chief of Staff.() However, Wahid rejected the idea and Yudhoyono became the Minister of Mining and Energy instead. At the same time, Yudhoyono ended his military career with the rank of General, although he would be made honorary General in 2000.Yudhoyonos popularity grew, even as Minister of Mining and Energy. In June 2000, there were rumors that Wahid, because of his lack of skill as an administrator was going to appoint a First Minister to look after the day to day running of the Government.() Yudhoyonos name appeared as a potential candidate for the position, although eventually Wahid appointed Vice President Sukarnoputri as the day to day administrator.In August 2000, after a Cabinet reshuffle, Yudhoyono became the Coordinating Minister for Politic and Security Affairs. One of his tasks was to separate the army from politics. This was in line with his reformist ideas on the future of Indonesian military, and is a view he has held since his days in an army policy center. He said at that time:Another task that Yudhoyono was given was as an intermediary between Wahid and the Suharto family. At the time, Wahid was trying to make Suharto hand back all the money which he had allegedly obtained through corruption when he was President. Yudhoyono was sent by Wahid to convey this wish and to negotiate with the former first family. However, Yudhoyono was not successful in this venture.At the beginning of 2001, with political pressure increasing on him, Wahid ordered Yudhoyono to form a crisis centre with Yudhoyono as Chairman(Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono, Jenderal yang Berpikir|Biografi Tokoh Indonesia) The purpose of this crisis centre was to assist the president in giving policy advice and was headquartered at Yudhoyonos office. It seemed as if because of this appointment, Yudhoyono could be considered one of Wahids men, however Yudhoyono would break ranks from Wahid in July 2001 when the latter was facing impeachment. In desperation, Wahid issued a decree freezing the Representative Council (DPR) and then asked Yudhoyono to declare a of emergency to further strengthen his position. Yudhoyono refused to accept this, and Wahid dismissed him.(Rachel Harvey, Profile: Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono, BBC News, October 20, 2004.)Megawati PresidencyOn 23 July 2001, in a Special Session, the MPR impeached Wahid and replaced him with Megawati as President. A few days later when the MPR assembled to elect a new Vice President, Yudhoyono threw his name in the hat and competed against Golkars Tanjung and Development Partys (PPP) Haz.( Yudhoyono and Akbar lost out to Hamzah who became the vice president.Yudhoyono was appointed to his old position of Coordinating Minister of Political and Security Affairs in Megawatis new cabinet. After the October 2002 Bali bombing, he oversaw the hunt for and arrest of those responsible, and gained a reputation both in Indonesia and abroad as one of the few Indonesian politicians serious about the on Terrorism. His speech during the one year anniversary of the Bali bombing (in which many Australians were killed) was praised by the Australian media and public.(Yudhoyono also dealt with the Aceh Movement (GAM), a separatist movement wanting to separate the Province of Aceh from Indonesia. On his advice, Megawati declared law in Aceh on 19 May 2003. This martial law was then extended in November 2003.(Darurat Militer Diperpanjang, Pikiran Rakyat, 6 November 2003)The Democratic PartyYudhoyonos supporters saw Yudhoyonos participation in the vice presidential election as a sign of his popularity and recognized Yudhoyonos potential as a possible leader for Indonesia. One of these supporters, Vence Rumangkang approached Yudhoyono with the idea of forming a political party to help shore up support for the 2004 Presidential Elections. Yudhoyono approved of the idea and after going through the basic concepts, left Rumangkang in charge of forming the Party.From 1219 August 2001, Rumangkang began holding a series meetings to discuss the formation of the party while holding consultations with Yudhoyono. Yudhoyono personally led the meetings on 19 August and 20 August 2001, and the basic outline of the Democratic Party was finalized.On 9 September 2001, the formation of the party was officially declared and on 10 September it was registered at the Ministry of Justice and Human Rights.The organizers behind Democratic Partys formation went to extreme lengths to make sure that PD was Yudhoyonos personal political party. The declaration of its formation was 9 September 2001, which was Yudhoyonos birthday and to start off with, the Party had 99 members.Road to PresidencyBy 2003 there was a gathering momentum behind the possibility of Yudhoyono being a presidential candidate.(Menakar Karier Politik SB Yudhoyono, Kompas, 12 March 2004) The United Democratic Nationhood Party (PPDK) was the first to bring up the subject of nomination. In September 2003, Yudhoyonos own party began to make preparations in case Yudhoyono was willing to accept a presidential nomination. The Democratic Party then initiated a publicity campaign to promote Yudhoyono as a candidate. For his part, Yudhoyono was not responsive both to PPDK or the Democratic Partys maneuverings to nominate him and continued his duties as Minister. PPDK was disappointed in Yudhoyonos reaction and the Democratic Party continued to wait for Yudhoyono to resign his position as was expected of all presidential candidates apart from the incumbent President and Vice President.File:SBYgaruda.jpg|thumb|left|Yudhoyono with his wife at opening of new Indonesia headquartersThe turning point came on 1 March 2004, when Yudhoyonos secretary, Sudi Silalahi announced to the media that for the last six months, Yudhoyono had been excluded from policy decision-making in the field of politics and security.(Harian Umum Suara Merdeka, 12 March 2004) On 2 March 2004, Megawati responded that she had never excluded Yudhoyono, while her husband, Kiemas called Yudhoyono childish for complaining to the media instead of the president herself. On 8 March 2004, Yudhoyono sent a letter asking for permission to meet the president about his ministerial authority. Megawati did not respond when she received the letter, although she invited Yudhoyono along to a cabinet meeting on 11 March 2004. Yudhoyono did not attend the cabinet meeting and instead held a press conference at his office and announced his resignation from the position of Coordinating Minister of Political and security affairs. He also announced that he was ready to be nominated as a presidential candidate.File:Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono.jpg|thumb|right|184px|Yudhoyono in Nations.Yudhoyonos popularity skyrocketed after his falling out with Megawati as he was seen by the people as the underdog. However this popularity did not translate to a victory for the Democratic Party at the 2004 legislative elections. The party won 7.5% of the votes, which was still enough to nominate Yudhoyono as a presidential candidate. Yudhoyono accepted the nomination and picked Golkars Kalla as his running mate. Aside from the Democratic Party, their presidential and vice presidential candidacy was supported by the Star Party (PBB), the Star Party (PBR) and the Justice and Unity Party (PKPI).(Yudhoyono  Kalla Resmi Daftar ke KPU, Tempointeraktif.com, 10 May 2004)Yudhoyonos manifesto for the future of Indonesia, summarised in a book titled Vision For Change written by him and distributed for free during the campaign, was built on four pillars: prosperity, peace, justice and democracy. At the top of his agenda was a plan for increasing economic prosperity, aiming for economic growth of at least 7% and a revival of small and medium-sized enterprises. He also put forward policies to offer better credit lines, to cut red tape, improve labor laws and to root out corruption from the top down. He told an interviewer:Yudhoyonos perceived communication skills made him the front-runner throughout the election campaign, according to many opinion polls and the opinions of election commentators,(Lingkaran Survey Indonesia  Opini & Analisis Direktur  Mengalahkan Megawati di Tahun 2004?) ahead of the other candidates (Megawati, Wiranto, Rais, and Hamzah). On 5 July 2004, Yudhoyono participated in the first round of the presidential election, coming first with 33% of the votes. However, 50% of votes were required for a new president and vice-president to be elected, and this meant Yudhoyono going into a run-off against Megawati.In the run-off, Yudhoyono faced a challenge from Megawatis Democratic Party-Struggle (PDI-P), forming a national coalition with Golkar, the PPP, Peace Party (PDS) and the National Party (PNI). Yudhoyono then declared that his coalition, which now received political support from the Awakening Party (PKB), the Justice Party (PKS) and the Mandate Party (PAN), would be the peoples coalition. On 20 September 2004, Yudhoyono participated in the run-off election, winning it with 60.87% of the vote. Yudhoyono was inaugurated as president on 20 October 2004. In February 2010, SBY was named as the political figure who had achieved The Gold Standard in Political Communications by the influential PublicAffairsAsia network and magazine.Presidency: 2004presentCabinetThe day of his inauguration in 2004, Yudhoyono announced his new cabinet, which would be known as the Indonesia Cabinet (Kabinet Indonesia Bersatu). Consisting of 36 ministers, it included members of the Democratic Party, Golkar and the PPP, PBB, PKB, PAN, PKP, and PKS. Professionals were also named in the cabinet, most of them taking on ministries in the economic field. The military were also included, with five former members appointed to the cabinet. As per Yudhoyonos promise during the election, four of the cabinet appointees were female.(SBY Akan Tunjuk 4 Wanita. Tempointeraktif.Com (2004-09-29). Retrieved on 2011-04-18.)Yudhoyonos United Indonesia Cabinet was announced in October 2009 after he was reelected as president earlier in the year. The vice president in Yudhoyonos second cabinet is Dr Boediono.  Boediono replaces Kalla who was vice president in the first Yudhoyono cabinet.EconomyIn late 2007, Yudhoyono led Indonesia into a trade agreement with Japan.(Japan-Indonesia FTA (2007), Bilaterals.org, 21 August 2007)Education and healthIn July 2005, Yudhoyono launched the Schools Operational Assistance (BOS) program.(Pemerintah Cairkan Dana Kompensasi BBM, Pikiran Rakyat, 27 July 2005) Under this arrangement, the government gives money to principals to financially assist in the running of schools. Should BOS be able to provide significant financial assistance to the school then the school is expected to lower fees or, if they are able to, to abolish fees altogether. In June 2006, Yudhoyono launched Books BOS which provides funds for the purchase of textbooks.(BOS Buku Digunakan UN, Kompas, 5 June 2006)In January 2005, Yudhoyono launched the Poor Community Health Insurance (Askeskin). Askeskin is a program directed at poor people which allows them access to healthcare.(Adang Setiana Social Health Insurance Development as an Integral Part of the National Health Policy: Recent Reform in the Indonesian Health Insurance System, Coordinating Ministry for Peoples Welfare the Republic of Indonesia, Jakarta)Balance of power with Vice President KallaFile:Susilo-bambang-yudhoyono jusuf-kalla indonesia.jpg|thumb|upright1.2|Yudhoyono with Vice-President Kalla.Although he had won the Presidency, Yudhoyono was still weak in the Indonesian parliament, the Representative Council (DPR). The Democratic Party, even combined with all of its coalition partners, had far fewer representatives than Golkar and the PDI-P, which played the role of opposition.With a national congress to be held in December 2004, Yudhoyono and Kalla had originally backed Agung Laksono speaker to become Golkar chairman. When Agung was perceived to be too weak to run against Akbar, Yudhoyono and Kalla threw their weight behind Surya Paloh. Finally, when Paloh was perceived to be too weak to run against Akbar, Yudhoyono gave the green light for Kalla to run for the Golkar Chairmanship.(Nasional. Suara Merdeka. Retrieved on 2011-04-18.) On 19 December 2004, Kalla was elected as the new chairman of Golkar.Kallas victory posed a dilemma for Yudhoyono. Although it now enabled Yudhoyono to pass legislation, Kallas new position meant that he was now more powerful than Yudhoyono in terms of influence in parliament.After the 2004 Indian Ocean Tsunami Kalla, apparently on his own initiative, assembled Ministers and signed a Vice Presidential decree ordering work to begin on rehabilitating Aceh. The legality of his Vice Presidential decree was questioned() although Yudhoyono maintained that it was he who gave the orders for Kalla to proceed.In September 2005, when Yudhoyono went to York to attend the annual Nations Summit, he left Vice President Kalla in charge. Yudhoyono held a conference from New York to receive reports from ministers. Critics suggest that this was an expression of distrust by Yudhoyono.() The suggestion seemed to gain momentum when Kalla only showed up for one video conference and then spent the rest of the time taking care of Golkar matters.The alleged rivalry resurfaced again in October 2006 when Yudhoyono established the Presidential Work Unit for the Organization of Reform Program (UKP3R). He tasked it with improving the conditions for business investment, executing government diplomacy and administration, improving the performance of the state-owned enterprises, expanding the role of small and medium businesses, and improving law enforcement as a whole.(Marsillam Simanjuntak, Demokrat Berintegritas Tinggi) The UKP3R was headed by Marsillam Simanjuntak, who served as Attorney General during the Wahid Presidency.In February 2007, Yudhoyono added welfare to UKP3Rs tasks by ordering them to also put focus on the abolition of poverty, the direct cash assistance, public service as well as assisting programs in health and education(Presiden Republik Indonesia  Dr. H. Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono. Presidensby.info (2009-01-07). Retrieved on 2011-04-18.) There were accusations that this was an attempt by Yudhoyono to exclude Kalla from government. Yudhoyono was quick to clarify that in supervising UKP3R, he would be assisted by Kalla.(Presiden SBY Tegaskan: UKP3R Dipertahankan)Dealings with SuhartoOn May 6, 2005, Yudhoyono visited Suharto at hospital when the latter suffered from intestinal bleeding. On 5 January 2007, Yudhoyono and his wife visited Suharto, who was again hospitalized due to anaemia as well as heart and kidney problems.(Presiden Republik Indonesia  Dr. H. Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono. Presidenri.go.id (2009-01-07). Retrieved on 2011-04-18.)(Asia-Pacific|Suharto condition deteriorating. BBC News (2008-01-08). Retrieved on 2011-04-18.) After the visit, Yudhoyono made an appeal to all Indonesians to pray for Suhartos recovery.(Presiden Republik Indonesia  Dr. H. Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono. Presidenri.go.id (2009-01-07). Retrieved on 2011-04-18.)Responding to some publicly-made requests to Yudhoyono to granting a pardon for all Suhartos possible past mistakes in governing the country, presidential spokesperson Andi Mallarangeng said, A visit from an incumbent president to a hospitalized former president is something normal. However, this show of humanity and legal step are two different things.(Presiden Republik Indonesia  Dr. H. Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono. Presidensby.info (2009-01-07). Retrieved on 2011-04-18.)OtherFile:GeorgeWBush & SusiloBambangYudhoyono, APEC 2004-Nov-20.jpg|thumb|Yudhoyono with US President W. Bush while attending APEC summit in 2004.On 17 August 2007, Indonesia by initiative of Yudhoyono in Jakarta, proposed that eight nations, homes to some 80% of the worlds tropical rainforests join diplomatic ranks amid increasing concern over warming. Indonesia led the summit of eight countries (on September 24 in York)  Brazil, Cameroon, Congo, Rica, Gabon, Indonesia, Malaysia and New Guinea. On 315 December 2007, Indonesia hosted the 13th Conferences of the Parties (COP-13) under the Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change (UNFCCC) in Bali.(AFP: Indonesia proposes rainforest nations climate group. Afp.google.com (2007-08-31). Retrieved on 2011-04-18.)During the Benedict XVI Islam controversy, Yudhoyono stated that the Popes comments were unwise and inappropriate, (Pope says hes sorry about strong reaction, says speech didnt reflect his personal opinion, Jakarta Post, 17 September 2006) but also that Indonesian Muslims should have wisdom, patience, and self-restraint to address this sensitive issue....We need them so that harmony among people is not at stake.(Amid criticism and violence the first balanced views about the Popes speech appear, AsiaNews, 17 September 2006)Yudhoyono is one of the 100 Worlds Most Influential People in 2009 according to TIME Magazine.()During an official visit to Australia, 911 March 2010, he was appointed an Honorary Companion of the of Australia (AC)(SBY awarded Honorary Companion of the Order of Australia, The Australian, 9 March 2010) and addressed Parliament, the first Indonesian head of state to do so.()Indonesian security forces claim to have uncovered a plot to murder Yudhoyono. A purported strike was to occur 17 August 2010, on Indonesian Day.()Political partyDuring his presidency, Yudhoyono further consolidated his position within the Democratic Party. In May 2005, at PDs first National Congress, Yudhoyono was elected Chairman of the Executive Board (Ketua Dewan Pembina).(Tempointeraktif.com  SBY Jadi Ketua Dewan Pembina Partai Demokrat. Tempointeractive.com. Retrieved on 2011-04-18.) In this position, Yudhoyono has the highest authority, superseding that of chairman.EducationYudhoyono also studied in the States, where he received his Masters degree in Management from University in 1991. He subsequently earned his PhD in economics from the Agricultural University on 3 October 2004, two days before his presidential victory was announced.(Biography of President Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono) His dissertation is entitled The Rural and Agricultural Development as an Effort to Alleviate Poverty and Unemployment: a political economic analysis of fiscal policy. He was also awarded with two honorary doctorates in 2005, respectively in the field of law from his alma mater, Webster University, and in political science from Thammasat University in Thailand.(FamilyThe name Yudhoyono is not an inherited surname; most Javanese do not have surnames. Rather, he chose it for his military name-tag, and it is how he is referred to abroad.()()() His children go by the name Yudhoyono, and in formal meetings and functions he is addressed as Dr Yudhoyono.  In Indonesia, he is referred to in some media as Susilo and is widely known as SBY.Yudhoyono lives both in the Presidential Merdeka Palace in Jakarta and his family residence in Cikeas, Bogor with his wife, Ani Bambang Yudhoyono. First Lady Ani Yudhoyono holds a political science degree from Merdeka University, and was the first vice chairman of her husbands Democratic Party. She is the eldest child of General (Ret.) Sarwo Edhie Wibowo, one of Indonesias high-profile generals.The familys eldest son, Captain Agus Harimurti Yudhoyono (born 1978), graduated from Taruna Nusantara High School in 1997 and the Indonesian Military Academy in 2000 and is a holder of the Adhi Makayasa Medal like his father, continuing family tradition as the best graduate of the Military Academy. In July 2006, Agus graduated from the Institute of Defense and Strategic Studies, Singapore with a masters degree in strategic studies, and is currently studying at University.() Yudhoyono gave a speech at Harvard Kennedy School in September 2009 and joked that his son became another Harvard student working for him  some of Yudhoyonos ministers and military generals also went to Harvard.()  He is married to Annisa Larasati Pohan,(Annisa Pohan-Agus Yudhoyono Menikah) a fashion model and the daughter of a former Bank Indonesia vice-president. The couples daughter and Yudhoyonos only grandchild, Almira Tunggadewi Yudhoyono, was born on August 17, 2008.(VIVAnews  Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono: King of Popularity. En.vivanews.com. Retrieved on 2011-04-18.)The familys younger son, Edhie Baskoro Yudhoyono(born 1982), received his bachelor degree in Economics from the University of Technology, in Perth, Australia( and his Master Degree from the Institute of Defense and Strategic Studies, Singapore.(NTU plans drastic revamp, Straits Times, 24 July 2007) In the 2009 general election, Edhie was elected as member of Parliament from the Democratic Party and currently sits as a member of Parliaments Commission 1 dealing with international affairs.(Edhie Baskoro Jadi Anggota Badan Anggaran DPR RI)Music / DiscographySusilo Bambang Yudhoyono is a musician and in his younger days was part of a band called Gaya Teruna. In the 2000s, he has come back to his early love of music by authoring and co-authoring three pop albums.(Indonesias President Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono releases third pop album, Huffington Post, 25 January 2010)*In 2007, he released his first music album entitled My Longing for You (English title), a collection of love ballads and religious songs. The 10-song tracklist features some of the countrys popular singers performing the songs.(Reuters: Indonesian President launches album, 29 October 2007)*In 2009, he joined forces with Suryoprayogo under the name Yockie and Susilo releasing the album Evolusi.*In 2010, he released a new third album entitled Im Certain Ill Make It (English title)Selected publications by Yudhoyono* * * * ReferencesExternal links* President of Indonesia, Dr. H. Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono official government website******* New era as Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono takes office, Rachel Harvey, News, 20 October 2004* VOA News* Profile at Tokoh IndonesiaBambang Yudhoyono Bambang YudhoyonoBambang Yudhoyono  Bambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang Yudhoyono Bambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang Yudhoyono  Bambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang Yudhoyono Bambang YudhoyonoBambans JudojonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang Yudhoyonoja:Bambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang Yudhoyono Bambang Yudhoyono Bambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang Yudhoyono Bambang Yudhoyono Bambang Yudhoyono Bambang YudhoyonoBambang YudhoyonoBambang Yudhoyonozh:
773672
Compressed-air_vehicle
File:Victor Tatin aeroplane 1879.jpg|thumb|The Tatin airplane of 1879 used a compressed-air engine for propulsion. Original craft, at de lAir et de lEspace.File:Plongeur Rochefort top and side views.jpg|thumb|The first mechanically powered submarine, the 1863 Plongeur, used a compressed-air engine. de la Marine (Rochefort).A compressed-air vehicle (CAV) is powered by an engine, using air, which is stored in a tank. Instead of mixing fuel with air and burning it in the engine to drive pistons with hot expanding gases, compressed-air vehicles use the expansion of compressed air to drive their pistons. One manufacturer claims to have designed an engine that is 90 percent efficient.(Technology Review: The Air Car Preps for Market)Compressed-air propulsion may also be incorporated in hybrid systems, e.g., electric propulsion and fuel tanks to recharge the batteries. This kind of system is called a hybrid-pneumatic electric propulsion. Additionally, braking can also be used in conjunction with this system. Technology  Engine One can buy the vehicle with the engine or buy an engine to be installed in the vehicle. Typical air engines use one or more expander pistons. In some applications it is advantageous to heat the air, or the engine, to increase the range or power. Tanks The tanks must be designed to safety standards appropriate for a vessel, such as 11439.()The storage tank may be made of:*steel,*aluminium,*fiber,*Kevlar,*other materials, or combinations of the above.The fiber materials are considerably lighter than metals but generally more expensive. Metal tanks can withstand a large number of pressure cycles, but must be checked for corrosion periodically.One company stores air in tanks at 4,500 per square inch (about 30 MPa) and hold nearly 3,200 cubic feet (around 90 cubic metres) of air.()The tanks may be refilled at a service station equipped with heat exchangers, or in a few hours at home or in lots, plugging the car into the grid via an on-board compressor. The cost of driving such a car is typically projected to be around 0.75 per 100 km, with a complete refill at the tank-station at about US$3. Compressed air air has a low density. In 300 bar containers, about 0.1 MJ/L and 0.1 MJ/kg is achievable, comparable to the values of electrochemical lead-acid batteries. While batteries can somewhat maintain their voltage throughout their discharge and chemical fuel tanks provide the same power densities from the first to the last litre, the pressure of compressed air tanks falls as air is drawn off. A consumer-automobile of conventional size and shape typically consumes 0.3-0.5 kWh (1.1-1.8 MJ) at the drive shaft(http://www.speedace.info/electric_cars.htm) per mile of use, though unconventional sizes may perform with significantly less. Emission output Like other non-combustion energy storage technologies, an air vehicle displaces the emission source from the vehicles tail pipe to the central electrical generating plant. Where emissions-free sources are available, net production of pollutants can be reduced. Emission control measures at a central generating plant may be more effective and less costly than treating the emissions of widely dispersed vehicles.Since the compressed air is filtered to protect the compressor machinery, the air discharged has less suspended dust in it, though there may be carry-over of lubricants used in the engine. History Compressed air has been used since the 19th century to power mine locomotives and trams in cities such as Paris (via a central, city-level, compressed air energy distribution system), and was previously the basis of naval torpedo propulsion.First ever try to build a compressed air vehicle was done during 1838-1840 by Andraud and Tessi du Motay.(http://www.efcf.com/reports/E14.pdf)During the construction of the Gotthardbahn from 1872 to 1882, pneumatic locomotives were used in the construction of the Rail Tunnel and other tunnels of the Gotthardbahn.In 1903, the Liquid Air Company located in London England manufactured a number of compressed-air and liquified-air cars. The major problem with these cars and all compressed-air cars is the lack of torque produced by the engines and the cost of compressing the air.()Recently several companies have started to develop air cars, although none have been released to the public, or have been tested by third parties. Advantages Compressed-air vehicles are comparable in many ways to vehicles, but use compressed air to store the energy instead of batteries. Their potential advantages over other vehicles include:* Much like electrical vehicles, air powered vehicles would ultimately be powered through the electrical grid. Which makes it easier to focus on reducing pollution from one source, as opposed to the millions of vehicles on the road.* Transportation of the fuel would not be required due to drawing power off the electrical grid. This presents significant cost benefits. Pollution created during fuel transportation would be eliminated.* Compressed-air technology reduces the cost of vehicle production by about 20%, because there is no need to build a cooling system, fuel tank, Ignition Systems or silencers.()* Air, on its own, is non-flammable.* The engine can be massively reduced in size.()* The engine runs on cold or warm air, so can be made of lower strength light weight material such as aluminium, plastic, low friction teflon or a combination.* Low manufacture and maintenance costs as well as easy maintenance.* Compressed-air tanks can be disposed of or recycled with less pollution than batteries.* Compressed-air vehicles are unconstrained by the degradation problems associated with current battery systems.(* The air tank may be refilled more often and in less time than batteries can be recharged, with re-filling rates comparable to liquid fuels.* Lighter vehicles cause less damage to roads, resulting in lower maintenance cost.* The price of filling air powered vehicles is significantly cheaper than petrol, diesel or biofuel. If electricity is cheap, then compressing air will also be relatively cheap. Disadvantages Like the modern car and most household appliances, the principal disadvantage is the indirect use of energy. Energy is used to compress air, which - in turn - provides the energy to run the motor. Any conversion of energy between forms results in loss. For conventional combustion motor cars, the energy is lost when oil is converted to usable fuel - including drilling, refinement, labor, storage, eventually transportation to the end-user. For compressed-air cars, energy is lost when electrical energy is converted to compressed air.* When air expands, as it would in the engine, it cools dramatically (law) and must be heated to ambient temperature using a heat exchanger similar to the Intercooler used for internal combustion engines. The heating is necessary in order to obtain a significant fraction of the theoretical energy output. The heat exchanger can be problematic. While it performs a similar task to the Intercooler, the temperature difference between the incoming air and the working gas is smaller. In heating the stored air, the device gets very cold and may ice up in cool, moist climates.* Refueling the compressed-air container using a home or low-end conventional air compressor may take as long as 4 hours though the specialized equipment at service stations may fill the tanks in only 3 minutes.* Tanks get very hot when filled rapidly. SCUBA tanks are sometimes immersed in water to cool them down when they are being filled. That would not be possible with tanks in  a car and thus it would either take a long time to fill the tanks, or they would have to take less than a full charge, since heat drives up the pressure.* Early tests have demonstrated the limited storage capacity of the tanks; the only published test of a vehicle running on compressed air alone was limited to a range of .(MDI refilling stations)* A 2005 study demonstrated that cars running on lithium-ion batteries out-perform both compressed-air and cell vehicles more than threefold at same speeds.() MDI has recently claimed that an air car will be able to travel  in urban driving, and have a range of  with a top speed of  on highways,() when operating on compressed air alone. Possible improvements * Compressed-air vehicles operate to a process as air cools down when expanding and heats up when being compressed. As it is not possible in practice to use a theoretically ideal process, losses occur and improvements may involve reducing these, e.g., by using large heat exchangers in order to use heat from the ambient air and at the same time provide air cooling in the passenger compartment. At the other end, the heat produced during compression can be stored in water systems, physical or chemical systems and reused later.* It may be possible to store compressed air at lower pressure using an absorption material within the tank. Absorption materials such as carbon,() or a organic framework(http://pubs.acs.org/doi/full/10.1021/ja0771639) is used to store natural gas at 500 psi instead of 4500 psi, which amounts to a large energy saving. Vehicles compressed air locomotive used in boring the Rove Tunnel Scientific American 1916-11-25.jpg|thumb|right|Compressed-air locomotive used in boring the Rove canal tunnel in France Trikes Three mechanical engineering students from Jose State University; Daniel Mekis, Dennis Schaaf and Andrew Merovich, designed and built a bike that runs on compressed air.  The total cost of the prototype was under $1000 and was sponsored by Sunshops (on the Boardwalk in Cruz, California) and NO DIG NO RIDE (from California.). The top speed of the maiden voyage in May 2009 was 23 mph.http://www.youtube.com/watch?vNBeky4EuyBcMotorcyclesA compressed-air powered motorcycle, called the Speed Air Powered Motorcycle was made by Edwin Yi Yuan, based on the Suzuki GP100 and using the Angelo Di Pietro compressed air engine.(Green Speed Air Powered Motorcycle) Mopeds As part of the TV-show Mechanics, Stansfield and Strawbridge have converted a regular scooter to a compressed air moped.(Compressed air moped conversion) This has been done by equipping the scooter with a compressed-air engine and air tank.() Cars Several companies are investigating and producing prototypes, and one plans to offer cars late 2009, early 2010.(http://www.popularmechanics.com/automotive/new_cars/4217016.html; http://www.ecogeek.org/content/view/659/) Buses MDI makes MultiCATs vehicle that can be used as buses or trucks. RATP has also already expressed an interest in the compressed-air pollution-free bus. Locomotives Compressed-air locomotives are a kind of locomotive and have been used in mining(Compressed-Air Propulsion) and tunnel boring.(American cover 1916-11-25 http://www.magazineart.org/main.php/v/technical/scientificamerican/ScientificAmerican1916-11-25.jpg.html) Trams Various compressed-air-powered trams were trialled, starting in 1876.() Most of them used the system. Watercraft and aircraft Currently, no water or air vehicles exist that make use of the air engine. Historically certain torpedoes were propelled by compressed-air engines. See also *fuel*propulsion*Airbus, compressed-air tanks maker*cars*engine*station*air energy storage*ratio*Eolocompressor*warming*hybrid*Pneumatics References  External links *** Study: Air Hybrids Yield Fuel Savings (of Automotive Engineers)* Hydraulic Hybrid Research (States Environmental Protection Agency)* OSEN page about Compressed Air Technology* Compressed-air vehicles history* Photograph of the 1903 Liquid Air Company car* Regusci Air, Armando Reguscis official webdaire comprimitde aire comprimido air comprimja:   
776341
Datamining
#redirect mining
779242
Stephen_Benton_Elkins
battlesCivil WarStephen Benton Elkins (September 26, 1841 January 4, 1911) was an American industrialist and figure. He served as the Secretary of War between 1891 and 1893. He served in the Congress as a Delegate from the of New Mexico and a Senator from Virginia.BiographyEarly lifeElkins was born near Lexington, Ohio and moved with his family to Westport, Missouri (now part of Kansas City) in the mid-1840s to Philip Duncan Elkins and Sarah Pickett Withers. He attended the College in Missouri in the 1850s, and graduated from the of Missouri in Columbia in 1860.  After graduation, he briefly taught school in County, Missouri.  Among his pupils was future Gang member Younger.(Jesse James Was His Name; or, Fact and Fiction concerning the Careers of the Notorious James Brothers of Missouri by William Settle - Bison Books - 1977 ISBN 0803258607)Civil WarIn the Civil War Elkins father and brother joined the Confederate Army under Price, but he joined the Union Army.  Before he joined the Union Army he was to encounter Raiders twice and was spared from being killed because of his father and brother.  He noted::They marched me along and we got to Quantrills camp. There I saw Younger, Yager and M. Todd, and several others afterward known for desperate deeds. Those I have mentioned were farmers sons around where I lived. They identified me and said: Here comes Steve Elkins.  All the way along I had been afraid that those fellows who had captured me would shoot me in the back, for I had on the watch which I am carrying now in the office of the secretary of war.()Elkins entered the Army as a captain of militia in the 77th Missouri Infantry.  He served under Coates and only saw action once in the of Lone Jack, which he said filled him with disgust for war.  Elkins noted that his good fortune of being protected by Quantrill matched a fear of being butchered by Quantrill for becoming a Union soldier as Quantrills Raiders were thought to be present at the battle.:Foster thought the Confederates were the guerrilla hands who raised the black flag, and never gave any quarter. So he refused to surrender, and every one of his officers was picked off. The guerrillas were victorious. I went over the battlefield afterward, the blood, the cries for water and death, the naked bodies stripped of their clothing, the dead horses which served for ramparts, gave me a disgust for war, which makes it seem strange that I am here at the head of the war department of this great government.()Elkins and Foster from the Lone Jack Battle were to argue for a pardon for Younger following his conviction in the Minnesota bank robbery (Younger had rescued Foster from execution by Quantrills Raiders in the battle).New MexicoHe entered the practice of law at New Mexico, and was elected to the territorial legislature in 1864 and 1865. He was appointed territorial district attorney for a term from 1866 to 1867. It was at this time, on June 10, 1866, that he married his first wife Sarah Simms Jacobs.In 1867, Elkins served as attorney general of the territory and later as U.S. district attorney from 1867 to 1870.  He was elected territorial delegate to the U.S. Congress in 1872, and reelected in 1874, serving from March 4, 1873 to March 4, 1877. In 1875, he met and married his second wife, Hallie Davis, and continued to practice law. He founded and was president of the Santa Fe National Bank, and pursued broad business interests in land, rail, mining, and finance including president of the massive Land Grant Company.(http://www.sangres.com/history/maxwelllandgrant.htm)  In attempting to evict squattors (legitimate land grant heirs) from the Land Grant he would be accused of being part of the Fe Ring.  Along with his brother in law, Thomas B. Catron, Elkins participated in what would become the largest land speculation conspiracy in U.S. history.  Using his influence on politicians such as congressmen, territorial judges, and U.S. Surveyors General, Elkins was able to patent Spanish and Mexican land grants in his name, thereby illegally including himself as a legitimate heir to the grants.  By collectively representing opposing parties in land disputes, Elkins and Catron effectively manipulated territorial government policy to illegally partition Spanish and Mexican land grants, a direct violation of the Treaty of Guadalupe Hidalgo.West VirginiaAround 1890, he moved to West Virginia, a town he had founded earlier, to pursue coal and rail interests.  By 1892, the Coal and Coke Company, a partnership between Elkins and his father-in-law, Senator G. Davis, was among the largest coal companies in the world. Secretary of WarElkins served as Secretary of War in the Harrison administration from December 17, 1891 to March 5, 1893.  Amongst his goals were that the rank of lieutenant general be revived, and also that noncommissioned officers receive higher pay to improve the quality of the service.  He also broadened the intelligence functions of the Division of Military Information.  U.S. SenatorAfter his service as Secretary, he was elected to the Senate in 1895, serving the state of West Virginia, and was re-elected twice.  In the Senate, he held the positions of chairman of the Committee on the Geological Survey (Fifty-sixth and Fifty-ninth Congresses), and of member of the Committee on Interstate Commerce (Fifty-seventh through Sixty-first Congresses).  Elkins served as Senator until his death in Washington, D.C. in 1911, and is interred in Maplewood Cemetery of Elkins, West Virginia.See also*and Elkins College, in Elkins, WV; named for Senators Elkins and Davis*Stephen Benton Elkins HouseReferences* Retrieved on 2008-10-19*Biography in Secretaries of War and Secretaries of the Army published by the States Army Center of Military HistoryBenton ElkinsBenton Elkinsja:Benton Elkins
781005
Anna_May_Wong
1700 Vine StreetAnna May Wong (January 3, 1905  February 3, 1961) was an American actress, the first American movie star,(Chan 2003, p. xi.) and the first American to become an international star.(Gan 1995, p. 83.) Her long and varied career spanned both silent and sound film, television, stage, and radio.Born near the Chinatown neighborhood of Los Angeles to second-generation Chinese-American parents, Wong became infatuated with the movies and began acting in films at an early age. During the film era, she acted in Toll of the Sea (1922), one of the first movies made in color and Fairbanks The Thief of Bagdad (1924). Wong became a fashion icon, and by 1924 had achieved international stardom.Frustrated by the stereotypical supporting roles she reluctantly played in Hollywood, she left for Europe in the late 1920s, where she starred in several notable plays and films, among them Piccadilly (1929).She spent the first half of the 1930s traveling between the United States and Europe for film and stage work. Wong was featured in films of the early sound era, such as of the Dragon (1931) and of Shanghai (1937), and with Dietrich in von Sternbergs Shanghai Express (1932).(Zia 1995, p. 415.)In 1935 Wong was dealt the most severe disappointment of her career, when Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer refused to consider her for the leading role in its film version of S. Bucks Good Earth, choosing instead the German actress Rainer to play the leading role. Wong spent the next year touring China, visiting her familys ancestral village and studying Chinese culture. In the late 1930s, she starred in several movies for Pictures, portraying Chinese-Americans in a positive light. She paid less attention to her film career during War II, when she devoted her time and money to helping the Chinese cause against Japan. Wong returned to the public eye in the 1950s in several television appearances as well as her own series in 1951, Gallery of Madame Liu-Tsong, the first U.S. television show starring an Asian-American.(Film reveals real-life struggles of an onscreen Dragon Lady. (2008).) She had been planning to return to film in Flower Drum Song when she died in 1961, at the age of 56.For decades after her death, Wong was remembered principally for the stereotypical Dragon Lady and demure Butterfly roles that she was often given. Her life and career were re-evaluated in the years around the centennial of her birth, in three major literary works and film retrospectives. Interest in her life story continues and another biography, Shining Star: The Anna May Wong Story, was published in 2009.(Maughan, Shannon. Spring 2009 Sneak Previews: Shining Star by Paula Yoo, illus. by Lin Wang, a biography of Chinese-American actress Anna May Wong. Weekly Volume 255, Issue 29, July 2008,  p. 125. Retrieved: August 1, 2008.)Early lifeAnna May Wong was born Wong Liu Tsong (meaning frosted yellow willows) on January 3, 1905, on Flower Street in Los Angeles, one block north of Chinatown, in an integrated community of Chinese, Irish, German, and Japanese residents.(Hodges 2004, pp. 2, 5.)(Corliss January 29, 2005, p. 2.) She was the second of seven children born to Wong Sam Sing, owner of the Sam Kee Laundry in Los Angeles, and his second wife Lee Gon Toy.(Finch and Rosenkrantz 1979, p. 231.)Anna May Wongs parents were second-generation Chinese-Americans; her maternal and paternal grandparents had resided in the U.S. since at least 1855.(Hodges 2004, p. 1.) Her paternal grandfather, A Wong Wong, was a merchant who owned two stores in Michigan Hills, a gold-mining area in Placer County. He had come from Chang On, a village near Taishan, Province, China in 1853.(Hodges 2004, p. 6.) Anna Mays father spent his youth traveling between the U.S. and China, where he married his first wife and fathered a son in 1890.(Chan 2003, p. 13.) He returned to the U.S. in the late 1890s, and in 1901, while continuing to support his family in China, he married a second wife, Anna Mays mother.(Hodges 2004, pp. 1, 78, 10.) Anna Mays older sister Lew Ying (Lulu) was born in late 1902,(Hodges 2004, p. 2.) and Anna May was born in 1905, followed by five more children.In 1910, the family moved to a neighborhood on Street where they were the only Chinese on their block, living alongside mostly Mexican and Eastern European families. The two hills separating their new home from Chinatown helped Wong to assimilate into American culture.(Hodges 2004, p. 5.) At first she attended public school with her older sister, but when the girls were the target of racist taunts from other students, their parents moved them to a Presbyterian Chinese school. Classes were taught in English, but Wong attended a Chinese language school afternoons and on Saturdays.(Hodges 2004, pp. 1315.)About that same time, U.S. motion picture production began to relocate from the east coast to the Los Angeles area. Movies were shot constantly in and around Wongs neighborhood. She began going to Nickelodeon movie theaters and quickly became obsessed with the flickers, missing school and using lunch money to attend the cinema. Her father was not happy with her interest in films, feeling that it interfered with her studies, but Wong decided to pursue a career in film regardless. At nine years of age, she begged filmmakers for parts, earning herself the nickname C.C.C. or Curious Chinese Child.(Hodges 2004, p. 21.) By the age of 11, Wong had come up with her name of Anna May Wong, formed by joining both her English and family names.(Wollstein 1999, p. 248.)Early careerImage:Anna May Wong as Lotus Flower calling out in The Toll of the Sea.jpg|thumb|left|200 px|Anna May Wong in the early Technicolor film Toll of the Sea (1922)Wong was working at Hollywoods Ville de Paris department store when Pictures needed 300 girl extras to appear in Nazimovas film Red Lantern (1919). Without her fathers knowledge, a friend of his with movie connections helped Anna May land an uncredited role as an extra carrying a lantern.(Chan 2003, p. 31.)She worked steadily for the next two years as an extra in various movies, including Dean and Moore pictures. While still a student, Wong came down with an illness identified as St. Vituss Dance which caused her to miss months of school. She was on the verge of emotional collapse when her father took her to a practitioner of Chinese medicine. The treatments proved successful, though Wong later claimed this had more to do with her dislike of the methods.(Hodges 2004, pp. 2627.) Other Chinese thought such as Confucianism and particularly Taoism and the teachings of Laozi had a strong influence on Wongs personal philosophy throughout her life.(Chan 2003, pp. 145146.) The familys religious life also included Christian thought, in the form of Presbyterianism, and as an adult she was a Christian Scientist for some time.(Hodges 2004, p. 225.)Finding it difficult to keep up with both her schoolwork and her passion, she dropped out of Angeles High School in 1921 to pursue a full-time acting career.(Lim 2005, p. 51.)(Hodges 2004, p. 41.) Reflecting on her decision, Wong told Motion Picture Magazine in 1931: I was so young when I began that I knew I still had youth if I failed, so I determined to give myself 10 years to succeed as an actress.(Wollstein 1999, p. 249.)In 1921, Wong received her first screen credit for of Life, the first film, in which she played the wife of Lon Chaneys character, Toy Ling, in a segment entitled Hop.(Gan 1995, p. 84.) She later recalled it fondly as the only time she played the role of a mother;(Hodges 2004, p. 35.) her appearance earned her a cover photo in the British magazine Picture Show.At the age of 17 she played her first leading role, in the early Metro two-strip Technicolor movie Toll of the Sea. Written by Marion, the story was based loosely on Butterfly. Variety magazine singled Wong out for praise, noting her extraordinarily fine acting.(The Toll of the Sea (film review) December 1, 1922.) New York Times  commented, Miss Wong stirs in the spectator all the sympathy her part calls for, and she never repels one by an excess of theatrical feeling. She has a difficult role, a role that is botched nine times out of ten, but hers is the tenth performance. Completely unconscious of the camera, with a fine sense of proportion and remarkable pantomimic accuracy ... She should be seen again and often on the screen.(The Toll of the Sea (film review) November 27, 1922.)Despite such reviews, Hollywood proved reluctant to create starring roles for Wong; her ethnicity prevented U.S. filmmakers from seeing her as a leading lady. David Schwartz, the chief curator of the Museum of the Moving Image, notes, She built up a level of stardom in Hollywood, but Hollywood didnt know what to do with her.(Anderson, Melissa. The Wong Show. Time Out: New York, Issue 544: March 28, 2006, TimeOut. Retrieved: March 24, 2008.) She spent the next few years in supporting roles providing exotic atmosphere,(Parish 1976, pp. 532533.) for instance playing a concubine in Brownings Drifting (1923).( Film producers capitalized on Wongs growing fame by using her brief appearances in these supporting roles to promote their films.(Hodges 2004, p. 58.) Still optimistic about a film career, in 1923 Wong said: Pictures are fine, and Im getting along all right, but its not so bad to have the laundry back of you, so you can wait and take good parts and be independent when youre climbing.(StardomAt the age of 19, Anna May Wong was cast in a supporting role as a Mongol slave in the Fairbanks picture The Thief of Bagdad (1924). Playing a stereotypical Dragon Lady role, her brief appearances on-screen caught the attention of audiences and critics alike.(Hodges 2004, p. 49.) The film grossed more than $2 million and helped introduce Wong to the public.After this second prominent role, Wong moved out of the family home into her own apartment. Conscious that Americans viewed her as foreign born even though she was born and raised in California, Wong began cultivating a flapper image.(Chan 2003, pp. 37, 139.) In March 1924, planning to make films about Chinese myths, she signed a deal creating Anna May Wong Productions; when her business partner was found to be engaging in dishonest practices, Wong brought a lawsuit against him and the company was dissolved.(Chan 2003, pp. 3738.)It soon became evident that Wongs career would continue to be limited by American laws, which prevented her from sharing an on-screen kiss with any person of another race, even if the character was Asian, but being portrayed by a white actor.(Leong 2005, pp. 181182.) The only leading Asian man in U.S. films in the silent era was Hayakawa. Unless Asian leading men could be found, Wong could not be a leading lady.(Hodges 2004, p. 64.)Wong continued to be offered supporting roles in minor films, in which she was often singled out for critical praise.(Forty Winks (film review), February 3, 1925.) Despite such favorable reviews, she became increasingly disappointed with her casting and began to seek other roads to success. In early 1925 she joined a group of serial stars on a tour of the vaudeville circuits; when the tour proved to be a failure, Wong and the rest of the group returned to Hollywood.(Wollstein 1999, p. 250.)In 1926, Wong put the first rivet into the structure of Chinese Theatre when she joined Talmadge for its groundbreaking ceremony, although she was not invited to leave her hand- and foot-prints in cement.(Sweet 2008.)(Hodges 2004, p. 66.)In the same year Wong starred in The Silk Bouquet. Re-titled The Dragon Horse in 1927, the film was one of the first U.S. films to be produced with Chinese backing, provided by San Franciscos Six Companies. The story was set in China during the Dynasty, and featured Asian actors playing the Asian roles.(Chan 2003, p. 185.)Wong continued to be assigned supporting roles. Hollywoods Asian female characters tended toward two stereotypical poles: the nave and self-sacrificing Butterfly and the sly and deceitful Dragon Lady. In Old San Francisco (1927), directed by Crosland for Brothers, Wong played a Dragon Lady, a gangsters daughter.(Liu 2000, p. 24.) In Wu (1927) she played a supporting role as  increasing censorship against mixed race onscreen couples cost her the lead. In Crimson City, released the following year, this happened again.(Rohter, Larry.  The Crimson City (1928). The New York Times, September 2, 2010. Retrieved: September 2, 2010.)Move to EuropeTired of being both typecast and being passed over for lead Asian character roles in favor of non-Asian actresses, Wong left Hollywood in 1928 for Europe.(Chan 2003, p. 42.) Interviewed by Doris Mackie for Film Weekly in 1933, Wong complained about her Hollywood roles: I was so tired of the parts I had to play.(Leong 2005, pp. 83, 187.)(Wollstein 1999, p. 252.) She commented: There seems little for me in Hollywood, because, rather than real Chinese, producers prefer Hungarians, Mexicans, American Indians for Chinese roles.(Parish 1976, p. 533.)In Europe, Wong became a sensation, starring in notable films such as  Schmutziges Geld (aka Song and Show Life, 1928), and Grostadtschmetterling (City Butterfly). Of the German critics response to Song, The New York Times reported that Wong was acclaimed not only as an actress of transcendent talent but as a great beauty. The article noted that Germans passed over Wongs American background: Berlin critics, who were unanimous in praise of both the star and the production, neglect to mention that Anna May is of American birth. They mention only her Chinese origins.(Song (film review). August 22, 1928.) In Vienna, she played the title role in the operetta Tschun Tschi in fluent German.( An Austrian critic wrote, Frulein Wong had the audience perfectly in her power and the unobtrusive tragedy of her acting was deeply moving, carrying off the difficult German-speaking part very successfully.(Parish 1976, p. 534.)While in Germany, Wong became an inseparable friend of the director Riefenstahl. Her close friendships with several women throughout her life, including Dietrich and Cunningham, led to rumors of lesbianism which damaged her public reputation.(Wollstein 1999, pp. 252, 253, 256.) These rumors, in particular of her supposed relationship with Dietrich, embarrassed Wongs family who in any case had long been opposed to her acting career, at that time not considered to be an entirely respectable profession.(Hodges 2004, p. 87.)London producer Dean bought the play Circle of Chalk for Wong to appear in with the young Olivier, her first stage performance in the UK.( Criticism of her Californian accent, described by one critic as a Yankee squeak, led to Wong seeking vocal tutoring at University, where she acquired a British accent.(Hodges 2004, p. 97.) Composer Lambert, infatuated with the actress after having seen her in films, attended the play on its opening night and subsequently composed Eight Poems of Li Po, dedicated to her.(Motion 1986, p. 161.)Wong made her last silent film, Piccadilly, in 1929, the first of five English films in which she had a starring role. The film caused a sensation in the UK.(Hodges 2004, p. 92.) Gray was the top-billed actress, but Variety commented that Wong outshines the star, and that from the moment Miss Wong dances in the kitchens rear, she steals Piccadilly from Miss Gray.(Piccadilly (film review) July 24, 1929.) Though the film presented Wong in her most sensual role in a British film, once again she was not permitted to kiss her Caucasian love interest, and a controversial planned scene involving a kiss was cut before the film was released.(Chan 2003, pp. xiii, 213, 215, 219.) Forgotten for decades after its release, Piccadilly was later restored by the Film Institute.(Hsu 2004.) Time magazines Corliss  calls Piccadilly Wongs best film,(Corliss January 29, 2005, pp. 1, 3.) and Guardian reports that the rediscovery of this film and Wongs performance in it has been responsible for a restoration of the actress reputation.(While in London, Wong was romantically linked with writer and broadcasting executive Maschwitz, who wrote the lyrics to Foolish Things (Remind Me Of You) as an evocation of his longing for her after they parted.((Hodges 2004, p. 178.) Wongs first talkie was The Flame of Love (1930), which she recorded in French, English, and German. Though Wongs performance  particularly her handling of the three languages  was lauded, all three versions of the film received negative reviews.(Chan 2003, pp. 5153.)Return to HollywoodDuring the 1930s, American studios were looking for fresh European talent. Ironically, Wong caught their eye and she was offered a contract with Paramount Studios in 1930. Enticed by the promise of lead roles and top billing, she returned to the United States.  The prestige and training she had gained during her years in Europe led to a starring role on Broadway in On the Spot,(Lim 2005, p. 56.) a drama that ran for 167 performances and which she would later film as to Know.(Hodges 2004, p. 187.) When the plays director wanted Wong to use stereotypical Japanese mannerisms, derived from Madame Butterfly, in her performance of a Chinese character, Wong refused. She instead used her knowledge of Chinese style and gestures to imbue the character with a greater degree of authenticity.(Lim 2005, p. 57.) Following her return to Hollywood in 1930, Wong repeatedly turned to the stage and cabaret for a creative outlet.In November 1930, Anna Mays mother was run over and killed by an automobile in front of the Figueroa Street house.(Hodges 2004, p. 112.) The family remained at the house until 1934, when Wongs father returned to his hometown in China with Anna Mays younger brothers and sister.(Chan 2003, p. 90.) Anna May had been paying for the education of her younger siblings, who put their education to work after they relocated to China.(Hodges 2004, p. 155.) Before the family left, Wongs father wrote a brief article for Xinning, a magazine for overseas Taishanese, in which he expressed his pride in his famous daughter.(Hodges 2004, p. 148.)With the promise of appearing in a von Sternberg film, Wong accepted another stereotypical role  the title character of Manchus vengeful daughter in of the Dragon (1931).(Wollstein 1999, p. 253.) This was the last stereotypically evil Chinese role Wong played,(Lim 2005, p. 59.) and also her one starring appearance alongside the only other well-known Asian actor of the era, Hayakawa. Though she was given the starring role, this status was not reflected in her paycheck: she was paid $6,000, while Hayakawa received $10,000 and Oland, who is only in the film for 23 minutes, was paid $12,000.(Corliss February 3, 2005, p. 4.)Wong began using her newfound celebrity to make political statements: late in 1931, for example, she wrote a harsh criticism of the Incident and Japans subsequent invasion of Manchuria.(Hodges 2004, p. 118.)(Chan 2003, pp. 9596.) She also became more outspoken in her advocacy for Chinese-American causes and for better film roles. In a 1933 interview for Film Weekly entitled I Protest, Wong criticized the negative stereotyping in Daughter of the Dragon, saying, Why is it that the screen Chinese is always the villain? And so crude a villain  murderous, treacherous, a snake in the grass! We are not like that. How could we be, with a civilization that is so many times older than the West?((Lim 2005, p. 58.)Image:Anna May Wong Shanghai Express.jpg|thumb| 250px| Anna May Wong and Dietrich in Shanghai Express (1932)Wong appeared alongside Dietrich as a self-sacrificing courtesan in Sternbergs Shanghai Express.( Her sexually charged scenes with Dietrich have been noted by many commentators, and fed rumors about the relationship between the two stars.(Chan 2003, p. 232.) Though contemporary reviews focused on Dietrichs acting and Sternbergs direction, film historians today judge that Wongs performance upstaged that of Dietrich.((Lim 2005, p. 60.)The Chinese press had long given Wongs career very mixed reviews, and were less than favorable to her performance in Shanghai Express. A Chinese newspaper ran the headline: Paramount Utilizes Anna May Wong to Produce Picture to Disgrace China, and continued, Although she is deficient in artistic portrayal, she has done more than enough to disgrace the Chinese race.(Leong 2005, p. 74.) Critics in China believed that Wongs on-screen sexuality spread negative stereotypes of Chinese women.(Leong 2005, p. 75.) The most virulent criticism came from the Nationalist government, but Chinas intellectuals and liberals were not always so opposed to Wong, as demonstrated when University awarded the actress an honorary doctorate in 1932. Contemporary sources reported that this was probably the only time that an actor had been so honored.(Mein Film 1932, p. 333. Cited in Hodges 2004, p. 125.)In both America and Europe, Wong had been seen as a fashion icon for over a decade. In 1934, the Mayfair Mannequin Society of New York voted her The Worlds best-dressed woman, and in 1938 Look magazine named her The Worlds most beautiful Chinese girl.(Chan 2003, p. 33.)Atlantic crossingsAfter her success in Europe and prominent role in Shanghai Express, Wongs Hollywood career returned to its old pattern. Because of the Hays Codes anti-miscegenation rules, she was passed over for the leading female role in The Son-Daughter in favor of Hayes. Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer deemed her too Chinese to play a Chinese in the film,(Hodges 2004, p. 128.) and the Hays Office would not have allowed her to perform romantic scenes since the films male lead, Navarro, was not Asian.( Wong was scheduled to play the role of a mistress to a corrupt Chinese general in Capras Bitter Tea of General Yen (1933), but the role went instead to Mori.(Hodges 2004, pp. 127128.)Image:AnnaMayWong2.jpg|thumb|Van Vechten photo portrait of Wong, September 22, 1935Again disappointed with Hollywood, Wong returned to Britain, where she stayed for nearly three years. In addition to appearing in four films she toured Scotland, Ireland, and outlying British provinces as part of a vaudeville show. She also appeared in the King George Jubilee program in 1935.(Gan 1995, p. 89.) Her film Java Head (1934), though generally considered a minor effort, was the only film in which Wong kissed the lead male character, her white husband in the film. Wongs biographer, Graham Russell Hodges, commented that this may be why the film remained one of Wongs personal favorites.(Hodges 2004, pp. 144, 217.) While in London, Wong met Lanfang, one of the most famous stars of the Opera. She had long been interested in Chinese opera and Mei offered to instruct Wong if she ever visited China.(Hodges 2004, pp. 150, 155.)In the 1930s, the popularity of Bucks novels, especially Good Earth, as well as growing American sympathy for China in its struggles with Japanese Imperialism, opened up opportunities for more positive Chinese roles in U.S. films.(Leong 2005, pp. 75, 94.) Wong returned to the U.S. in June 1935 with the goal of obtaining the role of O-lan, the lead female character in MGMs film version of The Good Earth. Since its publication in 1931, Wong had made known her desire to play O-lan in a film version of the book;(Hodges 2004, pp. 150151.) and as early as 1933, Los Angeles newspapers were touting Wong as the best choice for the part.(Hodges 2004, p. 152.) Nevertheless, the studio apparently never seriously considered Wong for the role because Muni, an actor of European descent, was to play O-lans husband, Wang Lung. The Chinese government also advised the studio against casting Wong in the role. The Chinese advisor to MGM commented: whenever she appears in a movie, the newspapers print her picture with the caption Anna May again loses face for China .(Hodges 2004, p. 151.)According to Wong, she was instead offered the part of Lotus, a deceitful song girl who helps to destroy the family and seduces the familys oldest son.(Leong 2005, p. 76.) Wong refused the role, telling MGM head of production Thalberg, If you let me play O-lan, I will be very glad. But youre asking me  with Chinese blood  to do the only unsympathetic role in the picture featuring an all-American cast portraying Chinese characters.( The role Wong hoped for went to Rainer, who won the Best Actress Oscar for her performance. Wongs sister, Mary Liu Heung Wong, appeared in the film in the role of the Little Bride.(Chan 2003, p. 261.) MGMs refusal to consider Wong for this most high-profile of Chinese characters in U.S. film is remembered today as one of the most notorious cases of casting discrimination in the 1930s.(Berry 2000, p. 111.)Tour of ChinaAfter the major disappointment of losing the role in The Good Earth, Wong announced plans for a year-long tour of China, to visit her father and his family in Taishan.((Parish 1976, p. 536.) Wongs father had returned to his hometown in China with her younger brothers and sister in 1934.  Aside from Mei Lanfangs offer to teach her, she wanted to learn more about the Chinese theater, and through English translations to better perform some Chinese plays before international audiences.((Liu 2000, p. 29.) She told the Francisco Chronicle on her departure, ... for a year, I shall study the land of my fathers. Perhaps upon my arrival, I shall feel like an outsider. Perhaps instead, I shall find my past life assuming a dreamlike quality of unreality.(Embarking in January 1936, she chronicled her experiences in a series of articles printed in U.S. newspapers such as the York Herald Tribune,( the Angeles Examiner, the Angeles Times, and Photoplay.(Liu 2000, pp. 2829.) In a stopover in Tokyo on the way to Shanghai, local reporters, ever curious about her romantic life, asked if she had marriage plans, to which Wong replied, No, I am wedded to my art. The following day, however, Japanese newspapers reported that Wong was married to a wealthy Cantonese man named Art.((Chan 2003, p. 97.)During her travels in China, Wong continued to be strongly criticized by the Nationalist government and the film community.(Hodges 2004, pp. 159160.) She had difficulty communicating in many areas of China because she was raised with the dialect rather than Chinese. She later commented that some of the Chinese dialects sounded as strange to me as Gaelic. I thus had the strange experience of talking to my own people through an interpreter.(Chan 2003, p. 99.)The toll of international celebrity on Wongs personal life manifested itself in bouts of depression and sudden anger, as well as excessive smoking and drinking.(Hodges 2004, p. 134.) Feeling irritable when she disembarked in Hong Kong, Wong was uncharacteristically rude to the awaiting crowd, which then quickly turned hostile. One person shouted: Down with Huang Liu Tsong  the stooge that disgraces China. Dont let her go ashore. Wong began crying, and a stampede ensued.(Hodges 2004, pp. 165167.) After she left for a short trip to the Philippines, the situation cooled and Wong joined her family in Hong Kong. With her father and her siblings, Wong visited his family and his first wife at the familys ancestral home near Taishan.((Chan 2003, pp. 122123.) Conflicting reports claim that she was either warmly welcomed or met with hostility by the villagers. She spent over 10 days in the familys village, and some time in neighboring villages before continuing her tour of China.(Hodges 2004, p. 168.) After returning to Hollywood, Wong reflected on her year in China and her career in Hollywood: I am convinced that I could never play in the Chinese Theatre. I have no feeling for it. Its a pretty sad situation to be rejected by Chinese because Im too American and by American producers because they prefer other races to act Chinese parts.( Wongs father returned to Los Angeles in 1938.(Chan 2003, p. 280.)Late 1930sTo complete her contract with Paramount Pictures, Wong made a string of B movies in the late 1930s. Often dismissed by critics, the films gave Wong non-stereotypical roles which were publicized in the Chinese-American press for their positive images. These smaller-budgeted films could be bolder than the higher-profile releases, and Wong used this to her advantage to portray successful, professional, Chinese-American characters. Competent and proud of their Chinese heritage, these roles worked against the prevailing U.S. film portrayals of Chinese-Americans.(Lim 2005, pp. 47, 63, 67.) In contrast to the usual official Chinese condemnation of Wongs film roles, the Chinese consul to Los Angeles gave his approval to the final scripts of two of these films, of Shanghai (1937) and of Chinatown (1939).(Leong 2005, p. 94.)Image:Anna May Wong.jpg|thumb|left|Carl Van Vechten photo portrait of Wong, in costume for a dramatic adaptation of Puccinis Turandot at Westport, August 11, 1937(Hodges 2004, p. 180.)In Daughter of Shanghai, Wong played the Asian-American female lead in a role that was rewritten for her as the heroine of the story, actively setting the plot into motion rather than the more passive character originally planned.(Lim 2005, p. 66.) The script was so carefully tailored for Wong that at one point it was titled, Anna May Wong Story.( Of this film, Wong told Hollywood Magazine, I like my part in this picture better than any Ive had before ... because this picture gives Chinese a break  we have sympathetic parts for a change! To me that means a great deal.(Leung, Louise. East Meets West, Hollywood Magazine, June 1938, pp. 40, 55. Quoted in Leong 2005, p. 94.) The New York Times gave the film a generally positive review, commenting of its B-movie origins, An unusually competent cast saves the film from the worst consequences of certain inevitable banalities. cast ... combine with effective sets to reduce the natural odds against any pictures in the Daughter of Shanghai tradition.(Crisler 1937.) In October 1937, the press carried rumors that Wong had plans to marry her male co-star in this film, childhood friend  and Korean-American actor Ahn.( Wong replied, It would be like marrying my brother.(Wollstein 1999, p. 256.)Crowther was not so kind to to Know (1938), which he called a second-rate melodrama, hardly worthy of the talents of its generally capable cast.(Crowther 1938.) In King of Chinatown Wong played a surgeon who sacrifices a high-paying promotion in order to devote her energies to helping the Chinese fight the Japanese invasion.(Lim 2005, p. 47.) The New York Times Frank Nugent gave the film a negative review. Though he commented positively on its advocacy of the Chinese in their fight against Japan, he wrote, ... Paramount should have spared us and its cast ... the necessity of being bothered with such folderol.(Nugent 1939.)Paramount also employed Wong as a tutor to other actors, such as Lamour in her role as a Eurasian in Passage.( Wong performed on radio several times, including a 1939 role as Peony in Pearl Bucks The Patriot on Welles Campbell Playhouse.(Hodges 2004, p. 191.) Wongs cabaret act, which included songs in Cantonese, French, English, German, Danish, Swedish, and other languages, took her from the U.S. to Europe and Australia through the 1930s and 1940s.(Corliss January 29, 2005, p. 1.)In 1938, having auctioned off her movie costumes and donated the money to Chinese aid, the Chinese Benevolent Association of California honored Wong for her work in support of Chinese refugees.(Leong 2005, p. 95.) The proceeds from the preface that she wrote in 1942 to a cookbook titled New Chinese Recipes, one of the first Chinese cookbooks, were also dedicated to United China Relief.(Hodges 2004, p. 203.) Between 1939 and 1942, she made few films, instead engaging in events and appearances in support of the Chinese struggle against Japan.Later yearsWong starred in from Chungking (1942) and over Burma (1943), both propaganda made by the row studio Releasing Corporation. She donated her salary for both films to United China Relief.(Leong 2005, p. 101.) The Lady from Chungking differed from the usual Hollywood war film in that the Chinese were portrayed as heroes rather than as victims rescued by Americans. Even after American characters are captured by the Japanese, the primary goal of the heroes is not to free the Americans, but to prevent the Japanese from entering the city of Chongqing (Chungking). Also, in an interesting twist, the Chinese characters are portrayed by Chinese-American actors, while the Japanese villains  normally played by Chinese-American actors  are acted by European-Americans. The film ends with Wong making a speech for the birth of a new China.( The Hollywood Reporter and Variety both gave Wongs performance in The Lady from Chungking positive reviews, but commented negatively on the films plot.Later in life, Wong invested in real estate and owned a number of properties in Hollywood.(Finch and Rosenkrantz 1979, p. 156.) She converted her home on San Vincente Boulevard in Monica into four apartments which she called Moongate Apartments.(Parish 1976, p. 538.) She served as the apartment house manager from the late 1940s until 1956, when she moved in with her brother Richard on 21st Place in Santa Monica.(Wollstein 1999, pp. 257258.)In 1949, Wongs father died in Los Angeles at the age of 91.( After a six-year absence, Wong returned to film the same year with a small role in a B movie called Impact.(Chan 2003, p. 78.) From August 27 to November 21, 1951, Wong starred in a detective series that was written specifically for her, the Television Network series Gallery of Madame Liu-Tsong,( in which she played the title role which used her birth name.( Wongs character was a dealer in art whose career involved her in detective work and international intrigue.(Camhi 2004.) The ten half-hour episodes aired during time, from 9:00 to 9:30 p.m.(Chan 2003, p. 80.) Although there were plans for a second season, DuMont canceled the show in 1952. No copies of the show or its scripts are known to exist.(Hodges 2004, pp. 216217.) After the completion of the series, Wongs health began to deteriorate. In late 1953 she suffered an internal hemorrhage, which her brother attributed to the onset of menopause, her continued heavy drinking, and financial worries.(Hodges 2004, pp. 217218.)In 1956, Wong hosted one of the first U.S. documentaries on China narrated entirely by a Chinese-American. Broadcast on the ABC travel series Journey, the program consisted of film footage from her 1936 trip to China.(Chan 2003, p. 124.) Wong also did guest spots on television series such as in Paradise, Barbara Stanwyck Show, and Life and Legend of Wyatt Earp.(Chan 2003, pp. 81, 268.)For her contribution to the film industry, Anna May Wong received a star at 1708 Vine Street on the inauguration of the Walk of Fame in 1960.(Chung 2006, p. 26.) She is also depicted larger-than-life as one of the four supporting pillars of the Gateway to Hollywood sculpture located on the southeast corner of Hollywood Boulevard and La Brea Avenue, with the actresses del Rio (Hispanic American), Dandridge (American) and West.(Negra 2001, p. 1.)In 1960, Wong returned to film in in Black, starring Turner. She still found herself stereotyped, with one press release explaining her long absence from films with a supposed proverb, which was claimed to have been passed down to Wong by her father: Dont be photographed too much or youll lose your soul,( a quote that would be inserted into many of her obituaries.(She was scheduled to play the role of Madame Liang in the film production of and Hammersteins Flower Drum Song, but was unable to take the role due to failing health.(Chan 2003, pp. 8081.) On February 3, 1961, at the age of 56, Wong died of a heart attack at home in Santa Monica, two days after her final screen performance on the television show Man.((Anna May Wong Is Dead at 54. Actress Won Movie Fame in 24. Appeared With Fairbanks in Thief of Bagdad. Made Several Films Abroad. New York Times, February 4, 1961. Retrieved: August 3, 2008.)(Chan 2003, pp. xvii, 81, 269.)(Hodges 2004, p. 227. She announced that... an episode of Danger Man, entitled The Journey Ends Halfway, would appear on May 24., also p. 244.) Her cremated remains were interred in her mothers grave at Rosedale Cemetery in Los Angeles(), frequently reported to be only marked by her mothers name on the tombstone.(Hodges 2004, p. 228.)  In 2008, a fan campaign started to raise funds to create and purchase a headstone for Wong.(Film Buffs Hope to Buy Headstone for Anna May Wong. Goldsea Asians, 2008.)RomancesIn the early 1920s Wong had an affair with director Browning. It was a romance largely unknown of at the time and highlighted by the fact that it was an interracial relationship and that Wong was underage.(Hollywood Horror: from Gothic to Cosmic by Mark A. Vierra c. 2003)Legacythumb|Carl Van Vechtens photo portrait, April 25, 1939Wongs image and career have left a lasting legacy. Through her films, public appearances, and prominent magazine features, she helped to humanize Asian-Americans to white audiences during a period of overt racism and discrimination. Asian-Americans, especially the Chinese, had been viewed as perpetually foreign in U.S. society, but Wongs films and public image established her firmly as an Asian-American citizen at a time when laws specifically discriminated against Asian immigration and citizenship. Wongs hybrid image dispelled contemporary notions that the East and West were inherently different.(Lim 2005, pp. 4951.)Among Wongs films, only Shanghai Express retained critical attention in the U.S. in the decades after her death. In Europe, and especially England, her films appeared occasionally at festivals. Wong remained popular with the gay community who often claimed her as one of their own, and for whom her marginalization by the mainstream became a symbol.(Hodges 2004, p. 232.) Although the Chinese Nationalist criticism of her portrayals of the Dragon Lady and Butterfly stereotypes lingered, Wong herself was forgotten in China.(Hodges 2004, pp. 231232.) Nevertheless, the importance of Wongs legacy within the Asian-American film community can be seen in the Anna May Wong Award of Excellence which is given out yearly at the Asian-American Arts Awards;(Chan 2003, p. 276.) the annual award given out by the Asian Fashion Designers was also named after Wong in 1973.(For decades following her death, Wongs image remained as a symbol in literature, as well as in film. In the 1971 poem The Death of Anna May Wong, Hagedorn saw Wongs career as one of tragic glamour, and portrayed the actress as a fragile maternal presence, an Asian-American woman who managed to birth, however ambivalently, Asian-American screen women in the jazz age.(Liu 2000, p. 35.)  Wongs character in Shanghai Express was the subject of Yaus 1989 poem No One Ever Tried to Kiss Anna May Wong, which interprets the actress career as a series of tragic romances.(Liu 2000, pp. 3133.) In Cronenbergs 1993 film version of Henry Hwangs 1986 play, Butterfly, Wongs image was used briefly as a symbol of a tragic diva.(Liu 2000, pp. 3435.) Her life was the subject of China Doll, The Imagined Life of an American Actress, an award-winning(ACTF: The David Mark Cohen National Playwriting Award. Kennedy Center. Retrieved: March 8, 2010.) fictional play written by Elizabeth Wong in 1995.({UCSB Special Collections: California Ethnic and Multicultural Archives. Library.ucsb.edu. Retrieved: March 8, 2010.)As the centennial of Wongs birth approached, a re-examination of her life and career took shape; three major works on the actress appeared, and comprehensive retrospectives of her films were held at both the of Modern Art and the Museum of the Moving Image in New York City.((Performing Race on Screen.) Anthony Chans 2003 biography, Perpetually Cool: The Many Lives of Anna May Wong (19051961), was the first major work on Wong, and was written, Chan says, from a uniquely Asian-American perspective and sensibility.(Chan 2003, p. xvii.) In 2004, Philip Leibfried and Mi Lanes exhaustive examination of Wongs career, Anna May Wong: A Complete Guide to Her Film, Stage, Radio and Television Work was published, as well as a second full-length biography, Anna May Wong: From Laundrymans Daughter to Hollywood Legend by Graham Russell Hodges. Though Anna May Wongs life, career, and legacy reflect many complex issues which remain decades after her death, Anthony Chan points out that her place in Asian-American cinematic history, as its first female star, is permanent.(Chan 2003, p. 275.)See also*of East Asians in Hollywood*in Film of the United States*Stereotypes of East and Southeast Asians in American mediaSelected filmography* (includes her television work)* Red Lantern (1919) debut  uncredited* of Life (1921)* Toll of the Sea (1922) as Lotus Flower* The Thief of Bagdad (1924) as a Mongol Slave* A Trip to Chinatown (1926) as Ohati* Old San Francisco (1927)* Piccadilly (1929) as Shosho* Calling (1930) as Herself* of the Dragon (1931) as Princess Ling Moy* Shanghai Express (1932) as Hui Fei* A Study in Scarlet (1933)* to Know (1938) as Lan Ying* of Lost Men (1939) as Kim Ling (Island of Lost Men (1939). Tcm.com. Retrieved: March 8, 2010.)* from Chungking (1942) as Kwan Mei* Over Burma (1943) as Lin Ying* Impact (1949) as Su Lin* in Black (1960) as TawnyReferencesNotesBibliography of cited sources* Berry, Sarah. Screen Style: Fashion and Femininity in 1930s Hollywood. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 2000. ISBN 0-81663-312-6.* Camhi, Leslie. Film: A Dragon Lady and a Quiet Cultural Warrior. New York Times, January 11, 2004.* Chan, Anthony B. Perpetually Cool: The Many Lives of Anna May Wong (19051961). Lanham, MD: The Scarecrow Press, 2003. ISBN 0-8108-4789-2.* Chung, Hye-seung. Hollywood Asian: Philip Ahn and the Politics of Cross-ethnic Performance. Philadelphia: Temple University Press, 2006. ISBN 1-5921-3516-1.* Corliss, Richard. Anna May Wong Did It Right. Time, January 29, 2005. Retrieved: March 20, 2008.* Corliss, Richard. That Old Feeling: Anna May Win. Time, February 3, 2005. Retrieved: March 24, 2008.* Crisler, B.R. Daughter of Shanghai (film review). New York Times, December 24, 1937.* Crowther, Bosley. Dangerous to Know (film review). New York Times, March 11, 1938.* Film reveals real-life struggles of an onscreen Dragon Lady. UCLA Today Online, January 3, 2008. Retrieved: May 27, 2008.* Finch, Christopher and Linda Rosenkrantz. Gone Hollywood: The Movie Colony in the Golden Age. Garden City, NY: Doubleday, 1979. ISBN 978-0-385-12808-7.* Forty Winks (film review). New York Times, February 3, 1925.* Gan, Geraldine. Anna May Wong. Lives of Notable Asian Americans: Arts, Entertainment, Sports. New York: Chelsea House, 1995, pp. 8391. ISBN 978-0-7910-2188-0.* Hodges, Graham Russell. Anna May Wong: From Laundrymans Daughter to Hollywood Legend. Basingstoke, Hampshire: Palgrave Macmillan, 2004. ISBN 0-312-29319-4.* Hsu, Shirley. Nobodys Lotus Flower: Rediscovering Anna May Wong Film Retrospective. Asia Pacific Arts Online Magazine. UCLA Asia Institute. January 23, 2004. Retrieved: May 12, 2008.* Leibfried, Philip and Chei Mi Lane. Anna May Wong: A Complete Guide to her Film, Stage, Radio and Television Work. Jefferson, NC: McFarland, 2004. ISBN 0-7864-1633-5.* Leong, Karen J. The China Mystique: Pearl S. Buck, Anna May Wong, Mayling Soong, and the Transformation of American Orientalism. Berkeley, CA: University of California Press, 2005. ISBN 0-5202-4422-2.* Lim, Shirley Jennifer. I Protest: Anna May Wong and the Performance of Modernity, (Chapter title)A Feeling of Belonging: Asian American Womens Public Culture, 19301960. New York: New York University Press, 2005, pp. 104175. ISBN 0-8147-5193-8.* Liu, Cynthia W. When Dragon Ladies Die, Do They Come Back as Butterflies? Re-imagining Anna May Wong. Countervisions: Asian American Film Criticism. Hamamoto, Darrel and Sandra Liu, (editors). Philadelphia: Temple University Press, 2000, pp. 2339. ISBN 1-56639-776-6.* Motion, Andrew. The Lamberts: George, Constant and Kit. New York: Farrar, Straus and Giroux, 1986. ISBN 0-37418-283-3.* Negra, Diane. Off-White Hollywood: American Culture and Ethnic Female Stardom. London: Routledge, 2001. ISBN 0-415-21678-8.* Nugent, Frank. King of Chinatown (film review). New York Times, March 16, 1939.* Parish, James and William Leonard. Anna May Wong. Hollywood Players: The Thirties. New Rochelle, NY: Arlington House Publishers, 1976, pp. 532538. ISBN 0-87000-365-8.* Performing Race on Screen. cinema.cornell.edu. Retrieved: May 12, 2008.* Piccadilly (film review). Variety, July 24, 1929.* Rollins, Peter C., ed. The Columbia Companion to American History on Film: How the Movies Have Portrayed the American Past. New York: Columbia University Press, 2003. ISBN 0-23111-223-8.* Song (film review). New York Times, August 22, 1928.* Sweet, Matthew. Snakes, Slaves and Seduction; Anna May Wong. Guardian, February 6, 2008. Retrieved: March 20, 2008.* The Toll of the Sea (film review). New York Times, November 27, 1922.* The Toll of the Sea (film review). Variety, December 1, 1922.* Wang, Yiman and Catherine Russell, ed.. The Art of Screen Passing: Anna May Wongs Yellow Yellowface Performance in the Art Deco Era. Camera Obscura 60: New Women of the Silent Screen: China, Japan, Hollywood.  Durham, NC: Duke University Press, 2005, pp. 159191. ISBN 0-8223-6624-X.* Wollstein, Hans J. Anna May Wong. Vixens, Floozies, and Molls: 28 Actresses of late 1920s and 1930s Hollywood. Jefferson, NC: McFarland, 1999. ISBN 0-7864-0565-1.* Wong, Elizabeth: China Doll, The Imagined Life of an American Actress. Woodstock, Ill: Dramatic Publishing,  2005. ISBN 1-58342-315-X.* Wood, Ean. The Josephine Baker Story. London: Sanctuary, 2000. ISBN 1-86074-286-6.* Zia, Helen and Susan B. Gall. Notable Asian Americans. New York: Gale Research, 1995. ISBN 978-0-8103-9623-4.Further reading* Doerr, Conrad. Reminiscences of Anna May Wong. Films in Review. New York, December 1968. ISSN 015-1688.* Griffith, Richard and Richard Mayer. The Movies. New York: Fireside, 1970. ISBN 0-60036-044-X.* Schneider, Steven Jay, ed. 1001 Movies You Must See Before You Die. Hauppauge, NY: Barrons Educational Series, 2005. ISBN 0-76415-907-0.External links*The Anna May Wong Society***Time Magazine: The Career of Anna May Wong*Anna May Wong Documentary Home*Anna May Wong Tobacco Cards at Virtual HistoryMay WongMay WongMay WongMay WongMay WongMay WongMay WongMay WongMay WongMay Wongja:May WongMay WongMay Wong May WongMay Wongzh:
783511
Alfred_McCune_Home
thumb|300px|Alfred McCune Home in 2002The Alfred McCune Home is one of the turn-of-the-century mansions on Capitol Hill in Salt Lake City, Utah. Built for W. McCune on the inclined south side of Capitol Hill at the northeast corner of 200 North and Main Street, the mansion has 21 rooms and is on the Register of Historic Places.  The house was built in 1900.(Ensign, May 1975, p. 53)McCune was born in Calcutta, India while his father, Matthew McCune, was stationed with the Army and converted there to Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints. The family immigrated to Utah.  Despite this Alfred McCune seems to have never joined the LDS Church.(H. Roberts. Comprehensive History of The Church. Vol. 6, p. 344 specifically states that McCune was not a Mormon)By the time he was 21, Alfred had contracted to build portions of the Utah Southern Railroad. He was a highly successful railroad builder, and became well-connected to other late 19th century millionaires. He was a partner in the Peruvian Cerro de Pasco mines along with P. Morgan, Randolph Hearst, and William Vanderbilt. He owned business interests throughout Utah and in parts of Montana, British Columbia, and South America.McCune was respected by his contemporaries for his integrity, his congenial personality, and his generous donations to worthy causes. He was also civic-minded and politically ambitious. In 1899, he ran for the Senate as the Democratic candidate against Republican incumbent J. Cannon and several other candidates. When none was able to get a majority of votes, the election went down in history as the time when Utah was unable to select or send a senator to Washington. McCune later tried again for the Senate but was defeated by another mining and railroad magnate, Kearns.Elizabeth McCune had as many diversified interests as her husband had. She served in many prominent Church positions and became close friends with Young Gates, one of the daughters of Young. An active supporter of womens rights, Elizabeth attended the 1889 International Congress of Women in London. After being voted patron of the organization, Elizabeth was entertained by Victoria at Castle.McCune wanted his home to be an extravagant display and to these ends he financed a two-year tour of America and Europe for his architect S. C. Dallas to study designs and techniques. The design chosen was a revival plan with Asian influence. The home is a replica of a house Alfred and Elizabeth saw while driving on Riverside Drive in New York City.While the home was under construction, R. Winder and McCune called upon the Presidency of the LDS church. McCune told them that he and his wife, Elizabeth, were building a new home and wished to rent the House for two or three years. The Gardo house had been used as a residence and offices for LDS church leaders. Relieved to find a suitable new tenant, the Church accepted his offer and set the rent at $150 per month.The McCune home site was chosen to rise up impressively over the nearby streets, and little expense was spared on decoration. McCune had mahogany shipped from Domingo, oak from England, and a rare white-grained mahogany from Africa. The red roof tiles came from Holland, and an enormous broad mirror wall was transported from Germany in a specially made railroad car. The walls were adorned with moir silks, tapestries, and Russian leather. The exterior of the home was built of red Utah sandstone although some details like the lavish fireplaces used more exotic stone like Nubian marble. The home was completed in 1901 at a cost of over one half million dollars.History after the McCunesAlfred W. McCune and his wife Elizabeth lived in the home until 1920. Prior to moving to Angeles, they donated it to Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints with the intent that it be used as an official residence for President J. Grant.  President Grant did not like the idea of living in such an ornate residence, and so decided to turn it into a Music School.  It was used as the School of Music until 1963 when it became the Young University Salt Lake City Center which moved to a new location in Salt Lake City. In 1975 the LDS Church sold it to a group of Salt Lake City residents who were seeking to make the building into a cultural center of some sort.(Ensign, May 1975, p. 55)It then became the Tanner Modern Dance School, which held lessons in the ballroom. Since then, the building has been privately owned, often used for receptions and other short-term rental.Philip McCarthey, a shareholder of the Kearns-Tribune Corp. which published Salt Lake Tribune until 1997, bought the building  and began restoring it, after the August 11, 1999 Lake City Tornado, which toppled one of the buildings smokestacks. McCarthey completed the restoration in November 2001.ReferencesExternal links*Official McCune Mansion site*Utah City Guide - McCune Mansion - Salt Lake Tribune description of the mansion.*Alfred and Elizabeth McCune - Article with bio information of Alfred and Elizabeth McCune*The Horror Channel - Information about the McCune Mansion on The Horror Channel
787614
Tallinn_University_of_Technology
website       http://www.ttu.ee/Tallinn University of Technology (TUT) (, abbreviated TT) is the only university of technology in Estonia, and one of the three most important institutions of higher education in Estonia generally. It is located in the capital city of Tallinn, Estonia. Tallinn University of Technology is not related to University (established in 2005). TUT has colleges in Tallinn, Tartu, Kuressaare and Kohtla-Jrve.Faculties* Chemical and Materials Technology** Dean Prof. Andres pik* Engineering** Dean Prof. Roode Liias* Economics and Administration** Dean Prof. llas Ehrlich* Sciences** Dean Prof. Sulev Meltsemees* Engineering** Dean Prof. Tauno Otto * Technology** Dean Prof. Ennu Rstern* Power Engineering** Dean Prof. Tnu Lehtla* Science** Dean Prof. Tnis KangerInstitutes* Certification Centre** Director Toomas Laur* Institute of Cybernetics** Director Prof. Jaan Penjam* Institute of Geology** Director Prof. Alvar Soesoo* Institute of Sustainable Technology** Director Prof. Lembit Nei* Institute of Marine Systems** Director Prof. Jri Elken* Technomedicum** Director Prof.Kalju MeigasHistoryFile:Tallinn Kopli, May 1996.jpg|thumb|right|19321964 the main building was in Kopli.In the early twentieth century, Estonia recognised an urgent need for locally trained engineering specialists . Until then, young people from Estonia had received their specialist education in St. Petersburg, Germany or Riga. Opportunities had to be sought for engineering-minded people to acquire an Estonian-based education which was adapted to local conditions and needs; also, Estonia was in the process of establishing itself as an independent country.On 17 September 1918, the Estonian Engineering Society opened an Estonian-based engineering school named Special Engineering Courses. That date has been recognised as the founding date of the Tallinn University of Technology. Programmes were offered in mechanical, electrical, civil and hydraulic engineering, shipbuilding and architecture. In 1919, the school became the private Tallinn College of Engineering, which in 1920 was declared a state institution. Teachers efforts to develop an Estonian terminology for science and technology proved fruitful and the first engineering books were published. In 1923, the first engineering graduation theses were defended in Estonia. In the same year, a state laboratory of materials testing opened for research work.By the 15 September 1936 Act of the Head of State, the school was granted university status, and named the Tallinn Technical Institute. The institute had two faculties: civil and mechanical engineering and chemistry and mining. In 1938, the name - Tallinn Technical University (TTU) - was effective. In 1940 the Faculty of Economics, in 1958 the Faculty of Power Engineering and in 1965 the Faculty of Control Engineering were founded. After 2003 the university was known in English as the Tallinn University of Technology (TUT). On 1 July 2008, TUT took over University Audentes (IUA), which became part of the Faculty of Economics and Business Administration, except the Law School which joined the Faculty of Social Sciences.AlumniBesides the entire technological elite of Estonia, alumni also include numerous industrialists and businessmen, including the former Chairman of Hansapank, the biggest bank of the region, Indrek Neivelt; the Chairman of the Estonian of Commerce, Toomas Luman; and the former Prime Minister and eminent industrialist Vhi. The Vice President and former President of the Estonian of Science, Jri Engelbrecht, is also a member of TUT.Partner Universities (selection)* of Baltimore, Baltimore, Maryland, USA* University of Technology and Economics Budapest, Hungary  * Technische Universitt Chemnitz, Chemnitz, Germany* Technische Universitt Darmstadt, Darmstadt, Germany* Technische Universitt Dresden, Dresden, Germany* University of Technology, Eindhoven, Netherlands  * of Helsinki, Helsinki, Finland* Helsinki University of Technology, Helsinki, Finland  * University of Jnkping, Jnkping, Sweden    * Otto-von-Guericke-University Magdeburg, Magdeburg, Germany* Ecole Polytechnique de lUniversit de Nantes, Nantes, France  * of New Brunswick, Canada* Universit Pierre et Marie Curie, Paris, France* ITIN - cole suprieure dinformatique, Cergy-Saint-Cristophe, France* State University, East Lansing, Michigan, USA * Institute of Technology, Stockholm, Sweden* of Toronto, Toronto, Canada* Norwegian Institute of Technology Trondheim, Norway  * University of Twente, Twente, Netherlands  * National Technical University of Ukraine, Kiev, Ukraine* of Washington, Seattle, Washington, USA References (External links* Tallinn University of Technology * 6-min. video clip featuring TUT* Technology Governance program website* City of TallinnUniversitt TallinnTehnikalikoolTcnica de Tallintechnikos universitetasUniversiteit Tallinn teknillinen yliopistoTeknoloji niversitesifa:__
794216
Swansea,_California
footnotes               Swansea is an unincorporated community in Inyo County, California.( It is located  south of York Butte,() at an elevation of 3661 feet (1116 m).(Swansea was a boomtown located on the eastern shore of Lake. Spawned by the success of the silver mining operations in the nearby Gordo Mines in the late 1860s, Swansea became a hub for smelting the ore and transporting the resulting ingots to Angeles, over 200 miles away. The smelter operated from 1869 to 1874.(Swansea was named after the mining town Swansea in south Wales, from which many experienced miners emigrated to the USA.The Lone Pine earthquake damaged the smelters and uplifted the shoreline, rendering the Swansea pier inaccessible by Owens Lake steamships. As a result, most of the smelting and transportation business moved to Keeler, approximately one mile to the south.In the summer of 1874, a thunderstorm-induced debris flow inundated Swansea under several feet of water, rock and sand.(Likes, Robert C., From This Mountain, 1975, Sierra Media Inc.)  By then the town had been almost deserted, and the debris flow marked the end of Swansea.As of 2007, only one building and a smelter foundation remained alongside Route 136 (about 10 miles southeast of Lone Pine).References
796958
East_Region_(Cameroon)
The East Region (East Province until 2008; ) occupies the southeastern portion of the Republic of Cameroon. It is bordered to the east by the African Republic, to the south by Congo, to the north by the Region, and to the west by the Centre and South Regions. With 109,011 km of territory, it is the largest region in the nation as well as the most sparsely populated. Historically, the peoples of the East have been settled in Cameroonian territory for longer than any other of the countrys many ethnic groups, the first inhabitants being the Baka (or Babinga) pygmies.The East Region has very little industry, its main commerce consisting of logging, timber, and mining. Instead, the bulk of its inhabitants are subsistence farmers. The region is thus of little political import and is often ignored by Cameroonian politicians. This coupled with the low level of development in the province have led to its being dubbed the forgotten province.2008 Presidential Decree Abolishes ProvincesIn 2008, the President of the Republic of Cameroon, President Paul Biya signed decrees abolishing Provinces and replacing them with Regions. Hence, all of the countrys ten provinces are now known as Regions.GeographyLandThe soil of the East is predominantly ferrallitic, rich with iron and red in colour. The southern three quarters of the region consists of rock such as gneiss, schist, mica, and migmatite. Starting at about the level of Bertoua and going north, however, granite becomes the dominate soil component. While the region supports an abundance of plant life, it is not particularly fertile due to leaching caused by the humid environment. Eastern dirt hardens quickly in the sun, and it is often used as a building material by poorer inhabitants.DrainageThe province contains several river systems: the Nyong, which drains the central-western area, the Dja in the southwest, the Lom in the northeast, the Kad, which drains the northwest, the Boumba in the centre and southeast, and the Sangha and Ngoko, which drain portions of the southeast and form the border with the Central African Republic and Congo respectively. Many of these rivers have carved out valleys that surround them. The rivers of the territory have only slight gradients, and floods can occur along them during the rainy season. The Lom and Nyong rivers eventually empty into the Ocean. All other rivers in the East form part of the River basin.ReliefAlmost the entire territory of the East Province lies on the Cameroon Plateau that forms the southeastern half of the country. The elevation thus varies between 500 and 1000 metres above sea level except for lower-lying plains of 200 to 500 metres in the extreme southeast centered on the Dja, Boumba, Sangha, and Ngoko Rivers. The land consists largely of monotonous, gently undulating hills known as half-oranges due to their resemblance to that fruit.ClimateThe East has a Type A equatorial climate (also known as a type climate), meaning that it experiences high temperatures (24 C on average) and a lack of traditional seasons. Instead, there is a long dry season from December to May, a light wet season from May to June, a short dry season from July to October, and a heavy wet season from October to November. Humidity and cloud cover are relatively high, and precipitation averages 15002000 mm per year except in the extreme eastern and northern portions, where it is slightly less.thumb|300px|right|Guinean savanna near BertouaPlant and animal lifeApproximately the lower two thirds of the province is covered in forest, which grows progressively thicker as one travels south. The forests are composed of hardwood evergreens of species such as dibetu, ebony, iroko, mahogany, obeche, and sapelli, some of which grow to heights of 70 metres or more. There are also numerous ferns and orchids. This forest is stratified into several levels. The first is composed of straight, thick-rooted trees averaging about 40-metres tall. After this grow shorter, thinner trees with highly placed clusters of leaves. Sparse grasses and other plants make up the ground layer. In areas closer to settlements and roads, human groups have harvested the larger trees, thus exposing the forest floor to more direct sunlight and allowing thick vegetation to thrive. The upper third of the province (beginning at about the latitude of Bertoua and Batouri) is dominated by humid, wooded savanna. Trees here are sparser, but still may grow to be as tall as 20 metres.The government of Cameroon has established four forest and game reserves in the East: the Reserve (Rserve du Biosphre de Dja) in the southwest of the province and extending into the South Province, Park (Parc National de la Lobk), the Reserve (Rserve de Boumba-Bek) and the Reserve (Rserve de Nki) in the southeast. The Djrem Reserve (Rserve Pangar Djerem) protects one of the more heavily wooded parts of the Guinean savanna in the provinces northwest and extends into the Adamawa Province.Animal life is abundant and diverse. The forests are inhabited by numerous species of monkey, as well as some of the last populations of gorillas and chimpanzees in Cameroon. Bats and birds of various species are also common, as are various rodents. A few elephants still live in the province, as well. Many of these animals are currently under threat of extinction due to deforestation and the bushmeat trade.Demographicsthumb|278px|right|Typical Bantu house in the village of NgoilaSettlement patternsThe East had 517,198 inhabitants in 1987, and it remains the most sparsely populated of Cameroons ten provinces. The bulk of the territory has a density of less than five persons/km. This is mostly a result of the areas thick forests, which inhibit settlement and support disease-carrying insects such as mosquitoes and blackflies. These factors also make the East an unattractive target for development by both organisations and the Cameroonian government, a fact that has only further prevented larger numbers of people from settling in the region.The majority of the population is thus primarily situated in villages and towns along the few major roads that traverse the province. Along these routes, population density jumps to as high as 20/km and to 20-60/km on the Bertoua-Batouri corridor. The traditional Bantu dwelling is a rectangular house made of sun-dried bricks placed in a wooden frame. Raffia palm fronds are a common covering, though metal roofing has become more common.Peoplethumb|300px|right|Ethnic groups of the East ProvinceMost East Province peoples are considered Bantu in origin. The second most numerous are the various AdamawaUbangi (Sudanese) tribes that inhabit much of the northern portions of the territory. A third important group are the Fulbe (Fula), who have immigrated into the area in great numbers over the past few decades. Finally, the pygmies comprise another significant population.Most eastern peoples speak their own distinctive languages, though educated individuals usually also know French. Minor languages spoken include Bomwali, Bulu, Kol, Mbonga, and Vute.The people of the East are predominantly Christian, and Presbyterianism and Catholicism claim the most members. Animist beliefs are also followed by much of the population, often in conjunction with Christianity. The East also has a relatively high percentage of Muslims, particularly in the areas closer to the Adamawa Province.thumb|220px|left|Maka woman on the way to her fields near Abong-MbangBantuThe speakers of languages are the largest group of Bantu peoples in the province. The Maka form the majority of this group and occupy much of the western territories on the border with the Centre Province, including the towns of Abong-Mbang, Nguelemendouka, and Doum. The Bajwe inhabit the territory immediately south of this, centred at Massamna. The Nzime live at Mindourou and its surroundings on the road that runs south from Abong-Mbang. Further south on this road are the Njem, whose territory includes the settlements of Lomi, Zoulabot, Zwadiba, and Ngoila. The Mpo occupy most of the territory surrounding the Ndll-Yokadouma road and the side-roads off of it, as well as much of the border with the Congo. The Mpoman have a small enclave at Lokomo south of Yokadouma, and the Kunbabeeg live west of this Mpo-Mpoman territory. All of these groups speak distinct, but closely related, languages.Though the capital, Bertoua, is a traditional Gbaya settlement, the region is today a melange of several tribes, including the Baki, Pori, Bajem, and Kwa. The southwestern portion of the Lom and Djerem division, just west of this, is peopled by the Eki, who have more extensive territories in the Centre Province. Small areas on the road from Doum to Gonga belong to the Kwakum and Pori. The Kaka live to the south and the west of the Kadey River and have high centres at Batouri and Ndll. The Bageto have lands south of Ndll.AdamawaUbangiThe Gbaya are the most populous Ubangi group in the East, and they inhabit most of the Lom and Djerem division (including Bertoua) and the northernmost third of the Kadey division along the Kadey River. They also have smaller population centres, including the village of Gari-Gombo and Djampiel. The Kuo occupy the extreme northestern corner of the province, including Wendoka. The Gbete (Kepere) live northwest of Bertoua, including the territory from Blabo west to Yangamo. The Bangantu people live east of the Yokadouma-Moloundou road in the provinces southeastern corner.Baka pygmiesthumb|right|225px|Baka dancersThe rest of the province, that which is covered by thick forests and not serviced by roads, is inhabited by the Baka, Babaya, or Babinga pygmies. Though traditionally hunter-gatherers, in recent times, the Baka have established trade with their Bantu neighbours, exchanging wild game for crops or metal tools. This relationship is not always equal, however, and Bantu sometimes take advantage of the Baka, exploiting them for labour or ceding their territory to logging companies without compensation.The Cameroonian government has tried to encourage the Baka to establish permanent settlements, and some pygmy villages exist in the territory. Most of the Baka remain nomadic, however, living in temporary shelters of leaves and sticks. A much greater force acting to end the Bakas traditional lifestyle is intermarriage and assimilation into neighbouring tribes.EconomyAgricultureThe vast majority of the inhabitants of the region are subsistence farmers. Major crops are plantains south of Bertoua and Batouri and maize north of there. Farmers also raise many other crops in smaller quantities, including bananas, groundnuts, cocoyams, manioc, pineapples, oranges, mangoes, and yams. The dense forest and presence of the fly prohibits much cattle raising, but various livestock are raised for subsistence purposes, including pigs, sheep, goats, ducks, and chickens, as well as horses and donkeys in the extreme northeast. The Development Exploitation Organisation also runs a modern cattle ranch at Ndokayo in the provinces northeast.Farms are mostly small-scale affairs planted in clearings in the forest. Farmers clear an area during the dry season using traditional implements such as axes and machetes. The area is then burned, with care taken to preserve fruit trees such as mangoes or plums. At the start of the wet season, spices and common vegetables are planted close to the home and tubers, such as cocoyams and manioc, are placed with plantains in larger plots farther afield. Farmyard manure is used as fertiliser. Crops are then harvested at the beginning of the next dry season.This method of agriculture allows for high yields in the short term, but quickly exhausts the soil. Farms are thus moved every two to three years, and land must remain fallow for up to ten years once it has been drained in this way. With the Easts low population density, however, this generally presents little problem.Commercial crops also exist. Cocoa and coffee are raised for profit in the areas of Abong-Mbang, Bertoua, and Yokadouma, as well as in the heavy forests south of these areas. Tobacco is grown in the plains north of Batouri. No large-scale commercial livestock exists in the East, though cattle from the northern regions of Cameroon are herded through the province on their way to market in Yaound.Hunting and gatheringCrop growing is often supplemented by hunting and gathering, particularly in more rural areas. In fact, among the provinces pygmies, these activities are carried out almost exclusively. While gathering of various wild plant species is primarily a female occupation, hunting is conducted by men with traditional implements such as bows and arrows, spears, blowguns, and traps. In addition, firearms are becoming much more common in modern times. Though most hunting is done on a small scale, larger-scale techniques are sometimes employed. In these bigger hunts, people set fire to areas of forest or grassland in order to flush out prey. Other hunters or dogs frighten the animals into running toward armed men who then kill them.IndustryThe major industry of the East is forestry. The region has vast tracts of forest, and African and European companies have exploited these heavily. Because of the rapid rate of exploitation, however, lumber companies have been forced to push further and further into Africa to find suitable trees. As a result, much of the logging that once took place in Cameroon has been relocated to neighbouring countries such as Congo and the Central African Republic. The massive logging vehicles still travel through the East on their way to Cameroons ports, and it is possible that without the logging industry, the East might never have got the little transportation network that exists there now. The East is also the home of several timber processing centres with major operations located around Blabo, Dimako, and Mindourou.In recent years, speculators have found deposits of gold near Batar-Oya, cobalt near Lomi, and iron and aluminium in other areas. Companies have since moved in to exploit these resources as well. Other industries have a much smaller presence, such as a groundnut-oil mill located in Bertoua.TransportationFor its vast size, the East has very little transportation infrastructure. With the exception of a few private logging roads, travel through the province is only feasible along the three main roads that cover the territory. The first of these, National Road #10, heads east from Yaound, passes through Ayos on the border with the Centre Province, then continues on through the towns of Abong-Mbang, Doum, Dimako, Bertoua, and Batouri before turning south at Ndll near the Central African Republic border to pass through Gari-Goumbo and Yokadouma before terminating at Moloundou on the Congo border. Another major road begins in Abong-Mbang and heads south through Mindourou to Lomi. Neither of these roads is paved, causing travel conditions in most of the province to fluctuate with the seasons. The third major route through the province is a road from Bertoua to Garoua-Boula on the border with Central African Republic. This road was paved in 1997 with funds from the Union. The only transport that covers these routes is privately owned taxis or mini-buses run by private groups known as GICs (French acronym meaning group dinitiative commune).The East is accessible via railroad, as well, through Camrail, the state-owned train system. The train comes from Douala and Yaound and passes through Blabo before heading north to Ngaoundr in the Adamawa Province. There is a regional airport in Bertoua that is officially part of state-owned Camairs network, but it has been out of service since 2003. In addition, the Nyong River is navigable from Abong-Mbang to the Centre Province town of Mbalmayo during the rainy season.TourismDue to the remoteness of the region and the difficulty of travel within it, the East sees very few tourists. The area boasts huge tracts of relatively untouched rain forest, however, and non-governmental organisations such as Ecofac and the Wildlife Fund have in recent years endeavored to make the area a viable destination for eco-tourism. Their efforts have centered on the Easts national parks and forest reserves, particularly the Dja Reserve. In 2003, for example, CIAD and other NGOs began a gorilla habituation project to pave the way for camera-toting tourists to come within a few metres of the animals to see them in their natural environment. However, government corruption led to the cancellation of the initiative. Hunters may also pursue game through these reserves.Administration and social conditionsGovernmentthumb|right|Departments of East CameroonA presidentially appointed governor heads the administration of the province from the capital city of Bertoua.The East is divided into four departments (departements), each headed by a presidentially appointed senior divisional officer or prefect (prefet):# Boumba-et-Ngoko (Boumba and Ngoko) takes up the southeast and has its centre in Yokadouma.# Haut-Nyong (Upper Nyong) occupies the southwestern portion and is centred on Abong-Mbang.# Kadey (also spelled Kad or Kadei) forms the central-eastern portion of the territory and is governed from Batouri.# Lom-et-Djrem (Lom and Djrem) consists of the north of the province and has its capital in Bertoua.Each of these divisions is further divided into sub-divisions, each headed by a sub-divisional officer or sub-prefect (sous-prefet). Individual towns usually have a mayor, and some villages have a traditional chief, though this person usually holds little actual authority.Cameroonian politicians have traditionally ignored the East. The region is simply too underpopulated to have much influence in countrywide elections. Eastern residents have in recent years called for more infrastructure improvements from the government, especially the paving of roads. Candidates for office and government officials do occasionally make stops in the region to address such issues, but their message is often simply an excuse for why such improvements would be detrimental to the region. For example, they often argue that paved roads would only allow the forests upon which the region depends to be cut down at an even faster rate.EducationSchool attendance rates are difficult to determine for the East, but are generally higher in the towns than in the villages. schools are fairly widely distributed, but most of the regions schools are located in larger villages or in towns, meaning that students from more remote areas must walk long distances, stay with relatives, or rent rooms during the school year. In addition, school fees keep many families from sending their children for an education.HealthDue to its thick forests and equatorial climate, the East is home to a host of tropical diseases. Chief among these is malaria, which remains a major cause of death in the region. fever, filariasis, fever, and tuberculosis are also endemic. In 1997 and 1998, health professionals recorded outbreaks of what may have been the Ebola virus in the southwest near Ngoila. The Health Organisation today doubts that this bloody diarrhea was in fact that virus, however.As with most of sub-Saharan Africa, poor sanitation is a major source of illness for people in the East. Diseases spread this way include schistosomiasis, brucellosis, A, dysentery, dysentery, and giardia.In recent years, the East has come into focus for its role in the AIDS epidemic. This largely stems from the regions position as a transportation network for logging vehicles. In addition to the transportation network, the construction of the Chad/Cameroon pipeline has fueled the increase of Prostitution along these routes, with professional sex workers operating in virtually every town and village along the provinces roads. Government estimates report the HIV rate among operators of these logging vehicles to be about 18% and that of the sex workers to be as high as 30%.Government efforts in the 1980s to improve the number and quality of hospitals in Cameroon have made healthcare more available in the region. Most hospitals and clinics are located in the larger towns, however, meaning that the seriously ill have little chance of getting to treatment in many cases. medicine is still largely practiced in the East, as well, and many people ascribe various maladies to the workings of witches or sorcerers.HistoryEarly population movementsArchaeological finds around Batouri, Bertoua, and Btar-Oya attest to human presence in the territory of the East Province since prehistoric times. The earliest inhabitants of the region are commonly assumed to have been the Bambenga pygmies, part of the larger Twa group who may be descendants of the pygmies mentioned in Egyptian and Classical sources. The pygmies were followed by waves of migrating Bantus in the 17th and 18th centuries. The Maka stayed to occupy the territories surrounding what is now Massamna and Abong-Mbang, and the Njem settled around present-day Mindourou and Lomi. The Kaka settled in the territory that is now Ndll. A later wave of immigration came in the 19th century when the Beti-Pahuin pushed in from the west to escape pressures from the Babouti. This second Bantu invasion did not get far, however, as the Fang-Beti soon encountered the Maka and Njem and were unable to press on further. Of these, the Maka-Njem moved into the territory first, after being forced from their home north of the River by migrating Beti-Pahuin peoples, themselves fleeing the Vute, Mbum, Gbaya, and, ultimately, the Fulani. The Maka stayed to occupy the territories surrounding what is now Massamna and Abong-Mbang, and the Njem settled around present-day Mindourou and Lomi. The Kaka settled in the territory that is now Ndll.The Adama-Ubangi peoples came into the territory as part of this same general migration, though they were usually the ones pushing the Bantu peoples further south. Gbaya tradition says that they moved into the region of Bertoua under a leader named Ndiba. His son, Mbartoua, was in power when the Germans arrived.The coming of the EuropeansFor the five centuries or so since the Portuguese first reached the coast of present Cameroon, European explorers made little attempt to push into the intererior. The region was a source of slaves, which were shipped out via the port at Douala or via the River, though the numbers of natives taken were much smaller than in areas closer to the coast.The French were the first Europeans to enter the region when they began exploring the Congo basin in the mid-19th century. It was the Germans, however, who first gained formal control over the area, establishing the eastern border through negotiations with France between 1885 and 1908. Ironically, the earliest German colonists to the eastern forests were largely entering unknown territory. The Germans set to work building roads and establishing plantations, both endeavors requiring forced labor by the natives. This often led to violence, such as when the Gbaya under Mbartoua led a rebellion in the Bertoua region in 1903. Another revolt occurred when the Kaka protested their loss of lucrative trade opportunities that they had enjoyed in pre-colonial days.At the end of War I in 1916, Germany was forced to cede its colony to France. The French divided Cameroon into nine administrative areas, and most of what is now the East Province fell into the Doum-Loume-Yokadouma district with its capital in Doum. The French largely continued the colonial practices of the Germans, with forced labor continuing into the early 20th century. They made further infrastructure improvements, as well, such as improving the road from Yaound to Bertoua and on to Garoua-Boula.Post-independenceThe boundaries of the East Province were finalised after Cameroon gained independence in 1961. The capital was moved from Doum to Bertoua in 1972.The region has largely been ignored since independence. One of the few developments of note include the extension of the railroad from Yaound to Blabo under the presidency of Ahidjo.References* Chrispin, Dr. Pettang, directeur, Cameroun: Guide touristique. Paris: Les ditions Wala.* Fanso, V.G. (1989) Cameroon History for Secondary Schools and Colleges, Vol. 1: From Prehistoric Times to the Nineteenth Century. Hong Kong: Macmillan Education Ltd.* Fitzpatrick, Mary (2002) Cameroon, Lonely Planet West Africa, 5th ed. China: Lonely Planet Publications Pty Ltd.* Fomensky, R., M. Gwanfogbe, and F. Tsala, editorial advisers (1985) Macmillan School Atlas for Cameroon. Malaysia: Macmillan Education Ltd.* Gwanfogbe, Mathew, Ambrose Meligui, Jean Moukam, and Jeanette Nguoghia (1983) Geography of Cameroon. Hong Kong: Macmillan Education Ltd.* Neba, Aaron, Ph.D. (1999) Modern Geography of the Republic of Cameroon, 3rd ed. Bamenda: Neba Publishers.* Ngoh, Victor Julius (1996) History of Cameroon Since 1800. Limb: Presbook. ()(Kamerun)(Kamerun)del Este (Camern)de lEst (Cameroun) ()Timur, KamerundellEst (Camerun)(Kameroen)()(Kamerun)Wschodni (Kamerun)(Camares)de Est, Camerun () ()Blgesi (Kamerun)()
799537
Santarm,_Par
 format  PDF )| population_total         276,665| population_as_of         2009| population_density_km2   auto| population_demonym       Santareno| population_note          | timezone1                UTC-3| utc_offset1              | timezone1_DST            | utc_offset1_DST          | postal_code_type         | postal_code              | area_code_type           | area_code                | iso_code                 | website                  | footnotes                }}Santarm () is a city in the state of Par in Brazil. The Tapajs joins the River there, and it is a popular location for tourism. It was once home to the Indians, a tribe of Native Americans after which the river was named, and the leaders of a large, agricultural chiefdom that flourished before the arrival of Europeans. Santarm is also the name of the city in Portugal that gave its name to this Brazilian city. The Brazilian city is the home to the Roman Catholic Diocese of Santarm.Its Wilson Fonseca Airport is an important alternative and supporting airfield in the Amazon region. It has regular connections to cities in Brazil.Santarm is an important regional market center in Lower Amazonia located midway between the larger cities of Belm and Manaus. The economy is based on agriculture, cattle and mining. The city has seen many cycles of development dominated by one or a few economic activities, including (in the last century) rubber tapping, coffee production and gold mining. Most recently, there has been a huge growth in the area of soy plantations.Many Mocorongos seek to create a new Brazilian state by dividing the enormous state of Par into western and eastern regions. The new state (the western part) would be called Tapajs, with Santarm serving as the capital.Santarm is bordered by the Amazon and the Tapajs rivers. Both run along many kilometers in the front of the city, side by side, without mixing. The Amazons milky colored water carries sediment from the Andes in the East, while the Tapajss water is somewhat warmer and has a deep-blue tone. This phenomenon is called The meeting of the waters by the locals.Another popular place for tourism is the village of do Cho (Brazil), which is located by the Tapajs river, about 30 km from Santarm. It can be reached by car (about half an hour) or by boat (one or more hours, depending on the boat).Controversy around Cargill soybean portIn 2003, the US-based corporation Cargill completed a port facility for processing soybean in Santarm. The port has dramatically increased soybean production in the area due to the proximity of ease of transport. Although the company complied with state legislation, it failed to comply with a federal law requiring an Impact Statement. Instead, Cargill contested in court its need to comply. In late 2003 Greenpeace launched a campaign claiming the new port has increased deforestation of local forest as farmers have cleared land to make way for crops.(Soya blazes through the Amazon | Greenpeace International)In February 2006, the federal courts in Brazil gave Cargill six months to complete the environmental assessment. This ruling came as part of a broader popular backlash against the port; while it was initially supported by locals who hoped for jobs, opinion has turned against it as the jobs have not appeared. In July 2006, federal prosecutor Felcia Pontes Jr. suggested that the government was close to shutting down the port.(http://www.chron.com/disp/story.mpl/business/4058727.html )Cargill responds to criticisms of the port by focusing on the need for economic development in the local province, one of the poorest in Brazil. It makes the claim that extreme measures, such as closing the port, are not necessary because Soybean occupies less than 0.6 percent of the land in the Amazon biome today. Cargill also points to its partnership with Nature Conservancy to encourage farmers around Santarm to comply with Brazilian law that requires 80% of forest cover to be left intact in Amazon forest areas.(http://www.cargill.com/news/issues/issues_greenpeacereport.pdf) Climate Further reading* Allen, J. A. 1876. List of Birds Collected by Mr. Charles Linden, Near Santarem, Brazil. Bull. Essex Inst. 8(8): 78-83.* Bernard, E., and M. B. Fenton. 2007. Bats in a Fragmented Landscape: Species Composition, Diversity and Habitat Interactions in Savannas of Santarem, Central Amazonia, Brazil. Biological Conservation. 134, no. 3: 332-343.* Easby, Elizabeth K. The Pre-Conquest Art of Santarem, Brazil. 1952.* Fearnside, Philip M. 2007. Brazils Cuiaba- Santarem (BR-163) Highway: The Environmental Cost of Paving a Soybean Corridor Through the Amazon. Environmental Management. 39, no. 5: 601.* Winklerprins, Antoinette M G A. 2006. Jute Cultivation in the Lower Amazon, 1940-1990: an Ethnographic Account from Santarem, Para, Brazil. Journal of Historical Geography. 32, no. 4: 818.ReferencesExternal links* Santarm WebSite(Par)(Par)(Parao)(Par)( )(Par)lt:Santarenas(Par)(Par)i Brasil(Brazylia)(Par)Brazilia()(Brasilia)Par(Par)Par
806842
Sumitomo_Masatomo
Sumitomo Masatomo (, Sumitomo Masatomo) (1585 - 1652) was a Japanese copper mining businessman. He was the founder and eponym of Group.ja:zh:
815347
Rick_Bartolucci
Rick Bartolucci (born October 10, 1943) is a politician in Ontario, Canada.  He has represented Sudbury in the Assembly of Ontario since 1995, and is a cabinet minister in the government of McGuinty.  Bartolucci is a member of the Liberal Party.Early life and careerBartolucci was born in Sudbury, has degrees from University and the Bay Teachers College, and worked as a teacher and school principal for thirty years before becoming an MPP.  He was a Sudbury alderman and regional councillor from 1979 to 1982 and again from 1985 to 1991, and served as the citys deputy mayor for a time.(Glen Colbourn, Swing ridings can be crucial in todays vote, Hamilton Spectator, 8 June 1995, A15.)Member of Provincial ParliamentOpposition memberBartolucci was first elected to the Ontario legislature in the 1995 provincial election, defeating New Democratic Party incumbent Murdock.  The Progressive Conservative Party of Harris won a government in this election, and Bartolucci entered the legislature as a member of the Opposition.  He was appointed as his partys critic for Northern Development and Culture and Communications.  In December 1995, he helped organize a meeting at Queens Park where artists and cultural workers criticized the Harris governments cuts to the arts sector.(Peter Goddard, Whos Who in arts rally against cuts, Toronto Star, 5 December 1995, E4.)  He later criticized the Harris governments decision to close two of Sudburys three hospitals, arguing that it would compromise patient care.(News of hospital merger raises health-care concerns, Globe and Mail, 1 October 1996, A9.)Bartolucci was one of the three MPPs prevented from attending the Harris governments first from the Throne in September 1995, when police officers contracted by the government to guard against protesters refused them entry into the legislature.  The other MPPs were veteran opposition member Conway and cabinet minister Jackson.  Many opposition legislators and journalists later described the police presence as excessive.(Greg Crone, Members chafe under beefed-up security, Kitchener-Waterloo Record, 29 September 1995, A3.)  A similar incident took place in March 1996, when riot police contracted by the Harris government burst into Bartoluccis legislative office without any warning or explanation, just before a melee with protesting public service workers.  The police actions were widely criticized on this occasion as well.(Greg Crone, Actions of police embarrassed Ontario, opposition MPPs say, Kitchener-Waterloo Record, 20 March 1996, D8.)Bartolucci was a co-manager of Duncans bid to lead the Ontario Liberal Party in 1996,(Chris Vander Doelen and Richard Brennan, City success Duncans model, Windsor Star, 26 June 1996, A3.) and moved to the camp of Kennedy when Duncan was eliminated on the third ballot of the partys leadership convention.(Mike Whitehouse, Northern light: Rick Bartolucci has battled for Northern Ontario, Sudbury Star, 13 December 2003, B10.)  Kennedy was defeated on the final ballot by McGuinty.  Bartolucci introduced a Members Bill in early 1997 to limit class sizes in Ontarios public and separate schools.(Ian Urquhart, No reins -- or whips in House today, Toronto Star, 6 February 1997, A23.)  The government dropped this bill from the legislative agenda in January 1998.(Jim Poling, Agostinos bill a housekeeping casualty, Hamilton Spectator, 12 January 1998, A5.)  He later introduced a bill giving police the power to apprehend any person under eighteen who was involved in prostitution, and take that person to a safe house.(Michelle Shephard, Prostitute, 14, `overdoses on cocaine while in custody, Toronto Star, 12 February 1999, A1.)  The government introduced legislation modeled on Bartoluccis proposal in 2000,(Richard Mackie, New Ontario law aims to rescue child prostitutes, Globe and Mail, 19 December 2000, A8.) and passed it into law in June 2002.  Fourteen months later, Bartolucci complained that the law had not yet been enacted.(Ernie, tell the truth - why wont you protect our children? release, Canada NewsWire, 12 August 2003.)Bartolucci was re-elected by an increased margin in the 1999 provincial election, as the Progressive Conservatives won a second majority government.  He was appointed to the Liberal Partys election committee after the campaign,(Doug Draper, MCGUINTY SLAMS SPINELESS ATTACK, Hamilton Spectator, 19 July 1999, A2.) and later served as Chief Opposition Whip.(McGuinty announces caucus critic changes, Canada NewsWire, 23 August 2002, 08:21.)  In 2000, he criticized the provincial government for requiring that cancer patients in Ontario pay most of their transportation costs to and from treatment in other areas, while patients referred from Toronto to Sudbury were provided with free transportation and lodging.(Ian Urquhart, Tories no longer government fixers, Toronto Star, 7 June 2000, A1.  Bartolucci indicated that he was exploring the possibility of a class-action lawsuit on the matter.  See Lisa Priest, Northern Ontario cancer patients face discrimination, Globe and Mail, 17 June 2000, A3.)Bartolucci made frequent calls for Highway 69 to be widened between Sudbury and Parry Sound, citing a growing number of fatal accidents in the area.(Cottage highway accidents kill six, Globe and Mail, 4 June 2001, A7; Pat Conroy, Triple fatality renews protests --- Demands for Highway 69 widening ignored, Toronto Star, 9 August 2002, A4.)  He also chaired the JoeMac committee, which undertook a national campaign to have the killers of Sudbury police officer Joe MacDonald moved to a maximum security prison.  The group also opposed what it described as lenient treatment for federal offenders.(Local campaign goes national, Canadian Press, 18 March 2002, 22:39; Adrian Humphreys, Prison knew alarms faulty years before escape: report, National Post, 8 March 2003, A7.)  Bartolucci was endorsed by the Sudbury Police Association in the 2003 provincial election.(Rob OFlanagan, Cops union backs Bartolucci, Sudbury Star, 1 October 2003, A3.)Cabinet ministerMinister of Northern Development and MinesBartolucci was re-elected by a landslide in 2003, as the Liberals won a majority government across the province.  On October 23, 2003, he was appointed as Minister of Northern Development and Mines in the newly-formed government of McGuinty.  ;InitiativesBartolucci announced in March 2004 that he would end the previous governments efforts to privatize the Ontario Northland Transportation Commission.(Ontario government charts `bold new course for Ontario Northland: Bartolucci, Canadian Press, 4 March 2004, 13:53.)  He also called for the Ontario Heritage Fund to re-focus its attention on job creation, with support from the private sector.(Minister defends Heritage Fund, Globe and Mail, 23 December 2003, A9.)Bartolucci introduced the McGuinty governments Northern Prosperity Plan in December 2004, the highlights of which included a revamped Northern Ontario Heritage Fund Corporation, a GO North program to attract investors to the region, and a pilot Northern Ontario Grow Bonds Program.(Premier McGuinty is moving ahead with a three-pronged plan that he says will bring prosperity to northern Ontario, Broadcast News, 3 December 2004, 18:00; Northern Ontario Grow Bonds Campaign Extended release, Canada NewsWire, 7 April 2005, 13:28.)  In July 2005, he announced a Northern Ontario Youth Internship and Co-op program designed to give young workers an incentive to stay in northern Ontario.(New northern Ontario co-op program hopes to retain local students, Canadian Press, 22 July 2005, 21:20.  In the same month, Bartolucci also committed $10 million to clean abandoned mine sites.  See Abandoned mine sites to be cleaned up with $10 million in provincial aid, Canadian Press, 27 July 2005, 19:59.)  Bartolucci announced a twelve-year project for the expansion of Highway 69 in June 2005,(Adelle Larmour, Minister, MPPs square off over 69, Northern Ontario Business, 1 June 2005, 24.) and brought forward a new provincial mining strategy in March 2006.(Mining red tape to be eased Conservatives vow to help industry, Winnipeg Free Press, 7 March 2006, B6.  The journal Mineweb summarizes the plan in this manner: The strategy details four key objectives: promote long-term sustainability and global competitiveness; to support modern, safe and environmentally sound exploration and mining; to clarify and modernize stewardship of mineral resources; and to promote community development and opportunities for all.  See Ontario unveils new mineral strategy, Mineweb, 8 March 2006.)In January 2006, Bartolucci announced that the McGuinty government would investigate the possibility of an all-season road to the coast of Bay.  This decision was welcomed by some Nations leaders, who have long experienced difficult access to and from the area.(Province announces funding to study proposed all-season road to James Bay, Canadian Press, 25 January 2006, 19:30.)  Bartolucci presided over the opening of Ontarios first mine in June 2006, and spoke of limitless potential for growth in the field.(Angela Pacienza, Ontario opens first diamond mine, Globe and Mail, 20 June 2006, B7.)  The McGuinty government later proposed a new tax on diamond mining.  After criticism by groups such as DeBeers Canada, Bartolucci modified the tax to include deductions for new mining construction, and for expenditures made through agreements with aboriginal communities.(Ontario changes controversial diamond-mining tax, Reuters News, 5 July 2007, 13:32.);Mining and First Nations communitiesIn August 2006, Justice Patrick Smith of the Superior Court issued a ruling against the mining exploration company Platinex Inc. in its ongoing battle with the remote Inninuwug aboriginal community.  Platinex was ordered not to work at the site for five months, and was ordered to participate in a consultation process involving the province.  Bartolucci welcomed this decision as an important step forward, but argued that it would not impact the legitimacy of other mining claims in Ontario.  Others questioned this interpretation.(Kate Harries, Judge rules for native band, Globe and Mail, 1 August 2006, A9.)  In January 2007, the McGuinty government formally applied for intervenor status to participate in injunction proceedings.(Ontario Committed to Resolution in Far North Mineral Exploration Dispute, Canada NewsWire, 10 January 2007, 11:40.)In mid-2007, the Ardoch Algonquin and Shabot Obaadjiwan First Nations began a protest against proposed uranium mining in the Lake area.  The protesters, who were supported by several members of the local non-aboriginal community, noted that they had not been consulted by the province before the company Frontenac Ventures began prospecting in the area.  A spokesperson for Bartoluccis office confirmed that the province had a legal obligation to consult with First Nations communities before allowing exploration, and said that the province was attempting to establish better processes in dealing with such matters.(Suzanne Ma, Uranium drilling fight gets hot, Ottawa Citizen, 30 July 2007, D1.);OtherIn early 2004, Bartolucci re-designated the Muskoka District as a part of southern rather than northern Ontario.  The area had been a part of southern Ontario before 2000, when the Harris government chose to include it as part of the north.  Bartolucci had criticized this decision at the time, arguing that it would allow wealthy cottage communities to access funds earmarked for northern development.(Susan Bourette, Why Northern Ontario is creeping southward: Evess Muskoka riding gets Heritage Fund access, Globe and Mail, 15 May 2000, A1; Richard Mackie, Muskoka moves to Southern Ontario, Globe and Mail, 27 May 2004, A11.)  Bartolucci declined to intervene when Inco announced the closure of its Cliff copper refinery in May 2005, saying that he would not compel a company to keep open a financially troubled entity.  The Steelworkers of America protested this decision.(Inco vows to close Sudbury, Ont., copper refinery despite plea from mayor, Canadian Press, 27 May 2005, 05:36; Sean Barry, Union takes fight over Copper Cliff to mines minister, Metal Bulletin News Alert Service, 7 June 2005, 16:12.)Bartolucci rang the ceremonial opening bell at the Stock Exchange in New York City on April 19, 2005, when he was in New York City to promote Northern Ontario mining.  A press release indicated that he was the first Canadian cabinet minister to be given this honour.(Minister of Northern Development and Mines takes part in opening bell ceremony at the American Stock Exchange, Canada NewsWire, 18 April 2005, 13:43.)  He later criticized the federal government of Harper in April 2006, arguing that its proposed settlement of a softwood lumber dispute with the United States would amount to selling out Ontario.(Karen Howlett, Reduction in quotas comes as surprise to Ontario, Globe and Mail, 27 April 2006, A14.)Minister of Community Safety and Correctional ServicesBartolucci was re-elected without difficulty in the 2007 provincial election, in which the McGuinty government was re-elected with a second majority.  On October 30, 2007, he was appointed as Minister of Community Safety and Correctional Services.;Federal relationsIn November 2007, Bartolucci called on the federal government of Harper to honour an election commitment to hire 2,500 new front-line police officers across Canada.  He argued that these officers should be divided among the provinces by population, an arrangement that would give Ontario 1,000 new officers.(McGuinty Government Calls on Ottawa to Give Ontario Fair Share of 2,500 New Police Officers, Canada NewsWire, 15 November 2007, 13:15.)  He later accused the Harper government of short-changing his province, saying that the formula chosen by the federal government would likely result in Ontario receiving only 500 officers.(Chinta Puxley, Ontario Liberals wage fresh attack on Ottawa for holding up crucial funding, Canadian Press, 5 March 2008, 16:45.)Bartolucci and Attorney General Bentley appealed to the federal government to introduce stricter control legislation in March 2008, including a ban on handguns.  They also criticized the federal government for extending an amnesty to gun owners who refuse to register their firearms.(Tonda MacCharles, Ontario protests federal gun amnesty plan, Toronto Star, 4 March 2008, A14.)  In April 2009, Bartolucci requested that the federal government reconsider its plans to weaken the provisions of the Firearms Registry.(Reconsider gun-registry changes, Ontario Grits urge federal Tories, Ottawa Citizen, 22 April 2009, A6.);PoliceBartolucci has defended by use of tasers by Ontario police officers, and has described his provinces approach to taser use as very, very measured.(Steve Lambert, Provincial justice ministers defend use of Tasers despite fatalities, Canadian Press, 15 November 2007, 15:06.)  He rejected calls for a moratorium on taser use in June 2008, when an Ontario resident died after being tasered in a confrontation with police.(International was among the groups calling for a moratorium on taser use.  See Canadian man subdued with Taser dies in police custody, Associated Press Newswires, 24 June 2008, 13:54; Rights group wants freeze on Tasers; We dont know enough, Amnesty says after Ontario custody death, Toronto Star, 25 June 2008, A22.)  In 2009, he rejected a request that Ontario ban taser use on minors.(Michael Oliveira, Ontario government rejects call for banning Taser use on minors, Canadian Press, 4 February 2009, 05:36.)Bartolucci supported the McGuinty governments decision to renew Fantinos contract as head of the Ontario Provincial Police in 2008, and announced that Fantino would be re-appointed to another one-year term in 2009.(Keith Leslie, Fantino gets one-year contract extension as OPP commissioner, Canadian Press, 11 March 2008, 15:59; Romina Maurino, Julian Fantino re-appointed as Ontarios top cop through July 2010, Canadian Press, 9 June 2009, 03:54.)  In February 2008, Bartolucci met with leaders of the Aski Nation to discuss grievances about the territorys police detachments.  Conditions at many detachments were described as unsafe, and it was estimated that the buildings would cost $23 million to be brought up to code.  Bartolucci expressed sympathy, although he did not propose an immediate resolution.(Chinta Puxley, Aboriginal territory cant go on with medieval police detachments: chiefs, Canadian Press, 25 February 2008, 17:16.)  In May 2009, he announced that forty new officers would be added to Ontarios First Nations police services.(More Police Officers For First Nations, Canada NewsWire, 7 May 2009, 01:42; Ontario announces 40 new officers for First Nations police services, Canadian Press, 7 May 2009, 07:14.);Goudge ReportBartolucci announced in October 2008 that the McGuinty government would overhaul Ontarios forensic pathology system and provide compensation for past miscarriages of justice, after receiving a report from Justice Stephen Goudge.(Ontario Responds To The Goudge Report, Canada NewsWire, 1 October 2008, 12:54; Rob Gillies, Canada to compensate pathologists victims, Associated Press, 1 October 2008, 04:09.)  This report confirmed previous media revelations that several people had been wrongly convicted of serious crimes due to errors made by discredited pathologist Randal Smith.  Bartolucci personally apologized on behalf of the government to those who suffered as a result of these errors,(Theresa Boyle and Tracey Tyler, Another 200 cases to be probed, Toronto Star, 2 October 2008, A6.) and later announced that the McGuinty government would adopt all of the Goudge Reports recommendations into law.(Ont. seeks to adopt all legislative changes suggested in child pathology inquiry, Canadian Press, 23 October 2008, 01:52.)  Among other things, the report called for the creation of an oversight council to monitor Ontarios chief coroner and chief forensic pathologist, the creation of a public complaints committee, and a provincial registry of pathologists.(Rob Ferguson, Bill maps out pathology overhaul, Toronto Star, 24 October 2008, A22.)  The Coroners Amendment Act was passed by the legislature in May 2009.(A Stronger, More Accountable Coroners System release, Canada NewsWire, 28 May 2009, 10:34am; Theresa Boyle, Coroner rules strengthened after inquiry sounds alarm, Toronto Star, 29 May 2009, A4.);OtherBartolucci amended the provinces sex offender registry in December 2007, after the provincial General reported that prisoners released from federal institutions had been omitted from the list.(Robert Benzie, Hundreds not included on registry, auditor says, Toronto Star, 12 December 2007, A19.)Bartolucci introduced new animal protection legislation in April 2008,(Jim Wilkes, Act would put bite on animal abusers, Hamilton Spectator, 4 April 2008, A10.) and the provinces new Animal Welfare Act was officially proclaimed in March 2009.(Media Advisory - Province Highlights Animal Protection, 2 March 2009, 10:13am.)  The law requires that veterinarians report suspected cases of animal abuse, gives legal protection for veterinarians who make good faith reports, and increases penalties for animal abuse.(Ontario Veterinarians Applaud Province for Enacting Canadas Toughest Animal Welfare Legislation release, Canada NewsWire, 2 March 2009, 2:00pm.)In August 2008, a neighbourhood in northern Toronto was hit by a propane explosion that caused two deaths and extensive damage.  Media reports noted that the propane site was located near two area schools, both of which had several windows blown out and ceilings and walls damaged.  Bartolucci indicated that his government would undertake a cross-ministry review in accordance with Ontarios Standards and Safety Authority to ensure that such an incident would not recur.(Daniel Girard, Day, time made blast damages less severe, Toronto Star, 12 August 2008, A6; Arms length is too far for safety editorial, Toronto Star, 13 August 2008, A6.)Bartolucci and others in the McGuinty government have rejected calls for a provincial inquiry into a native land dispute at Caledonia, arguing that this dispute is a federal issue.(Lee Greenberg, McGuinty pans bill calling for Caledonia dispute inquiry, Ottawa Citizen, 19 February 2009, A6.)In July 2009, Bartolucci announced $10 million in new funding for the Toronto Anti-Violence Intervention Strategy.  Supporters of this program argue that it has led to a dramatic reduction in Torontos crime rate since 2006.(Trevor Pritchard, New money from province to fight guns, gangs and drugs in Toronto, Canadian Press, 7 July 2009, 04:46pm.)In October 2009, Bartolucci faced some criticism from his constituents for avoiding a vote on Kormos members bill to ban the use of replacement workers during a strike. With Inco workers in Sudbury on strike, Bartolucci chose to remain neutral on the legislation in the hope that his position would encourage the company and the striking workers to return to the bargaining table.(Bartolucci remains neutral. Star.)Electoral recordBartolucci was also elected as a Sudbury councillor from 1979 to 1982, and from 1985 to 1991.All provincial electoral information is taken from Ontario. The expenditure entries for all elections after 1995 are taken from official candidate reports as listed by Elections Ontario. The figures cited are the Total Candidates Campaign Expenses Subject to Limitation, and include transfers from constituency associations.ReferencesExternal links*Rick Bartoluccis official MPP Site*Rick Bartoluccis Ontario Liberal Party biography*
825382
Leigh_light
The Leigh Light  (abbreviated L/L)  was a British War II era anti-submarine device used in the Battle of the Atlantic.It was a powerful (22 million candela) carbon arc searchlight of 24 inches (610 mm) diameter fitted to a number of the British Air Forces Coastal Command bombers to help them spot surfaced German U-boats at night.()Light.jpg|right|250px|thumb|A Leigh Light fitted under the wing of a Consolidated Liberator aircraft of the Royal Air Force Coastal Command, 26 February 1944It was successfully used from June 1942 onwards to attack U-boats recharging their batteries on the surface at night. Up to then they had been relatively safe from attack at night. The aircraft would approach the submarine using its ASV (Air to Surface Vessel) radar and only switch on the searchlight beam during the final approach. The U-boat had insufficient time to dive and the bombardier had a clear view of the target. It was so successful that for a time German submarines were forced to switch to daytime battery charging when they could at least see aircraft approaching.Germany introduced the Metox warning receiver (later replaced with Naxos when Britain introduced centimetric radar) in an effort to counter the combination of ASV / Leigh Light. Metox provided the submarine crew with early warning that an aircraft using radar was approaching. Because the radar warning receiver could detect radar emissions at a greater range than the radar could detect vessels, this often gave the U-boat sufficient advanced warning to dive.DevelopmentEarly air-to-surface radar sets, namely the ASV Mk. II, had a fairly long minimum detection range. Thus as the aircraft approached the target, it would disappear off the radar at a range that was too great to allow it to be seen by eye at night without some form of illumination.  At first aircraft solved this problem by dropping flares to light up the area, but since the flare only lit up the area directly under the aircraft, a string would have to be dropped until the submarine was spotted. Once it was spotted the aircraft would have to circle back to attack, the entire process giving the submarine a fair amount of time to dive out of danger.Eventually time delayed flares were developed that allowed the attacking plane time to circle. The flare was fired into the air from a buoy previously dropped by the plane. The surfaced submarine could then be seen in silhouette as the plane approached.Wing Commander de Verd Leigh, an RAF personnel officer, came up with his own solution after chatting with returning air crew.  This was to mount a searchlight under the aircraft, pointed forward and allowing the submarine to be spotted as soon as it was turned on. He then developed the Leigh Light entirely off his own bat, in secret and without official sanction - even the Air Ministry were unaware of its development until shown the completed prototype.(The Secret War, by Brian Johnson,  Pen And Sword Military Classics, 1978, ISBN 1 84415 102 6  pages 216 - 217)) At first it was difficult to fit on aircraft due to its size. Leigh persisted in his efforts to test the idea, and garnered the support of the Commander-in-Chief of Coastal Command, Sir Bowhill. In March 1941 a Vickers Wellington DWI that conveniently already had the necessary generator on board, (it had been used for anti-magnetic mining operations using a large electromagnet) was modified with a retractable dustbin holding the lamp, and proved the concept sound.At this point the Ministry decided that the idea was worthwhile, but that they should instead use the Turbinlite, a less effective system which had been originally developed as an aid for nighttime bomber interception. After trials they too eventually decided to use Leighs system, but it was not until mid-1942 that aircraft started being modified to carry it. Development assistance and production was by Savage and Parsons Ltd. of Watford led by Jack Savage.(Death of Jack SavageFlight September 27th  1945, page 350. Accessed October 2010)Operationright|250px|thumb|Photograph of a destroyed U boat illuminated in Leigh LightsTwo types of Leigh Light entered operational use.(The Leigh Light For Night Anti-Submarine Operations RAF Liberator Squadrons, PC,  22 July 2009, Accessed November 2010):The Turret type, fitted on Wellington aircraft was a 24 inch searchlight mounted in a retractable under-turret controlled by hydraulic motor and ram.  The maximum beam intensity was 50 million candles without the spreading lens and about 20 million candles with the lens.  Total weight was 1,100 lbs.:The Nacelle type, fitted on Catalinas and Liberators was a 20 inch searchlight mounted in a nacelle 32 inches in diameter slung from the bomb lugs on the wing. The controls were electric and the maximum beam intensity was 90 million candles, without the spreading lens and about 17 million with the lens.  Total weight  was 870 lbs.By June 1942, aircraft equipped with ASV radar and the Leigh Light were operating over the of Biscay intercepting U-boats moving to and from their home ports on the coast of France. The first confirmed kill was the U-502, sunk on 5 July 1942 by a Vickers Wellington of 172 Squadron, piloted by American, Wiley B. Howell. In the five months prior not one submarine had been sunk, and six aircraft had been lost. The Leigh Light turned the tables, and by August the U-boats preferred to take their chances in daytime when they at least had some warning and could fight back.Swordfish biplane torpedo bombers were trialled with a Leigh Light under the lower port wing. A large battery pack for it was slung under the fuselage where the torpedo would normally be carried. The armament was a rack of anti-submarine bombs carried under the other wing. With such a heavy load performance was poor with a top speed marginally above the stall speed.(Brown, Eric Wings on my Sleeve)Wing Commander Cundy was also given the Air Force Cross for his part in the development of the Leigh Light.See also*TurbinliteReferences(External links*Technical details of the Leigh LightLightsvtloda:LeighlampelightLeighhu:Leigh-fnyszrLightlightLeigha
832519
Bothwell_Castle
open_to_public YesBothwell Castle is a large medieval castle sited on a high, steep bank, above a bend in  the Clyde, in Lanarkshire, Scotland. It is located between Uddingston and Bothwell, about  south-east of Glasgow. Construction of the castle was begun in the 13th century by the ancestors of Murray, to guard a strategic crossing point of the Clyde. Bothwell played a key role in Scotlands Wars of Independence, changing hands several times. The huge cylindrical Donjon was built in the 13th century, but before the rest of the castle was completed it was severely damaged in a series of sieges. Rebuilding in the early 15th century enlarged the castle, but it was abandoned by the 18th century. The present ruin is rectangular, with the remains of the Donjon to the west, and the later Great Hall to the east. The courtyard is enclosed by long curtain walls, with round towers at the south-east and south-west corners.  thumb|left|The Donjon seen from the Great HallHistoryKing David I granted the barony of Bothwell to David Olifard (or Olifant), of Lothian, in the mid 12th century. The lands passed to his descendents, and in 1242 the barony became the property of Walter de Moravia, or Walter of Moray, who had married the last Olifard barons heir. He began construction of the castle, but by the start of the of Scottish Independence in 1296, only the main donjon, the prison tower, and the short connecting curtain wall were completed. Foundations of the remainder were probably in place, and would have been defended by a wooden palisade.Wars of Scottish IndependenceThe forces of King I of England invaded Scotland at the start of the war, and seized Bothwell, also capturing Walters son, William Moray of Bothwell. The English garrison holding the castle was besieged by the Scots for 14 months in 1298&mdash;1299, and eventually capitulated. Edward I returned in 1301, capturing the castle once more with a force of 6800 men, and specially constructed engines. Bothwell became the headquarters of de Valence, 2nd Earl of Pembroke, Edwards appointed Warden of Scotland, and remained in English hands for several years.Following Robert the Bruces victory at Bannockburn in 1314, the castle provided shelter for several English nobles. However, the castles constable, Sir Walter FitzGilbert, surrendered the castle to the approaching Scots. For this act, he was granted the barony of Cadzow, where his descendents became the powerful Hamilton family. The Scots slighted the castle after its surrender.In 1336 the English returned again, this time under Edward III. The English king had the castle repaired, and again made it his headquarters in Scotland. The following year, however, Andrew Murray, nephew of Sir William and the rightful owner of Bothwell, recaptured the stronghold, again using siege engines. Following his victory he slighted the castle once more, pulling down the west side of the Donjon and tumbling it into the Clyde, in order that it could not be reoccupied by the enemy. The castle remained derelict until the 1360s.thumb|right|Great Hall and South East Tower seen from the DonjonDouglasIn 1362, Joan Moray of Bothwell, heiress of the Morays, married Archibald Douglas, nicknamed the Grim and later to be of Galloway and of Douglas. Douglas commenced rebuilding Bothwell, repairing the donjon and completing the walls. The work was continued by his son, Archibald, the 4th Earl. By 1424 they had constructed the Great Hall and adjacent chapel, with towers at the north-east and south-east corners, and curtain walls connecting to the Donjon, enclosing the courtyard. The Black Douglases were forfeited in 1455, and their lands returned to the crown. James III granted Bothwell to Crichton, and then to Sir John Ramsay, who were both forfeited in turn. In 1488 Bothwell was granted again to Patrick Hepburn, 2nd Lord Hailes, and the Earldom of Bothwell was created for him. Hepburn did not retain Bothwell Castle for long, however, exchanging it with Douglas, 5th Earl of Angus, known as Bell-the-Cat, in return for Castle in Liddesdale. James IV visited Bothwell in 1503 and 1504.thumb|left|South East Tower seen from inside the roofless Great HallBothwell thus reverted to the Douglases, and descended through the Earls of Angus to the Earls of Forfar. Douglas, 1st Earl of Forfar began construction of a new mansion nearby, demolishing the castles north-east tower for its stone. (His house was demolished in 1926 due to mining subsidence in the area). After the death of the 2nd Earl at Sheriffmuir in 1715, a lawsuit was fought over the inheritance of Bothwell, the winning party being Archibald Stewart of Grandtully. The castle then descended to the of Home. In 1935 the then Earl gave Bothwell into state care. It is now managed by Scotland, and is open to the public (entrance charge).References*Mason, Gordon The Castles of Glasgow and the Clyde, Goblinshead, 2000*Salter, Mike The Castles of South West Scotland, Folly Publications, 1993* External links * de BothwellCastlede BothwellCastleCastle
836172
Fred_Dibnah
honorary Doctorates from Gordon University & of BirminghamFrederick Fred Dibnah MBE (28 April 1938  6 November 2004), born in Bolton, was an English steeplejack and eccentric with a keen interest in engineering who became a cult television personality.Dibnah was born in a country which then relied heavily upon coal to fuel its industry.  As a child he was fascinated by the steam engines which powered the many textile mills in Bolton, but he paid particular attention to chimneys and the men who worked on them.  He began his working life as a joiner, before becoming a steeplejack.  From age 22, he served for two years in the armed forces, as part of his national service.  Once demobilised, he returned to steeplejacking but met with limited success until he was asked to repair Boltons parish church.  The resulting publicity provided a welcome boost to his business, ensuring he was almost never out of work.In 1978, while making repairs to Bolton Town Hall, Dibnah was filmed by a regional BBC news crew.  The BBC then commissioned an award-winning documentary, which followed the rough-hewn steeplejack as he worked on chimneys, interacted with his family and talked about his favourite hobbysteam.  His Lancastrian manner and gentle, self-taught philosophical outlook, proved popular with viewers and he featured in a number of television programmes.  Toward the end of his life, the decline of Britains industry was mirrored by a decline in his steeplejacking business and Dibnah increasingly came to rely on after-dinner speaking for his income.  In 1998, he presented a programme on Britains industrial history and went on to present a number of series, largely concerned with the Revolution and its mechanical and architectural legacy.Dibnah died from cancer in November 2004 aged 66.  He is survived by his five children from three marriages.Early lifeChildhoodFred Dibnah was the son of Frank and Betsy Dibnah (ne Travis),( who were initially both employed at a bleach works (his mother later worked as a charlady at a gas works).()  Named after his uncle Frederick, he was born on 28 April 1938() and raised in the historic Lancashire town of Bolton, then a predominantly industrial town with a history in the spinning and weaving of cotton.  As a child, Dibnah was fascinated by the sights and sounds of industry and the dozens of chimney stacks visible around Park,() and paid particular attention to the steeplejacks he saw on his way to school.()  A popular pastime for local children was playing around the many lodges (industrial ponds) which once littered the area.  An inventive child, Dibnah and some friends designed a makeshift suit from a crisp tin, a car tube and some piping. After being told to remove it from the local baths, they tested it in one of the lodges, but were unsuccessful.()The Bolton arm of the Bolton and Bury Canal was one of Dibnahs regular haunts.  The canal was by then largely disused (the Bolton arm had been mostly closed in 1924) and Dibnah sometimes dredged it with a rope and iron hook, for what he called plunder.  Much of this was stored in the back yard of his mothers house.  Dibnah and friend Alan Heap built a canoe from old bicycle wheels (cut in half to make the ribs), slate laths and a canvas sheet from the back of a lorry.  Much to the consternation of his mother, Dibnah sailed the boat along the nearby Croal.(  He once astonished his teachers when, following the theft of the school keys, he cut new keys for each classroom door.()As a young manAt school Dibnah was placed in an art class (his reading and writing skills were judged to be poor),() following which he spent three years at art college, where his work was based mainly on industrial themes such as machinery, pithead gear and spinning mills.  On leaving college at 16 he was offered a job at a funeral parlour, but left quickly to begin work at a local joinery.() width  33%Dibnah had watched the activities of steeplejacks throughout his childhood, and witnessed his first felling from his fathers allotment near Boltons greyhound track at Raikes Park.  The steeplejacks first removed the top of the chimney and then created a hole in its base, propped with blocks of wood.  They then lit a fire, destroying the supports and causing the chimney to collapse.  Unfortunately, on this occasion the chimney fell in the wrong direction, onto the greyhound tracks dog kennels, a local cafe and a series of power cables.()His first job that involved ladders was given to him while he still worked as a joiner.  He was asked to point a garden wall and then the gable end of the customers house.  He used several short ladders, lashed together with rope and hardboard.  This gave Dibnah valuable experience and his employer expanded the business to include property repairs.()  Aged about 1718 he climbed the  chimney at Barrow Bridge, for a 10 shilling bet.  During the night he took two flags to the top and secured each to the lightning conductors there.  The Bolton Evening News reported the incident, with a photograph of Dibnahs feat, but attributed it to the activities of students from Manchester University.()  At about the same time, Dibnah decided to replace the chimney stack at his mothers house on Alfred Street with one of his own design, as his mother used only one fireplaceleaving four of the five chimney pots redundant.  As the single opening at the top of the new stack was only about  wide, the flue needed regular maintenance.  On one occasion, he was cleaning the flue using a sack of bricks tied to a rope when the sack ripped open, breaking several lead pipes and flooding his mothers kitchen.  After the death of his mother, the house was sold and the council placed a preservation order on the chimney which remains to this day.()National serviceAged 22 Dibnah was conscripted into the army to complete his National Service and was given a position in the cook house.  He spent six weeks training at Aldershot, before being sent to Catterick to learn the basics of army catering.  He was then posted with the Kings Hussars and sent to Germany.  There he persuaded his commanding officer to let him repair the regiments farmhouse (used for stabling horses and hounds) and he was soon given a more permanent position as a builder and handyman.()  He dug a  deep shaft into which the horse manure and dog faeces would be emptied and he also fed the animals.  He impressed his commanding officers by making a weathercock from army kitchen trays, but was also chastised when he was found with a 1914 P08 pistol he had bought from a fellow soldier.()  He often received parcels of alcohol and tobacco from his mother, which allowed him to maintain the habits he had formed when he began his working life.()  Although Dibnah initially resented being called into service, he would later be more positive about the experience:It wasnt a bad thing, if National Service had been kept going it might have kept all the vandals and hooligans we have now in line.()SteeplejackOn his return from National Service in 1962 Dibnah retrieved his tools from storage, bought a 1927 350 cc AJS Motorcycle for 21 guineas and looked for more work.  Bolton, however, was in the midst of post-industrial decline; between 19571965 about 70 mills were closed in the town, leaving only 37 mills operational and about 50 disused.()  Initially he was unable to find much work and existed on smaller, domestic jobs, until he earned enough to buy his own set of ladders and secured his first commission while working at a local mill.  He was paid 140 to point a mill tower, which he did on weekends.  He struggled, however, to get any more meaningful work, until he met Lonsdale Bonner, one of his teachers from art college.  The two agreed a deal whereby Bonner would be paid a commission for each job he got for Dibnah.  His first job was dismantling a chimney alongside the and Bolton Railway, a difficult proposition, as a mistake could force the temporary closure of the railway.()  The two managed to gain commissions for several jobs, but their relationship was terminated when Dibnah was called upon to undertake another six months of National Service.()He was then commissioned to repair a chimney at a local brewery.  While working on this, he met a local welder who also knew the vicar of Bolton (Richard Greville Norburn), who wanted some repairs done to Bolton parish churchs weathervanes.  The vicar drove a 1929 Humber limousine and was impressed by Freds AJS motorcycle; the two quickly became friends.  The church was the tallest building in Bolton and once Dibnah had repaired the weathervane the vicar asked him to gild it.  Dibnah appeared in the local newspaper and the publicity and his friendship with the vicar enabled him to gain more work from the local clergy.()His next major job was for local firm Hick Hargreaves, the proceeds of which enabled him to expand his collection of ladders to 30.  He was commissioned to remove the top half of a  chimney and employed an assistant, Percy Porter.  The top of the chimney contained a length of railway line, which had been used for lifting materials during construction.  Dibnah hacksawed the line into pieces, letting each piece fall to the ground, with his assistant below, keeping the area clear.  He then spent the next six months removing each brick by hand while the chimney was still in use, as the factory could not afford to cease production.()First marriageIn 1967, following disagreements over who should be invited to their wedding, Dibnah and 19-year-old hairdresser Alison Mary Foster eloped to Green, to get married.()(  Dibnah had first spotted Alison from the top of a chimney and, when one day she walked into the pub where he was drinking, he asked her out; six weeks later, the two became engaged.()  They left notes for their parents, caught a train to Carlisle and from thereon a series of buses to Dumfries.  They had initially planned to stay at the house of a friend but as he had returned to Bolton for his holidays, they stayed instead at a local farmhouse.  The two had to be resident for at least 21 days to be married and so Dibnah agreed to point the gable ends of a local hotel in exchange for bed and board.  On 19 May,( the two married at the church at Gretna Green and returned to live at Dibnahs mothers house.  They later moved into a Victorian gatehouse on the of Bradfords estate, just outside Bolton.()  Dibnah spent years restoring the property, including building an extension.  The house was a building and so he had to source appropriately aged bricks for the extension.  A vicar offered him some of the old gravestones from the church graveyard, which Dibnah then used to create the stone lintels and mullions, though he later expressed his fear that his property would now be haunted.()  The couple later purchased the house for 5,000, although it required major repairs to stabilize the rear wall.()The couple had their first child, a girl named Jayne, in June 1968.  Alison was initially worried about her husbands occupation but learned to deal with the risk and to trust Fred.  She organised his accounts and even collected debts.  She also helped him demolish some of the chimneys that he worked on, by lighting the fire to burn away the temporary supports he had put in place.()Chimney fellingHaving mastered his trade repairing chimneys, Dibnah became aware of the demand for a cost-effective method of demolishing them.  He offered to remove them without using explosives, by cutting an ingress at the base of the chimneysupporting the brickwork with wooden propsand then burning away the props so that the chimney fell, hopefully in the intended direction.  Although this was a tried and tested method, it was not without its opponents.  On one occasion he was contracted by the local council to fell two chimneys.  The contract obliged him to dismantle each by hand, but he decided to fell them by cutting away the base.  The first chimney collapsed as planned, but the council terminated his contract and refused to pay.  Dibnah contacted the borough engineer and offered to fell the second chimney for no charge, to prove the effectiveness of his technique.  He even offered to let the engineer light the fire, but the wind blew so hard that the chimney didnt draw the flames and once the props had been burnt through, it remained standing.  Dibnah resorted to using a hydraulic jack to apply extra pressure to the intact side of the base and the chimney eventually fell.()  He later told the engineer that it was all about fine balancing and counteracting high wind forces.()  He almost lost his life in 1997, when a concrete chimney he had been asked to fell began to collapse before the felling team had finished preparing the base.  As the team ran from the chimney, Dibnah tripped and fell and was greeted by the sight of 2,500 tonnes of concrete leaning toward him, but fortunately the chimney righted itself and then fell in the opposite direction.()  He felled his last chimney in Royton, in May 2004.()SteamDibnahs interest in steam power stemmed from his childhood observations of the steam locomotives on the nearby railway line,() and his visits to his fathers workplacea bleach works in Boltonwhere he was fascinated by the steam engines used to drive the shafting.()  A small mill near his childhood home was sometimes mothballed and Dibnah once broke in:()He later became a steam enthusiast, befriending many of the engine drivers and firemen who worked on the nearby railway.  As a teenager he met a driver who invited him onto the footplate of his locomotive and who asked him to keep the boiler supplied with fuel.()  Dibnah became so enamoured with steam engines that he eventually looked for one he could buy.  He learnt of a steamroller kept in a barn near Warrington and which the owners had bought from Flintshire County Council.  He had the boiler pressure-tested and, despite it being in poor condition, bought it for 175.  He towed it to a friends house, spent a fortnight making various repairs and drove it to his mothers house in Bolton.  After he married and bought his own property on Radcliffe new Road, he cut an access road to the garden of his new house and moved the steamroller there.  Restoring the engine took many years, as Dibnah had to create his own replacement parts, using Victorian engineering techniques and equipment he built in his garden.  The boiler was in poor condition and needed serious work, but Dibnah fell back on local knowledge and was eventually able to build a new boiler.()  Once restored, he used the 1910 & Porter steamroller() together with a living van he bought and restored, to take his family around the local fairs.()  While driving the vehicle was relatively safe, Dibnah had experienced several mishaps, including one instance when he lost control while descending a steep hill and was forced to drive the engine into a concrete barrier to bring it to a halt, smashing the front fork in the process.()Restoring the steamroller placed a heavy burden upon his marriage and Alison would often complain that her husband spent more time in the shed, repairing the engine, than he did in the house.  He responded by naming the vehicle Alison, telling his wife Its not every woman that has a steam engine named after her.()  Alison eventually developed an affection for the antique vehicle saying Weve done without for so many years to get it built up.  I couldnt bear to part with it.  Theres too much of us in it.()His next purchase, made in the autumn of 1980,() was a 1912 Aveling & Porter engine.  Dibnah paid a friend 2,300 for the vehicle and moved it to the garden behind his home.  He built a steam-driven workshop in his garden, salvaging parts from various mills, including line shaft gear and a stationary engine from a mill in Oldham.  He gave a conservative estimate of four years to complete the work, but the restoration eventually took 27 years.() The engine was sold at auction in July 2010 for 240,000.()In 1988 he was asked by Caernarfon council to make repairs to a chimney at Parc Glynllifon.(Carney, Neil (2005). On the buses to up the ladders, In: Langston, Keith (edr). Fred Dibnah MBE Remembered: The life & times of a Great Briton 1938&ndash;2004 Mortons Media Group. ISBN 9-7480954-244262.)  Beneath the chimney, an engine room contained an 1854 single-cylinder steam engine in poor condition.  Dibnah repaired the chimney and several weeks later was asked to repair the engine, which he dismantled during the winter of 1988/89 and took back to Bolton.(  With his assistant Neil Carney, he spent six months repairing the engine.  The two sourced a replacement boiler from a local pork pie factory and re-installed the engine in Wales.  Dibnah later won a prize for the quality of the restoration work.()  He also spent about seven months restoring the boiler, engine and blunger at County Pottery near Penrith.()FameFred Dibnah, SteeplejackIn 1978 Dibnah was commissioned to make repairs to Bolton Town Hall.  Decades of exposure to soot and rain had caused serious damage to the clock tower and Dibnah alerted the Clerk of Works to the condition of the 16 stone pillars at the top of the tower.  He bought new stone, built a lathe in his workshop and created the replacement pillars.  He was given the job of repairing the clock tower and he also gilded the golden sphere at the top of the building.  While Fred was working from his chair, a public relations officer at the Town Hall informed Dibnah that BBC Look North West wanted to interview him.  The following week, the film crew arrived and Alistair MacDonald conducted the interview from the top of the building, with Dibnah perched outside on his scaffold.()  His warm and friendly manner combined with his enthusiasm and broad Lancashire accent proved popular and he was later contacted by producer Don Haworth, with a view to making a documentary.  After several meetings over the course of a few weeks, filming began early one morning just as Dibnah had climbed to the top of a  chimney at and Crompton, a town near Oldham.  Sporadic filming took place over an 18-month period and captured Dibnah (with assistant Donald Paiton) working on a range of buildings, spending time with his family and enjoying his hobbies.  Briccialdis Carnival Of Venice (performed by Galway) was the music chosen to accompany Dibnahs work on Bolton Town Hall.  One of the more notable aspects was Dibnahs 1979 demolition of a chimney in Rochdale.  Standing only yards away from the base of the chimney as it began to collapse, his retreat to safety and subsequent boyish outburst of Did you like that? endeared him to viewers.()()Fred Dibnah, Steeplejack won the 1979 BAFTA award for best documentary,() and over the years Haworth returned to film more documentaries.(  With his newly found fame, however, came distractions from his work.  Visitors would arrive at his house, to see his garden.  He began to receive fan mail; one individual wrote to offer Dibnah a steam-powered machine he no longer wanted.  One company, who were apparently disturbed to see Dibnahs matches being extinguished by the wind while at the top of a chimney, sent him a sample of their windproof matches.()  Filming would also interfere with his work.  Cameraman Martin Lightening would climb with Fred to the top of a chimneywith a 16mm film cameraand film him at work, often hundreds of feet above the ground.()width33%Several years later, Dibnah and his family went on holiday, to Blackpool.  The trip was filmed for television and showed Dibnahs preference for working rather than holidaying.  He did however manage to undertake the removal of a small chimney stack from a business in the town, under a distinctly grey sky and aided by his wife, Alison.  His payment for the job was a new front plate for the boiler of his traction engine.  Dibnah, however, refused to take any more holidays and, after 18 years of marriage, Alison booked and paid for a holiday to Greece, taking their three children (Jayne, Lorna and Caroline)( with her.  Dibnah remained at home and was surprised when, upon her return, she asked for a divorce.()  One day in October 1985, Dibnah attended a solid fuel exhibition in nearby Bury.  Upon his return he discovered that Alison had left the house, taking with her their three children, the dog and some items of furniture.()  Short of money, he was forced to sell his antique AJS motorcycle.(  He found life without his family difficult but defended his wife: There is no doubt whatsoever, she were a good help to me and Im going to miss her.  It was just that all the pressure got too much for her.()Second marriageDibnah met his second wife Susan Lorenza 28-year-old administrator(at a steam rally in Cheshire.  In The Fred Dibnah Story (1985) she recalled their first meeting: He looked sad and miserable, quite a pathetic sort of figure really, none of the bounce that people knew him for.()  He later invited her to a chimney felling in Oldham and then a talk he had been invited to give to a group of fans in Halifax, known as The Fred Dibnah Appreciation Society.  Sue moved into Dibnahs home in Bolton and the two  married on 27 February 1987.(  She encouraged him to grow a moustache and also to give up smoking.(  Many of the chimneys around Bolton had now been either repaired, or demolished and so Dibnah was forced to travel further afield for work.  He travelled to the Dales to install a conductor on the parish church in Kirkby Malham.  While digging the hole for the conductor, they uncovered human bones, for which a reinterment ceremony was held.  Their first son, Jack (named after his fathers trade),() was born in 1987.  Dibnah offered to make a weathercock, provided that his son was christened in the same church.()  His second son, Roger, was born in 1991.(Later lifeIn 1996 Dibnah repaired the  chimney at Barrow Bridgethe same chimney he had scaled for a bet, in his youth.  He was also asked to install a falcon nest at the top.()  He was later influential in ensuring the chimney was made a building.(  As a notable raconteur he also became an after-dinner speaker and would wear his trademark cap with his dinner jacket.()  He made an appearance in a 1996 television advertisement for Kelloggs,( but the strain of living with a man so dedicated to his hobbies began to take its toll on his wife: Sometimes hell have busted his thumb because hes hit it with a hammer; you couldnt really expect him then to come in and start doing things in the house.  I just dont think its fair though, I think youve got to strike a balance and I think ours is about 90/10.  Me for 90 per cent of the housework and Fred for 10.()  Susan met another man and moved out, taking Roger with her and leaving Jack with Fred.(()Third marriage and television presentingBy 1997 Dibnah was living alone, with little work or money.  Competition from Manchester had reduced his income from steeplejacking and filming for the BBC had dried up completely.  He had, however, met Sheila Grundy, a former magicians assistant.  She had arrived one day with her parents and young son to see Dibnahs back yard, and signed the visitors book.  The two remained in contact and became friends; they shared an interest in steam and Grundy was fascinated by Dibnahs tales of steeplejacking.()  She and her son moved in with Dibnah in 1998 and the couple married on 26 September that year.(()  At their wedding reception in Bolton, Dibnah was surprised and moved to tears when his youngest daughter, Caroline, came to see him.  Dibnah had had little contact with his daughters in the years since his divorce from Alison.()In 1997 he met author David Hall.  Hall had been raised in the Bradford district of Manchester and the two swapped tales of growing up in the latter half of the 20th century.  Hall suggested that Dibnah would be unlikely to have any further television work commissioned on his life and that he should consider becoming a television presenter.(  The two worked on new ideas for a programme that would show Dibnah touring the country, visiting important historical locations and speaking to the men involved in the maintenance and restoration of industrial machinery and architecture.  The programme would also exploit Dibnahs working-class attitude and show him operating some of the machinery he visited.()  Filming of Fred Dibnahs Industrial Age began in July 1998.  The first location was near Bolton, at the Earth Colliery and the crew then moved on to various locations around the country, continuing to film through the summer and autumn of 1998.()The series achieved high viewing figures, with positive reviews, and the associated website became the second most-visited BBC website at the time.  A complementary book was also published and was one of the top five best-selling history books of the year.  Dibnah admitted he found speaking to a camera more nerve-racking than climbing a chimney,() but the success of Fred Dibnahs Industrial Age was a portent; he later presented several other television series.  Before filming began for Fred Dibnahs Magnificent Monuments, he had installed his red ladders on the steeple at St. Walburges in Preston, ready for an inspection.  With filming for television now taking up much of his time, however, he was unable to complete the job.  He left the ladders at the church for several years and donated them to the tradesman who eventually took the job.()Last yearsIllnessFile:IKBrunelChains.jpg|right|thumb|upright|altA 19th-century man wearing jacket trousers and waistcoat, hands in pockets, cigar in mouth, wearing a tall stovepipe top hat, standing in front of giant iron chains on a drum.|Kingdom Brunel was much admired by Dibnah.In 2001, to mark the centenary of the death of Victoria, the BBC transmitted a season of programmes based on a Victorian theme and Dibnah presented Fred Dibnahs Victorian Heroes.  He had long been fascinated by the Victorians, especially Kingdom Brunel, whom he regarded as his hero.  During filming he visited a number of locations including the  high Suspension Bridge and the slipway for the Great Eastern.()In early 2001 Dibnah was due to begin filming Fred Dibnahs Building of Britain, but suffered severe abdominal pains and was admitted to hospital for tests.  He was discharged and began filming at locations around the country, including the Theatre, Cathedral and Castle.  Dibnah was the chairman of the Manchester Bolton & Bury Canal Society and an episode on the construction of Britains canal network was therefore of particular interest to him.()  Toward the end of filming, Dibnah went to Bolton Royal Hospital for a check-up, where a tumour was found on his right kidney.  The kidney was removed and the tumour was found to be malignant.  He went to Hospital in Manchester, where further growths were discovered around his bladder.  On the same day, Sheilas father fell from the roof of his house and died.  Dibnah underwent chemotherapy and once his treatment was finished tests showed that he was free of cancer.()Filming for Fred Dibnahs Age of Steam began early in 2003, at the Trencherfield Mill, near Pier.  The film crew visited a number of locations, including a steam rally in Cornwall and the Railway in Sussex.()  Dibnah was travelling around the country working on a subject that fascinated him, visiting old friends and making money from his hobby.  The restoration of his traction engine was almost complete; later that year, however, Dibnah had another checkup at Christie Hospital and was told that a large tumour had been found on his bladder.()Dig with DibnahDibnah had another course of chemotherapy, but this time the treatment was unsuccessful.  Undeterred, he began to dig a replica coal mine in the back garden of his home.  Although the sight of pithead gear may have been considered by his neighbours to be unusual, as a child raised in Bolton he had been surrounded by pits such as Colliery and had long harboured an interest in mining.  He had already assembled the wooden pithead gear and was planning to sink a  brick-lined shaft below this into the hillside.()  At the bottom of the shaft, a horizontal tunnel would have led out to the steep side of the valley above which his garden sits.  The intention was to have a gauge railway running along the tunnel, back up the hillside on a rope-hauled plane, returning to the pithead.  The ultimate aim was to be able to demonstrate the basic working of an early colliery.  Seven years before his diagnosis, therefore, Dibnah had sourced drawings of suitable pithead gear and built a frame from timber and iron bolts.  He had applied for and was given planning permission to erect the structure, but made no mention of his wish to dig a shaft underneath it.  The BBC decided to make a documentary on Dibnahs proposed mine, which would entail his once again travelling around the country, visiting working collieries and heritage mines.  Filming started late in 2003, by which time Dibnah and his friend Alf Molyneux had already made a start on the shaft.()Using traditional shaft-sinking techniques and the labour of mining friends Alf Molyneux and Jimmy Crooks, the shaft was sunk to a depth of  and lined with brick.  The work had been undertaken without permission and, when the council eventually found out what was happening, they insisted he apply for planning permission.()Fred Dibnahs Made in Britain  Despite Dibnahs best efforts, planning permission was refused.  Although he appealed against the decision,() a new series diverted his attention.  At the end of 2003 production began for Fred Dibnahs Made in Britain. With his friend, Alf Molyneux, Dibnah would tour the country on his completed traction engine, visiting the workshops that still could produce the parts needed for his antique vehicle.  His engine, however, was not yet complete and Dibnahs medical diagnosis was not good: he knew he had only a short time to live.  His traction engine developed a serious fault, but with the help of friends it was quickly repaired and its restoration completed.()Dibnah.jpg|thumb|Dibnah visiting the Great Central Railway works at Loughborough, as part of his final televised tour of Britains industrial heritageIn December 2003, his traction engine was now in working order and planning for the new series commenced.  Dibnahs illness necessitated that he sleep in hotels, rather than the living van the engine would tow during the trip.  For the long distances between locations, the engine would be transported on the back of a low loader.()  Dibnahs engine suffered early mechanical problems; it could barely tow the fully loaded living van uphill, as the cylinder had been placed very slightly closer to the footplate than it should have been. As a result of this, every time the piston was fully forward it covered the steam port.()  The engine was repaired, and with some minor engineering work to one of the pistons was brought up to full power.  The team was joined by Dibnahs sons, Jack and Rodger.()The production crew made every effort to reduce Dibnahs workload.  Changes were made to the filming schedule, to allow Dibnah more time to rest at home between filming days.  The crew visited the Road Bridge and Dibnah became the first man to drive a traction engine under its own steam across the bridge.  Such pleasures provided a welcome distraction for Dibnah, who was by then ill and in pain.  By the end of June he was so ill he could not continue filming.  He was sent home to rest and given medication to alleviate his condition, so that he could collect his MBE.()HonoursIn mid-2000, Dibnah was awarded an degree of of Technology for his achievement in engineering by Gordon University in Aberdeen,() and on 19 July 2004 he was made an honorary Doctor of the University by the of Birmingham.()Dibnah was awarded an MBE for services to heritage and broadcasting.  He said Im looking forward to meeting the Queen but I shall probably have to get a new cap.  And Id like to meet Charles because we share the same views about modern architecture.()On 7 July 2004, Dibnah went to Palace to receive his award from the Queen.  He initially planned to drive his traction engine into the palace grounds, but was refused as the Royal Parks Agency feared that its weight would damage the surface of The Mall.  Eventually he was allowed to drive the engine to an army barracks a short distance from the palace.  He collected his medal wearing dress and a hat.( width  33%Filming continued at various locations around the country, with sons Jack and Roger, who had become essential members of the tour, providing much-needed support for their father.  By the end of July, the crew had filmed only 34 days with Dibnah, out of a planned 60.  It was becoming more difficult by the day for Dibnah to fulfil his filming duties and the crew decided to cut short the schedule.  Once home, Dibnah decided to creosote the pithead gear in his garden but fell and injured his back.  He was adamant that he would continue filming, however, and made the trip to North Wales to complete filming.  He later made a partial recovery and completed his last days filming at an Ironworks in Atherton.()DeathDibnah died at Bolton hospice, after suffering from cancer for three years,  surrounded by his family, on 6 November 2004.  He was 66 years old.(()  At the time of his death, his estate was estimated as being worth about 1 million.()Eleven days later, thousands of mourners watched as Dibnahs coffin (on top of which his trade mark flat cap was placed) was towed through the centre of Bolton by his restored traction engine, driven by his son.  A cortge of steam-powered vehicles followed, as the procession made its way to Bolton Parish Church.  During the hour-long service, David Hall told the congregation He wasnt a posh TV presenter.  He was recognised as a working man who had learned through experience.()  Following the hour-long service, led by the Vicar of BoltonCanon Michael Williams (a friend of Dibnah)he was buried at Tonge Cemetery, behind his home.()(http://www.findagrave.com/cgi-bin/fg.cgi?pagegr&GRid9905133)LegacyThrough his television work Dibnah became famous for felling chimneys (by the time of his death he had felled ninety), although it was one of his least favourite jobs.(  As he made more films with Don Haworth, his outspoken views on changing society, work ethics and delinquency, made him the embodiment of the views of many of his fans and epitomised the stereotypical view of a northern working man.()Dibnah was praised by many notable British people.  After reporting on his death, television presenter Sissons remarked: They dont make them like that any more.  Comedian Kay said: Its very sad news.  He was one of a kind and now he has gone I think there will be no one else like him.  He was enthusiastic about a way of life that has virtually disappeared now.  Brian Tetlow, chairman of the Bolton and District Civic Trust, said: Hes unique, not just to Bolton but to Britain and the world. Our thoughts are with his wife and children.( )An  bronze statue of Dibnah was unveiled by the Mayor of Bolton, in Bolton town centre, on 29 April 2008.  The sculpture was created by Jane Robbins.()  His home has since been converted into a heritage centre.()  A play titled The Demolition Man, based on his final years, was staged in 2011 at Boltons Octagon Theatre.()FilmographySee *Fred Dibnah: Steeplejack (1979)*Fred (1983)*Fred - A Disappearing World (1983)*A Year with Fred (1987)*A Year with Fred - New Horizons (1991)*Life With Fred (1994)*The Ups and Downs of Chimneys (1994)*The Fred Dibnah Story (1996)*Fred Dibnahs Industrial Age (1999)*Fred Dibnahs Magnificent Monuments (2000)*Fred Dibnahs Victorian Heroes (2001)*Fred Dibnahs Building of Britain (2002)*Fred Dibnahs Age of Steam (2003)*Dig with Dibnah (2004)*A Tribute to Fred Dibnah (2004)*Fred Dibnahs Made in Britain (2005)*Fred Dibnahs World of Steam, Steel and Stone (2006) Notes  References ** Further reading ****External links* Fred Dibnah Heritage Centre* Fred Dibnahs website* Fred Dibnah - Some personal photographic memories.* Fred Dibnah Tribute site with many pictures* Meet the original reality TV star (The Westmorland Gazette)* Bolton Evening News tribute* Dibnah
841216
B._B._Comer
Braxton Bragg Comer (November 7, 1848 August 15, 1927) was an American Democratic politician who was the 33rd Governor of Alabama from 1907 to 1911.Early Life and EducationComer was born at old Spring Hill, County, Alabama, the fourth son of John Fletcher and Catherine Drewry Comer. B.B. Comer began his education at the age of ten under the tutelage of E.N. Brown. In 1864 Comer went to the of Alabama, but in April 1865 was forced to leave when General T. Croxtons troops burned the university. He then enrolled at the of Georgia in Athens where he was a member of the Kappa Literary Society, and attended for several years before transferring to and Henry College in Virginia. In 1869, Comer graduated from Emory and Henry with AB and AM degrees.Early Business CareerFollowing graduation, Comer returned to Spring Hill and helped to manage the family property. In 1872 he married Eva Jane Harris of Cuthbert, Georgia. He then built a large home at Comer Station, Barbour County, Alabama, and continued his plantation and general store business. He grew corn and cotton primarily on what became a  plantation.( His Barbour County plantation enterprise continued to operate after he moved his family to Anniston in 1885.Sources of the Comer Family Wealth Pre and Post AntebellumIn 1885 Comer moved his family to Anniston, but continued to actively run the family owned plantation in Barbour County. The Comer Plantation operations continued to use bonded forced convict labor, which amounted essentially to slavery, throughout the late nineteenth and early twentieth centuries.  The Comer Plantation leased African American convicts from the State of Alabama for use as forced labor. After a visit to the Barbour County Comer Plantation in the early 1880s Alabamas Prison Inspector Richard Dawson wrote: Things in bad order. No fireplace in cell. No arrangements for washing. No Hospital. Everything filthy- privy terrible- convicts ragged many barefooted- very heavily ironed.(Dawson, Diary of Richard Dawson, July 11, 1883)Although hailed in the mid twentieth century as one of the leading families of Alabama there is now little doubt that the Comer Family legacy and a portion of the family wealth was built on the entrapment and enslavement of African Americans, before, and after, the civil war.(Blackmon, Slavery By Another Name, 70 (Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group, 2009))At this time Barbour County, the origin of much of the Comer family wealth, was notorious for the entrapment, and selling into bondage, of African Americans, for the purpose of exploiting their labor to rebuild the post-Civil War wealth of Alabamas leading families.( Attorney General Knox, of the Roosevelt administration assigned Warren Reese and Julius Stern to investigate these charges of slavery.(Blackmon, Slavery By Another Name, 253 (Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group, 2009)) More than forty such cases in Coffee, Geneva, Covington, and Barbour Counties were investigated by these Federal Agents in 1903.(The peonage scheme in use throughout the State of Alabama, and put into place in various Comer Family enterprises, depended on the entrapment and conviction of African Americans on trumped up charges such as vagrancy, insulting behavior,  rudeness to white women, or gambling.( By the 1880s the attractiveness of this scheme was apparent to both local and state officials. Local officials would arrest African Americans, convict them of these trumped up charges, and then fine them for their actions plus court costs. Most cash strapped African Americans could not pay these fines. The state then leased them to industry and planters for the amount of the fines (usually for $50 $100).(ADAH, Convicts at Hard Labor for the County in the State of Alabama on the First Day of March 1883, microfiche) They had to then to work off the amount they owed to the state through forced labor on farms, plantations, mills and mines. These illiterate men and women were forced to sign contracts including stipulations that they would be subject to the same conditions as other prisoners, which meant leg irons, being unable to leave their place of work without being subject to punishment and further extension of contracts. There is evidence that these debts could never be worked off with the bondsmen being charged for food and medical care.(Blackmon, Slavery By Another Name, 66 (Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group, 2009)) The result was that on plantations, mines, and mills, owned by Alabama families such as the Comers, black tenant farmers and share croppers, during the 1880s and 90s, were turned into convict labor. Once convicted these citizens were subject to imprisonment, shackles, and the lash and worked in the same fields where a few weeks earlier they had been independent, free men.(Blackmon, Slavery By Another Name, 68 (Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group, 2009))In Anniston, Comer invested the income from his plantation to expand his business pursuits and joined with S.B. Trapp to open Comer & Trapp, a grocery store.(Harris, Braxton Bragg Comer (1901-11)) He remained in Anniston for five years before selling his interest in the firm and relocating to Birmingham where he continued to be involved in successful business pursuits, including cornmeal, flour, and textile mills and serving as the president of City National Bank.(( Later, he liquidated the bank to focus on his other business pursuits.(Mock, Braxton Bragg Comer, Birmingham, Alabama)Comers Role in the Post Reconstruction Disenfranchisement of African AmericansWhile living in Spring Hill, Comer served on the Barbour County Commissioners Court from 18741880, helping to redeem that county from Republican Party rule. This quote from Comer signaled his implicit support for post reconstruction  elimination of political participation by African Americans by physical and mental intimidation, use of the onerous poll tax, literacy tests, and other coercive methods.( White Americans in the 1880s had literacy rates slightly better than African Americans- but men with the right to vote prior to 1865  (and their descendants) were grandfathered and exempted from these requirements in Alabama. This exemption for whites resulted in African Americans being excluded as a class from politics post reconstruction and, ultimately, the demise of liberal Republicanism in Alabama. Thus his wish to redeem his county from Republican Party rule was realized to the detriment of Alabamas African American citizens freed by the 13th and 14th amendments to the U.S. Constitution.(Kelly, Race Class and Power in the Alabama Coal Field, 16) Comers one term as Governor reinforced this racist and discriminatory view of African American political participation and his support for the re-enslavement of African Americans via Alabamas peonage-convict system.(Eureka Mines: Another Source of Comer Family WealthAn important source of Comer family wealth  was their investment in the development of the notorious Eureka mines in Shelby County, south of Birmingham.(Curtin Black Prisoners and Their World, Alabama, 69 (Urbana, 2001)) The manager of the labor force was none other than J.W. Comer, the brother of Governor B. B. Comer.(Blackmon, Slavery By Another Name, 69 (Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group, 2009)) The Eureka complex consisted of two mines, one mined by free miners, and the other by convicts bonded under the peonage system. The vast majority of forced laborers were African American negroes who were convicted at a rate of four times that of white citizens.(  This important Comer backed enterprise thrived on a mix of primitive excavations techniques and relentless, atavistic physical force.(Ezekial Archey, a prisoner leased to the Comer backed enterprise at Eureka, wrote that the convicts lived in a stockade filled with filth and vermin. Gunpowder cans were used to hold human waste that would fill up and run all over our beds where prisoners were shackled hand and foot for the night.(Curtin, Black Prisoners and Their World, Alabama, 55 (University of Virginia Press October 2000)) Later he wrote to a Roosevelt Administration Investigator that JWComer {the Governors brother and manager of the mine} is a hard man. I have seen men come to him with their shirts a solid scab on their backs and he would let the hide grow on and take it off again. I have seen him hit men 100 to 160 times with a ten prong strop and then say thay was not whipped. He would go off after an escaped man come one day with him and dig his grave the same day. (Archey Letter from E Archey to Dawson Pratt Mines dated 18 January 1884; Dawson Letter Books) Between 1878 and 1880 twenty five bonded convicts whose contracts were sold to the Comer backed  Eureka mines  died and their bodies were dumped into shallow earthen pits on the edge of the mine site.(Curtin Black Prisoners and Their World, Alabama, 69 (University of Virginia Press October 2000)) Further testimony to the nature of this Comer backed enterprise was given by Jonathan Good to the Joint Commission instigated by the Roosevelt Administration to investigate the use of peonage in Alabaman enterprises. Good testified that J.W. Comer, the brother of the Governor and manager of the Eureka mines,  ordered a captured black escapee to lie on the ground and the dogs were biting him. He begged piteously to have the dogs taken off of him, but Comer refused to allow it. Comer...stripped him naked took a stirrup strap, doubled it, wet it,, bucked him and whipped him, unmercifully whipped him, over half and hour. The Negro begged them to take a gun and kill him.They left him in a Negro cabin where...he died within a few hours. (J Good Testimony taken by the Joint Commission, 1881)Avondale Mills; Exploiting Child LaborAnother enterprise Comer championed was that of  Avondale Mills.  The Trainer Familya family in the textile business in Chester, Pennsylvaniaenvisioned a plan to expand its business into the South by way of the new and growing industrial city, Birmingham, Alabama.  In exchange for stock in the company, Frederick Mitchell Jackson, Sr., and other Birmingham civic leaders, agreed to commit $150,000 to help the Trainer family fulfill its plan.  Jackson, president of Birminghams Commercial Club, a forerunner of the Birmingham Area Chamber of Commerce, pledged his help in order to help give employment to those badly in need of it in the young and struggling city of Birmingham.  B.B. Comers son, James McDonald Comer, later recalled that his father was also motivated by the feeling that Birmingham needed an industry which could employ women as well as men.  Despite the sentiments voiced by Comers son that this investment by Comer was for the good of the common weal it is now apparent that one of the main reasons for the early financial success of Avondale Mills was its profligate use of inexpensive, and flexible, child labor.(Hall Like a Family the Making of a Southern Cotton Mill, 61 (Chapel Hill University of North Carolina 1987))Whatever the motivationan attempt to insinuate eastern textile business into the South or to provide employment opportunities for Birminghams women, or the attractiveness of cheap child laborthe Trainer family accepted the pledge of financial assistance and sought an Alabamian to invest $10,000 in the project and assume presidency of the mill.  In 1897, they approached Braxton Bragg Comer, owner of a plantation that used forced peonage labor, investor in various businesses, including the notorious Eureka mines,( and future governor of Alabama.  Comer accepted the  offer, invested in the enterprise and, from 1897 until his death in 1927, B.B. Comer served as president of Avondale Mills.In 1897 Comer built the first mill in Avondale, land that would become part of Birmingham, Alabama; hence the name Avondale Mills.  During the first year of its operation, Avondale Mills used 4,000 bales of cotton and by 1898, Avondale Mills employed 436 laborers and generated $15,000 in profit.  By the time B.B. Comer became governor of Alabama in 1907, Avondale Mills declared $55,000 in profit and produced almost 8,000,000 yards of material.  By the turn of the century, Avondale mills had set the course for future development.  Avondale Mills began with 30,000 spindles in the first mill in Birmingham and grew over he next thirty years to include ten mills in seven communities, with a total of 282,160 spindles.  The mills included:  Eva Jane, the Central, the Sally B, and the Catherine in Sylacauga; the Alexander City Cotton Mills, the Sycamore Mills, Mignon and Bevelle Mill, and the Pell City Manufacturing Company.(One of the drivers for the incredible growth in production at Avondale Mills, of which Comer was President, was exposed in 1910 by Lewis Hines, an American sociologist and photographer whose works were instrumental in changing child labor laws in the United States (Lavender The American Child A Cultural Studies Reader, 81 (Rutgers University Press 2003))As cotton prices fell, poor white farmers were forced to turn to sharecropping and tenancy; some of those were willing to give up farming and move to town.  One white mill worker said, we made good money compared with the farm.  Another white sharecropper said it this way, Mebbe we aint got much, but we sure has got more.  And at least one white ex-farmer remembered the move with considerable enthusiasm:  Yeah! Oh we just thought we had almost come to heaven when we got up here.  We didnt have to pick cotton, chop cotton, like that.  Just go to work and come back and nothing else to do.  And we really had it made when we come here.Hines visits and photographs during 1910, however, revealed another darker side of Avondale Mills and the its subsidiaries throughout Alabama.( Hines photographs and interviews in 1910 showed that numerous children were employed at Avondale Mills with mere weeks of education if any. ( The children were not at first officially employed but had to assist their parents in completing strenuous twelve hour shifts in the mill.(In Avondale Mills Hines noted numerous examples of child labor and abuse of children including that of fourteen and fifteen year old Mary and Miller Gilliam. Their father, according to Hines, removed them from school to work at Avondale Mills. Hines noted that the father had no job at the time.(Hines recorded, as he snapped photographs of children lined up at Avondale Mills owned locations, that none of the children would admit to being younger than twelve years of age .(Hall Like a Family the Making of a Southern Cotton Mill, 128 (Chapel Hill University of North Carolina 1987)) He wrote the The Mill bosses...arrived at school anytime during the day to remove children to work at the Mill..( When demand for textiles was low the children were allowed to return to school- making the children a ready made, cheap source of flexible labor.(At twelve years of age children could begin work at Avondale Mills as doffers.(Hall Like a Family the Making of a Southern Cotton Mill, 65 (Chapel Hill University of North Carolina 1987)) This was a fast paced job that required dexterity but little technical skill.(Hall Like a Family the Making of a Southern Cotton Mill, 64 (Chapel Hill University of North Carolina 1987)) The room the children would change bobbins in would be filled with lint and would leave the lungs of the child doffers full of debris leading to brown lung disease later in life..(Comers reaction to Hines exposure of the terrible conditions under which these children employed  was that the children were working at the insistence of their parents and neither that he, nor the state, had any right to interfere.( Stopping  the exploitation of child labor might have undermined much of the financial success of Avondale Mills. Cotton Mills in the south were successful fundamentally, not because of the decline in farming incomes, nor the decline in artisanship, but because of the abundance of flexible,willing, and cheap child labor.(Flamming  Creating the Modern South: Mill Hands and Managers, 25 (Chapel Hill University of North Carolina 1992))The inexpensive shelter provided by coton mills such as Avondale Mills encouraged families to become deeply entrenched in the mill, and as long as the family occupied the dwellings, the tenants were obligated to work in the mill and supply labor.( There was another price to pay for using Avondale Mills housing. If a worker missed church or drank alcohol they faced discipline and possible loss of their home and employment.(Creating the Modern South: Mill Hands and Managers, 25 (Chapel Hill University of North Carolina 1992))Railroad CommissionEven before Comer became president of Avondale Mills, he was a vocal advocate for railroad reform but not for organized labor.  Alabama businessmen were at a disadvantage when competing for business with companies based in Georgia due to that states lower freight rates.  Investigations by the Birmingham Commercial Club and the Birmingham Freight Bureau, organizations in which Comer had major roles, found evidence of discrimination by the railroads.  Comer believed giving more power to the states Railroad Commission was the best way to end the discrimination and lower rates to a level that would allow Alabama companies to compete with those in Georgia.  However, the state legislature and delegates to the 1901 Constitutional Convention did not strengthen the commissions power.  Nevertheless, the new 1901 Constitution did indirectly aid Comers push for railroad reform.  The disenfranchisement of African Americans and poor whites reduced the chance of an electoral challenge to railroad reforms such as those Comer supported.  When the Railroad Commission did not change rates after two more years had passed, Comer switched his tactics from being a vocal critic to running for a seat on the commission, which had recently become an elected position.  His campaign called for limiting the power of the railroads in favor of shipping.(ADAH, Alabama Governors: Braxton Bragg Comer) In 1904, his successful election over incumbent John V. Smith gave him the presidency of the commission but he quickly realized he had little power due to the other two commissioners siding with the railroads.( Three years into his term as president, he came to the conclusion that the only way for him to have enough power to enact true railroad reform was to become governor.(Gubernatorial CampaignThe 1906 gubernatorial campaign in the Democratic primarywas one of the most memorable in Alabamas history. The Democratic Party dropped the word Conservative from its formal name, demonstrating that it was now comfortable with a more progressive platform.( Both of the partys gubernatorial candidates were staunchly progressive on almost every topic.  Unlike Comer, the other candidate, Governor M. Cunningham of Birmingham, did not support the progressive railroad reform that had led Comer to seek the governorship. Not surprisingly, the railroads supported Cunningham. However, Comer was a better campaigner and orator than Cunningham, and his verbal attacks on the railroads so aroused Alabama audiences that he won the primary with 61 percent of the vote.( The Barbour County native then defeated E. Stratton of the Republican Party and Abbott of the Party of America in the November 1906 election. Comers plan to enact progressive reform of the railroads as well as in other areas such as education appeared a strong possibility due  to the progressives constituting a majority in the newly elected state legislature.(Railroad ReformComer devoted most of his inaugural address to the issue of railroad reform and requested the legislature pass 20 separate laws to give the railroad commission strong rate-making and enforcement powers.( The like-minded legislature passed his railroad reforms with only a few changes.  Through these new laws, Comer finally achieved the railroad reform he had so long desired.  The rates were lowered to a level similar those to Georgia and other southern states, thus allowing Alabama businesses to better compete with their counterparts in neighboring states.(In addition to railroad regulation, the state legislature added a provision that would revoke the state business license of any corporation bringing suit in federal court on any issue already before a state court.( L&N Railroad and other railroads challenged the new railroad statues in federal court. The disagreement between the state government and railroad continued after Comer had left office, however his initial goal to give the state increased regulatory power over railroad freight rates was achieved.(Comers Record with Regards to Organized Labor and Discrimination and Brutalization of African Americans During His Term as GovernorSeven thousand free (mostly white) miners went on strike at the Tennessee Coal, Iron, and Railroad and other mining operations in 1908. They were joined by five hundred African American convicts enslaved under the peonage system in place in Alabama. Company officials petitioned the state to break up the strike with state militia. To keep operating, TCIRR officials pushed the enslaved African American convicts, leased from the state and working only for food, to work long and excruciating hours.(Blackmon, Slavery By Another Name, 321 (Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group, 2009)) White foreman brought in from the country side other bonded African Americans, collected their wages, and worked them for food and water as well.(Kelly, Race Class and Power in the Alabama Coal Field, 1-8 (Urbana, 2001)) A prominent African American union leader, William Millin, who protested these conditions, was arrested, then taken from jail lynched and burned.( Another African American organizer was hanged from a tree a week later. Governor Comer then issued orders mobilizing the state militia to break up the strikers and their organized camps.(Atlanta Constitution, August 6, 1908, 2)In mid August 1908 a delegation of prominent Birmingham citizens visited leaders of the striking miners still encamped outside of Alabama coal mines and issued an explicit threat. They stated that unless the strike ended Birmingham would make Springfield (where twelve thousand whites had burned to the ground the African American section of the city) look like six cents.(Tuskegee Institute, The Lynching Century: African Americans Who Died in Racial Violence in the United States 1865-1965, 5) Governor Comer then issued this statement:We are outraged at the attempts to establish social equality between black and white miners. He added he would not tolerate eight or nine thousand idle niggers in the state of Alabama.(Kelly, Race Class and Power in the Alabama Coal Field, 24 (Urbana, 2001))Other Issues During Comers GovernorshipAlthough B.B. Comer was accused of being a one-issue candidate reform, he actually supported a broad platform while governor.( Two of the areas he is most remembered for are educational reform for whites and prohibition. He did little, however, to invest in the education of African Americans and the two tiered educational system continued throughout his term and beyond.(Blackmon, Slavery By Another Name, 100-106 (Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group, 2009))Educational Reform-Comer Administration Uses Peonage to Increase State Revenues and increase Literacy for Whites While Underfunding African American Educational InstitutionsComers educational reforms to improve education for whites were funded by increases in revenues to the state.( A State Board of Assessors was created to equalize taxation by equalizing property values throughout the state and establishing franchise taxes for businesses.( The reassessment of property values angered the large property owners who saw their property taxes increase.( However the increases in state tax revenues came about not through taxation reforms (although this probably stabilized tax revenues) but through the increase revenues generated from convicts leased from the state to private enterprise.( Regardless the increases in spending for education only benefited the white citizens of Alabama.(Bond, Negro Education in Alabama: A Study in Cotton and Steel, 160-161 (University Alabama Press May 30, 1994))  The increase in the state funds allowed him to devote money to much needed educational reforms for whites including the building of rural schools and county high schools (at least one in each county) and increasing the appropriations made to the University of Alabama, the Alabama Polytechnic Institute in Auburn, the nine agricultural schools, the schools, and the Girls Technical School at Montevallo. In addition, the state took control of the Alabama Boys Industrial School.( Comers educational reforms continue to affect the states educational system over a century later.(Alabama Hall of Fame, Braxton Bragg Comer)It is important to note, however, that over twenty five percent of the states revenue in 1910 was funded by the leasing of convicted African American back to private enterprise under the peonage system.( In essence many of the improvements in the states infrastructure during Comers term as Governor was funded by the slave labor of African Americans for the benefit of the states white citizens.( For white students the curriculum level was raised and literacy increased, but not for African Americans who suffered under Crow laws and the but equal doctrine. Comer did invest into education- but the amount of money per capita spent on African American children was approximately one seventh that of White Children.( Literacy climbed dramatically as a result for whites but lagged for blacks (less than 50% for African Americans by 1920) because of the dismal state of education for African American citizens.(Blackmon, Slavery By Another Name, 120 (Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group, 2009))ProhibitionProhibition was one issue upon which progressives were not united.  Some progressives believed prohibition should be a local issue, while others supported state laws against the sale of alcohol. During his gubernatorial campaign and first two years as governor, Comer viewed prohibition as a local matter. By 190850 of the states 67 counties had voted for prohibition.( Despite the majority of the counties being dry, the powerful Anti-Saloon League pushed for statewide prohibition.  Other prohibition groups rallied to the Leagues push for a statewide law, forcing Comer to call the legislature into special session to decide the matter. The 1909 special session enacted prohibition statewide, but, not content with a mere statute, they also proposed a constitutional amendment to end the sale of liquor.( Comer traveled the state to garner support for the proposed amendment but his and the Anti-Saloon Leagues support of it was not enough to overcome opposition and the amendment failed to win the necessary votes.(Other Areas of ReformIn addition to railroad and educational reform and prohibition, Comer also had success in the following areas.He helped to establish a tuberculosis sanatorium as part of his use of state funds to improve public health.((He strengthened insurance laws.(When President Theodore Roosevelt suggested that the nations governors should join him in conserving the countrys natural resources, Comer and the legislature established the Alabama Soil Conservation Department to oversee a public park system in Alabama.(He increased transportation funding to improve roads.(Later Life and DeathState law prevented governors from running for successive terms, thus Comer was illegible for the 1910 gubernatorial election. Comer ran for reelection in 1914 and was defeated by an unlikely coalition of railroads, organized labor, and supporters of local option prohibition.(In the spring of 1920, Governor Thomas Kilby appointed Comer to serve the remaining months of the late John H. Bankheads term in the United States Senate. He did not seek election when the term expired.(Alabama Mens Hall of Fame, Braxton Bragg Comer) Following his short time in the Senate, Comer spent the remainder of his life following his pre-political business pursuits.(Biographical Directory of the United States Congress, Comer, Braxton Bragg, (1848-1927), http://bioguide.congress.gov/scripts/biodisplay.pl?index_C0000657)B.B. died on August 15, 1927. His wife, Eva Jane, preceded him in death, having died on March 6, 1920 while he was serving in the Senate. He and his wife were survived by their eight children Sally Bailey, John Fletcher, James McDonald, Eva Mignon, Catherine, Braxton Bevelle, Eva, Braxton Bragg, Jr., and Hugh M. Comer. He was buried in Birminghams Elmwood Cemetery.LegacyBy the mid Twentieth Century Comer was hailed as a reformer who brought Alabamas primary and secondary educational systems into the mainstream. He was also hailed as an enlightened business man for bringing Avondale Mills to Birmingham and Central Alabama.( It is now clear that Comer was a product of his time: he was racist, discriminatory, and bigoted.( The family wealth that Comer used for political purposes, and for expansion of the Comer business empire, was built through the use of forced convict labor of bonded African Americans,( the exploited labor of underage children at Avondale Mills (and subsidiary plants),(  and through investments in the notorious Eureka Mines.(His laudable attempts at improving Alabamas educational systems also fell short for African Americans during his term as governor. Although literacy rates for whites increased during his reign as governor and afterwards there was little affect on the literacy rates for African Americans .( This was due to Comer and the State of Alabamas disenfranchisement of African Americans and the refusal of both to fund education for non whites.(However laudable Comers record with respect to reforms within the state  his one term as Governor reinforced the disenfranchisement of African Americans in Alabama. Backed by the power of the State of Alabama he was successful in turning back the peonage investigation into the false imprisonment and selling into bondage of African Americans.(Blackmon, Slavery By Another Name, 326 (Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group, 2009))Places Named for ComerB.B. Comer Memorial High School, B.B. Comer Memorial Elementary School, and B.B. Comer Memorial Library, all in Sylacauga, once home to one of Avondales largest mills.B.B. Comer Hall at the University of Alabama houses the Department of Modern Languages.The federal building in Birmingham.Braxton Bragg Comer Hall at Auburn University houses offices and labs for the School of Agriculture.NotesReferences*History of the University of Georgia, Thomas Walter Reed,  Imprint:  Athens, Georgia : University of Georgia, ca. 1949, p.900*Alabama Governors: Braxton Bragg Comer, Alabama Department of Archives and History*Comer, Braxton Bragg, (1848-1927), Biographical Directory of the United States Congress*Avondale Mills, Lynn Price McWhorter*Braxton Bragg Comer (1907-11), David Alan Harris*Braxton Bragg Comer, Alabama Mens Hall of Fame*Braxton Bragg Comer, Birmingham, Alabama, Gary Mock, 2010*RG60 NA Peonage Files, RG 60 NA ff5280-17119: National Archives*Curtin, Mary Ellen. Black Prisoners and Their World, Alabama, 1865-1900. Charlottesville: University Press of Virginia, 2000.*Kelly, Brian.  Race, Class and Power in the Alabama Coalfields 1908-1921. Urbana: University of Illinois Free Press, 2001.*Blackmon, Douglas. Slavery By Another Name. New York. Anchor Books, 2008.*Bond, Horace Mann. Negro Education in Alabama: A Study in Cotton and Steel. Tuscaloosa: University of Alabama Press, 1994.*Dawson Richard. Diary of Richard Dawson.Alabama Department of Archives and History 1883*ADAH, Convicts at Hard Labor for the County in the State of Alabama on the First Day of March 1883, microfiche*Tuskegee Institute. The Lynching Century: African Americans Who Died in Racial Violence in the United States 1865-1965*Hall. Like a Family the Making of a Southern Cotton Mill.Chapel Hill: University of North Carolina, 1987*Flamming.  Creating the Modern South: Mill Hands and Managers. 25 Chapel Hill: University of North Carolina 1992.External links*  Find-A-Grave profile for B. B. Comer* Alabama State Archives B. B. Comer page* Shadow of Slavery* Race, Class and Power in the Alabama Coalfields 1908-1921*1903 New York Times Article on Peonage and African Americans in Alabama* 1911 Encyclopdia Britannica Entry State of Alabama- references to peonage and disenfranchisement of African Americans* The Southern South* Extracts from Dothan Eagle 1909-10 Governor Comer seeks pardon for peonage convictions* MIT Forum on Slavery and Reparations* 50 Years of Peonage*Excerpts from Chesnutt, Charles W. Peonage, or the New Slavery. Voice of the Negro, 1 (Sept. 1904): 394-97. *Article in The Washington Post Slavery Did Not End With The Civil War.  One Mans Odyssey Into a Nations Secret Shame. by Len Cooper  Sunday, June 16 1996; Page F01 *Records of the National Negro Business League 1900-1919** Braxton Bragg Comer entry in the Encyclopedia of Alabama*Baker, Ray Following the Color Line 1908B. ComerBragg ComerBragg ComerB. ComerComer
843018
Sandwell_Valley_Country_Park
Sandwell Valley Country Park () is a park, run by Sandwell Metropolitan Borough Council, in Valley, on the River Tame in the middle of the urban conurbation between Birmingham and Bromwich in the West Midlands of England. Location Sandwell Valley country park stretches from the A41 at West Bromwich to the edge of Walsall, with car parks in Forge Lane and Sandwell Park Farm. The main entrances to the site are at Sandwell Park Farm, Salters Lane, West Bromwich, B71 4BG. Forge Mill Farm, Forge Lane, West Bromwich B71 3SZ History Sandwell Valley Country Park was once the site of Priory, a 12th century Benedictine monastery which itself was founded on the site of an earlier hermitage. The monastery was closed on the orders of Wolsey in 1525 and by 1705 the land was redeveloped once more, into Sandwell Hall, built for the of Dartmouth. From the late 19th century the Hall was used as an asylum, calling itself Sandwell Hall Industrial School for Mentally Defective Boys.In 1928 Sandwell Hall was demolished due to subsidence caused by mining at Colliery and Sandwell Park (Jubilee) Colliery which between them employed over 1,000 miners. A coal tramway ran from the Jubilee pit through the Sandwell Park to the canal / railway at West Bromwich. Amenities By the 1960s the site was developed into the Country Park with up to  set aside for amenities such as three golf courses, a Millennium Cycle Route, 2 off-road cycle paths and open spaces close to the heart of a major UK city that attracts over 20,000 visitors per year.The RSPB site here attracts over 150 different species of birds. External links *Info from Sandwell Metropolitan Borough Council*Photos of Sandwell Valley Country Park and surrounding area on geograph
844975
Harriman_Alaska_Expedition
thumb|Title page of a private souvenir album created collectively by the members of the Harriman Alaska Expedition.In 1899, wealthy railroad magnate Edward Harriman arranged for a maritime expedition to Alaska. Harriman brought with him an elite community of scientists, artists, photographers, and naturalists to explore and document the Alaskan coast. The voyage, called the Harriman Alaska Expedition, spent two months traveling from Seattle, along the coast of Alaska, to Siberia, and back again. The Genesis of the VoyageEdward Harriman was one of the most powerful men in America. He owned several railroads, with a dream of owning all of them. He had taken a number of near-bankrupt railroads and restored them to profitability.However, by early 1899, he was exhausted. His doctor told him that he needed a long vacation. Never a man to do anything small, Harriman decided to go to Alaska to hunt bears. But rather than go alone, he conceived of the idea of taking with him a scientific community to explore and document the coast of Alaska.He contacted Hart Merriam, the head of the Division of Economic Ornithology and Mammalogy at the United States Department of Agriculture, and one of the founders of the Geographic Society. Harriman told Merriam that he would cover the expenses of scientists, artists, and other experts who would join the voyage. He asked Merriam to choose the scientific party.Historians question why Harriman wanted to go to Alaska. Some think he was considering developing Alaskan resources. Some think he was considering building a railroad to the Alaskan territory. Some people at the time openly wondered if he was going to buy Alaska, or build a railroad bridge from Alaska to Siberiaa railroad around the world. Nothing seemed impossible for Edward H. Harriman (Chowder, 2003). Merriam held a flurry of meetings and sent out dozens of telegrams. He organized a broad range of expertsarctic experts, botanists, biologists and zoologists, geologists and geographers, artists, photographers, ornithologists, and writers.Harriman ordered the refitting of a steamship known as the George W. Elder. The remodeled ship featured lecture rooms, a library with over 500 volumes on Alaska, a stable for animals, taxidermy studios, and luxury rooms for the team. Some on the expedition referred to the ship as the George W. Roller, for its tendency to roll in the waves, causing seasickness among many of the passengers.ParticipantsThe members of the interdisciplinary team represented the best scientists, artists, and photographers of their time.Arctic Experts*William Brewer, Naturalist *Muir, Naturalist *William Dall, Paleontologist, GeographerBotanists*Frederick Coville, Botanist*Thomas Kearney, Botanist*De Alton Saunders, Botanist*Trelease, Botanist*Fernow, ForesterBiologists and Zoologists*Wesley Coe, Biologist*Daniel Elliot, Zoologist*Hart Merriam, Zoologist *Emerson Ritter, Biologist*Trevor Kincaid, Entomologist*A. K. Fisher, Ornithologist*Keeler, Ornithologist*Ridgway, Ornithologist*William H. Averell*Leon J. Cole, OrnithologistGeologists and Geographers*W. B. Devereux, Mining engineer*Benjamin Emerson, Geologist*Gannett, Geographer*Karl Gilbert, Geologist*Charles Palache, GeologistArtists and Photographers*Edward Curtis, Photographer*Frederick Dellenbaugh, Artist*Agassiz Fuertes, Bird Artist*R. Swain Gifford, Artist*D. J. Inverarity, Photographer (Curtis assistant)Writers*Bird Grinnell, Expert on Native American Culture (Editor, and Stream)*Burroughs, Author Harriman also brought a medical team, a chaplain, hunters and packers, guides, and taxidermists. He brought his own family and his servants. Together, with the crew of the Elder, the total number of people on the ship was 126 (Burroughs, 1901). The VoyageBy the end of May, the ships guests and passengers had all arrived in Seattle. Newspapers around the world ran front-page stories about the trip. On May 31, 1899, the Elder launched from Seattle. Cheering crowds saw them off (Chowder, 2003). Their first stop was the Victoria Museum on Island. They then traveled farther north to Lowe Inlet, where they stopped to explore and document the wildlife.On June 4, they stopped in Metlakatla, the European-style settlement that was created by Scottish missionary William Duncan for the Alaskan indigenous people. The scientists visited with Duncan in his home.In the next two weeks the Elder stopped at several spots on Alaskan soil, including Skagway and Sitka. They saw the results, both positive and negative, of the Gold Rush. They continued to catalog plants, animals, and marine creatures, as well as geological and glacial formations. Harriman had brought a graphophonic recording machine, and used it to record a native Tlingit song.By June 25, they had reached the pristine Prince William Sound. They discovered an undocumented fiord in the northwest corner of the Sound. They named it Harriman Fiord.While the scientists had some control over where they stopped to explore, Harriman retained the final judgment. He was anxious to hunt a bear, and he decided to head toward Island when he heard that there were bears there. On July 7, they reached Island in the Shumagins. Four of the scientists, William Ritter, De Alton Saunders, Palache, and Trevor Kincaid (accompanied by Luther Kelly, one of the expeditions guides), decided to stay and camp on Popof Island while the rest of the scientists continued on to Siberia. This allowed the campers to make much more detailed notes about the area, rather than quick notes on frequent stops along the way.Edward Harrimans wife wanted to put her feet on Siberian soil, so the Elder continued northward. By July 11, the ship had put into Plover Bay in Siberia. Harriman, by this time, was impatient and ready to get back to work. The Elder steamed southward, picking up the party on Popof Island. On July 26, the Elder made one last stop, at an abandoned Tlingit village at Cape Fox. On July 30, the ship pulled into the harbor in Seattle.Expedition PublicationsHarriman paid for the creation of several sizable volumes of the discoveries of the expedition. When Harriman died in 1909, his wife devoted enough money to continue the publications. C. Hart Merriam  served as the editor, and spent twelve years working on the publications (Goetzmann & Sloan, 1982).Burroughs, a best-selling nature author, was the official scribe of the expedition. He wrote much of Volume I, an overview of the trip. Volumes VI and VII, which were to be written by Merriam and feature mammals, never appeared. Perhaps Merriam simply couldnt find the time with his other duties. Subsequent volumes were written by other expedition scientists or authors hired by Merriam to finish the work. While they often mentioned the beauty and grandeur of the Alaskan coast, the publications were mostly highly technical and written for other scientists.The first volume was published in 1901, and they continued to be published in the next few years. The Smithsonian republished the entire series in 1910, and the volumes are now available as free downloads.  *** Vol I: Narrative, Glaciers, Natives** Vol II: History, Geography, Resources** Vol III: Glaciers and Glaciation** Vol IV: Geology and Paleontology** Vol V: Cryptogamic Botany** Vol VIII: Insects, Part 1** Vol IX: Insects, Part 2** Vol X: Crustaceans** Vol XI: Nemerteans, Bryozoans** Vol XII: Enchytraeids, Tubicolous Annelids** Vol XIII: Land and Fresh Water Mollusks** Vol XIV: Monograph of the Shallow-water Starfishes of the North Pacific Coast from the Arctic Ocean to California, Part 1. Text and Part 2. PlatesLegacyAccomplishmentsThe expedition claimed to have discovered some 600 species that were new to science, including 38 new fossil species. They charted the geographic distribution of many species. They discovered an unmapped fiord and named several glaciers. Gilberts work on glaciers represented new thinking in the field (Goetzmann & Sloan, 1982).Another legacy of the trip was the career of Edward Curtis. On the trip, he developed a close friendship with George Grinnell, who was an expert on Native American culture. After the expedition, Grinnell invited Curtis with him on a trip to the Blackfeet Reservation in Montana. Curtis, moved by what was commonly believed to be a dying way of life, spent much of his career documenting Native American culture (Goetzmann & Sloan, 1982). At first, Muir found Harriman distasteful and his hunting barbaric. But, over the course of the trip and afterward, the two became friends. Years later, Muir recruited Harriman to help with governmental lobbying on National Park legislation (Chowder, 2003). It was Muir who gave the eulogy at Harrimans funeral in 1909. The Intersection of 19th and 20th Century ScienceIn many ways, the expedition was an intersection of 19th-century science and 20th-century science. It often represented the best of the new centurys science, but it also showed how scientists thought in the previous century.They foreshadowed practices of 20th-century science by being a truly interdisciplinary team. The wealth of disciplines represented on the voyage enabled them to work together to solve many pieces of the puzzle. They also discussed the potential loss of the wilderness and the indigenous peoples. They saw the remnants of the Yukon gold rush, and how self-serving treasure hunters were plundering the countryside and the dignity and viability of the indigenous cultures. But in many ways, they were still firmly rooted in 19th-century science. In the 19th century, the common way to write scientific articles was to create endlessly long descriptions of the physical characteristics of a plants or animals. Most of the publications from the expedition followed this protocol. This approach to biology withered away in the early 20th century.Another example of 19th-century thinking was their perspective on indigenous cultures. Their ethnocentric view regarded the indigenous people as savages. While the scientists remarked in horror that the indigenous cultures were disappearing, they simultaneously felt that adopting modern European-style technology, dress, and customs would somehow be a helpful step for them. The intersection of 19th- and 20th-century science was even evident among different opinions of those on the expedition. Upon seeing the indigenous peoples involved in salmon fishing operations and canning factories, those on the Elder felt different things. Some saw the cannery operations as forced labor, akin to slavery. Other expedition members saw the cannery operations as efficient and effective. Cape Fox ArtifactsOn July 26, 1899, the expedition landed in Cape Fox, at an abandoned Tlingit village. The village had been deserted for about five years, but many piece of Tlingit artwork and totem poles were still there. Some members of the expedition (in protest of other members) removed some of the artifacts from the village. While this has been described by some as looting, it must be considered in the context of the times. Members of the expedition believed that the indigenous cultures of Alaska would soon be extinguished by the encroaching of modern civilization. Their desire was to save to museums what they believed would be the last remnants of the Tlingit artwork and culture. The expedition saw the artifacts as inanimate objects from a deserted village. To the Tlingit, who were living nearby, the artifacts were a sacred part of their identity. The Cape Fox artifacts were indeed preserved in museums. In 2001, a group of scientists retraced the steps of the 1899 Harriman Expedition. The 2001 scientists and crew, including the great-great-granddaughter of Edward Harriman, returned a number of artifacts to the descendants of the original Cape Fox Tlingit residents (Litwin, 2005). ReferencesBurroughs, J. (1901). The Harriman Alaska expedition; Narrative, glaciers, natives; Volume I. New York: Doubleday, Page & Company. Chowder, K. (2003, June). North to Alaska. Smithsonian.Goetzmann, W.H. & Sloan, K. (1982). Looking far north: The Harriman expedition to Alaska, 1899. New York: The Viking Press.Litwin, T. (Ed.) (2005). The Harriman Alaska expedition retraced: A century of change, 18992001. New Brunswick, NJ: Rutgers University Press.External links*Short chronology*University of Washington Libraries Digital Collections  Harriman Alaska Expedition of 1899  254 photographs from 1899 of Edward Harrimans scientific expedition to Alaska, including images of Alaskan Native Americans and their villages, scenic views of the coastline, glaciers and Alaskan towns.de:Harriman-Alaska-ExpeditionHarriman
849683
Christ_the_Redeemer_(statue)
 governing_body Christ the Redeemer () is a statue of Jesus Christ in de Janeiro, Brazil; considered the largest Deco statue in the world and the worlds 5th largest statue. It is  tall, including its  pedestal, and  wide. It weighs 635 tonnes (625 long,700 tons), and is located at the peak of the  Corcovado mountain in the Forest National Park overlooking the city. A symbol of Christianity, the statue has become an icon of Rio and Brazil.()  It is made of reinforced concrete and soapstone, and was constructed between 1922 and 1931.()()()Historyleft|thumb|A view of the statue, as seen from a helicopter.The idea for erecting a large statue atop Corcovado was first suggested in the mid-1850s, when Catholic priest Pedro Maria Boss requested financing from Princess Isabel to build a large religious monument. Princess Isabel did not think much of the idea and it was dismissed in 1889, when Brazil became a republic with laws mandating the of church and state.() The second proposal for a landmark statue on the mountain was made in 1921 by the Catholic Circle of Rio.( The group organised an event called Semana do Monumento (Monument Week) to attract donations and collect signatures to support the building of the statue. The donations came mostly from Brazilian Catholics.( The designs considered for the Statue of the Christ included a representation of the cross, a statue of Jesus with a globe in his hands, and a pedestal symbolizing the world.() The statue of Christ the Redeemer with open arms, a symbol of peace, was chosen.thumb|right|250px|A view of the statue from the base.Local engineer da Silva Costa designed the statue; it was sculpted by French sculptor Landowski.() A group of engineers and technicians studied Landowskis submissions and the decision was made to build the structure out of concrete (designed by Caquot) instead of steel, more suitable for the cross-shaped statue.( The outer layers are soapstone, chosen for its enduring qualities and ease of use.(  Construction took nine years, from 1922 to 1931 and cost the equivalent of . The monument was opened on October 12, 1931.(( The statue was meant to be lit by a battery of floodlights triggered remotely by shortwave radio pioneer Marconi, stationed  away in Rome,() but poor weather affected the signal and it had to be lit by workers in Rio.(In October 2006, on the statues 75th anniversary, Archbishop of Rio Cardinal Oscar Scheid consecrated a chapel (named after the patron saint of BrazilSenhora Aparecida, or Our Lady of the Apparition,) under the statue. This allows Catholics to hold baptisms and weddings there.(thumb|250px|left|A close up view of the face.The statue was struck by lightning during a violent electrical storm on Sunday, February 10, 2008 and suffered some damage on the fingers, head and eyebrows. A restoration effort was put in place by the Rio de Janeiro state government and archdiocese to replace some of the outer soapstone layers and repair the lightning rods installed on the statue.()()()On April 15, 2010 graffiti was sprayed on the statues head and right arm. Mayor Paes called the act a crime against the nation and vowed to jail the vandals, even offering a reward of R$ 10,000 for any information that might lead to an arrest.()() The Military Police eventually identified house painter Paulo Souza dos Santos as the suspect of the act of vandalism. A World Wonder On July 7, 2007, in Lisbon (da Luz), Christ the Redeemer was named one of the Seven Wonders of the World in a list compiled by the Swiss-based The New Open World Corporation.() Leading corporate sponsors, including Bradesco and Globo, had lobbied to have the statue voted into the top seven.()RestorationDeclared a protected monument by the National Heritage Institute, IPHAN, in 2009, the Christ the Redeemer monument underwent restoration work in 1980 before the visit of Germano Wallerstein.In 1990, further restoration work was conducted through an agreement between the Archdiocese of Rio de Janeiro, media company Rede Globo, oil company Shell do Brasil, environment regulator IBAMA, National Heritage Secretariat SPHAN and the city government of de Janeiro.More work on the statue and its environs was conducted in 2003 and early 2010. In 2003, a set of escalators, walkways and elevators was installed to facilitate access to the platform surrounding the statue.The four-month restoration in 2010,( carried out by mining company Vale in partnership with the Archdiocese, focused on the statue itself. The statues internal structure was renovated and its soapstone mosaic covering was restored by removing a crust of fungi and other microorganisms and repairing small cracks. The lightning rods located in the statues head and arms were also repaired. New lighting fixtures would be installed at the root of the statue to produce an all new dynamic lighting effect on the statue.(Christ the Redeemer, YouTube video, accessed January 20, 2011.)The restoration involved one hundred people and used in excess of 60,000 pieces of stone, taken from the same quarry as the original statue.()  During the unveiling of the restored statue, it was illuminated with green and yellow lighting in support of the national football team playing in the FIFA World Cup.(Maintenance work needs to be conducted periodically due to the strong winds and rain to which the statue is exposed.()Portrayal in MediaFile:Christ on Corcovado mountain.JPG|thumb|600px|center|A panoramic view of Christ the Redeemer at the top of Corcovado mountain. In the background is Sugarloaf Mountain (centre) and Bay.Christ the Redeemer is featured in various works of fiction and media. The statue was featured in a major destruction scene in the movie 2012, when its arms collapse, and the rest of the statue fails at the knees and crumbles as it collides with the side of the mountain. This scene was highly controversial, especially when it was featured in a billboard campaign in Los Angeles, when Brazilian Multimedia Designer Sara Vieira spoke out against it. It is featured in the videogames Clancys H.A.W.X, 2,  3, Terranigma, of Duty: Modern Warfare 2, 117: Lost in Rio, IV: Beyond the Sword, Revolution, V and Birds Rio. It briefly appears in the bonus level of Hawks Pro Skater 3 on PlayStation. It can be seen in the video for Jacksons, Runaway and in the video for the Latin group & Yandels Pam video. The statue is also found in an episode of the the Third anime series. It is also seen in the Twilight series, as Edward is on the phone with Jacob in a pivotal scene of New Moon.  The statue watches over fictional Verona Beach in Luhrmanns + Juliet.  It is also shown on the  MTV show La Bam in which Margera battled Vito to win a $1000. It is also in Mr. Magoo. A parody of the statue is also seen in of Warcraft on an island called Janerios Point, the statue was damaged in the Cataclysm revealing a heart filled with riches. It has also been featured in the 2011 animated film Rio and fifth film Five (film) which had a major part based in de Janeiro. In the science fiction anime of the Galactic Heroes the planet Heinessen, capitol of the Free Planets Alliance, has a giant monument to its founder Arle Heinessen in which Heinessen is posed in the same position as Jesus in the Redeemer statue.  The statue is seen in the movie Twilight Saga: New Moon, in the background, when Edward calls Bellas home and Jacob answers the phone. The statue is also briefly shown in the trailer for Twilight Saga: Breaking Dawn as the location of Edward & Bellas honeymoon.See alsoFile:Height comparison of notable statues 01.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Approximate heights of various notable statues:1. Temple Buddha 153 m2. of Liberty 93 m 3. Motherland Calls 91 m4. Lord Murugans Statue in Batu Caves 42.7 m5. Christ the Redeemer 39.6 m 6. Statue of David 5.17 m (sculpture 5.17 m + plinth  approximately 7.7 m)*al Divino Salvador del Mundo, Monument to the Savior of the World Salvador City, El Salvador*Redentore, Christ the Redeemer of Maratea, Italy*of Vung Tau in Vietnam (32 m)*Blessing in Manado, North Sulawesi, Indonesia (30m)*Cristo-Rei in Portugal: a 28 metre high monument of Christ the Redeemer*Rei of Dili: a 27 metre high statue in Dili, Timor-Leste*del Cubilete in Guanajuato, Mexico: a 23 meter high statue inspired by Christ the Redeemer*Cristo Rey in Jalisco: Inspired By Rio de Janeiros one*of the Ozarks in Arkansas, United States: a 20 meter high statue inspired by Christ the Redeemer*of Havana in Havana, Cuba: a 20 metre high statue inspired by Christ the Redeemer*the Redeemer of the Andes (Argentina/Chile)*de la Concordia in Cochabamba, Bolivia*de las Noas in Torren, Mexico*of the Abyss in various underwater locations*Christ the King (),  tall and weighing 440 tonnes.() in wiebodzin, Poland*del Pacfico, Lima, Peru, a 37 metre high statue erected in 2011.*of statues by height References  External links * Official web site* Useful information about Christ the Redeemer Statue (wiki format)* Map * BBC News Video about Poland and the Redeemer Statue* Government bulletin about the statues restoration * Free interactive 3D model of Statue of Christ the Redeemer Msihin heykli  () , -- ()  Redemptor de Rio de JaneiroKrista Spasitele (Rio de Janeiro)RedentorRedentor Kristuse kuju  Redentorde Kristo Savinto (Rio de Janeiro)Berreroslea (Rio de Janeiro)du Christ Rdempteuran Slnaitheoirdo Cristo Redentor   ()Krista IskupiteljaRedemptoroKristus PenebusRedentore  --saRedemptorPesttjs (statuja)RedentorAtpirkjo statulaMegvlt Krisztus szobra    de Verlosserja:(Rio de Janeiro)Chrystusa Zbawiciela w Rio de JaneiroRedentorMntuitorulQispichiq wanka- ()Spasite (Rio de Janeiro) (  )de Janeiron Kristus-patsasRedentor ()  ( )th:sa heykeli()Cha Kit Cu Th (Rio de Janeiro)nga Manurubos (estatuwa)zh:
856794
Fleet_in_being
Image:Arthur Herbert, 1st Earl of Torrington.jpg|thumb|250px|Herbert, 1st Earl of Torrington, originator of the term fleet in being in 1690In warfare, a fleet in being is a naval force that extends a controlling influence without ever leaving port. Were the fleet to leave port and face the enemy, it might lose in battle and no longer influence the enemys actions, but while it remains safely in port the enemy is forced to continually deploy forces to guard against it.  A fleet in being can be part of a denial doctrine but not one of control.Use of the termThe term was first used in 1690, when Lord Torrington, commander of the Navy forces in the Channel, found himself facing a stronger French fleet. He proposed avoiding a sea battle, except under very favourable conditions, until he could be reinforced. By thus keeping his fleet in being, he could maintain an active threat which would force the enemy to remain in the area and prevent them from taking the initiative elsewhere.()Secondary use(Kipling published a series of articles about the British Fleet under the title Fleet in Being in 1898, but did not use the term in the sense described here.)ConceptThe fleet in being concept is based on the assumption that the fleet is relatively safe in port, even if near the enemy. After the of Taranto and the on Pearl Harbor, however, it became obvious that power made a fleet concentrated in a port vulnerable, and a fleet in being was normally no longer a safe option. It is, of course, possible to imagine a situation where a fleet is still relatively safe in harbour, such as because the opponent being unwilling to attack them in harbour for political reasons. After looking at the alternatives; The strategy that was accepted for the Navy in the 1982 War was one of a fleet in being concept ... The fleet would not conduct a direct attack; they would only attack when the odds were in their favor. Otherwise they would remain outside any declared British exclusion zones and wait for a target of opportunity.The idea of a fleet in being can be generalised to forces other than naval. A fortress under siege is essentially an army in being, which ties up enemy forces without leaving the fortress or doing much fighting. During the War, Hussein used his air force with an operational doctrine analogous to fleet in being. ( cite ) The mere presence of the Iraqi Air Force in hardened bunkers forced the coalition attacking Iraq to act cautiously and to escort its bomber sorties until the aircraft shelters were found to be vulnerable.HistoryRusso-Japanese War 19045The first modern example was the stand-off between the Russian Navy and the Japanese Navy (IJN) at Arthur during the War in 1904. Russia possessed three battle fleets: one in the Sea, the second in the Sea, and the third in the  Far East. The Pacific squadron in the Far East was stationed at Vladivostok and Port Arthur. With the latter being closer to the land war, Port Arthur became strategically more important.The IJN possessed only one battle fleet to the Russian Navys three, therefore it was imperative that the IJN not have to fight all three of them. The Treaty of 1902 effectively eliminated the Black Sea fleet by keeping it blocked in the Black Sea, lest they risk war with Britain. However, the Fleet (later re-named the 2nd Pacific Squadron) had orders to reinforce the Port Arthur squadron sometime in 1905.()  It would be the IJNs mission to preempt that move.Only after Port Arthurs fleet in being was eliminated could the Baltic Fleet and Japanese fleet square off; and this would happen the following year, during the of Tsushima in May 1905.In order to permanently eliminate Port Arthurs battle squadron, the IJN initiated three operations. The first was a surprise destroyer torpedo attack inside the harbor in early February 1904,() this was quickly followed up with an attempt to block the harbors entrance by sinking old steam ships (block ships) in the channel.() The third and final attempt of permanently bottling up the fleet was the mining of the waters surrounding the harbors entrance.()  Although this last attempt also failed, it had the un-intended consequence of robbing the Russian Navy of one of its most brilliant naval officers, Admiral Makarov.  When his flagship, the battleship Petropavlovsk, struck one of those mines it sank almost immediately, taking Makarov with it to the bottom.The fleet in being remained so, until under the new command of Admiral Vitgeft, the Port Arthur squadron was ordered to break out and steam for Vladivostok on 10 August 1904.  Vitgefts exit from Port Arthur resulted in the of the Yellow Sea,() an excessively long-ranged gun duel that resulted in no capital warships being sunk on either side, but finally eliminated Port Arthurs fleet in being, as its warships became dispersed to neutral ports (where they were interned), and the survivors were so heavily damaged that they were no longer serviceable.World War IA more modern example is the stand-off between the German Seas Fleet and the British Fleet during War I.  Other than the inconclusive engagement at the of Jutland, Germany preferred to keep its fleet intact rather than taking the risk of losing an engagement with the larger Royal Navy.World War IIIn War II, actions of the Italian Royal Navy (Marina) in 1940 also demonstrate the idea of a fleet in being. After a number of minor battles against the Royal Navy that were mostly lost or inconclusive, the Italian fleet was left in Taranto from where it could sortie very quickly against any British attempt to reach Malta. Because of this threat the British decided to attack the Italian fleet at anchor during the famed of Taranto.  In this action, the British disabled for a long period three Italian battleships, about half of the Italian  Navys battleship strength. Realising that Taranto harbour was no longer safe, the Italians relocated the undamaged ships to ports further away. As a fleet in being is not very effective at a distance, the Italians were forced into combat and suffered repeated losses over the next two years.Even more so than other surface vessels in the German Navy (Kriegsmarine), the powerful German battleship Tirpitz served her entire career as a fleet in being in her own right. Although she never fired a shot at an enemy ship, her mere presence forced the Navy to allocate powerful warships in defending convoys, and caused a major convoy (PQ-17) to scatter, suffering huge losses, mainly to U-boats and aircraft.See also* denial* of the sea* Sea FlotillaNotesReferences***** Further reading *de:Fleet-in-beingin beingin beingin beingzh:
860781
Iwamuro,_Niigata
thumb|300px|Iwamuro onsens beneath the 634m-high Yahiko Mountain in Niigata, Japan was a village located in the former Nishikanbara District, Niigata, Japan. The area is famous for onsen near Yahiko mountain. Farming remains the predominant industry in the area. It is served by National Route 116 and Niigata Route 55.On April 1, 2007, Iwamuro became part of Nishikan-ku ward (, Nishikan-ku?) of Niigata city. HistoryIwamuro, which means stone and room in kanji, lies at the foot of . It was originally surrounded by lagoons and marshes before major irrigation work was undertaken in the late 19th and early 20th century. Nevertheless people have been coming to the area since the Edo period to bathe in naturally-created geothermal waters. Currently there are more than 20 onsens which range in price from cheap (500 yen) to expensive (+20,000 yen). Iwamuros fame stems from its waters perceived healing properties. An apocryphal tale tells of a farmers wife who found a goose with a broken leg. She put it in a hot sulphur-smelling pool near her home. The gooses leg got better. The farmer and his wife then became very rich by opening the first onsen in Iwamuro.Iwamuro w.Behind Yahiko mountain lies the fishing village of Maze. During the period copper mining flourished in the foothills north west of Maze. At its peak, 60 tons of copper were being extracted each month. Output decreased in the 1920s but in 1943, mining was temporarily revived. Work ended at the end of the war.Traditionally Maze was one of the ferry points to the banishment island of Sado. A small watch tower was sited just of north of the village. Samurai were tasked with guarding the shore and questioning all who landed from boats. South of the harbour is Maze Beach, which is popular with surfers. Maze is also famous for its race circuit that holds regular weekend meetings throughout the summer months, attracting sports car drivers from across Japan. GeographyThe sulphurous waters in Iwamuro rise from depths of up to . They have an average surface temperature of 24.3C and are highly saturated in mineral salts. Iwamuro lies on a fault zone between Yahiko mountain and the bedrock beneath the Niigata Plain.  In 2006, due to the number of onsens in the area, additional bore holes were drilled to a depth of .Rice farming is predominant throughout the area although there are several dairy and pig-rearing farms. As the village is on the Niigata plain, the rich soil deposited by the Shinano and River make it ideal for agriculture. DemographicsAs of 2005, the Iwamuro had an estimated population of 9,917 and a density of 274.63 persons per km. Its total administrative area was 36.11 km. On March 21, 2005 Iwamuro was absorbed into the greatly expanded city of Niigata which now included the former towns of Kameda, Kosudo and Yokogoshi from the Nakakanbara District; the town of Nishikawa, the villages of Ajikata, Katahigashi, Nakanokuchi and Tsukigata from Nishikanbara District; and the cities of Niitsu, Shirone and Toyosaka. Since Iwamuro became part of  there have been several changes in the area. For instance local government services have moved to Maki, Iwamuros farming cooperative opened a new rice storage centre centralising grain collection for the entire area In April 2008 after closing six independent silos and the fishing cooperatives of Maze and Niigata city have both merged, although the fish market and boat repair yard both remain open. Iwamuro also has two independent sake makers both located in the heart of the old district at Iwamuro-onsen. Products are sold locally and are of a higher quality than commercially-made rice wine.There are two elementary schools and one Junior High School within Iwamuro.Iwamuro incorporates more than 20 hamlets, villages and townships:*Hiso*Sakai*Hashimoto*Iwamuro-onsen*Ishize*Kubota*Saragase*Kanaike*Minami-yachi*Kitano*Shitatori*Nishinagashima*Tokozone*Araya*Oburajima*Takabatake*Nishifunakoshi*Katakami*Nishinaka*Natsui*Wano*Maze*Kami-WanoSee also* Niigata City* StationExternal links* Niigata official website in Japanese* Niigata Nishikan-ku website in Japanese* ) Iwamuro Folk Song* Iwamuro Onsen Information page in Japaneseja:
863018
Edge_of_Darkness
 website               http://www.bbc.co.uk/cult/ilove/tv/edge/Edge of Darkness is a television drama serial, produced by Television in association with Lionheart Television International and originally broadcast in six fifty-five minute episodes in late 1985. A mixture of crime drama and political thriller, it revolves around the efforts of policeman Ronald Craven (played by Peck) to unravel the truth behind the brutal killing of his daughter Emma (played by Whalley). Cravens investigations soon lead him into a murky world of government and corporate cover-ups and nuclear espionage, pitting him against dark forces that threaten the future of life on Earth.Writer Kennedy Martin was greatly influenced by the political climate of the time, dominated by the Thatcher government, regarded by many on the left as reactionary, and the aura of secrecy surrounding the nuclear industry  and by the implications of the hypothesis of environmentalist Lovelock; these combined to his crafting a thriller that mingled real world concerns with mythic and mystical elements. Kennedy Martins original ending was more fantastic than that eventually used in the finished serial: he had proposed that Craven would turn into a tree but this was vetoed by members of the cast and crew.First broadcast on BBC2, Edge of Darkness was met with such widespread critical acclaim that within days it had earned a repeat on BBC1. Winner of several prestigious awards, it remains highly regarded to this day, often cited as one of the best and most influential pieces of British television drama ever made. The series director, Campbell, filmed a remake, released in January 2010, starring Gibson. Plot  Compassionate Leave On a rainy night, Yorkshire police officer Ronald Craven (Peck) and his daughter Emma (Whalley), a scientist and environmental activist, are confronted by a man with a shotgun just outside Cravens home. The gunman fatally shoots Emma with both barrels, then escapes. Because Craven is a detective involved in many ongoing criminal investigations and has conducted many other investigations in the past, his colleagues almost immediately conclude that he had been the target, and that the shooter was one of the men Craven had put away years earlier. Emma is immediately deemed to have been an innocent bystander. Soon, Craven discovers clues suggesting that Emma was indeed the target.  Going through Emmas belongings, Craven discovers a geiger counter and a gun - the gun clearly registering on the geiger counter, as does a lock of Emmas hair that hed clipped in the morgue. He also finds a radiation badge marked IIF - International Irradiated Fuels Ltd - a British company contracted to store radioactive waste at a low level radioactive waste facility known as Northmoor. Emmas body and her possessions are found to be radioactive. Craven begins experiencing visions of his daughter, but it is unclear whether she is a ghost or a figment of his imagination. Convincing his boss that the killer will end up in London, Craven heads for the city. In London, Craven is contacted by Pendleton (Kay) a polished official attached to the Prime Ministers office, who informs him that Emma was known to the government as a terrorist. Pendleton later receives a visit from CIA agent Darius Jedburgh (Don Baker), an associate who is aware of Emmas previous activities.  In contrast to Pendleton, Jedburgh is played as a hard-hitting professional with a wry sense of humour and an incongruous passion for golf, music and watching dancing on television. Into the Shadows Staying in London, Craven has more intense visions of Emma to which he voices his frustration.  The police find the killers getaway car.  Fingerprints on the car belong to Lowe, a man Craven had arrested ten years earlier. Meanwhile, Pendleton introduces Craven to his colleague, Harcourt (Ian McNeice), who informs him that Emma was a member of a subversive anti-nuclear group called GAIA. A team of six GAIA members led by Emma broke into Northmoor on 8 May 1985; all of whom are now either dead or missing.  Craven meets Emmas boyfriend, Terry Tel Shields (Tim McInnerny), a political agitator who is under surveillance.  Shields - more a socialist than environmentalist - tells Craven that Emma was investigating a hot cell in Northmoor. When Craven looks up his file on computer he finds it is restricted, leading him to speculate that Shields is an informer who passed information about the GAIA raid to the authorities. Seeing Craven make a televised appeal for information about Emmas killer, Jedburgh contacts him and shows Craven the CIAs file on Emmas activities.  The file describes how GAIA and the CIA became suspicious of Northmoor when a nearby reservoir became contaminated with radioactive material, leading them to believe Northmoor was illegally storing plutonium. Along with Harcourt and Pendleton, Jedburgh is keen to find the source and purpose of the plutonium, but there are signs that he has his own plans for Northmoor. Burden of Proof The police close in on their suspect, Lowe (Roy Heather).  Although successfully apprehended, Lowe manages to break free, jumping from the window of his building. Lowe dies in his hospital bed, but not before he tells Craven that he was working with McCroon, whom Craven had convicted while in Northern Ireland.  Ironically, this only strengthens the official theory that Ronald had been the target. Meanwhile, Jedburgh goes to Shieldss home, and finds that he was murdered - as was the occupant of a van that had been surveilling Shieldss home. Craven meets Harcourt and Pendleton at the British House of Commons where an inquiry is taking place into the sale of IIF to The Fusion Corporation of Kansas, owned by Jerry Grogan (Kenneth Nelson). Pendleton tells Craven that he believes Grogan was behind Emmas death. Craven refuses to testify in the IIF inquiry, but his presence there clearly unsettles Robert Bennet (Hugh Fraser), IIFs managing director.  Outside of the hearings, Craven is introduced to Clementine (Zo Wanamaker), with whom Jedburgh worked in the past.  It is Clemmy who informs an incredulous Craven that Jedburgh created GAIA.  Jedburgh confronts Grogan, warning him to stay out of Northmoor.  It is clear both men know each other on hostile terms.  Returning to Yorkshire for Emmas funeral, Craven is refused permission to seek a warrant to enter Northmoor - his superiors stubbornly adhere to the theory that Emma was killed by Lowe and McCroon, and suspect Craven of cracking. Returning home, Craven is observed by McCroon (Sean Caffrey). Breakthrough McCroon, as Craven had expected, breaks into Cravens house intent on killing him.  McCroon, with a shotgun to Cravens head, insists that it was Ronnie and not Emma who had been targeted - revenge for Cravens work exploiting and then abandoning informers in Northern Ireland.  Craven appears unafraid, certain he can get McCroon to tell him who he is working for.  Cryptically, McCroon says they were both marked for death but is then shot by a police marksman - driving Craven into a breakdown.  Briefly hospitalized, Craven returns home and resumes his investigation.  He finds a list apparently of London Underground stations written by Emma - possibly the names of tunnels providing a back door into Northmoor.  Meanwhile, Harcourt and Pendleton investigate the recovery of a womans body from a reservoir near Northmoor.  Though the cause of death was drowning, the body is irradiated.  A pathologist will later testify that the body shows signs of having been in proximity to concentrated fissile material, of the kind found in a reprocessing plant, and that this coincided with an exposure to a criticality accident.  With the help of a colleague, Craven uses a terminal connected to the MI5 computer to find information on GAIA, Northmoor and Emma.  Computer records show that McCroon was acting on the orders of Northmoor Security. He also obtains a three-dimensional map of Northmoor from the computer, and narrowly avoids arrest with Clemmys help when police investigate the security breach. Craven also confronts Godbolt, a mining union functionary Craven had already begun investigating for rigging a union election.  Confident at first, Godbolt wilts when Craven tells him of his investigations of Northmoor.  Godbolt, knowing that disclosure of Northmoor will ruin him, confesses his role in IIF and Emmas death, and reveals the origins of Northmoor.  Craven reunites with Jedburgh  (who is just returning from a mission in Salvador) and learns that the American spys role in creating GAIA resulted from his countrys policy in limiting the worldwide production of plutonium - a policy reversed (according to Jedburgh) during the Administration.  The episode ends with Craven broaching to Jedburgh his idea of breaking into Northmoor. Northmoor Over breakfast, Grogan informs Bennet of Jedburghs plan to break into Northmoor.  With the help of Godbolt, Craven and Jedburgh penetrate Northmoor through old mines.  Tipped off, IIF security try to flood the tunnels, apparently as they had with GAIA.  This requires tons of water already needed to cool their reactor rods.  Surviving the floods, Jedburgh and Craven proceed to Northmoor - on the way, they stumble on the irradiated bodies of the missing members of the GAIA team.  Reaching the hot cell, which sends Cravens geiger counter into a frenzy, the two find the signs of a horrific radiation accident.  The bodies of fatally irradiated personnel still lie where they died. Jedburgh, under orders from the CIA, enters the hot cell and steals the plutonium.  Meanwhile, at the House of Commons inquiry, Bennett is forced to admit the presence of plutonium at Northmoor and the deaths of the GAIA team.  He had informed neither the police nor the civilian nuclear regulatory authorities of this - in violation of regulations and IIFs charter - because, he says, the plutonium belonged to the Ministry of Defence.  Back at Northmoor, as the two intruders escape the hot cell and flee from IIF security forces, Jedburgh gives Ronnie some of the plutonium as evidence, then orders Craven to split from him.  Craven - having been warned by Godbolt to stay on his guard about Jedburgh - wants to know what the CIA man intends to do with the rest of the material.  Jedburgh, telling Craven that he plans to go to Scotland, reiterates his order at gun point and the two part ways.  Craven flees for a bunker - a disused nuclear weapons fire control site.  Now feeling the effects of the radiation, and with the IIF forces flooding the bunker with gas, Craven desperately seeks out a working telephone - the only one he can find dials directly to a disused basement at Downing Street.  A bemused security guard answers the call as Craven screams Get me Pendleton! Fusion Craven wakes up in a hospital on an American Air Force base - showing signs of massive radiation poisoning.  Jedburgh has not been found, and Craven cannot tell them where to look.  Harcourt reports to the Minister, but finds his boss already knows the truth about Northmoor. The IIF plutonium was created by a secret laser process for the Ministry of Defence: the investigation was simply to divert American suspicions. The Americans are searching for Jedburgh as well - but he kills at least four American agents sent to get him.  In Scotland, Jedburgh is also suffering from poisoning, and may be becoming delusional.  Rather than golf, Jedburghs plans in Scotland involve an appearance at a NATO conference on directed energy weapons held at the Hotel in Scotland. Also present at the conference is Grogan who arrives with the news that the British government has approved the purchase of IIF.  Before a roused audience, Grogan delivers a coldly passionate address on the power of fusion, invoking the spirit of historic explorers and boldly proclaiming mans destiny to become a celestial warrior and establish a solar empire. The audience of military and civilian officials applauds but Jedburgh, in U.S. Army uniform, takes the podium to denounce Grogans vision for a nuclear state.  Finishing his speech, he gleefully reveals two bars of the plutonium stolen from Northmoor, yelling Get it while its hot.  The audience, bemused at first, breaks into a panic and flees the room.  With only Grogan left, Jedburgh brings together the two bars, causing a  criticality incident and irradiating Grogan.With Clemmys car, Craven drives to Scotland.  His sickness worsening, Craven stops near a stream, where Emma appears.  She tells Craven of a time in Earths distant and frigid past when black flowers grew, warming the Earth and preventing life from becoming extinct. These same black flowers have returned, she says, to save Earth from its latest enemy - mankind.  Once the flowers have spread, the absorbed heat will melt the polar icecaps, washing mankind away. Tracking Jedburgh down to a remote country house, Craven learns that the American has weaponized the remaining plutonium by wrapping it around a plastic explosive core, it can be detonated even at the bottom of a loch by shooting it with a plutonium bullet.  Craven tells Jedburgh that Grogan had expected the inquiry to block his acquisition of Northmooor; his mission to steal the plutonium was set up by the CIA to ensure the industrialist kept control of the material.  Unbeknownst to both men, a hit squad is nearing the house.  Among other things, they carry a coffin shaped box carrying radiation warning labels.  Inside the house, the pair have a final rambling conversation - touching the appearance of the black flower, the song Time of the Preacher and the likely victor in the battles of good and evil, and between Earth and mankind; The black flower is real, Jedburgh tells Craven - hes seen it in Afghanistan.  The American is convinced that mankind will find a way to survive, but Craven doubts this, and declares that if it comes to war between mankind and the planet hes on the side of the planet. Jedburgh, expecting the assassins, leaves Craven when they break into the house, determined to get as many as he can.  Ultimately killing Jedburgh, the team spares Craven, the squad leader pointing out to the others that Cravens on our side. Outraged, Craven bellows I am not on your side! as they leave.(BBC, 1983 :the death of Jedburgh)In the final scene, Pendleton and Harcourt observe IIFs retrieval of the plutonium from a nearby loch, where Jedburgh had hidden it. A voiceover by Harcourt, in the form of a letter to Clemmy concerning the events, reveals that Grogan is also dying from the radiation exposure he received at the hotel. Pendleton and Harcourt spot Craven watching the retrieval operation from a nearby hill. Harcourt laments his inability to comfort Craven, wanting to reassure the detective that Gaia will be safe and that good will triumph over evil - knowing that Craven simply would not believe it.  As he watches the recovery team leave the area, and knowing his life is at an end, Craven wails Emmas name one last time.Time passes.  The waves lap against a nameless shore over nights and days.  The camera pans against the side of snow covered hill where black flowers bloom, harbingers of Gaias coming war against mankind. Principal credits  Cast Ronald Craven was played by Bob Peck, an actor who was well known in theatre but, at the time he was cast as Craven, had appeared in only minor roles on television. In creating the role of Craven, Peck drew upon his experience gained from the two years he played the title role in Macbeth for the Shakespeare Company.() Notable roles after Edge of Darkness included On the Black Hill (1987), Slipstream (1989), Natural Lies (1992) and Jurassic Park (1993). He died in 1999.()Whalley, who played Emma Craven, began acting during childhood, appearing in the long-running opera Street (1960present) in 1976 at the age of 10. She had also appeared in supporting roles in several series including Bravo (19801985), Bergerac (19811991) and Ace of Spies (1983). Following Edge of Darkness, Whalley was cast in the equally well regarded BBC television serial Singing Detective (1986), written by Potter. Moving to Hollywood, she appeared in such films as Willow (1988), Scandal (1989) and Shattered (1991) as well as television mini-series such as Scarlett (1994) and Jackie Bouvier Kennedy Onassis (2000). During her eight year marriage to the actor Kilmer, between 1988 and 1996, she was often credited as Joanne Whalley-Kilmer.()Cast as Darius Jedburgh was Don Baker, who had been acting since the 1960s and was known for his roles in Westerns such as Gunsmoke (19551975) and as the lead in the detective series Eischied (19791980).  He also starred as Sherriff Buford Pusser in the original 1972 film Tall. The script of Edge of Darkness so impressed him that he agreed to take the part at lower than his usual fee.(Pixley, Get It While Its Hot, p. 56.) He was later cast, by Edge of Darkness director Martin Campbell, as CIA agent Jack Wade in the Bond film GoldenEye (1995), a role he reprised in Never Dies (1997).()Charles Kay, who played Pendleton, was a well established character actor who had appeared in of Eagles (1974), I, Claudius (1976) and The Devils Crown (1978). He has since acted in many television productions such as Fortunes of War (1989), Darling Buds of May (19911993), Creek (19972004) and Murders (1997present).()Edge of Darkness was an early role for Ian McNeice, who played Harcourt. He went on to act in a wide variety of film and television parts including Englishman Who Went Up a Hill But Came Down a Mountain (1995), Ventura: When Nature Calls (1995) and Herberts Dune (2000) as well as regular roles in Martin (2004present) and Rome (20052007).()Several other familiar faces to British viewers appeared during the course of the episodes, including Woodvine (as Cravens superior DCS Ross), McInnerny (as Emmas boyfriend Terry Shields), Hugh Fraser (as IIF chief executive Robert Bennett), Wanamaker (as intelligence agent Clementine) and 7 cast members David Jackson (as Colonel Lawson) and Croucher (as Northmoor security chief Connors). Playing themselves were television reporters Cook and Kendall, weatherman Giles and Labour MP Meacher. Long-standing BBC visual effects designer Irvine, who contributed visual effects to the series, received a brief cameo as a police diver in Breakthrough. Crew Writer Kennedy Martin was the creator of the long-running BBC police drama Z-Cars (19621978). He also wrote the screenplay for the films Italian Job (1969) and Heroes (1970) and scripts for television series such as Colditz (19721974), Sweeney (19751978) (which was created by his brother Kennedy Martin) and Reilly, Ace of Spies (1983). Following Edge of Darkness, he wrote the screenplays for the films Heat (with Walter Hill) (1988) and Bravo Two Zero (1999).() He died in September 2009.()Director Campbell had developed a reputation for handling action thrillers with credits including The Professionals (19771983), Minder (19791994) and Shoestring (19791980). A few years after Edge of Darkness, Campbell moved into feature films, directing the James Bond films GoldenEye (1995) and Casino Royale (2006) as well as Mask of Zorro (1998), Limit (2000) and Legend of Zorro (2005).()Producer Wearing had worked on for Today for which he had produced Bleasdales The Black Stuff (1978) and which he and Bleasdale subsequently spun off into the highly acclaimed from the Blackstuff (1982). He also produced the conspiracy thriller Bird of Prey (1982). Following Edge of Darkness he continued to be one of British televisions most high profile and successful producers, appointed Head of Serials at the BBC between 1989 and 1998 where he was responsible for such programmes as Pride and Prejudice (1995), Friends in the North (1996) and Dennis Potters final two plays Karaoke (1996) and Lazarus (1996).()Patterson, who acted as series adviser, was a leading commentator on nuclear affairs, best known for his book Nuclear Power (Penguin, 19761986). Following Edge of Darkness, he acted as specialist adviser to the British House of Commons Select Committee on Environment for their 1986 study, Radioactive Waste. He continues to contribute to the policy debate about energy and environmental issues.() Advice on the policing aspects of the serial was provided by the Yorkshire Police and former Yard detective Slipper, famous for his pursuit of the train robber Biggs.(Pixley, Get It While Its Hot, p. 55.) Music The musical score was provided by Clapton and Kamen. Clapton was approached to provide the score by producer Michael Wearing.(Vanezis, Magnox: The Secrets of Edge of Darkness.) Shortly afterwards, when Michael Kamen brought Clapton to a screening of Brazil (1985), which he, Kamen, had scored, Eric suggested a collaboration between the two on Edge of Darkness.() Kamen became one of Hollywoods most successful film composers, writing the scores for many blockbuster films including the Weapon series (19871998) (with Eric Clapton), the first three Hard films (1988, 1990, 1995), Hood: Prince of Thieves (1991) and X-Men (2000). He died in 2003.()Aside from the Clapton/Kamen soundtrack, Nelsons The Time of the Preacher, New Model Armys Christian Militia, and Waits 16 Shells From A Thirty-Ought-Six are featured in the series. Christian Militia is on the record player when Terrys body is found. Craven listens to The Time of the Preacher when he is in Emmas room in the first episode. It later emerges Jedburgh is familiar with the song and both he and Craven sing it on two occasions, the lyrics being significant.The Broadcasting Corporation used the music to illustrate stories on the disaster the following year. Eric Clapton and Michael Kamen performed the movies main theme with the Philharmonic Orchestra during the Nights period in 1990 and 1991.(http://www.amazon.com/dp/B000002LN9) Background  Origins I am writing this story about a detective who turns into a tree was what writer Troy Kennedy Martin told his colleagues when asked what he was working on during the early nineteen-eighties.(Kennedy Martin, Introduction.) Kennedy Martin had become frustrated that at the BBC there was no political dimension to their drama whatsoever but had chosen to write a political story anyway, not really believing it would ever get made.( The election of Margaret Thatcher as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom and Reagan as of the United States had brought about a major shift in the global political landscape and Kennedy Martin was motivated to write out of concern arising from such issues as the Greenham Common protests, the War, unrest among the miners and, arising out of the escalation of the War, the fear that born-again Christians and Cold War warriors appeared to be running the United States.(By 1983, Kennedy Martin had written the first draft of what would eventually become Edge of Darkness  at this stage it was called Magnox (a reference to the Magnox type of reactor) and was about union problems in the nuclear industry.(Pixley, Get It While Its Hot, p. 52.) The script was given to BBC Head of Drama Series & Serials, Jonathan Powell, who encouraged Kennedy Martin to continue its development.(Pixley, Get It While Its Hot, p. 53.) The script would go though many changes and revisions before reaching its final form.A particular influence was the speech made by President Ronald Reagan on 23 March 1983 announcing the Defense Initiative (SDI) which, using ground-based and space-based systems, proposed protecting the United States from attack by nuclear missiles.( One of the supporters of SDI was one-time US presidential candidate LaRouche, on whom Kennedy Martin based the character of Jerry Grogan, owner of the Fusion Corporation of Kansas.( Kennedy Martin was also influenced by the culture of secrecy surrounding the UKs policy regarding nuclear power in light of the inquiry into the construction of the B nuclear power station and the concerns about the safety record of the Sellafield nuclear power plant; this led him to conceive International Irradiated Fuels and its chief executive Robert Bennett.(The other major influence was the Gaia hypothesis, that the Earth is a single living system that self-regulates to maintain the optimum conditions for life, formulated by climate scientist James Lovelock and popularised in his 1979 book Gaia: A new look at life on Earth. Kennedy Martin used the name GAIA for the environmental organisation Emma Craven was involved in and drew the notion for the black flowers seen at the serials conclusion from a passage in Lovelocks book that describes a dark marsh grass that grew on the surface of the Earth trapping heat during a time when the planet was too cold to sustain life.(Although Kennedy Martins notion for the serial was influenced by real political events, he had for a long time railed against naturalism in television drama  most notably in a 1964 article for the theatre magazine Encore, titled Nats Go Home. First Statement of a New Drama for Television, in which he sought to free the camera from photographing dialogue, to free the structure from natural time and to exploit the total and absolute objectivity of the television camera.(Cooke, British Television Drama: A History, p. 64) Edge of Darkness producer Michael Wearing has noted that there is a mystical dimension to Troys imagination. His instincts are visual and non-naturalistic.(Lavender, Edge of Darkness (Troy Kennedy Martin), p. 104.) Kennedy Martin, therefore, crafted a serial that on the one hand placed its events squarely within the real, present day world but on the other also placed itself within the realm of the mystical and the mythic.(Lavender, Edge of Darkness (Troy Kennedy Martin), p. 112.) Realism and authenticity was provided by the appearances of real life television presenter Sue Cook and Labour MP Michael Meacher. There was also use of contemporary stock footage, such as Days interview with Margaret Thatcher and references to real persons like Heseltine and places such as Sellafield, alongside the references to fictitious characters and places contained in the plot. The mystical dimension is provided by Emmas ghost while the mythic is provided by Craven himself and by Jedburgh and Grogan. Kennedy Martin, influenced by Darraghs The Real Camelot (Thames and Hudson, 1981) which examined the pagan origins of the Arthurian legend, saw Craven as a modern day Man who would confront the threats to the Earth on behalf of Gaia.( Jedburgh was conceived by Kennedy Martin as a Knight of the Marches, one of the Knights who defended the borders of Europe, opposed to Grogan, who Kennedy Martin saw as a descendant of the Templar who, according to legend, had guarded a special wisdom in the Temple of the of the Rock in Jerusalem.( These aspects would reach their apotheosis in the serials conclusion in which Kennedy Martin envisaged that Craven, having found the plutonium stolen by Jedburgh, would be shot by a sniper and would be transformed into a tree.( Production By 1983, Jonathan Powell was keen to put the serial into production and offered the scripts to producer Michael Wearing who was immediately impressed by the scenes in the first episode, Compassionate Leave, depicting Cravens reaction to Emmas death, describing them as the most sustained evocation of individual grief in bereavement that I can remember.(Pixley, Get It While Its Hot, p. 54.) The budget was set at 2 million, of which 400,000 came from an American co-producer, Lionheart Television International.( Director Martin Campbell came on board shortly afterwards and soon clashed with Troy Kennedy Martin, demanding rewrites, in particular to the notion that Craven had known about Emmas involvement with GAIA right from the start; this was removed at Campbells behest.(Pixley, Get It While Its Hot, p. 54 - 55.) Further clashes over the script occurred between Kennedy Martin and star Bob Peck over the conclusion in which his character would turn into a tree; Peck recalled that it didnt seem to be working in script terms, it seemed as though we wouldnt be able to make it work for the audience,( a view echoed by Michael Wearing who felt that it was likely not to come off as an effect.( Kennedy Martin capitulated, introducing instead the concept of the black flowers seen in the finished production. However, some elements of Kennedy Martins original vision persist in the final script: for example, in episode three, Burden of Proof, the ghost of Emma urges Craven, as he undergoes a breakdown, to be strong, like a tree.(Lavender, Edge of Darkness (Troy Kennedy Martin), p. 113.)Shooting on Edge of Darkness began on 9 July 1984( and ran for five months until 5 December 1984.(Pixley, Into The Shadows, p. 50.) Location filming took place in London (including the Arts Centre, Television Centre and the Hilton International Kensington), Yorkshire (including the headquarters of the West Yorkshire Police in Bradford, the headquarters of Systime Computers {now the O2 building} in Leeds where Craven hacks into the MI5 computer and at Westwood Cottage, Ilkley for Cravens home), Scotland (including the Gleneagles Hotel, where Jedburgh addresses the NATO conference and also where President Reagans Reykjavik policy was formulated(Inglis, Citizenship and the Media, p. 55.)) and Wales (including Gold Mine and Manod, Ffestiniog doubling as Northmoor with the hot cell a set constructed at a factory in Penygroes).(Pixley, Into The Shadows, passim) Throughout the entire shoot, the production continued to be known as Magnox; the title Dark Forces was briefly considered before the serial was renamed Edge of Darkness in April 1985.( As the shoot progressed it became apparent to the cast and crew that they had a potential hit on their hands; Bob Peck recalled, I think we knew when we were making it that it was a good piece of work() while Kennedy Martin told reporters I havent had this feeling about something for 20 years. Its wonderful, after all this time, to get something that actually works.( Broadcast and critical reception Edge of Darkness was promoted on the cover of the magazine Times and was broadcast on Monday nights on BBC2 at 9:30pm, beginning 4 November 1985.(Pixley, Into The Shadows, p. 51.) The serial averaged an audience of 4 million viewers over its run.(Cooke, British Television Drama: A History, p. 147.) The critical response was generally positive with most commentators concentrating their praise on Pecks performance as Craven and the scale of the programmes political themes.( A good television thriller is very hard to find but Edge of Darkness promises to be one of the best, wrote Celia Brayfield in Times, The central character is played by Bob Peck, who has the gift of looking tragic and intelligent simultaneously. ... There was humour to lift the gloom and superb characterisation to flesh out the stock situation.()  Ruth Baumgarten, in The Listener, praised the serial as a grandiosely ambitious and compelling piece of fiction.( Speaking on the BBCs review programme You See...?, the writer Dunant said, this is a very classy piece of television drama, on all levels, I think on the plot level, I think on the level of emotion and I think stylistically ... it looks absolutely wonderful, its shot like a feature film.() Not so impressed was Byron Rogers, television critic of Sunday Times, who initially hailed the series as one that stayed in the mind and will stay there long ... because of its portrayal of human grief() but later felt he was beginning to find Edge of Darkness slightly irritating() and decried the final episode as an insult to its considerable following.()Aware of the critical buzz surrounding the show, BBC1 Controller, Grade, quickly announced that the series would be repeated on BBC1, stating, I think it will reach a wider audience and it deserves it, and so Edge of Darkness was duly shown, in double episodes, over three consecutive nights between 19 December and 21 December 1985, the fastest time between original broadcast and repeat in the BBCs history.(Pixley, Into The Shadows, p. 52.) These repeats were accompanied by a disclaimer that the GAIA organisation depicted in the programme was not connected with the Gaia publishing company supported by Prince Philip.( It was a move that paid off  Edge of Darkness doubled its audience on BBC1 to 8 million viewers.( Cultural significance Edge of Darkness tapped into a cultural zeitgeist of concern about nuclear power and nuclear warfare in the early to mid nineteen-eighties. In 1980, current affairs programme Panorama broadcast If The Bomb Drops, a documentary that examined how well prepared Britain was for a nuclear attack; in 1983, Day After an American TV movie about a nuclear war aired; in 1984, the BBC broadcast On the Eighth Day, a documentary about the effects of a winter and Threads, a drama about a nuclear attack on Sheffield while 1985 saw the first screening of Watkins nuclear war television film War Game, banned on television since 1965.(Kibble-White, Lets All Hide In The Linen Cupboard.)  Edge of Darkness also rode on a wave of preoccupation with the secretive nature of the State in both fact (e.g. This Weeks on the Rock (1988) about the deaths of three IRA members in Gibraltar and Secret Society (1987) about undisclosed matters of public interest which led to the sacking of BBC Director General Milne) and fiction (e.g. the films of the Realm (1985) and The Whistle Blower (1987) and the television serials Very British Coup (1988) and Traffik (1989)).(Lavender, Edge of Darkness (Troy Kennedy Martin), p. 107.)Edge of Darkness continues to be well regarded to this day. When it was repeated on BBC2 in 1992, Sean Day-Lewis wrote in Daily Telegraph, Edge of Darkness is a masterpiece. It is one of those very rare television creations so rich in form and content that the spectator wishes there was some way of prolonging it indefinitely.(Lavender, Edge of Darkness (Troy Kennedy Martin), p. 103 - 104.) Andrew Lavender, writing in British Television Drama in the 1980s, has said that Edge of Darkness captured the spirit of its age but went far beyond the drama of its time. ... It pushed against expectations attaching to the thriller form, often transcending the limits of the genre.(Lavender, Edge of Darkness (Troy Kennedy Martin), p. 103.) Inglis, in his analysis of the serial in Formations: 20th Century Media Studies, takes it as one of the most remarkable works of art made for British television.( According to Lez Cooke, in British Television Drama: A History, In a reactionary climate, when the possibilities for the production of social issue drama were limited, Edge of Darkness proved that, by adapting to changed circumstances and adopting a serialised thriller format, it was still possible to produce ambitious and progressive television drama in Britain in the mid-1980s,(Cooke, British Television Drama: A History, p. 148.) a view echoed by Sean Cubit in EcoMedia who notes that the series neatly echoed the chill that descended on radical politics in the Thatcher years in the United Kingdom.(Cubitt, Edge of Darkness: eco-terrorism and the public sphere, p. 79.) The television historian Andrew Pixley has described the series as possibly the finest BBC drama ever made( and one of the few television programmes where every element can be said to have worked to complete effect.(Pixley, Into The Shadows, p. 53.)Edge of Darkness was placed fifteenth (fourth position out of the dramas featured on the list) on the Film Institutes list of the Greatest British Television Programmes in 2000,() the BFI describing it as a gripping, innovative six-part drama which fully deserves its cult status and many awards..() Radio Times television editor Alison Graham listed it as one of the forty greatest television programmes ever made in 2003.() It was one of only seven dramas listed in Broadcast magazines list of the fifty most influential television programmes, published in July 2004.() In March 2007, Edge of Darkness was placed third in 4s list of the Greatest TV Dramas.() Also on Channel 4, Darius Jedburgh was listed eighty-fourth in their list of the One Hundred Greatest TV Characters in 2001.() Awards Edge of Darkness received eleven nominations and won six awards at the 1986 Awards:()* Won: Best Drama Series/Serial (Martin Campbell & Michael Wearing)* Won: Best Actor (Bob Peck).* Nominated: Best Actor (Joe Don Baker).* Nominated: Best Actress (Joanne Whalley).* Won: Best Original Television Music (Eric Clapton & Michael Kamen).* Won: Best Film Cameraman (Andrew Dunn).* Won: Best Film Editor (Ardan Fisher, Dan Rae).* Won: Best Film Sound (Dickie Bird, Rob James, Christopher Swantoni, Tony Quinn).* Nominated: Best Makeup (Daphne Croker).* Nominated: Best Graphics (Andy Coward, Linda Sherwood-Page).* Nominated: Best Design (Graeme Thompson).At the 1986 Press Guild television critics awards, Edge of Darkness won two awards:(* Won: Best Actor (Bob Peck) (joint winner with Kingsley for Marner).* Nominated: Best Actor (Joe Don Baker).* Won: Best Drama Series. Hollywood adaptation In 2010, a Hollywood remake of the show was released in cinemas. It was released on 28 January in the UK, 29 January in the US and 4 February in Australia. Mel Gibson plays Detective Craven. The film is directed by Martin Campbell, who also directed the original. Other media Edge of Darkness was released on VHS videotape by the BBC in 1987.(Pixley, Into the Shadows, p. 53.) There was also a release from CBS/Fox Video in North America at the same time. The soundtrack was also released as an album entitled Edge of Darkness.Troy Kennedy Martins original script for episode one and the final scripts for episodes two to six of the serial were published by and Faber in 1990; the script book also included an introduction by Kennedy Martin and two appendices  the first giving background to the story and the main characters and the second giving comments on the script by experts on nuclear power and police procedures.()The serial was re-issued on VHS in 1998 by Revelation Films who also issued the serial on DVD in 1999.( In 2003, Worldwide re-issued Edge of Darkness on DVD (encoded for both regions 2 and 4) with several extra features including Magnox: The Secrets of Edge of Darkness, a specially made making-of documentary; an isolated soundtrack of Eric Clapton and Michael Kamens score; a Bob Peck interview from BBC Time; a contemporary report on the programmes BAFTA wins and coverage of the programmes wins at the Broadcasting Press Guild awards.(Edge of Darkness (DVD), BBC Worldwide, 2003.) A Region 1 DVD set was released on 3 November 2009. See also * Edge of Darkness, the soundtrack album for the series, by Eric Clapton and Michael Kamen. Notes  References * * * * * * * * * * *  External links * * * * Edge of Darkness at the Film Institutes Screenonline* Interview with Troy Kennedy Martin (circa 2004)Rande der Finsternisof Darkness (televisieserie)krawdzi mrokuof Darkness
867058
Crazywell_Pool
 frozen Crazywell Pool or Crazy Well Pool(Also known as Clazywell, Classenwell or Classiwell Pool, according to Hemery (see below).) is a large pond situated about  south of Princetown just off the path between Burrator and Whiteworks on the western side of Dartmoor, Devon, England at . It is about  long and has a surface area of about .The pool is thought to be the result of excavations by tin miners,() and is either a flooded shaft, or a reservoir. The presence of tin workings downhill from the pool support this view.  The valley (Newleycombe Lake) has been extensively worked with many mining remains along its short length. The level of the pool never varies much from its meanit is maintained by a hidden spring and by subterranean drainage at its lower end.( Near to the pool is Crazywell Cross, one of the line of crosses that marked the ancient track between Abbey and Abbey.In 1998, Nathaniel Burton, a sixteen-year-old recruit in the Royal Marines died in Crazywell Pool.  He was taking part in a routine training exercise and drowned while crossing the icy waters of the pool.(. (Subscription required for online access))(. (Subscription required for online access))LegendsThere are no natural lakes on Dartmoor, which may be one reason why Crazywell Pool has attracted more than its share of local legends. It was once believed to be bottomless, and according to local legend the parishioners of Walkhampton (or Sheepstor) brought up the bell ropes from the parish church to test its depth. Even after tying the ropes togethera total length of over 500 feet(and weighting the end, it is claimed they were still unable to reach the bottom.() This legend was disproved in the dry summer of 1844 when the pool was almost completely pumped out by the Plymouth Dock Water Company to supplement the water supply of Leat which runs along the hillside not far above the pool.() The reality is that the pool is about  deep at the western end and considerably less at the eastern end.thumb|left|The ancient cross next to the poolCrazywell Pool is the subject of other Dartmoor superstitions. The level was said to rise and fall with the tides at sea,( and it was claimed that at dusk the waters call out the name of the next parishioner to die; their face can be seen reflected in the pool at midnight on Midsummers Eve.()The pool was also said to be haunted during the Ages by the Witch of Sheepstor, who gave people bad advice. Legend says she advised Piers Gaveston, who owned the of Dartmoor from 1308, and who was in hiding here after being banished from the kings court, telling him to return to court predicting that his humbled head shall soon be high. Instead, he was captured by the kings enemies and beheaded and his head was set up on high battlements.(()More recently two young men were said to have gone to the pool at midnight one Midsummers Eve on a motorbike for a dare, but they never returned because on their way back the motorbike came off the road, killing them both.(thumb|upright|Mine working below the poolReferencesExternal links*Newspaper travel reviewPool
868657
The_Thumb
thumb|320px|Much of the Thumb is characterized by rolling farmland such as thisThe Thumb is a region and a peninsula of Michigan, so named because the Lower Peninsula is shaped like a mitten; thus the Thumb is the area that looks like the thumb of the mitten. The Thumb is a subregion of the Flint/Tri-Cities region, also branded as the Blue Water Area of Michigan.The counties which constitute the Thumb are those forming the extended peninsula that stretches northward into Huron and Bay. There is no formal declaration for which of these counties are part of the Thumb. However, virtually all common definitions include Huron, Tuscola, and Sanilac counties. This definition is almost always extended to include Lapeer and St. Clair counties as well.EconomyThe Thumb region is very flat with fertile soil, the reason for its historical role as a chiefly agricultural area. Major agricultural products are beets, beans,(Saginaw Valley Dry Bean and Sugar Beet Research Farm, State University.) corn, fruits, and fish from the Bay and Huron. Few of the residents commute for work to Detroit or Flint or the Tri-Cities. Large cities in the Thumb area are Port Huron, Lapeer, Marysville, St. Clair, Sandusky, Bad Axe, and Caro. The majority of these cities are in the southern portion of the Thumb.IndustrySee also: of companies based in MichiganThe Thumb has many notable businesses, many linked to agriculture.*Intertape Polymer Group, Inc. has a major factory in Marysville.*Cargill Salt operates a large salt mine and factory in St. Clair. This is the only plant in the U.S.A. that produces Alberger salt, which is especially prized in the fast food industry because of its higher volume (due to its unique shape) and lower sodium content (for a given volume, not weight). This is part of Michigans large salt-mining industry.*Cooperative Elevator Company has been named the top Michigan Agriculture Exporter by the Michigan Department of Agriculture.() Its headquarters are in Pigeon, and it has branch elevators in Deckerville, Akron, Gagetown, Sebewaing, Elkton, and Bad Axe.File:DTE St Clair.jpg|thumb|right|Edisons Clair Power Plant, once the largest in the world.*Edison is the operator of five power plants in the Thumb area: St. Clair and River Power Plants in East China Township, Marysville Power Plant in Marysville , Harbor Beach Powerplant, and Greenwood Energy Center in Greenwood Township.*AgroSciences Harbor Beach manufactures agricultural chemicals: weed killer, fungicides, fertilizers and plant nutrients and herbicides.()*Mueller Industries owns and operates Mueller Brass in Port Huron.()*Trunk Western Railway has a major rail yard in Port Huron Township.*Marysville Hydrocarbons is an ethanol plant in Marysville.*Michigan Ethanol, a partner of Broin Companies, operates a ethanol production facility in southwest Caro.*Sugar Company, an cooperative owned by 1200 farmers, operates four plants in the area. It is the successor to the 100-year-old Big Chief and Pioneer Sugar companies.() Local plants are located in Caro, Sebewaing, Croswell, and headquarters in Bay City.*Domtar operates a paper mill in Port Huron.*Technologies Corporation, Harbor Beach, makes food flavors and colors, yeast dehydrated products and vegetable protein extract.()*Star of the West Milling Co.() which has grain elevators in Vassar and Cass City, joined with Eastern Michigan Grain in Emmett.()Tourismthumb|The Pointe aux Barques Light, near the tip of the Thumb.Some towns, such as Bay Port, Caseville, Harbor Beach, Lakeport, Lexington, Port Austin, Port Hope, Port Huron, Port Sanilac, Sebewaing, and St. Clair enjoy seasonal tourism, due to their locations on Huron, Bay, or Clair River. The Thumb lies within the east-central tourism region of the state()The of The Thumb Heritage Water Trail is a nonprofit citizens organization working with the Huron County Parks to establish and maintain a water trail along Michigans Lake Hurons shoreline.(of The Thumb Heritage Water Trail)Unique to the ThumbUnique features in the area include the following:*Algonac, known as the Venice of Michigan because of its many canals, is a part of the largest freshwater delta in the world, that of the Clair River into Lake St. Clair.*Bad Axe was named after a broken axe found lodged in the knot of a tree at the clearing of the settlements chief crossroads.()*Bay Port, is the worlds largest freshwater fishing port.*Harbor Beach is the home of the largest man-made harbor and the Beach Light.*Harvest Wind Farm, an generation project of John Deere Wind Energy and Wolverine Power Supply Cooperative.* Huron County Nature Center includes a  wilderness arboretum that has been under the care of the Huron County Womens Clubs for more than 50 years.()*Kernan Memorial Nature Sanctuary is a  refuge with  of shoreline acquired October 30, 1989 on Huron, in Huron County. On the western coast of Whiskey Harbor, this area is a great place to see migratory birds in early March and November.()*Kinde was once the bean capital of the world.  Michigan soup has been a staple for over a hundred years in the U.S. Senate dining room.(Michigan Bean Soup recipe and history, the Honorable and Mrs. D. Rockefeller IV, U.S. Senator.)*Pigeon is the home of the Cooperative Elevator Company, one of the largest grain elevators in the state.*Port Huron is the maritime capital of the Lakes, where Huron flows into the Clair River. This is the largest city in the Thumb area. It was the boyhood home of Edison.*The Sanilac Petroglyphs were discovered after massive fires swept the Lower Peninsula in 1881. Native Americans created this unusual artwork 300 to 1,000 years ago. The petroglyphs provide a glimpse into the lives of an ancient woodland people who occupied Michigans Thumb area.*Sebewaing is the beet capital of the world, and home to one of the four Sugar Company factories in the Thumb region. The sugar companies were organized with money from barons such as Rasmus Hanson.()*St. Clair boasts the worlds largest boardwalk along freshwater, the Clair River.*Underwater Preserves are protected areas of the Lakes on Michigans coast. There are nineteen major shipwrecks in the  of the Area Bottomland Preserve and the Shores Underwater Preserve which expands a total of  of Huron.*Caseville is the home of the annual in Caseville festival, a hometown festival devoted to Buffetts song in Paradise.Traveling around the ThumbA favorite of tourists who visit this area is traveling the Huron and Bay shoreline via M-25 (formerly 25 until 1973). M-25 starts at the end of I-69/I-94 in Port Huron at the foot of the Water Bridge and ends in Bay City. The whole route is about , and passes through quaint cities and villages. Along M-25 you can see five lighthouses: Gratiot Lighthouse, Sanilac lighthouse, aux Barques Lighthouse, Beach Light, and the Austin Lighthouse.The Lakes Circle Tour is a designated scenic road system connecting all of the Great Lakes and the St. Lawrence River.(Great Lakes Circle Tour.) Port Huron in eastern Michigan is a good starting point for the circle tour of Lake Huron. M-25 winds around the Thumb and along the Saginaw Bay to Saginaw and Bay City. Do not forget to go to the beach and walk the boardwalks in Lexington and Port Austin.Sanilac Light (Port Sanilac Mich).jpg|thumb|300 px|right|Lighthouse at Port Sanilac on Lake HuronLighthouse TourIn order from east to west:*Lightship -- Huron / Clair River -- Port Huron*Gratiot Light -- Lake Huron / St. Clair RiverPort Huron*Port Sanilac Light -- Lake Huron-- Port Sanilac -- Private*White Rock Memorial Light -- Lake Huron -- White Rock -- Private*Beach Light -- Lake Huron -- Harbor Beach*aux Barques Light -- Lake Huronnear Port Hope*Austin Light -- Lake Huron -- Port Austin*Island Light -- Bay*River Light -- RiverArea festivals and events*Antique and Yard Sale Trail 2nd weekend in August, (Algonac to Sebewaing)*Art on the River, third week in June, St. Clair.*Art on the Avenue, downtown Port Huron, 3rd week in August.* around the state.*Bay Port Fish Sandwich Festival (Bay Port)*Blue Water Ramble (St. Clair) Annual International Bicycling Event along the Clair River in Michigan and Canada, involving two boat crossings, first weekend in October.()*Boat Night(Family Night a/k/a Boat Night.) & Huron to Mackinac Boat Race(Port Huron to Mackinac Island, Michigan Yacht Race) (Port Huron to Mackinac Island)(Morris, Julie The Port Huron to Mackinac race, May 1, 2001 News)*Cheeseburger in Caseville Festival (Caseville)(Cheesburger in Caseville at Michigan.)(Campbell, Ron.  August 13, 2010  Cheeseburger in Caseville festival turns town into Fun, wacky, tasteful and tacky place City Times.)*Croswell Agricultural Society Fair (Croswell) celebrating its 125th year in 2009*Croswell Swinging Bridge Festival (Croswell)*Feast of the Sainte Claire sponsored by the Port Huron Museum of Arts and History, a large living reenactment of 18th century lifeMemorial Day weekend, (Port Huron).*Harbor Beach Maritime Festival(Harbor Beach)*Huron County Fair (Bad Axe)(Pure Michigan, Huron County Fair.)*Michigan Bean Festival Day weekend (Fairgrove)*Michigan Farmers Festival (Pigeon)(Pigeon Festival.)*Sugar Festival (Sebewaing)*The Original Country Christmas Lighted Farm Implement Parade (Sandusky)*Tuscola County Pumpkin Festival (Caro)*Sanilac County 4-H Fair (Sandusky)*St. Clair County 4-H Fair (Goodells County Park)*Thumbfest (Lexington)*Yale Bologna Festival (Yale)Thumb countiesHuronHuron County is located at the tip of the thumb. The county is surrounded on three sides by water  Bay and Huron, and has over  of shoreline, from White Rock on Huron to Sebewaing on Bay, and more shoreline parks than any other county in the state. The countys economy relies on agriculture and ranks as one of the top agricultural counties in Michigan. Rich farmland inland produces beans, sugar beets and grain, including most of the worlds supply of navy beans.(Michigan Bean Commission.) Tourism is also important to Huron County with bay front and lakefront towns such as Sebewaing, Caseville, Port Austin, Port Hope, and Harbor Beach, attracting tourists from all over. Huron County borders the Bay and Huron. There are two state parks  State Park and Crescent State Park. Three roadside parks  Jenks Park, Brown Park, and White Rock Park. Also, Huron County maintains nine county parks along the shoreline, which are Caseville Park, Lighthouse Park, Stafford Park, McGraw Park, Philp Park, Port Austin Bird Creek Park, Wagener Park, Oak Beach Park, and Sebewaing Park.The county seat is Bad Axe, located in the center of the county.SanilacThe County of Sanilac has the largest area of land in The Thumb. Like other counties, Sanilac has fertile and flat land, great for growing crops. Towns like Lexington and Port Sanilac bring in many tourists from the Detroit Area. Sandusky is the county seat and largest city.TuscolaLike Huron County, Tuscola is mostly dependent on agriculture. Industries such as sugar refining and ethanol processing, as well as growing various grains and beans, make up most of the economy. Caro, one of the largest cities in The Thumb (the largest if you exclude St. Clair and Lapeer Counties), is named after Egypt and is the county seat. Tuscola County only has  of shoreline along Bay, so it is not as dependent on tourism as the other counties in the area. Tuscola County is economically tied to the surrounding region as well as to the Saginaw, Bay City, and Flint areas.LapeerLapeer County is economically attached to Flint and Detroit. Lapeer derives from the French word for Flint, la pierre. Lapeers economy depends on manufacturing more than agriculture. Although it is landlocked, Lapeer County has many inland bodies of water such as Lake Pleasant, Lake Metamora, Nepessing Lake, Bronson Lake and Barnes Lake. These lakes bring in many campers and tourists. Lapeer Countys geography is very different than any other county in The Thumb.St. ClairSt. Clair County has the largest population in The Thumb. Many residents farther north in The Thumb, especially Sanilac County, travel to Port Huron for shopping and work. It is the farthest county to the east in Michigan, and most of the eastern border is the Clair River, which separates Michigan from Ontario. For the most part, St. Clair County is flat and agriculturally dominating in the north and west, but also has steep hills and small canyons near the Black River, although manufacturing dominates in and around Port Huron. Borderline regionsSome areas of the thumb are debatable, but nearly all definitions will include Huron, Sanilac, and Tuscola Counties, known as the tri-county region. Disputed areas include:*St. Clair County, especially the southern portion.*Lapeer County*Richmond and Northern Macomb County.*Genesee County, although it has a more urban setting, may be seen as part of the thumb peninsula.The Blue Water AreaThe Blue Water Area is a subregion of the thumb, describing St. Clair County, parts of Sanilac County, Northern Macomb County, and Eastern Lapeer County. It is so named because of the Water Bridge and the areas many bodies of water. Sometimes the definition is extended to include all of the Thumb and even Eastern Michigan. A simple definition of the Blue Water Area is the area surrounding Port Huron where residents regularly travel to Port Huron for shopping and work.Discover the BlueDiscover the Blue is a promotion by the Blue Water Area Convention and Visitors Bureau() to attract visitors to the shoreline of eastern Michigan. Communities participating in Discover the Blue range from Algonac (at the southern end of the Thumb) to Port Austin (at the tip of the Thumb).GeographyLand featuresSee also List of Michigan state parks and geography of Michigan.*The Thumbs landscape ranges from a flat sandy plain, that hugs the shores of Lake Huron and Saginaw Bay, to a gently rolling topography, which is fertile and well suited for agriculture. Perhaps, the most unusual geographic formation, however, is a rugged glacial ridge, known collectively, as the Hadley Hills, which extends in a northeasterly direction through the center of The Thumb, from the southwestern portion of the peninsula.*All counties except for Lapeer border the Bay or Huron.*The places with the highest elevation are all associated with the Hadley Hills, and are located in Lapeer County, they are: Pinnacle Point, at , Kerr (Cemetery) Hill, at , both in Hadley Township, Mt Christie, at , in Metamora Township, and a point near Mayville, reaching up to  above sea level.*The lowest place in the Thumb region is in the Saginaw Valley, the far western part of the thumb, at a low  above sea level.*Huron County is very flat and is home to turbines and large fields.*The tip of the Thumb is Aux Barques, between Port Austin and Grindstone City.*Marlette is also called the heart of the Thumb because of its central position on the peninsula.Major riversThe Thumb has many waterways.*River has many branches, one of which flows into the River in the National Wildlife Refuge at  less than  from where the Shiawassee merges with the River to form the River*The Pinnebog, Shebahyonk, and Pigeon Rivers all rise in the center of Huron County and empty into the Bay.*Clair River, connects Huron to Lake St. Clair, and is the farthest east border in Michigan. It forms a low impression in eastern St. Clair County, and has a delta at its mouth (North Americas largest freshwater delta), which includes Island and Island, Ontario. Ferries cross the river at Algonac and Marine City, these being international border crossings.*Black River rises near Minden City and flows into the St. Clair River at Port Huron. The Black River forms a basin in Sanilac County, and northern St. Clair County.*The north branch of the Flint River lies in northern Lapeer County. It rises near North Branch. The southern branch flows through the central and southern portion of Lapeer County, and merges with the North Branch just north of the Holloway Reservoir.History and local cultureSee also: of Michigan history and history of MichiganNaming and founding of the ThumbThe earliest name for the Thumb of Michigan was Skenchioe, which is shown on early maps in  the late 17th century and is of Iroquois origin. Skenchioe was the early home of the Native people called the Fox. There is no definite documentation on the meaning of the name Schenchioe although the name red fox is implied. The Onondaga word for a champain or large plain is uchwuntschios and ganhuntios while sgechnaxen means red fox.Maps from the early 18th century, show the Thumb of Michigan as Le Pays Plat, which is French and means the Flat Country. The British used this name in maps of the late-18th century calling the Thumb of Michigan in English the Flat Country.The Thumb of Michigan county name Tuscola is probably of Chippewa/Ottawa origin and likely means shelf, dish, or plate like landFlat Country. The Chippewa and Ottawa often used bark from a tree or a shell as a plate. Their words tessi aki means plateau, tableland, or flat country. Esse in Chippewa/Ottawa means shell, and essimig means a breast-plate.CulturePersons of European ancestry have formed the overwhelming majority of the population since the late 19th century. The land was settled mostly by English and Scots-Irish immigrants, many of whom arrived from Canada. Other settlers of the same ancestry migrated from eastern states such as New York, Pennsylvania and New England. Later 19th and 20th century residents included Polish and German immigrants who migrated from Europe through the Detroit area. Many of the customs, much of the regional lifestyle, and even the local accent, strongly reflect these origins. Examples are polka shows on local radio stations and the Michigan Polkafest.These European latecomers, arriving many years after the initial waves of arrivals to the Atlantic coast region from Europe, encountered aboriginal peoples for whom many sites in the Thumb were named. The name of Tuscola County was derived from a native word, Saginaw (both the city and county) is taken from an Ojibwe term, and Sanilac, which is the name of a county, is believed to be a Wyandotte name derivation, as well. Among other Thumb place names, Sebewaing is another location with a name derived from the Ojibwe. These tribally-influenced place names greatly outnumber those of any Thumb sites which may have been named with strictly European-influenced words.Historical events*The great Fire took place on September 5, 1881 in the Thumb area of Michigan. The fire, which burned over a million acres (4,000 km) in less than a day, was the consequence of drought, hurricane-force winds, heat, the after-effects of the Huron Fire of 1871 and the ecological damage wrought by the eras logging techniques.*The Lakes Storm of 1913 was a November blizzard with hurricane-force winds which devastated the Lakes Basin in the United States Midwest and the Canadian province of Ontario. The storm battered and overturned ships on four of the five Great Lakes, particularly Huron.*The Port Huron area is one of oldest settlements in the state of Michigan.*Colonial forts such as Gratiot (north of Port Huron) and Fort Sinclair (near present day St. Clair) were built along the St. Clair River.*Bad Axe was named so because Captain Rudolph Papst found an old axe in 1861, when he was clearing land for the present-day Huron County seat.Notable people (by town)More comprehensive lists are available at individual cities, villages, etc. See local towns of interest at the bottom of the page for links.Cass City* H. Shaw - retired States Air Force colonel and former NASA astronaut.Harbor Beach* Murphy - Detroit mayor, Michigan governor, U.S. Attorney General and Justice of the States Supreme Court.Lapeer* de Angeli, childrens book author, Award winner* Gay, Michigan USA 2006* Knight, singer, DJ, manager, Knight and the Pack, Funk Railroad* Long, offensive lineman, Dolphins* Nichols, accomplice in the City bombing* Jim Slater, hockey player ThrashersPort Huron* Edison - Inventor and entrepreneur settled in Port Huron from 1854 to 1863.* Gardner - US Senator for Maine* McMillan - Award-winning author of to Exhale, and Stella Got Her Groove BackLocal elected officials400px|right|Congressional District 10, served by Republican Candice MillerLocal politicians in Washington and Lansing are listed below.United States CongressDistrict 10 - Northern Macomb, and all of St Clair, Lapeer, Sanilac, and Huron County.*S. Miller, RepublicanDistrict 5 - Saginaw/Bay City Area, and all of Genesse and Tuscola.*E. Kildee, DemocratMichigan House32nd District - Northern Macomb and two townships in St Clair County.*Daniel Acciavatti, Republican81st District - Most of St Clair County, except Port Huron.*Jud Gilbert, - Republican82nd District - All of Lapeer County.*John Stahl, Republican83rd District - City of Port Huron, Fort Gratiot, and all of Sanilac County.*John Espinoza, Democrat84th District - Huron and Tuscola County.*Terry Brown, DemocratMichigan SenateColleges and universities*Clair County Community College, with the main campus in Port Huron, and learning centers in Huron, Sanilac, and Lapeer Counties.*College, with a campus in Cass City, Sandusky, and Port Huron.*of Michigan - Flint, Valley State University, and Delta College, while not in the Thumb, are universities and colleges that attract many residents from the Thumb.MuseumsSee also: of museums in MichiganHarbor Beach* Murphy Memorial Museum and home.()* House Museum - Harbor Beach(Harbor Beach, Yesterday and Today, Compiled by the Harbor Beach Womans Club. First Printing 1976, Revised Edition 1996.)Marysville* Marysville Historical Museum - Marysville* Wills Ste. Claire Auto Museum - MarysvillePort Huronthumb|200 px|right|Huron Light Ship Museum in the St. Clair River, Port Huron, Michigan* Huron Museum - a series of five museums - Port Huron()* Center - Port Huron* Lightship - Port Huron* Edison Depot Museum - Port Huron* Bramble (WLB-392) - Port Huron* Gratiot Lighthouse - Port HuronElsewhere in the Thumb* Sanilac County Historical Museum - Port Sanilac* Bad Axe Historical Society Museum - Bad Axe* Capac Historical Museum - Capac* aux Barques Lighthouse near Port Hope* St. Clair County Farm Museum - GoodellsMediaRadioThe Thumb Area Radio Region lies between the Detroit Radio Market, the Tri-Cities Radio Market and the Flint Market, with stations in Port Huron and Ontario also serving the region.Powerful local stations include; WMIC AM 660, WBGV FM 92.5, WTGV FM 97.7 of Sandusky;  WPHM AM 1380 of Port Huron; WIDL FM 92.1 of Caro;WLEW FM 102.1 of Bad Axe; and WLCO AM 1530 in Lapeer. Other radio stations broadcasting to the thumb area include WJR, WWJ, and WXYT of Detroit; WSGW, WKCQ and WHNN of Saginaw; and CFCO of Chatham, Ontario.; Local Radio Stations in the Thumb AreaNewspaper* Daily editions of the Free Press and Detroit News are available throughout the area.* The City Times() and News() are available in northern and western portions of the area.; Huron County newspapers*Harbor Beach Times*Huron County Press*Huron Daily Tribune http://www.michigansthumb.com*News Weekly, The*The Lakeshore Guardian*Thumb Blanket; Lapeer County newspapers*Buyers Guide*County Press, The http://www.countypress.com*LA View*Webco Press; Sanilac County newspapers*Brown City Banner*Buyers Guide*Camden Publications*Deckerville Recorder*Marlette Leader*Sandusky Tribune*Sanilac County News http://www.sanilaccountynews.com; St. Clair County newspapers*Blue Water Shopper*Port Huron Times Herald-USA Today http://www.thetimesherald.com*Thumb Print News, The*Voice, The*Yale Expositor, The; Tuscola County Newspapers*Tuscola County Advertiser http://www.tuscolatoday.com*Cass City Chronicle*Cass River Trader*Reese Reporter*Vassar Pioneer TimesBroadcast televisionThe Lapeer County, St. Clair County and Sanilac County area lies in the Detroit Television Market. The far northern and western areas lie inside the Flint/Tri-Cities Television Market. The only broadcast TV station licensed to the Thumb region is WDCQ-TV, the PBS station licensed to Bad Axe.; Flint/Tri-Cities*WSMH, Fox 66*WEYI-TV, NBC 25*WJRT-TV, ABC 12*WNEM-TV, CBS 5*WDCQ-TV, PBS 19*WCMZ-TV, PBS 28; Sarnia/Windsor Ontario*CBET, CBC 9*CBLN-TV-2, CBC 34*CIII-TV, Global 22/29*CICO-TV, TVO 32/59*CKCO-TV, CTV 42*CBLFT-17, Radio-Canada 68; Detroit area*WJBK, Fox 2*WDIV-TV, NBC 4*WXYZ-TV, ABC 7*WWJ-TV, CBS 62*WTVS, PBS 56*WKBD, CW 50*WMYD, MyTV 20*WADL, independent 38; Alpena area*WBKB-TV, CBS 11Transportationthumb|left|Port Hurons two Blue Water Bridges, taken during the Port Huron to Mackinac Yacht Race.BordersThe border between Huron, Michigan and Ontario is one of the busiest connections between Canada and the US. Crossings include the two Water Bridges and the two St. Clair River Railway Tunnels. Ferries also connect to Canada at Marine City and Algonac.Major highways(organized by numbers)*21px I-69 begins at the Water Bridge, proceeds west through Flint, then Lansing, and then turns south to Indiana.*21px I-94 is the only precisely east-west U.S. interstate that has a terminus in a foreign country.() It has its eastern terminus at the U.S. side of the Water Bridge in Huron, Michigan, at the Ontario, Canada border, where together with I-69 it meets 20px Highway 402.*20pxM-15*20pxM-19*old 20pxM-21 (largely replaced by I-69)*20pxM-24*20pxM-25 is a highway of an arc-like shape closely following the outline of the Thumb along the Lake Huron/Saginaw Bay shoreline between Port Huron and Bay City. It is generally a scenic drive.*20pxM-29*20pxM-46 is a cross peninsular road, running across the mitten and the Thumbfrom Port Sanilac on the Huron shore; through Saginaw near Bay; and then on to Muskegon on the Michigan shore.() This east-west surface route nearly bisects the Lower Peninsula of Michigan latitudinally.*20pxM-53 (Van Dyke Road) is a gateway route to The Thumb of Michigan, carrying vacationers to the resorts and cottages on Saginaw Bay and Lake Huron in the vicinity of Caseville and Port Austin. It goes up the middle of the Thumb, and directly connects in County, Michigan to the M-53 expressway. It is an important route for agricultural and manufactured goods.*20pxM-81*20pxM-90*20pxM-136*20pxM-138*20pxM-142Rail*Main article: ServicesArea Amtrak stations are in Lapeer, Port Huron, and Flint. Local railroads are the Trunk Western Railroad, Transportation, National Railway, and the and Eastern Railway. Marquette Railway was a railroad that had lines throughout the Thumb; its lines are now either abandoned or in use by CSX, or Huron and Eastern.Major railroad centers are Vassar, Bad Axe and Port Huron.AirportsThe only international airport in the Thumb is Clair County International Airport about  outside Port Huron. City airports include: Caro Municipal, Dupont-Lapeer Airport, Huron County Memorial Airport, Marine City Airport, Marlette Municipal, Sandusky City, and Yale Airport. Scheduled airline service is available from International Airport() in Michigan and Flint International Airport.() While neither of these airports is in the Thumb, both are relatively close by.Area codescode 989 covers about half of the Thumb: Huron, Tuscola, and far northern Sanilac County (and the Michigan area). The Thumbs other half is covered by code 810, which takes in most of Sanilac, Lapeer, Genesee and Saint Clair Counties. All of Macomb County is served by code 586, as is a small part of south-western Saint Clair County.See alsoState* MichiganRegional*Flint/Tri-Cities and Tri-Cities*Huron*DetroitLocal cities and villages of interest*Akron (Tuscola)*Algonac (St. Clair)*Applegate (Sanilac)*Almont (Lapeer)*Bad Axe (Huron)*Brown City (Sanilac/Lapeer)*Capac (St. Clair)*Caro (Tuscola)*Carsonville (Sanilac)*Caseville (Huron)*Cass City (Tuscola)*Clifford (Lapeer)*Columbiaville (Lapeer)*Croswell (Sanilac)*Deckerville (Sanilac)*Dryden (Lapeer)*Elkton (Huron)*Emmett (St. Clair)*Fairgrove (Tuscola)*Forestville (Sanilac)*Gagetown (Tuscola)*Harbor Beach (Huron)*Imlay City (Lapeer)*Kinde (Huron)*Kingston (Tuscola)*Lapeer (Lapeer)*Lexington (Sanilac)*Marine City (St. Clair)*Marlette (Sanilac)*Marysville (St. Clair)*Mayville (Tuscola)*Melvin (Sanilac)*Memphis (St. Clair/Macomb)*Metamora (Lapeer)*Millington (Tuscola)*Minden City (Sanilac)*North Branch (Lapeer)*Otter Lake (Lapeer/Genesee)*Owendale (Huron)*Peck (Sanilac)*Pigeon (Huron)*Port Austin (Huron)*Port Hope (Huron)*Port Huron (St. Clair)*Port Sanilac (Sanilac)*Reese (Tuscola/Saginaw)*Richmond (Macomb/St. Clair)*Sandusky (Sanilac)*Sebewaing (Huron)*St. Clair (St. Clair)*Unionville (Tuscola)*Vassar (Tuscola)*Yale (St. Clair)*Ubly (Huron)Subjects*of Michigan county name etymologiesNotesFurther reading*Ackerman, Emma J. Thumb Fires of 1871 and 1881. CMU Term Paper, 1968.*DuMond, Neva. Thumb diggings; adventures into Michigans Thumb area. Lexington, Mich, 1962.*The Great Fire of 1881: A Collection of Stories. Caro, MI: Tuscola County Advertiser, 1981.*Hatt, R. T. --The petroglyphs, by D. J. Richards.--An archeological survey of the petroglyph site, by M. Papworth (republished from the Michigan archeologist, Dec. 1957) The Sanilac petroglyphs. Hills, Michigan: Institute of Science, 1958*House Party: Reminiscences by Traditional Musicians and Square Dance Callers in Michigans Thumb Area. Port Huron, MI: Museum of Arts and History, 1982.*Schultz, Gerard. A History of Michigans Thumb.*Smith, Dee. Treks into the Past: Historical Sketches of Michigans Thumb. Decatur, MI: Heritage Valley Publishing, 1989.*Southgate, Jerry D. Thumbs Forest Fire of 1881. Central Michigan University Term Paper, 1967.External links* Blue Water Convention and Visitors Bureau.* Clarke Historical Library, Central Michigan University, Bibliography on Michigan (arranged by counties and regions).* Great Lakes Coast Watch* Huron County economic development corporation/Community calendars, webcams and more.* List of Museums, other attractions compiled by state government.* Michigan Geology -- Clarke Historical Library, Central Michigan University.* Michigan Historical Markers* Michigan Department of Natural Resources website, harbors, hunting, resources and more.* Information about Michigans Thumb* Michigans Official Economic Development and Travel Site, including interactive map, information on attractions, museums, etc.* Interactive map of lighthouses in area.* Seeing the Light: Terry Pepper on lighthouses of the Western Great Lakes.* Info MichiganThumb
870767
Company_town
A company town is a town or city in which much or all estate, buildings (both residential and commercial), utilities, hospitals, small businesses such as stores and stations, and other necessities or luxuries of life within its borders are owned by a single company. The term is used in the US and UK to refer to a town or city where loyalty to the company that is perceived to be responsible for its success is expected and that company is, or was, a major employer in the area.OverviewTraditional settings for company towns were where extractive industries &mdash; coal, metal mines, lumber &mdash; had established a monopoly franchise. Dam sites and war-industry camps founded other company towns. Since company stores tend to have a monopoly in company towns, it was not uncommon for systems to emerge in isolated company towns.Typically, a company town will be isolated from neighbors and centered (figuratively, if not literally) around a large production factory such as a lumber or steel mill or an automobile plant; and the citizens of the town will either work in the factory, work in one of the smaller businesses, or be a family member of someone who does. The company may also operate parks, host cultural events such as concerts, and so on. If the owning company cuts back or goes out of business, the economic effect on the company town is devastating, and often fatal.Company towns sometimes become regular public cities and towns as they grow. Other times, a town may not officially be a company town, but it may be a town where the majority of citizens are employed by a single company, thus creating a similar situation to a company town (especially in regard to the towns economy).United StatesAt their peak there were more than 2,500 company towns, housing 3% of the US population.()()One of the first company towns in the United States was Chicago, developed in the 1880s just outside the Chicago city limits. The town, entirely company-owned, provided housing, markets, a library, churches and entertainment for the 6,000 company employees and an equal number of dependents. Employees were required to live in Pullman, despite the fact that cheaper rentals could be found in nearby communities. In 1898 the Supreme Court required Pullman to dissolve their ownership of the town.Another famous company town was Ohio, which was created by the Steel Company to house and serve the needs of its employees in the Ohio area.In the present day States, it is relatively rare for any place in which a single company owns all the property to be granted status as an incorporated municipality. Rather, companies will normally prefer their wholly owned communities to remain unincorporated as this permits administration of the community to be carried out by appointed company officers rather than elected officials. However, there are incorporated municipalities that are heavily dependent upon a single industry or organization and may be loosely considered a company town, even though the company does not technically own the town. A different type of company town has appeared in the U.S. since the 1960s, where real estate companies started developing uninhabited tracts of unincorporated lands into huge communities. These can be called company towns since they were not developed as part of a city, but completely on their own. Often these towns then grow into full fledged cities and then become incorporated, such as California.The adjacent cities of Bay Lake and Lake Buena Vista, near Florida in the Creek Improvement District, are most widely known as the location of Disney World Resort. Being company towns, they are entirely owned by Disney-related companies. A few token persons reside on the site; all are either employees of Disney or their immediate family members. Paternalism Paternalism, a subtle form of social engineering, refers to the control of workers by their employers who sought to force middle-class ideals upon their working-class employees. Similarly to some of todays businessmen who concern themselves with environmental best practice, paternalism was considered by many nineteenth century businessmen as a moral responsibility, or often a religious obligation, which would advance society whilst furthering their own business interests. Accordingly, the company town offered a unique opportunity to achieve such ends. Although many prominent examples of company towns portray their founders as capitalists with a conscience, for example Cadburys Bourneville, if viewed cynically the company town was often an economically viable ploy to attract and retain workers. Additionally, for-profit shops within company towns were usually owned by the company which were unavoidable to its isolated workers thus resulting in a monopoly for the owners.(Crawford, M. 1995. Building the Workingmans Paradise: The Design of American Company Towns. Verso. London.)Although economically successful, company towns sometimes failed politically due to a lack of elected officials and municipally owned services.(Garner, J. 1992. The Company Town: Architecture and Society in the Early Industrial Age. Oxford. Oxford University Press.) Accordingly, workers often had no say in local affairs and therefore felt dictated to. Ultimately, this political climate caused resentment amongst workers and resulted in many residents eventually losing long-term affection for their towns; such was the case at Pullman. The Pullman lesson Chicago was a model company town founded by the Pullman Palace Car Company in the 1880s. The town operated successfully until the economic of 1893 when demands for the companys products declined and employee wages had to be lowered accordingly. Despite this the company refused to lower rents in the town or the price of goods at its shops thus resulting in the Strike of 1894.(	Lukas, A. 1997. Big Trouble. New York. Simon & Schuster.) A national commission formed to investigate the causes of the strikes found that Pullmans paternalism partly to blame and labelled it un-American.(Pearson, A. 2009. Utopia Derailed. Archaeology. Volume 62 Number 1. Jan/Feb 2009.)However, government observers maintained that Pullmans principles were accurate, in that he provided his employees with a quality of life otherwise unattainable to them, but recognised that his excessive paternalism was inappropriate for a large-scale corporate economy and thus caused the towns downfall. Accordingly, government observers and social reformers alike saw the need for a balance between control and well-designed towns concluding that a model company town would only succeed if independent professionals, acting as a buffer between employers and employees, took a role in conception, planning, and management of these towns.(Fogelsong, R. 1986. Planning the Capitalist City. Princeton, NJ: Princeton University Press.)Thus the Pullman Strike did not kill the concept of a company town but rather initiated a new chapter in their existence. Over the next thirty years the old model of paternalism was abandoned in favour of new professionally designed company towns with architects, landscape architects, and planners translating new concepts of industrial relations and social welfare into new physical forms.(Crawford, M. 1995. Building the Workingmans Paradise: The Design of American Company Towns. Verso. London.pp45) This suited capitalists of the day who were obviously keen to avoid the experiences of Pullman. The first real example of this occurred at Indian Hill-North Village, Massachusetts in 1915.(Crawford, M. 1995. Building the Workingmans Paradise: The Design of American Company Towns. Verso. London.) Model company towns During the late nineteenth century, model company towns materialised as enlightened industrialists recognised that many poor workers were living in appalling conditions.(Parsons, 1985, p.639) These industrialists wished to combat the unsanitary and congested conditions common to working class districts in order to create better living conditions for workers.(Garner, 1982, p.xi) Model company towns such as Sunlight (1888) and Bournville (1895) were influential in regards to their building and planning innovation.(Jackson, 1985) The ideas generated from these model towns are regarded as having a significant influence on the Garden City movement.(Jackson, 1985; Garner, 1992)  The model company town is concerned with creating a productive and prosperous company.(Gaskell, 1979) Enlightened industrialists believed this could be achieved by providing a healthier residential environment for their employees.(Gaskell, 1979, p.440) Planning a model company town involved the fusion of new notions of house design and layout.(Gaskell, 1979) The paternalism of the enlightened industrialist was exhibited in his desire to provide an environment for his employees that was aesthetically appealing and which included well-designed residences, parks, schools, libraries and meeting halls.(Garner, 1992, p.4) The industrialist also wished to contribute to his workers wellbeing by providing social programs such as sporting events and functions.(Garner, 1992, p.4) This however, highlights the power and immense control possessed by the company owner who could shape the lifestyle and activities of his employees to serve his own interests and those of the company.(Garner, 1982, p.xi)  The creation of model company towns was particularly evident in Britain during the latter half of the nineteenth century with the creation of Saltaire, Bournville, Sunlight, Creswell and Earswick, and coincided with the housing reform movement which emphasised the improvement of housing for the working class.(Cherry, 1979, p.51; Parsons, 1985) These model towns contrasted with the overcrowded conditions in British working class districts which were often characterised by congested housing, unsanitary conditions, poor provision of open space and facilities.(Gaskell, 1979; Cherry, 1979) Model company towns promoted the idea of orderly, planned town development as well as the notion of planning for the needs of the community in order to provide healthier living conditions.(Cherry, 1979) Model company towns in Britain Model company towns around the mid-nineteenth century such as Copley (1849) near Halifax, and Saltaire (1853) close to Bradford were characterised by improved dwellings for workers which contrasted with working-class housing in other industrial villages and cities.(Garner, 1982, p.87) These model company towns prompted the creation of others such as Port Sunlight, Bourneville and Creswell within an environment of reform.(Garner, 1982)Sunlight (1888) in Cheshire, was established by William Hesketh Lever (later Lord Leverhulme) of Lever Brothers  a soap and tallow manufacturer.(Jackson, 1985, p.47) The earlier layout of this model company town was planned to suit the undulating topography of the site.(Jackson, 1985; p.47) Port Sunlight catered for the Lever Brothers employees through the provision of improved housing (cottages of varying designs and materials) and gardens, as well as social and community facilities including an auditorium, school, tennis courts and bowling greens.(Cherry, 1979, p.314; Jackson, 1985) Port Sunlight combined the use of formal and informal planning elements such as straight streets close to the town centre and curved streets in the residential areas.(Hebblethwaite, 1987, p.155) This combination of the formal and informal represented a new feature of British town planning.(Hebblethwaite, 1987, p.155) Bournville (1895) near Birmingham, was established by the Cadbury brothers, George and Richard.(Dellheim, 1987) George and Richard Cadbury chose to transfer the Cadbury factory to this new site in order to provide their employees with improved living conditions and a country environment that they could enjoy - a far cry from the busy, smoky city centre of Birmingham.(Dellheim, 1987, p.20) The firm provided education in the form of a compulsory academic course and workers were given the opportunity to complete commercial or technical training.(Dellheim, 1987, p.29) Cadburys also encouraged their workers to get involved in the social life of Bournville through the provision of sports facilities, athletic and cultural clubs, as well as social events such as summer parties.(Dellheim, 1987, p.29)  Cadbury, a Quaker, preached Christian values such as respectability, thrift and sobriety and sought to unify the Bournville community through rituals such as gift giving between employer and employee.(Dellheim, 1987, p.30) The firm also established work councils such as the Womens Works Council and supported trade unions.(Dellheim, 1987, p.42)Bournville represented the union of industry and nature as the company town boasted the attractiveness of the countryside and low-density development characterised by well-built and visually appealing dwellings.(Dellheim, 1987, p.31; Cherry, 1979, p.314) Unlike Port Sunlight, Bournville catered for a mixed community where residences were not restricted to the workforce only.(Jackson, 1985, p.49) Bournville illustrated how, towards the end of the nineteenth century, low-density development was being emphasised along with the provision of open air, space and sunlight.(Cherry, 1979, p.317) Bournvilles gardens, parks, tree-lined streets, its sense of spaciousness and country setting enhanced its aesthetic appeal and demonstrated George Cadburys endeavour to provide workers with a healthy, beautiful and well-ventilated environment.(Jackson, 1985, p.49) The Bolsover Company developed two exemplary mining communities in Derbyshire during the late nineteenth century, Bolsover (1891) and Creswell (1896).(Gaskell, 1979) The Bolsover Company aimed to provide improved living conditions for the miners and their families in these model industrial villages.(Gaskell, 1979) The houses at Creswell were built in concentric circles, and within these circles was large open parkland and a bandstand.(Gaskell, 1979, p.446) Not only did the Bolsover Company aim to provide better housing, but they also wished to improve workers moral fibre, believing that the provision of facilities and the promotion of workers welfare would discourage drunkenness, gambling and bad language.(Gaskell, 1979) The Bolsover Company provided facilities deemed beneficial for employees at both villages including clubhouses, bowling greens, cooperative society stores, cricket pitches and schools.(Gaskell, 1979, p.446) During the early years of these model industrial villages, the Bolsover Company organised various events intended to enhance community life such as flower shows, lectures, sporting events, concerts, teas and dances.(Gaskell, 1979, p.447)The decline of American company townsBy the 1920s the need for company towns had declined significantly due to increased national affluence. Despite income inequalities and a relatively low standard of living conditions amongst factory labourers, the prosperity of the 1920s saw workers material well-being improve significantly. A strong post-war American economy meant instalment buying was accessible to low-wage earners who could now purchase previously unattainable goods like automobiles and radios. Moreover, workers were no longer dependent on employers for healthcare and education. By the 1920s the widespread nature of the automobile meant workers no longer needed to live near their work places and now had access to more employment opportunities. A combination of the freedom that came with private transport and the mass communication of radio saw the isolation of company towns lessen and the social basis of the company town become less necessary. Furthermore, the accessibility of the working class to private transport also marked a step of equality as they had previously only been accessible to the wealthy. As access to surrounding municipalities increased, residents of company towns gained access to an increasing amount of government-funded public resources such as schools, libraries, and parks. Accordingly, there was no longer a need for the amenities of company towns which, prior to capitalism, had previously been unattainable to the working class.(Crawford, M. 1995. Building the Workingmans Paradise: The Design of American Company Towns. Verso. London.)This new found freedom saw a change in the mindset of workers who began to look on welfare capitalism as demeaning rather than an incentive. Accordingly, many employees began to request additional pay in lieu of welfare programs. This was well received by some employers as the idea of laissez-faire individualism, which promoted entrepreneurial virtues of hard-work being rewarded rather than direct charity, began to shape new-age paternalism.(Crawford, M. 1995. Building the Workingmans Paradise: The Design of American Company Towns. Verso. London.) Modernisation and the increase in material well-being had also lessened the perceived need for paternalism and moral reform. Accordingly, the economic downturn of the early 1930s saw some businesses do away with employee welfare schemes to reduce costs. However, the Roosevelt Administrations Deal dealt the final blow to end American company towns by raising minimum wages, encouraging industrial self-governance, and pushing for the owners of company towns to consider the question of plans for eventual employee ownership of homes.(Crawford, M. 1995. Building the Workingmans Paradise: The Design of American Company Towns. Verso. London. pp 204) To a lesser extent the New Deal also reduced the need for employee housing by transforming housing finance to a lower-interest, lower-deposit system making home ownership more accessible to the working class.See also*of company towns*town*on Industrial Relations*republic*town*paternalism*town*Monotown, a similar phenomenon in Russia*townReferencesFurther reading*Carlson, L. (2003). Company Towns of the Pacific Northwest, ISBN 0-295-98332-9 http://www.lindacarlson.com/historybook.html**Cherry, G.E. (1979). The town planning movement and the late Victorian city. Transactions of the Institute of British Geographers, 4, 306-319.*Dellheim, C. (1987). The creation of company culture: Cadburys, 1861-1931. The American Historical Review, 92, 13-44.*Garner, J.S. (1982). The model company town. Massachusetts: The University of Massachusetts Press.*Garner, J.S. (1992). The company town: Architecture and society in the early industrial age. New York: Oxford University Press, Inc.*Gaskell, M. (1979). Model industrial villages in S. Yorkshire/N. Derbyshire and the early town planning movement. The Town Planning Review, 50, 437-458.*Hebblethwaite, R. (1987). The municipal housing programme in Sheffield before 1914. Architectural History, 30, 143-179.*Jackson, F. (1985). Sir Raymond Unwin: Architect, planner and visionary. London: A. Zwemmer Ltd.*Parsons, K.C. (1985). Review of the model company town: Urban design through private enterprise in nineteenth-century New England. The New England Quarterly, 58, 639-643.industrialde:Arbeitersiedlungouvrireko:aziendaleja:
872490
Gaia_(Final_Fantasy_VII)
Gaia (also called the Planet) is the fictional world in the 1997 role-playing game Fantasy VII.() The games setting follows in the footsteps of Final Fantasy VI by presenting a world with considerably more advanced technology than the first five games in the series. Overall, the games technology and society approximates that of an industrial or post-industrial fiction.()() Gaia is composed of three land masses:The eastern continent features the city of Midgar, an industrial metropolis that serves as the headquarters of the Electric Power Company, a ruthless megacorporation that operates as the facto government. Shinras major military base, Junon, is also located on the continent, along with a chocobo ranch, a small town called Kalm and a fortified town called Fort Condor.The western continent features most of the playable areas, which include an amusement park, a seaside resort, and a settlement constructed on a plateau called Cosmo Canyon. The tribe inhabiting the canyon places a strong emphasis on living in harmony with nature and dedicate great consideration to its well-being.() Their settlement features an observatory and serves as a research facility for those who wish to participate in a philosophy known as the Study of Planet Life, an environmentally conscious way of life that encourages utmost deference for nature, and teaches that the planet has a life of its own.( The northernmost continent is a heavily glaciated wasteland covered in snow and ice, with its few settlements largely concerned with excavation or research. It does, however, feature a ski resort. The most prominent landmark is the northern crater which is a large crater caused when JENOVA (the calamity from the sky) collided with the planet. There are also underwater locations accessible via submarine. Geography right|250px|thumb|MidgarGaias land area is composed of three major landmasses. The Eastern Continent is where the game begins. To the west across the ocean is the Western continent and the Northern continent lies to the north of both of them. Smaller inhabited landmasses lie to the west and south of the main continents.Midgar is the de-facto capital of Gaia, controlled by the Shinra Company. It sits in the middle of a large plain on the northwestern corner of the eastern continent. The area around the city has become drained, lifeless and polluted as a result of the use of Mako reactors. The citys prosperity was due to the abundance of Mako Energy in the vicinity, and the reactor complex meant that there was no vegetation within the city or in close proximity to it, with exception to both the church where Aerith and later two children tend to flowers, and the grounds of Aeriths house in sector 5. The area where the city stands also appears to be in a state of constant darkness even during daylight hours. This was made obvious when the Sister Ray was fired; at that moment, it was dark in Midgar, but clearly daylight where the Mako beam struck the Diamond WEAPON (just outside the city). Whether or not this constant darkness is also related to the use of Mako reactors is unclear, although by the time of Advent Children, after the city had been destroyed and Mako generation had ceased, daylight had returned to Midgar.The city of Midgar is a circular plate elevated 50 meters above the ground and supported by both a central pillar and a system of smaller columns. A network of maintenance platforms are also suspended beneath the plate. Commercial and residential complexes, as well as recreational facilities such as bars and theaters are located on the plate. The plate itself is divided into eight numbered sectors with each sector punctuated by two walls and a Mako reactor. Each of these sectors once had a name, but no one in Midgar remembers them. The Shinra Company headquarters, Sector 0, is located at the center of the upper plate, and serves as the tallest structure in the city with 70 floors, the top ten of which are restricted access. There also appears to be a built-up ring outside the main perimeter of the city. The upper plate would remain incomplete for the entirety of its history.Following the construction of the plate the land beneath was taken up by the poorer residents of Midgar and their ramshackle slum dwellings. Like the city above, the slums are divided into the eight numbered sectors punctuated by walls and gates. Quality of life in the slums is often very low due to the upper plate trapping all the pollution of the slums underneath it whilst at the same time blocking out the sunlight (although the sun is never shown to shine above the plate either). The slums as a whole are strewn with strange wreckage, including pillars of Greco-Roman design, and components of various dismembered mecha. The majority of the buildings there are made of collected scrap shaped into dwellings; few of the buildings exhibit any thorough architectural planning. There are, however, scattered buildings that are presumed to be left behind from before the plates construction, the most obvious of which being Aeriths church and her house in the slums of Sector 5. The slums beneath Sector 6 are comparatively wealthy, having services such as restaurants, bars, shops, and clubs. This is most likely because that part of lower Midgar has yet to be adversely affected by the construction of the upper plate (the Sector 6 plate is still under construction during the game and is never finished). Most notably, Sector 6 is home to the mansion of slum libertine Don Corneo. A commuter railway system carries workers to and from the slums, and security measures have been implemented throughout the city.In addition to Midgar, Shinra owned and operated the city of Junon, the worlds second-largest city, and the only port on the Eastern continent, which featured the powerful artillery cannon Sister Ray. From Junon, it is possible to ride the cargo ship to Costa del Sol on the Western continent (and back). The only other significant settlement on the Eastern continent is close to Midgar at Kalm, where the majority of the townspeople once worked at the nearby Mythril Mine until monsters started appearing in that area and put the miners out of work. In addition to the eight Mako reactors in Midgar, Shinra had two other reactors built on the Eastern Continent. The reactor at Fort Condor is no longer operational by the beginning of the game and the mountain upon which it stands has been colonized by nesting condors and the mercenary fighters who protect them. The other reactor is located on the sea bed beneath Junon. Shinra financed the building and operation of the Gold Saucer, a combined amusement park-casino entertainment complex built on the Western continent in the middle of a harsh quicksand desert. The desert prison beneath the Gold Saucer was once the site of Wallaces hometown Corel, a former coal mining village which was razed to the ground by Shinra troops in reprisal after members of the original AVALANCHE attacked the new Mako reactor at Mt. Corel. The few survivors now live in destitution close by in North Corel, a town built largely from scrap and other junk. Also on the Western continent the Shinra built a Mako reactor in the Alps-like mountains above Strife and Lockharts hometown Nibelheim. The reactor at Gongaga, Fairs birthplace, suffered a meltdown three years prior to the beginning of the game, suspending operations there. Cosmo Canyon, XIIIs windmill-powered birthplace, is a pilgrimage site for those who have an interest in the Study of Planet Life philosophy. Rocket Town, Highwinds town of residence, is the site of the first attempt at manned spaceflight.Occupying a large island off the westernmost continent is the city of Wutai. Kisaragi is the princess of Wutai. Yuffies father, Godo Kisaragi, led the city in a struggle for dominance against Shinra but lost.(Elmyra: Oh... it must have been 15 years ago... ...during the war. My husband was sent to the front. Some far away place called Wutai.(Final Fantasy VII))(Yuffie: You scared of the Shinra? Then why dont you fall into line and obey them, just like all of the other towns! Those guys are the ones who are really fighting the Shinra! / Godo: Shut up! What would you know about this? / Yuffie: You get beaten once, and then thats it? What happened to the mighty Wutai I used to know?(Final Fantasy VII)) Wutai is apparently based upon pre-modern Japan and China, utilizing familiar motifs such as a pagoda (where Godo resides), and a large statue called Da Chao, bearing the appearance of what appears to be Buddha and other related figures. Wutai is likely to be named after the sacred mountain Shan.The northern continent is mostly covered in snow and ice, except for the southernmost areas which are temperate enough to support boreal forests. This area contains the excavation site at Bone Village and beyond that, the mysterious Sleeping Forest. Past the forest is the Forgotten City, the capital of the Cetra civilization, exhibiting such unusual structures as homes made from giant helical shells. North and west of the Forgotten City are mountains beyond which the climate becomes polar. Icicle Lodge, Aerith Gainsboroughs snowy birthplace, is where the snowboarding mini-game can be played for the first time. The Northern Cave, also called Northern Crater, is the original impact site of Jenova. The WEAPONs slept under the ice, encased in frozen Mako here for thousands of years following their creation. The remaining portion of Sephiroths body emerged here after traveling through the Lifestream and became encased in a Mako crystal. The crater is also the site of the Jenova Reunion.Located on a small island, the Temple of the Ancients is a large structure into which the Ancients transformed the Black Materia to prevent its use. Whoever wishes to turn the building back into the Black Materia must sacrifice his or her life by solving a series of puzzles that shrinks the temple back to its original size, crushing whoever is inside.(Cloud: This huge Temple? This is the Black Materia!? Then no one could take it. / Aerith: Hmm, its pretty hard. You see this is a model of the Temple. And inside it is a device, which gets smaller each time you solve a puzzle. As the model becomes smaller, you become smaller too. Until its small enough to fit in the palm of your hand. / Cloud: So, if we solve the puzzles, the Black Materia will get smaller and smaller and we can take it out? / Aerith: Yes, but theres one thing... You can only answer puzzles inside the Temple. So, anyone who solves the puzzle will be crushed by the Temple.(Final Fantasy VII)) To the south-east of the Temple of The Ancients lies the only other inhabited island on Gaia, Mideel Island, a sub-tropical area where the Lifestream sometimes breaks through from inside the planet. Mideel village is the only settlement on the island until it is destroyed in a Lifestream eruption.The Promised Land is a place sought after by the nomadic Cetraa legacy briefly taken up by Sephiroth, who mistakenly believed himself to be an Ancient. Aerith tells Cloud that the Promised Land may not be a specific place, but the Shinra Company believe otherwise and are intent on using Aerith to find it. Upon reaching the Northern Crater, Shinra comes to the conclusion that it is the Promised Land due to its vast quantity of natural Mako. In actuality, both the game and the Final Fantasy VII Ultimania  guidebook suggest that the Promised Land is no one specific place or thing, but rather something unique to each individual which brings that person supreme happiness.()(Aerith: Someday Ill get out of Midgar... Speak with the Planet and find my Promised Land. ...Thats what mom said.(Final Fantasy VII))(Elder Hargo: There is no one place called the Promised Land. That is what I believe. No no, it does exist. Hmmm... You can say that too. In other words, it doesnt exist for us, but it did for the Ancients. The Promised Land is the resting place of the Ancients. The life of the Ancients is one continuous journey. A journey to grow trees and plants, produce animals, and raise Mako energy. Their harsh journeys continued throughout their lives... The place they return to after their long journey... Their burial land is the Promised Land. Huh? Supreme happiness? I believe that, for the Ancients, it was the moment that they were able to return to their planet. At that moment, they were released from their fate, and gained their supreme happiness...(Final Fantasy VII))In Advent Children and Dirge of Cerberus, the city of Edge appears, having been built north of the remains of Midgar. It is where most Midgar people relocated, including Cloud and Tifa. In of Cerberus, a massive complex that serves as the Regenesis Organizations headquarters is featured. Though its precise location is unknown, its presumed to reside somewhere on the Eastern Continent. The building is later severely damaged by Deepground prior to the retaliation assault on Midgar. Political organizations  Shinra Electric Power Company  Overview and Background The , or simply the , was a powerful mega-corporation which acted as a facto government for much of Gaia. The Shinra Company grew from a small weapons manufacturer into a large conglomerate after the discovery of mako energy which Shinra used to fuel the planet. In addition to their monopoly over mako, the company employed a large military to secure their control over much of the planet. However, the company collapsed following the Meteor Crisis and now operates on a far smaller level. Despite this downsizing the company still plays a major role in world affairs.According to materials pertaining to the original Final Fantasy VII, the companys name is parsed Shin-Ra, though this parsing has not appeared in any English localizations and has been disused in Japan. Shinra is written with the Japanese kanji . This does not appear to be an actual Japanese surname, although its on-reading is the same as many others. The individual kanji mean god/divine and snare/net/silk, respectively.The name Shinra may also be connected to Jenova, one of the major antagonists in Final Fantasy VII. Jenova is indicated to be an extraterrestrial lifeform, composed of strange cells that carry her will and power even when separated. It may be that JENOVA is portmanteau of Jehova and the Latin stem novus or nova meaning new. This explanation may be alluded to by the many times throughout the game in which Sephiroth mentions he wishes to become a god, and the theme that plays during one of the final fights, Birth of a God. Exactly why this name was chosen and what it might imply are unknown, although Shin-Ra could mean capturing a god, or the essence of a god, such as Mako.It could also mean Soul (of) Rome since  in Japanese can also mean soul or spirit (see kami) and  can represent Rome thus being a name representation of the game design idea behind Shinra and Gaia. Company Ethos Shinra acted as a world government and as such had its own policy on world affairs. The first leader of the company is President Shinra who followed a doctrine of using Shinras vast reserves of money to maintain control over the worlds populace. The means by which the money was deployed is never made clear however the notion is similar to the and Circuses method of Rulers in Ancient Rome which kept the people in-line by providing them with food and entertainment- a costly policy but one which maintained order. President Shinra was murdered by Sephiroth in Shinra Tower and succeeded by his son Rufus Shinra. As President, Rufus felt his fathers methods were too exhaustive and decided a change in policy was required. Rufus argued that establishing a climate of fear and using that fear to maintain public loyalty would be far more effective than the Bread and Circuses model of his predecessor. During Diamond WEAPONs attack on Midgar, WEAPON launches a barrage of energy missiles at Shinra HQ, Rufus is engulfed in the explosion and presumed dead by the Company Board. This gap of leadership allowed two directors, Heidegger and Scarlet, to seize control of the Company. Whatever policies Heidegger and Scarlet had in mind for Shinra were never made clear as soon after their coup they were killed by AVALANCHE. Shinra may have appeared finished at this point but for the miraculous survival of Rufus. After his near-death experience Rufus formed a new policy concerning the companys direction- rather than controlling the planet it should help save it. Management The Shinra Company is led by a president and board of directors, each with their own portfolio and responsibility for a sector of the companys operations. The highest office in the company is that of the President. The President has total control over company affairs, convenes the board and acts as its chair. Next is the office of the Vice-President, however the duties of this office are never made clear other than acting as a successor in waiting to the President. After Rufus succeeds his father he makes no known appointment to the Vice-Presidential office.The Department of Public Relations and Public Safety Maintenance was Shinras largest department and headed by Heidegger. This department controlled Shinras military and policing service as well as the elite SOLDIER unit. SOLDIER was originally a separate portfolio but was brought into the Public Safety Maintenance Department by Heidegger after the demotion of Lazard, who had previously been the director of SOLDIER. The members of SOLDIER were specially trained, elite fighters divided into Third, Second, and First Class branches. Sephiroth, Fair, Angeal Hewley, and Rhapsodos were First Class members of SOLDIER before the Nibelheim incident.The Department of General Affairs was also incorporated with the Department of Public Relations and Public Safety Maintenance by Heidegger after he seized control of the department from Verdot but maintained semi-autonomy through the Investigation Division of the Department of General Affairs, better known as the Turks. This division formed Shinras special security force, under the leadership of Tseng who reported to Heidegger. The Turks performed covert operations on behalf of the company, including espionage, kidnappings and assassinations. They also acted as scouts for potential candidates for Shinras elite military unit, SOLDIER,()(Cloud: The Turks are an organization in Shinra. They scout for possible candidates for SOLDIER.(Final Fantasy VII)) and serve as bodyguards for the Shinra executives. After the demise of the company the Turks remained loyal to Rufus and acted as his bodyguard and carried out Intelligence operations to aid the reconstruction of the company.Shinra had a large Department of Science and Research, originally under Dr. Gast until he was replaced by Professor Hojo, which dealt with research into the Cetra, Mako energy, bio-chemistry and genetics. The department was also in charge of the Jenova Project which was used to create Sephiroth and the perfect SOLDIERs. Mako was one of the two main components in biologically enhancing members of SOLDIER. It was also used in a series of experiments by Professors Gast and Hojo on living people. SOLDIERs are not only infused with Mako, however. They are also injected with Jenova cells. Jenovas cells together with Mako gives them far greater strength and cognitive ability than ordinary humans possess, provided they are mentally strong enough to handle the Mako infusion process without suffering from mako poisoning.()(Cloud: You see, someone in SOLDIER isnt simply exposed to Mako energy. Their bodies are actually injected with Jenova cells......(Final Fantasy VII))The Department of Weapons Development was led by Scarlet and was tasked with the development and manufacture of new technological advancements to aid Shinras forces. The department was behind the creation of Shinras robot guards, the Junon Sister Ray Cannon and the plan to use Huge Materia to destroy the meteor.The Department of Urban Development was in charge of maintaining the cities under Shinras control- Midgar, Junon and others as well as controlling the Mako Reactor network which spread across Gaia. Reeve Tuesti was the Director of Urban Development and de jure administrator of Midgar--as opposed to the public officials, namely the Mayor of Midgar.The Department of Space Exploration was created as part of Shinras aspirations to explore space. However, the department was not fit for its purpose and under the incompetent Palmers leadership failed to achieve its goal. However the Department was never abolished and played a major role in the attempt to blow up the Meteor. World Regenesis Organization The World Regenesis Organization (WRO, known in Japan as the World Restoration Organization) is a fictional group in the Fantasy series. Two years after the events of Fantasy VII, Reeve Tuesti founded the World Regenesis Organization as shown by the acronym WRO on a road sign in the Advent Children movie. The primary objective of the WRO is to help heal and protect the planet against those who would wish to do it more harm. To help accomplish this, they have formed a large military force. The WRO is financially backed by an unknown benefactor, hinted to be Shinra hoping to help undo the damage he and his company caused to the planet.Members of WRO include many military units and scientists, as well as Sith, an animatronic cat designed by Reeve (although usually controlled by Reeve, it seems capable of independent actions and has its own distinct voice and personality); Shalua Rui, a WRO scientist; Kisaragi, drafted into the WRO and placed in charge of espionage and intelligence gathering; Highwind, placed in charge of the airship division.Additionally, several characters from Fantasy VII have helped aid the WRO, but it is unsure if they are official members, or simply lending Reeve a hand. These include Strife, Lockhart, Wallace (likely aiding in the search for an alternative natural resource in oil), XIII, and Shinra (financially backing the WRO in secret). Though not a member, Valentine aided the WRO on many occasions as he is targeted by the Deep Ground. Demography Ancients are an ancient nomadic people who called themselves the Cetra. They were the first humans to live on the Planet.() Their cultures goal was to seek out the Promised Land and offer respect to the Planet. As such, they cultivated the Planets life energy and fought and defeated the alien Jenova.((Aerith: All I know is... The Cetra were born from the Planet, speak with the Planet, and unlock the Planet. And....... then...... The Cetra will return to the Promised Land. A land that promises supreme happiness.(Final Fantasy VII))(Sephiroth: This Planet originally belonged to the Cetra. Cetra was an itinerant race. They would migrate in, settle the Planet, then move on... At the end of their harsh, hard journey, they would find the Promised Land and supreme happiness.(Final Fantasy VII))(Ifalna: The one the Professor mistook for a Cetra... was named Jenova. That is the crisis from the sky. The Planet knew it had to destroy the crisis from the sky... You see, as long as Jenova exists, the Planet will never be able to fully heal itself. ... / Ifalna: A small number of the surviving Cetra defeated Jenova, and confined it.(Final Fantasy VII)) Some Ancients abandoned their close relationship with the Planet and became the ancestors of modern day humans.(Sephiroth: But, those that disliked the journey appeared. Those who stopped their migrations built shelters and elected to lead an easier life. They took that which the Cetra and the planet had made without giving one whit in return! Those are your ancestors.(Final Fantasy VII)) Gainsborough was the last Ancient, although she was also of Human descent on her fathers side. Because Aerith was killed by Sephiroth while she was praying for Holy, the Cetra are now extinct. History Some say Midgar was once a collection of several smaller, independent towns. Eventually, the settlements consolidated to form the larger city of Midgar; each town formed one sector and gradually lost its original name.(Jessie: The 8 Reactors provide Midgar with electricity. Each town used to have a name, but no one in Midgar remembers them. Instead of names, we refer to them by numbered sectors.(Final Fantasy VII)) Though this quote may be poorly translated and can be taken to mean the sectors themselves previously had names and not that there were smaller towns prior to Midgars construction.At some point in its history, the Shinra Company went to war with the nation of Wutai.(( Shinra manufactured weaponry at this time, and developed a means of mass-producing materia, small spheres that allow one to use magical abilities, as well as an army of elite military units called SOLDIER.() With the development of these two assets, Shinra quickly brought the warwhich had lasted several yearsto an end.(() In the wake of the war, the public became extremely dependent on the Shinra Company for its materia and the Mako energy they provided for electricity.( At one point, Shinra had also developed a space exploration program, but after the war and the realization of just how profitable Mako energy could be, Shinra shifted its focus towards manufacturing it and conducting research upon Mako technologies, cancelling their space program and consolidating their operations.(Cid: And finally we get to the day of the launch. Everything was goin well... But, because of that dumb-ass Shera, the launch got messed up. Thats why they became so anal! And so, Shinra nixed their outer space exploration plans. After they told me how the future was Space Exploration and got my damn hopes up... DAMN THEM TO HELL! Then, it was all over once they found out Mako energy was profitable. They didnt even so much as look at space exploration.(Final Fantasy VII))Midgar eventually became embroiled in what was effectively a war against the terrorist AVALANCHE organization. During this time, AVALANCHE succeeded in causing great unrest within the company, and the Turks (Shinras covert operatives) and Shinra army worked to combat the threat.Eventually, this original incarnation of AVALANCHE was crushed and its name taken up by a new group that only consisted of a handful of operatives, who, nevertheless, engineered successful bombing missions that temporarily put two mako reactors out of commission. Later, Reno of the Turks destroyed the pillar holding up the section of the upper plate above Sector 7s slums, where AVALANCHE was based. This caused the plate to collapse and crush the slums below. Shinra executiveshoping that all members of AVALANCHE would be killed in the calamityblamed the incident on AVALANCHE in order to sway public opinion against the insurgents.President Shinra soon announced to his executives his desire to discover the Promised Land (a legendary place some believed would offer supreme happiness() where there would be a Neo-Midgar. The president believed this land to be abundant in Mako to such an extent that it would flow out of the ground of its own accord without the need for Mako reactors to siphon it, which would, in turn, increase Shinras profits exponentially.(President Shinra: Its been said the Promised Land is very fertile. ...If the land is fertile... / Barret: Then theres gotta be Mako! / President Shinra: Exactly. That is why our money sucking Mako Reactor is a necessity. The abundant Mako will just come out on its own. That is where Neo-Midgar will be built. Shinras new glory...(Final Fantasy VII)) This desire resulted in a decision by the company not to rebuild Sector 7 after it was destroyed.Some time later, the Shinra Company moved the Mako Cannon from Junon to Midgar and integrated it with the citys Mako reactor network, increasing its power. Their intent was to use the reactors to power the cannon and fire a beam of pure Mako in the hopes of removing an energy barrier the Planets nemesis, Sephiroth, had conjured to protect himself. The cannon was able to destroy the rampaging Diamond WEAPON and destroy Sephiroths barrier around the Northern Crater, but a simultaneous attack by the fallen WEAPON damaged some areas of Midgar, destroying the upper floors of the Shinra headquarters and nearly killing Shinra. At the same time, AVALANCHE infiltrated the city, killing several of the remaining Shinra executives and disabling the Sister Ray, which threatened to destroy the entire city due to overload incited by Professor Hojo, the head of Shinras Science Department.When Sephiroths Planet-destroying spell known as Meteor descended, it was revealed to be directed at Midgar. Although Reeve Tuesti, Kisaragi, Valentine and the Turks evacuated the populace of the upper plate to the slums, storms spawned by the intense gravity generated between Meteor and the Planet tore apart much of the city itself.()After the destruction of Meteor, the survivors of Midgar used debris from the city to build a new town called Edge on the outskirts of Midgar.() During the events of Advent Children, the populace suffered greatly from Geostigma, and the city itself suffered a large amount of structural damage when the movies central villain, Kadaj, summoned Bahamut SIN.A year later, it was revealed that the Deep Groundan experimental military project involving SOLDIERs, developed by President Shinra before his deathwere housed deep underground in Midgar, and were briefly trapped there by the effects of the Meteor crisis. Midgar once more became a battlefield as the World Restoration Organization (WRO) led by Reeve Tuesti engaged the Deep Grounds army, allowing Valentine to slip into the city and play a large role in bringing the conflict to an end.Little is known of Midgars history after this game. It is known, however, that five hundred years after the crisis brought by Sephiroth, central Midgar, containing Shinra headquarters and mako reactors, is overgrown as nature reclaimed the once-drained land. Metaphysics  Lifestream :For the Internet aggregation technique, see lifestreaming.250px|thumb|right|Waves of energy from the LifestreamHoused below the Planets surface, the  is considered the lifeblood and very spirit of the Planet. This river of green ethereal energy (called Spirit Energy) is characterized as a swell of souls of those who have lived and died in the past, a collective consciousness with strong similarities to the Oversoul of transcendentalist philosophy, the Atman-Brahman God concept of Hinduism, or certain Gaia theories. In particular, the Lifestream concept is identical to the Gaia Theory depicted in Fantasy: The Spirits Within, in which living things (plants, animals, and human beings) are given energy by the spirit of the Planet prior to birth, live out their lives, and then die, with the energy then returning to the Planet. During an organisms lifetime, they have experiences from which they gain memories, and once they die, their Spirit Energy returns to the Planet, taking with it the memories of the life form to which it had been attached. These memories in turn give rise to more Spirit Energy, allowing the Planets spirit as a whole to grow, and the cycle of life to continue.()(Bugenhagen: Spirit Energy is a word that you should never forget. A new life... children are blessed with Spirit Energy and are brought into the world. Then, the time comes when they die and once again return to the Planet...(Final Fantasy VII)) Mako Whereas Spirit Energy in its raw form is ethereal, Mako is a liquid, taking this form after settling at the surface of the Planet and condensing. The terms  and Spirit Energy are often used interchangeably due to one being a derivative of the other, but in Final Fantasy VIIs modern times, the use of the term Spirit Energy is widely opposed due to its negative connotation.() Mako as an energy source Mako is the most common source of electrical power on the planet in the present day of Final Fantasy VII, with the various fossil fuels (oil, coal, etc.) becoming obsolete. The process of generating energy via mako was pioneeredand monopolizedby the Electric Power Company. Those who research the Study of Planet Life, a philosophy that regards the Planet as a living entity and seeks to understand it, consider Mako extraction and its usage to be environmentally unfriendly.( Despite this, few openly oppose Shinra, as their control over the world is absolute. The only people to have done so were the organized group known as AVALANCHE, who actively attacked Shinra facilities, specifically Mako reactors, in the hopes of deterring their use.Mako serves as Shinras main source of profit, as well as the basis for many of their weapons and inventions. Combined with powerful computer technology, Mako can be used to create powerful and efficient robotic soldiers. This is something the Shinra Company has taken advantage of and has created various types of guard from robotic-Mako technology, such as the Scorpion Guard and Proud-Clod. The Sister Ray Mako cannon stationed in Junon used a variety of Mako shells, and, laterafter being moved to Midgar and modifiedfired a massive beam of raw Mako energy. In addition to the energy resource and weaponry allocations of Mako, the Shinra Company was also developing Mako-powered vehicles for civilian purposes.Mako is thought to be similar to radioactive materials in that prolonged exposure can lead to genetic mutation, disability and even death. Individuals who have had prolonged exposure to Mako are identified by a glow in their eyes, referred to as Mako eyes. All members of SOLDIER bear this distinguishing feature, and, as such, it is considered to be a mark of SOLDIER.(Aerith: ...Your eyes. They have a strange glow... / Cloud: Thats the sign of those who have been infused with Mako... A mark of SOLDIER.(Final Fantasy VII)) Mako poisoning Exposure to mako in its concentrated form can be dangerous to humans and typically results in a psychological disorder known as Mako poisoning. The cause is a surge of memories flooding ones mind to the extent that they can no longer perceive their own place amongst the knowledge that has entered their brains.( Mako poisoning can be averted by minimal exposure to Mako and/or by having strong mental composure during Mako exposure. Symptoms of Mako poisoning, at least in the extreme cases, are diagnosed by the victims partial or complete inability to speak, hazed vision bathed in green (as seen in Last Order), and limpness in the body with very limited capabilities of movement. It seems those suffering from severe cases are still capable of hearing, though not necessarily able to respond. Treatments have been devised to help those whom suffer from Mako poisoning, but the greater levels of contamination are more difficult and normally impossible to cure. The main character of Final Fantasy VII, Cloud Strife, experienced severe mako poisoning at least twice: the first being 4 years prior to the events of the game when he was an unwilling test subject of Professor Hojos, and the second time being during the games storyline when he fell into the Lifestream after being forced to give Sephiroth the Black Materia. Geostigma Geostigma, a disease which appears in Fantasy VII Advent Children is an infectious disease first spread through Lifestream: When Sephiroth and Jenova were defeated deep within the Planet, their destruction released Jenova cells into the Lifestream. When the Lifestream came out of the Planet to help Holy stop Meteor, the people of Midgar were in close proximity with the Lifestream. This saw them infected with Sephiroths tainted cells, and they began to suffer the effects of Geostigma, a syndrome in which the bodys spirit energy exerts itself to expunge the foreign Jenova cells, wreaking havoc on the body itself. The souls of those that died from Geostigma formed a new kind of Spirit Energy, bent to Sephiroths will, which Sephiroth intended to use to seize control of the Planet. He is defeated by Cloud before this plan can be followed through to conclusion. In of Cerberus: Final Fantasy VII, Deepground deemed any and all who were afflicted with Geostigma as unworthy to exist in their new world order. Materia  are small spheres of crystallized Spirit Energy used in the magic system of the role-playing game Fantasy VII. These spheres allow their users to cast various magic spells and use special abilities. Materia is created from crystallized Mako, either naturally or artificially, although finding a natural source of materia is extremely rare.( One such Mako fountain exists in the mountains above Nibelheim. Within materia reside the knowledge and memories of those who have lived and died in the past. Materia functions by acting as a conduit between its wielder and the planets Lifestream, allowing the memories associated with that materia to be manifested in a physical sense, as what is referred to as magic.((Sephiroth: ...the knowledge and wisdom of the Ancients is held in the materia. Anyone with this knowledge can freely use the powers of the Land and the Planet. That knowledge interacts between ourselves and the planet calling up magic..... or so they say.(Final Fantasy VII)) Materia come in various colors, with the Black and the White Materia being unique items.The Black Materia is utilized to cast the spell Meteor, the Ultimate Destructive Magic in Final Fantasy VII, capable of destroying an entire planet. Much of the plot in the game revolves around the pursuit of the Black Materia, both by the games heroes (in order to safeguard it from those who would misuse it) and by the games villain, Sephiroth (as a vehicle for his plans). The party is able to obtain the materia at the Temple of the Ancients, but main character Strife is forced to relinquish it to Sephiroth, both there, and a second time later at the Northern Crater, allowing Sephiroth to cast Meteor. Meteor is stopped when Aerith controls Holy and the Lifestream to protect the planet after being impaled and murdered by Sephiroth.The White Materia casts the spell called Holy which can protect the Planet, and is the antithesis of the Black Materia. Where Meteor is the Ultimate Destructive Magic, Holy is the pinnacle of defensive magic, at least so far as regarding the Planet. It is for this reason that the party seeks out the White Materia during the latter part of the game, though it can only be used by one with an understanding of its purpose and only in the City of the Ancients.() Like all materia, the White Materia links its wielder to the Planet, and if their request to the Planet to release Holy is granted, the White Materia will glow pale green as a symbol of this.((Cloud: Search for Holy... How do we do it? ... / Bugenhagen: Get the White Materia... This will bond the Planet to humans. Then speak to the planet. If our wish reaches the planet, the White Materia will begin to glow a pale green.(Final Fantasy VII)) When Gainsborough is killed by Sephiroth after he impales her , the White Materia falls from her hair and finds its final resting place at the bottom of a lake in the City of the Ancients, where the deceased body of Aeris herself also rests.The size of materia has changed since its inception in the original game. Materia crystals in Final Fantasy VII were roughly marble-sized (the exception being the Black Materia, which is significantly larger), as can be seen in several characters weapons in the official artwork. In Advent Children, however, Materia have increased in size to that of tennis balls, slightly smaller than the Black Materia. This could, however, be because materia is supposed to grow (as it grows in the game an upon reaching its highest level spawns a first level copy of itself), and the materia in Clouds possession is supposedly the same materia he possessed from the game (which would logically be a high level). Also, Kadaj uses a blue materia to summon Bahamut SIN and use Enemy Skills. Green materia were originally used in the game for offensive and defensive spells such as Fire, Quake, and Cure. Summon materia in the game were denoted by the color red. The materia in Before Crisis is similar in size to that used in the original game.Materia has also appeared in other Square or Square Enix video games. In the Quest mode of Ehrgeiz, materia are the source of magical abilities. Also, in the games backstory, the Ehrgeiz sword is said to have a materia set into its hilt. In Fantasy Tactics, materia can be found as treasure on proposition missions accepted at various bars in Ivalice. However, the materia is not usable in the game. In addition, the Materia Bladea sword that can be found at Bervenia Volcanois the only weapon in the game that allows Cloudappearing as an optional secret characterto use his Break abilities. In Fantasy Tactics Advance, materia is the substance produced from materite. There are two pieces of equipment made from materia in this game: the Materia Blade (which teaches Ultima Sword to Gladiators and Ultima Charge to Mog Knights) and Materia Armor (which has one of the highest defensive stats in the game). WEAPON In the of Final Fantasy VII, there are eight WEAPON: Jade WEAPON, Sapphire WEAPON,(The name Sapphire is not actually mentioned in the game, but it was confirmed by its database entry in the fourth disc of Final Fantasy VII International and then in an official collectible figurine release.) Ultima WEAPON, Diamond WEAPON, Emerald WEAPON, Ruby WEAPON, Omega WEAPON, and Chaos. The WEAPON play a major role in the Final Fantasy VII storyline. According to the game, these entities were created by the Planet as self-defense mechanisms to deal with threats against Gaia. The precise purpose of WEAPON is, in the extreme crisis caused by Jenova, to destroy all that exists on the Planet, to allow the life of all of the organisms that exist on Gaia to return to the Lifestream. Once that was done, Omega WEAPON, whose purpose is evacuation, would absorb the Lifestream within itself and leave Gaia to find another planet, whereupon the Lifestream would be implanted, and life would start over. However, once Jenova was contained by the Cetra, the WEAPON were no longer needed and entered hibernation beneath the ice at the Northern Crater. Thousands of years later, during the games events when Meteor is summoned by Sephiroth, the other fighting WEAPON are reactivated to fulfill the reason of their existence: protecting the Planet by targeting every potential threat to it (especially the Shinra Company, for their Mako Reactors) and reducing everything to nothingness.(Hojo:...WEAPON. Monsters created by the Planet. It appears when the Planet is in danger, reducing everything to nothingness. Thats what was stated in Professor Gasts report.) Unfortunately, Sephiroth created the barrier on the Northern Cave to keep the WEAPON from him. The WEAPON were intent to send all souls back to the Lifestream to strengthen it in order to help survive the coming destruction by Meteor, or if that was not possible, to evacuate the Lifestream altogether using Omega.Only three WEAPON creatures were featured in the original Japanese release of Final Fantasy VII; these were the Sapphire, Diamond, and Ultima WEAPON, although others such as the Emerald and Ruby WEAPON are briefly visible in the cinematic in which the WEAPON are released. The Western release (and the later International release) added the Ruby and Emerald WEAPON as optional battles, as well as a mandatory battle against the Diamond WEAPON. The Sapphire WEAPON is destroyed by Shinras Sister Ray cannon at Junon after the monster emerges from the ocean and attacks the town. AVALANCHE fights the Diamond WEAPON when it emerges from the ocean near Midgar and threatens the city before it is ultimately finished off, again by Shinra and their Sister Ray (now located at Midgar). AVALANCHE also has one mandatory fight against Ultima WEAPON in Mideel but are unable to destroy it before it flies away. They have the option to chase it down and fight it several times after the fight with Diamond Weapon where it is finally brought down near Cosmo Canyon, with the resulting impact crater allowing access on foot to the nearby Ancient Forest, as well as giving the player Clouds ultimate weapon. However as the player is told to immediately go to the next destination which is the final mission in disc 2 where the Highwind is available, it is missed by a lot of players until disc 3. The Emerald and Ruby WEAPONs are both optional battles and pose as the strongest monsters in the game. The Emerald WEAPON resides under the sea, and is ready to attack when the player first acquires the submarine. The battle is made even harder by a 20 minute time limit representing the characters oxygen capacity. This time limit can be removed by morphing a ghost ship from the underground reactor and giving the acquired item to the Kalm Traveler. Even with the time limit removed, the Emerald WEAPON can still cause a problem by random use of Aire Tam Storm (Materia spelled backwards) attack that will do 1111 damage for each materia equipped. The Ruby WEAPON resides in the desert surrounding the Gold Saucer, but only appears after defeating Ultima WEAPON.Jade WEAPON is chronologically the first to be activated, as a result of the events of Crisis: Final Fantasy VII. Omega WEAPON is awakened three years after the destruction of Meteor; its purpose is to serve as an ark for the Planets life, absorbing all its Lifestream and setting off to space to avoid a huge calamity. Chaos awakens as well in order to harvest Lifestream for Omega to collect and bring to space.An inactive WEAPON can also be seen in the Village Underground in Core: Final Fantasy VII, though it appears to exist only as an easter egg at this time.() This weapon is thought to be Emerald, as you can just see its eyes. References  External links * Final Fantasy VII Ultimania and Compilation Translations at The Lifestream.net* Final Fantasy VII Ultimania  Translations FAQ - Translations from the Final Fantasy VII Ultimania * The Planet (Gaia) at the Final Fantasy WikiShin-Raes:Midgarde Final Fantasy VIIid:Materiait:Midgarja:(Final Fantasy VII)(Final Fantasy)sv:Midgar
874075
British_T_class_submarine
{|Ship notes|}The Navys T class (or Triton class) of diesel-electric submarines was designed in the 1930s to replace the O, P and R classes. Fifty-three members of the class were built just before and during the Second World War, where they played a major role in the Royal Navys submarine operations. Four boats in service for the Netherlands Navy were known as the Zwaardfisch class.In the decade following the war, the oldest surviving boats were scrapped and the remainder converted to anti-submarine vessels to counter the perceived growing Soviet submarine threat.  The Royal Navy disposed of its last operational boat in 1969, although it retained one permanently moored as a static training submarine until 1974. The last surviving boat, serving in the Israel Sea Corps, was scrapped in 1977.Design and developmentDesign began in 1934 but was constrained by the 1930 Naval Treaty restricting the total British submarine fleet to 52,700 tons, a maximum of 2,000 tons for any boat, and maximum armament of one 5.1 inch (130 mm) gun.  The Repeat Ps, as the design was originally called, were intended to be large and powerful enough to operate against Japan in the absence of other British naval units. Britain was in a financial crisis and would have difficulty affording enough boats to meet their allowance. It was expected from British work on ASDIC that the other nations would develop something similar. To that end a smaller vessel around 1,100 tons would avoid detection. In the face of expected enemy anti-submarine measures any attack would probably have to be made at long range without the aid of the periscope but on ASDIC. To counter the resultant inaccuracy a large salvo of at least eight torpedoes would be needed.(Brown DK Nelson to Vanguard p 112)The eventual design had 10 forward-facing torpedo tubes and a maximum diving depth of 300 ft (91 m).  The design was finalised in 1935 and on June 24 the decision was made to drop the Repeat P designation and give all boats names starting with T.The forward firing armament was 6 internal bow torpedo tubes, two external tubes on the bow and two more external tubes amidships angled to fire forward. A single  deck gun was carried.The ten-torpedo salvo was the largest ever fitted to an operational submarine.(McCartney, I., British Submarines 1939-1945, Osprey Publishing, ISBN 9781846030079, 2006)  British operational planning at the time assumed that international treaties would prevent unrestricted submarine warfare, and that the main purpose of the submarine would be to attack enemy warships.  In such a situation a commander may only have had one chance to attack, so a large salvo was essential.  Placing six of the ten torpedo tubes within the pressure hull prevented the design from having the perfect cylindrical shape, like contemporary German designs, which were more lightly armed.  This reduced the T-class pressure depth, but it was a conscious design compromise.  T-class  boats built later in the war reversed the two amidships tubes to fire astern, rather than forward.The lead boat, Triton, was ordered on 5 March 1936 and ran her first-of-class trials in December 1938. Fifty-three T-class submarines were built before and during the war in three distinct groups, although there were minor differences between boats within the same group. The second and third groups had the fuel capacity increased on many boats to 230 tons, giving a range of  at ((The Complete Encyclopedia of Weapons of WW2, Bishop, p450: states a range of 12665nm at 10 knots.)Service historyT-class submarines fought in all theatres in the Second World War and suffered around 25 percent losses. They were particularly vulnerable in the Mediterranean, where their large size made them easily visible from the air in the clear waters, but they had much more success elsewhere.After the war, all surviving Group One and Two boats were scrapped and the remainder fitted with snorts.In the late 1940s and 1950s, most were streamlined for quiet and higher-speed underwater operation against Soviet submarines, in place of the anti-surface-ship role that they had been designed for. In January 1948, it was formally acknowledged that the main operational function of the British submarine fleet would now be to intercept Soviet submarines slipping out of their bases in Northern Russia to attack British and Allied merchant vessels. The following April, the Assistant Chief of Naval Staff, Rear-Admiral Oliver, circulated a paper in which he proposed that British submarines take a more offensive role by attacking Soviet submarines off the Northern Russian coast and mining the waters in the area. With the dramatically reduced surface fleet following the end of the Second World War, he commented that this was one of the few methods the Royal Navy had for getting to the enemy on his home ground.()Much of the work carried out on the submarines was underpinned by results of measurements made using Tradewind, which had been modified in July 1945-September 1946 to become an acoustic trials submarine, with external tubes and guns removed, the bridge faired, the hull streamlined and some internal torpedo tubes blanked over.Starting in 1948, eight newer all-welded boats underwent extensive Super-T conversion at Dockyard. The modifications included the removal of deck guns and the replacement of the conning tower with a sail, a smooth-surfaced and far more symmetrical and streamlined tower. An extra battery was installed, and a new section of hull inserted to accommodate an extra pair of motors and switchgear.  This varied between 14 ft (4.3 m) in the earlier conversions and 17 ft 6 in (5.33 m) in the later ones. These changes allowed an underwater speed of 15 knots (28 km/h) or more and increased the endurance to around 32 hours at 3 knots (6 km/h). The first boats to undergo this modification were Taciturn in November 1948-March 1951, followed by  Turpin in June 1949-September 1951. The programme was completed with the conversion of Trump in February 1954-June 1956.The conversion was not entirely successful since the height was reduced, making the boats roll heavily on the surface in rough weather.  This was alleviated in 1953 in those conversions which had been completed by increasing the buoyancy by raising the capacity of a main ballast tank by 50 tons. This was done by merging it with an existing emergency oil fuel tank. For the four boats remaining to be converted, increase in buoyancy was achieved by lengthening the extra hull section to be inserted from 14 ft (4.3 m) to 17 ft 6 in (5.33 m). The effect was to lengthen the control room and strict instructions were issued that this space was not to be used for extra equipment otherwise the improved buoyancy would be affected.In the meantime, in December 1950, approval was made for the streamlining of five riveted boats. This was a much less extensive process with the removal of deck guns, external torpedo tubes and the replacement of the conning tower with a sail and the batteries replaced with more modern versions providing a 23 percent increase in power.  The work was much more straightforward than the conversion of the welded boats and was undertaken during normal refit. The first riveted boat to undergo this modification was Tireless in 1951. The last operational Royal Navy boat of the class was Tiptoe, which was decommissioned on 29 August 1969.  The last T class boat in service with Royal Navy, albeit non-operationally, was Tabard which was permanently moored as a static training submarine at the HMS Dolphin shore-establishment from 1969 until 1974, when she was replaced by HMS Alliance.The last operational boat anywhere was the INS Dolphin, formerly HMS Truncheon, one of three T-class boats (and two S-class ones) sold to the Navy() - and which was decommissioned in 1977. Another submarine sold to Israel, Totem renamed INS Dakar, was lost in the Mediterranean in 1969 while on passage from Scotland to Haifa - a tragedy still remembered in Israel decades later.  Although the wreck was discovered in 1999, the cause of the accident remains uncertain.Group One boatsThese fifteen pre-war submarines were ordered under the Programmes of 1935 (Triton), 1936 (next four), 1937 (next seven) and 1938 (last three). The boats originally had a bulbous bow covering the two forward external torpedo tubes, which quickly produced complaints that they reduced surface speed in rough weather. These external tubes were therefore removed from Triumph during repairs after she was damaged by a mine and Thetis during the extensive repairs following her sinking and subsequent salvage.  Only six survived the war, less than half.* Triton (sunk in the Adriatic on 18 December 1940)* Thetis (sank during trials, was salvaged and recommissioned as Thunderbolt; sunk by the Italian corvette Cicogna off Strait on 14 March 1942)* Tribune* Trident* Triumph (lost, probably to Italian mines, on 14 January 1942)* Taku* Tarpon (probably sunk by German minesweeper M-6 on 14 April 1940)* Thistle (torpedoed by U-4 on 10 April 1940)* Tigris (probably sunk by German ship UJ-2210 on 27 February 1943)* Triad (sunk by gunfire from the Italian submarine Enrico Toti in the of Taranto on 15 October 1940)* Truant* Tuna* Talisman (lost, probably to Italian mines, on 17 September 1942)* Tetrarch, the only boat completed with mine laying equipment (lost, probably to Italian mines, on 2 November 1941)* TorbayGroup Two boatsThese seven vessels were all ordered under the 1939 War Emergency Programme. The first, Thrasher, was launched on 5 November 1940. The external bow torpedo tubes were moved seven feet aft to help with sea keeping. The two external forward-angled tubes just forward of conning tower were repositioned aft of it and angled backwards to fire astern, and a stern external torpedo tube was also fitted.  This gave a total of eight forward-facing tubes and three rear-facing ones. All Group Two boats were sent to the Mediterranean, only Thrasher and Trusty returned.* Tempest (sunk by the Italian class torpedo boat Circe on 13 February 1942)* Thorn (sunk by the Italian class torpedo boat Pegaso on 6 August 1942)* Thrasher* Traveller (lost, probably to Italian mines, on 12 December 1942)* Trooper (lost, probably to German mines, on 14 October 1943)* Trusty* Turbulent (sunk by Italian torpedo boats on 12 March 1943):Turbulent sank over 90,000 tons of enemy shipping. She was depth charged on over 250 occasions by enemy forces hunting her.(Submarine History : Submarine Service : Operations and Support : Royal Navy)Group Three boatsWartime austerity meant that they lacked many refinements such as jackstaffs and guardrails, and had only one anchor. Much of the internal pipework was steel rather than copper.  The first Group Three boat was P311, launched on 10 June 1942.  Welding gradually replaced riveting and some boats were completely welded, which gave them an improved rated maximum diving depth of 350 ft (107 m).*Nine submarines were ordered under the 1940 Programme.* P311 (lost, probably to Italian mines, before her name Tutankhamen was formally assigned)* Trespasser* Taurus (To the Royal Netherlands Navy as Dolfijn)* Tactician* Truculent (sunk in collision on 12 January 1950)* Templar* Tally-Ho* Tantalus* Tantivy*Seventeen submarines were ordered under the 1941 Programme.* Telemachus* Talent (P322) (to the Netherlands Navy as Zwaardvisch)* Terrapin * Thorough* Thule* Tudor* Tireless* Token* Tradewind* Trenchant* Tiptoe* Trump* Taciturn* Tapir (to the Royal Netherlands Navy as Zeehond (2))* Tarn (to the Royal Netherlands Navy as Tijgerhaai)* Talent (P337)* Teredo*Fourteen submarines were ordered under the 1942 Programme, but only five were completed.* Tabard* Totem (lost in accident on passage to Israel as INS Dakar)* Truncheon (later the Israeli INS Dolphin)* Turpin (later the Israeli INS Leviathan)* ThermopylaeThe other nine were ordered but cancelled on October 29, 1945 following the end of hostilities:* Thor (launched 18 April 1944 but not completed)* Tiara (also launched on 18 April 1944 but not completed)* Theban (P341)* Talent (P343)* Threat (P344)* also four unnamed submarines (P345, P346, P347 and P348).Transfers to Royal Netherlands Navy* Tijgerhaai (ex-Tarn)* Zwaardvisch (ex-Talent)* Zeehond (2) (ex-Tapir)* Dolfijn (ex-Taurus)See alsoNotes and referencesT (Royal Navy)T (sommergibile Regno Unito)Tokrty podwodne typu T   ()
875713
Aur_Resources
Aur Resources Inc. was a Ontario, Canada, based, international mining company active in the acquisition, exploration, development and mining of mineral properties. Aur has three producing mining operations and derives approximately 95% of its revenue from the production and sale of copper.Cominco acquired all of the outstanding common shares of Aur Resources in September 2007.External links* Former official site - now redirects to Teck Cominco
877392
Prince_of_Wales_Island_(Alaska)
:For other islands named after the Prince of Wales, see of Wales Island.Prince of Wales Island is one of the islands of the Archipelago in the Panhandle. It is the fourth-largest island in the United States (after Hawaii, Island, and Rico) and the 97th-largest island in the world. footnotes() Geography and ecologyThe island is  long,  wide and has an area of , about 1/10 the size of Ireland and slightly larger than the state of Delaware. Approximately 6,000 people live on the island. Craig is the largest community; founded as a saltery in the early 20th century, it has a population of 1,000. Some 750 people live in Klawock, a long-established village that grew with the industry. Hollis was a boom and bust mining town from 1900 to about 1915; abandoned, it was re-established as a logging camp in the 50s, and now has a population of 100. Hollis is where the ferry terminal is located,() one hour drive from Craig and a three-hour trip to Ketchikan.Mountain peaks, all but the tallest of which were buried by Pleistocene glaciation, reach over . Fjords, steep-sided mountains, and dense forests characterize the island. Extensive tracts of limestone include karst features such as Capitan Pit, at  the deepest vertical shaft in the United States.Moist, maritime conditions dominate the weather. The National Forest covers most of the island. Within the forest and on the island are the River Wilderness and the Prince of Wales Wilderness. The of Wales flying squirrel (Glaucomys sabrinus griseifrons) is found nowhere else.()The island is in the Prince of Wales-Hyder Census Area.HistoryPrince of Wales Island is the homeland of the Haida people. Kaigani is a mispronunciation of the Tlingit word xaax aani which translates to crabapple country. The Tlingit name for the island is Taan, meaning sea lion. The island is traditional Tlingit territory with the Haida moving into the area in the late 18th century and the abandoned Haida villages actually being Tlingit in name.In 1741, Chirikov, commanding a ship on Berings second voyage of exploration out of Kamchatka, made the first European landfall on the northwest coast of North America at Baker Island on the west coast of Prince of Wales Island. It was not until 1775 that a Spanish expedition reached Prince of Wales Island and claimed it for Spain. A British expedition in 1778, under Captain Cook, accurately mapped much of the coast of Alaska, including parts of Prince of Wales Island. Comte de La Perouse led a French expedition to the area in 1786.()Mining of gold, copper, and other metals on the island began in the late 19th century. Gold production came from underground lode mines exploiting: gold-bearing quartz veins in metamorphic rocks (such as the Gold Standard, Sea Level, Dawson, Golden Fleece and Goldstream mines); skarns (at the Jumbo and Kassan Peninsula copper-gold mines); zoned mafic-ultramafic plutons, as at the Salt Chuck silver-gold-copper-PGE mine; and VMS deposits such as Niblack. Uranium was mined at Bokan Mountain in the 1950s and 1970s.(http://ardf.wr.usgs.gov/ardf_data/DixonEntrance.pdf)(http://www.ucoreuranium.com/bokan.asp)EconomyLoggingLogging has historically been a mainstay of the collective Prince of Wales economy, however recently there has been a decline in the industry leaving only a few small-scale sawmills operating. In 1975, the Point Baker Association and other citizens sued the States Forest Service to prevent logging  on the northern portion of the island.In December 1975, Judge von der Heydt issued a ruling enjoining clearcutting. In March 1976, the States Congress responded to the suit by passing the Forest Management Act which removed the injunction. Subsequently half of the marketable timber was cut on the north end of the island.In 2010, Senators Murkowski and Begich  introduced a bill to privatize stands of growth forests on the island.()TourismRecently, tourism, including fishing, has become a more important part in Prince of Wales economy. Tourism has increased in part due to the easier accessibility to Prince of Wales Island by the new Ferry Authority.FishingCommercial fishing provides the foundation of the economy for numerous towns on the island including Craig, Klawock, Hydaburg, Port Protection and Point Baker. During the summer, trollers and seiners both fish for all five species of salmon. Longliners bring up halibut and cod. crab and shrimp seasons are open throughout the year. During the winter there are dive fisheries for geoducks, cucumbers, and urchins.GovernmentSince Prince of Wales Island is almost entirely made up of federal land, the two ranger districts (Craig and Thorne Bay) on the island provide employment for a number of residents.MiningMineral exploration continues at many projects on Prince of Wales Island. The only producing uranium mine in the entire state of Alaska is located on the island, the Ross-Adams mine in Kendrick Bay. Current remediation projects have been reported in local media, and continued exploration of Rare Earth Metals continue in the region. Bokan Mountain has been rated by the Technology Metals report as a a location (tied with Canadas Strange Lake containing the third highest of relative quantity of individual critical rare earth oxides, a way of comparing rare earth mine reserves.()TransportationRoadsA road system, much of it originally created by the logging industry, spans much of the island and an increasing amount of it is becoming paved. Only a number of communities on the northern tip of the island are without road access to other Prince of Wales communities.There is now a newly-designated state scenic highway - the  Prince of Wales Island road system. The highway reaches almost every community on Prince of Wales.CargoA few companies provide scheduled barge service from Pacific coast ports to southeastern Alaskan ports, including those on Prince of Wales island (primarily Craig).Public ferryAlaska Marine Highway SystemHistorically, the Marine Highway (AMHS) intermittently served the port of Hollis, until the Inter-Island Ferry Authority began regular scheduled service.Inter-Island Ferry AuthorityAfter little AMHS service, the communities of Prince of Wales Island banded together to create their own ferry service, the Ferry Authority which has two Prince of Wales Island-dedicated vessels in its fleet, currently with year-round daily service between Hollis and Ketchikan. There was summer service between Coffman Cove, Wrangell and Petersburg (via Wrangell); and indirect service via connections with the Alaska Marine Highway to many Alaskan ports, Rupert, British Columbia, and Washington which was cancelled due to low ridership and lack of funding.AirportsAirport  is the only airport on Prince of Wales island.Three commercial airlines in Ketchikan provide scheduled service to Prince of Wales island.Air taxi or chartered flights are also available from them and other airlines.Seaplane basesScheduled airlinesCommunities*Coffman Cove*Craig*Hollis*Hydaburg*Kasaan*Klawock*Naukati Bay*Point Baker*Port Protection*Port St. Nicholas*Thorne Bay*Waterfall*Whale PassNotable ex-residents*Madison, American model and Hefners former girlfriend.ReferencesGeneral references del Prncep de Galles (Alaska)(Alaska)Printsi saar (Alaska)del Prncipe de Galesdu Prince-de-Galles (Alaska)Prncipe de Gales ( )Principe di Galles (Stati Uniti dAmerica)Princo sala (Aliaska)van Wales-eiland (Alaska)Ksicia Walii (Archipelag Aleksandra)do Prncipe de Gales (Alasca)  ()of Wales Island
879080
Austin,_Nevada
File:Stokes castle.JPG|right|thumb|CastleImage:Austin, Nevada (King Survey), 1868.jpg|thumb|Austin in 1868. Photo by H. OSullivan.Image:AustinNevada.JPG|right|thumb|Austin in 2004, looking east on Route 50.Austin is a small, unincorporated community located in County, Nevada, in the States. As of 2004, its population is approximately 340. It is located on the western slopes of the Range at an elevation of . U.S. Route 50 passes through the town.HistoryNamed for Texas, Austin was founded in 1862, as part of a rush reputedly triggered by a Express horse who kicked over a rock. By summer 1863, the Austin and the surrounding River Mining District had a population of over 10,000, and it became the seat of Lander County (the seat was shifted to Battle Mountain in 1997).   In 1864, the town launched Colt Gridleys impromptu fundraising drive that raised over $250,000 for wounded Civil War veterans, by repeatedly auctioning a sack of flour.The Central Railroad was built to connect Austin with the transcontinental railroad at Battle Mountain in 1880. However, by that time the boom was almost over.  Major silver production ended by 1887, although there was a slight revival in the 1910s.  In the mid 1950s there was a great deal of interest in uranium deposits in the area, but the ore proved to be of low quality. Gold and silver mining has continued in the area sporadically and at generally low levels of production. High quality turquoise is still mined in the area in small quantities. This active turquoise mining, together with several shops that manufacture jewelry from local turquoise have made Austin a sort of Nevada Turquoise mecca.Today Austin is a living town, a well-preserved example of an early Nevada mining town. It contains three churches; the Catholic church and the Methodist church were both built in 1866. The Methodist Church is now used as a community center. The Catholic church, St. Augustines, has been purchased and is being restored as a cultural center for Central Nevada.  The Episcopal church, considered by some to be the prettiest frontier church still standing, was built in 1878 and is still in regular use.  The International Hotel, first built in Virginia City in 1859 and moved to Austin in 1863 still serves meals and drinks, but does not rent out rooms (there is a motel across the street).  The International Hotel is said to be the oldest in Nevada.  Austin contains numerous other historical buildings, in various states of repair.Castle, a strange three-story stone tower, is located just outside of town.  It was built in 1897 by Phelps Stokes, a wealthy eastern capitalist who had a financial interest in several of the local mines.  It was only occupied for a month, and then fell into disrepair.GovernmentAustin is the headquarters of the federally recognized Shoshone Tribe of the Yomba Reservation.(Nevada Tribes. 500 Nations. (retrieved 5 May 2010))AttractionsApproximately fifteen miles East of Austin is a cluster of natural hot springs maintained by visitors and local volunteers.  The Petroglyph Recreational Area  http://www.roadtripusa.com/routes/loneliestroad/nevada/lon_hickison.html, located 28 miles east of Austin, features a short interpretive trail where visitors can see ancient drawings carved into the rocks.  Free brochures are provided.Silver depositsThe Austin silver deposits consist of numerous narrow (often only several inches in width) quartz veins hosted in monzonite rock.  The main ore minerals are sulfides that contain silver, including large quantities of galena and tetrahedrite.  Oxidized ore, which was very shallow, included silver chloride (chlorargyrite) which was easily reduced to metallic silver, although these oxidized deposits were exhausted quickly.  The deeper sulfide (hypogene) ore was much more difficult to work and had to be roasted prior to amalgamation.  Milling and concentration was used to separate the silver-containing sulfides from the barren quartz.  Because of the added expense of this kind of processing along with the narrow veins, only high grade ores could be profitably worked in Austin.The Austin veins are of an older age and were formed at a greater depth than many other silver districts in Nevada, such as the epithermal veins of Virginia City (Lode).  In addition, the value of the Austin ores was largely (with several exceptions) silver (with significant base metals (lead, zinc and copper)) with very little gold, whereas most epithermal veins have highly significant gold.Pop cultureIn the Humor video Google Street View Guys, the two men go through Austin.ReferencesExternal links* Austin Chamber of Commerce page* The Austin Blog* Lander County page on Austin* Austin Branch Library* Nevada Central Narrow Gauge(Nevada)Nevada(Nevada)Nevada(Nevada)
882533
Aaron_A._Sargent
 professionPolitician, LawyerAaron Augustus Sargent (September 28, 1827 &ndash; August 14, 1887) was an American journalist, lawyer, politician and diplomat. He was sometimes called the Senator for the Pacific Railroad.BiographyBorn in Massachusetts, he attended the common schools and then was apprenticed to a cabinetmaker. In his youth he worked as a printer in Philadelphia and then, in 1847, moved to D.C., where he was a secretary to a Congressman.He moved to California in 1849 and settled in Nevada City in 1850. There he was on the staff of the Nevada Daily Journal, eventually becoming that newspapers owner. He was admitted to the California bar in 1854 and began practicing in Nevada City, becoming attorney for Nevada County in 1856. He was served in the Senate in 1856.Sargent was elected as a Republican to the Congress; skipped several terms and was reelected to the 41st and Congresses. In 1861 he was the author of the first Railroad Act that was passed in Congress. He was elected to the States Senate and served 1873 to 1879. During his time in the Senate he was chairman of the Senate Committee on Mines and Mining during the 44th Congress and chairman of the Senate Committee on Naval Affairs during the 45th Congress.In January 1878, Senator Sargent introduced the 29 words that would later become the 19th Amendment to the Constitution of the United States, allowing women the right to vote. Sargents wife, Clark Sargent, was a leading voting rights advocate, and a friend of such suffrage leaders as B. Anthony. The bill calling for the amendment would be introduced unsuccessfully each year for the next forty years.  Sargent returned to California in 1880.After leaving the Senate he practiced law in Francisco for three years, leaving to become States Ambassador to Germany for two years, and held office until the action of the German authorities in excluding American pork from the empire made his incumbency personally distasteful. He turned down the appointment of Ambassador to Russia after H. Hunts death and made an unsuccessful attempt for the Republican nomination for the Senate in 1885.He died in San Francisco in 1887.()  He was buried in the Cemetery in City, California.(Findagrave.com lists Sargent as being buried at Holy Cross Cemetery in Colma, California)ReferencesExternal linksAugustus SargentAugustus SargentAugustus Sargent
